He may drink wine, sing and dance in gatherings of men and women.
He may cheerfully enjoy such pleasures all day long more and more often.
He may outwardly ask and pray for happiness but inwardly welcome licentiousness.
After being intoxicated, may seek each other out as an expedient .
Furthermore, they may engage in satisfying their licentious feelings.
When they consummate sexual union their joy is beyond comparison.
They indulge in sensuality, which binds them. There is nothing they recognize.
At that moment, there is only pleasure.
They do not realize the stink and ﬁlth of impure bodily ﬂuids, or the suffering and pain in hell .
First, such men are laughable.
Second, they are pitiful.
For instance, they are just like crazy wild men who do not know their own faults.
This is the fourth evil aspect of men.
Men have these four evils, by which they fall into the three evil realms.
You must discern this deeply and then you will avoid suffering.
Furthermore, you will hear of women’s evils.” The Buddha explained in verse: are considered to be moved by desire. They are unscrupulous and unable to be peaceful. They are accustomed to illicitness. How could they be considered to be wise?
Out of desire they do the deeds of animals, And out of desire they destroy themselves at the same time. They are like maggots that create bad odors. They do not know that they are in severe difﬁculties. Just like maggots in a dirty place, They do not know the difference between east and west. They are bound by licentious desire. Probably are a kind of insect. Because of licentiousness they cannot see the path. They plant the roots of sin day and night. Presently the relationship between sovereign and subject is in disorder. The upper and lower classes are indistinct and mixed up together. The laws of the land are confused. State affairs are uncertain and troubled. Farmers give up their normal occupations. Merchants unite for the sake of valuables. The present world is a prison to a greater degree. After death enter Mount Tai, Where they must suffer from a hundred kinds of poisons. The pain is unspeakable. Molten copper is poured into their mouths. The mountain vehicle runs over their bodies. 41 These kinds are counted in the hundreds. It is difﬁcult to explain them all one by one. 42 They always remain in the three evil realms, Into which they transmigrate, just as if on a wheel. Even if the Buddha exists in the world at that time, They cannot hear . Women do evil to the extreme. It is hard to give them causes and conditions. Once they bind a man with kindness and affection, They take him through the gate of sin. What good points do women have? They just have various impurities. Why do they not attentively believe what is right? Yet for these , go crazy and wild. Inside they stink and are ﬁlthy. Outwardly they look neatly and properly dressed. In addition, in their mouths is a poisonous insect. They are as dangerous as a snake or dragon. For instance are just like a lance wrapped in brocade, Or the sharp point of a knife draped in silk crepe. The ignorant sees the appearance . He ﬁnds pleasure in them, inviting disaster. 43 The wise is aware of and leave off from them. 44 The shallow men cause casualties. Carnal desire is like this, too. take knives in their hands and destroy themselves. They see the new and then become tired of it. Therefore their enjoyments are also impermanent. speech is like cutting with a sword or ax. Their smiles are like being pricked by a thorn. 45 They harbor smelly and ﬁlthy poison inside the mind, And decorate the outside beautifully and fragrantly. The ignorant sees them joyfully. He does not think of suffering from disaster he will receive later. For instance, is just like a poisonous drug That is mixed with nectar. The shallow men covet the taste. Those who have drunk it all fall ﬂat on the ﬂoor. are also like ﬁrewood that catches ﬁre, Or grass and trees covered by heavy frost. Wherever face, everything is demolished. This is the most inauspicious. Women’s poison is worse than this. No one can see their whole shape. The surface is seen, yet the hidden side is not. Therefore, if one has carnal desire, His demeanor is very easily seen. The shallow men do not cut off this feeling. 46 Cut off desires in order to seek the Way! You may diverge even a little from the Way. People are, originally clean and pure. They are just like ﬁsh that live in an abyss. Nets are pitched on all sides, And the ﬁsh that are caught cannot return. The net of desire is more strenuous than this. Uniting with is more than just being strong. The wise men are able to realize this by themselves, And can escape from that condition. are just like a hungry ape That sees ripe sweet fruit, And throws itself into the thorny shrubs, taking a risk. Such men are numerous and fall into . are also like a ﬁsh that swallows a hook, Or a moth that ﬂies into a lamp, Devotedly throwing itself into ﬁre, seeking danger, Without thinking it will later suffer from disaster. The Buddha spoke in this way.
King Udayana was greatly delighted.
He promptly bowed his head to the ground and addressed the Buddha, “Since the time I was born I truly did not hear about these evil aspects of women, and men, following them, go against and fall into evil.
I just did not know about it. Therefore, I did not control my mind and intentions.
From now on I will repent all through my life, take refuge in the Three Revered Ones, and will not venture to violate it again.” He bowed to the Buddha, was joyful, and withdrew.
A book says:
Zhongni said, “Women and mean men are difﬁcult to manage.
If you become acquainted with them, they become haughty.
If you stay away from them, they become discontented.” 47 Therefore a sutra says:
Women who bewitch men with seductive charms have eighty-four aspects.
There are eight serious aspects, which intelligent men hate.
First is jealousy.
Second is reckless anger.
Third is using abusive language.
Fourth is cursing.
Fifth is suppressing others.
Sixth is stinginess and greed.
Seventh is loving to adorn themselves.
Last is using poisons.
These are the eight serious aspects .
48 Because of these women have many and various seductive charms.
I pray that you will reject their ﬂattering evils in order to seek the true Dharma.
Attain renunciation of the world soon to beneﬁt yourself as well as others!
Furthermore, the zhidu lun says:
As for women’s characteristics, if respects , she causes his spirits to be high.
If she abandons the wish to treat respectfully, she causes him to feel afraid of her.
In this way, women usually bring deﬁlement, anxiety, and fear to people.
How can we be close to them or become intimate with them?
As it is said, a king had a daughter whose name was Kumuda.
There was a ﬁsherman called Shuboqie.
49 While following a path he saw the princess on a top ﬂoor of a tall building in the distance.
Seeing her face in the window, he imagined her and developed attachment to her.
He did not forget her even for a moment.
As time passed he could not eat and drink.
His mother asked him the reason.
He replied to her with emotion, “I saw the princess and I cannot forget her.” The mother reasoned with him, “You are a poor commoner while the princess is noble.
You cannot win her .” The son said, “I think of her with happiness and I cannot forget her even for a moment.
If it does not go as I wish, I will not be able to go on living.” The mother went to the palace for her son’s sake.
She had frequently sent rich foods, such as ﬁsh and fowl, to present to the princess without receiving any money.
The princess felt strange and asked , “What do you seek?” The mother replied to the princess, “Please ask all the servants to leave the room.
I must tell you my feelings.
I have an only son, who respects and loves you, Princess. He has become depressed because of his affection for you and is ill.
Now his life will not last much longer.
Please take compassion on him and save his life.” The princess told her, “You must leave now!
On the ﬁfteenth day of the month,  stand behind a god image in a certain shrine.” The mother returned and said to her son, “What you wish is already accomplished.” She told him as described above.
The son bathed, put on new clothes, and went to stand behind the god image.
When the time came, the princess addressed her father, the king, “There is something inauspicious .
I must go to a shrine in order to seek auspiciousness and happiness.” The king said, “Very good!” Five hundred vehicles were accordingly adorned. The princess went out and soon arrived at the shrine.
She ordered all her attendants to stay at the gate and entered the shrine alone.
The heavenly god thought , “This should be not so.
The king is my donor.
I cannot let this mean man defame and disgrace the princess.” immediately detested the man and put him to sleep and let him not wake up.
The princess, having entered , saw him sleeping deeply. She pushed him but he did not wake up.
Then she left him a necklace of precious stones as valuable as a hundred thousand taels of gold and departed.
Later the man woke up and saw the necklace.
He asked people .
Then knew that the princess had come.
The vow of his affection was not fulﬁlled. He felt sad and regretful, remorseful and angry.
The ﬁre of sensuality broke out within him and he burned up and died.
From this testimony it is known that a woman’s mind does not choose what is noble and what is humble but only engages in desire.
Furthermore, the Sapoduo lun says:
would rather be inside the mouth of a venomous serpent’s , because of his status. Do not consort with women.
A serpent has three ways to harm people: When it is seen, it causes harm to people.
When it is touched, it harms people.
When it bites, it harms people.
Women have also three kinds of ways to cause harm.
If sees a woman and produces the thought of desire, he destroys the people’s wholesome Dharma.
If he touches a woman, he is guilty of the offense of probation and destroys the people’s wholesome Dharma.
If he has sexual intercourse with , he is guilty of a grave offense and destroys the people’s wholesome Dharma.
First, if he is harmed by a venomous serpent, only his body is harmed.
If he is harmed by a woman, numberless bodies are harmed.
Second, if he is harmed by a venomous serpent, he attains a body of neither good nor evil , which has no reward or retribution from the injury.
If he is harmed by a woman the body of the wholesome Dharma is harmed.
Third, if he is harmed by a venomous serpent, the body of the ﬁve kinds of consciousnesses is harmed.
If he is harmed by a woman, the body of the six kinds of consciousnesses is harmed.
Fourth, if he is harmed by a venomous serpent, he can still join the community .
If he is harmed by a woman, he cannot act with other monks.
Fifth, if he is harmed by a venomous serpent, he will be able to be reborn in heaven and to meet wise ones and sages in the realm of human beings.
If he is harmed by a woman, he will enter the three evil realms.
Sixth, if he is harmed by a venomous serpent, he is able to attain the śramaṇa’s four fruits of sainthood because of it.
If he is harmed by a woman, he cannot beneﬁt from the eightfold holy path.
Seventh, if he is harmed by a venomous serpent, people kindly think of him, and relieve and nurse him.
If he is harmed by a woman, the people altogether reject him and have no joy in their minds.
Because of these causes and conditions, would rather be inside of a venomous serpent’s mouth , because of his status.
After all, he should not touch a woman at all for these .
Moreover, the Zengyi ahan jing says:
“Women have ﬁve kinds of powers with which they are disrespectful to their husbands.
What are the ﬁve kinds?
First is the power of female charms.
Second is the power of their kinsmen.
Third is the power of their farmlands.
Fourth is the power of their sons.
Fifth is the power of self-protection.
This means that women have these ﬁve kinds of powers, with which they are accordingly disrespectful to their husbands.
If a husband has a power, he will completely conquer his women.
It is what is called the power of wealth and high position.
The harmful Māra-pāpīyān has ﬁve kinds of powers, too.
They are what are called form, sound, smell, taste, and touch .
If ignorant people become attached to these ﬁve elements they cannot attain liberation.
If a disciple of the Sage attains a single power, which is called the power of not being indolent, he will not be restrained .
Then he will be able to discern the law of birth, aging, sickness, and death, and defeat the devil ’s ﬁve powers.
He will not fall into the realm of devils and will reach the place of wuwei .” At that time, the World-honored One accordingly spoke these verses: The precepts are a path of nectar. Being indolent is a path of death.
If you are not greedy, you will not die. Losing the Way is to lose yourself. At that time, the World-honored One told all the bhikṣus, “Women have ﬁve thoughts of desire.
What are these ﬁve ?
First is to be born in an inﬂuential and noble family.
Second is to marry into a wealthy and noble family.
Third is to cause her husband to follow her words and do what she says.
Fourth is to have many sons.
Fifth is to be able to do everything according to her own at home.
This means that have these ﬁve matters as their thoughts of desire.” Further, the Daweide tuoluoni jing says:
The Buddha told Ānanda, “For instance, just as when in a great sandy place a drop of water moistens the sand, will penetrate it.
If a woman receives the good fortune of desire with a thousand men, she cannot be made content.
This woman has three things with which she does not know to be content.
First, she adorns herself.
Second, she receives the pleasures of desire from a nearby man.
Third, she loves ﬂattering compliments.
“Ānanda, this woman has ﬁve holes for worms, while men do not have these.
Her ﬁve worms exit within her vagina.
One hole has eight thousand worms.
has two heads, each of which has a mouth.
are all like a pointed needles.
Those worms continuously trouble her and eat in her.
They cause her to make actions and to repeat them.
Therefore she is caused to act.
Therefore, they are called annoyance.
Licentious women thus do not work together with the Dharma.
Through karmic retribution they give rise to the actions of desire and become greedily attached to men without knowing contentment.
When these women see a man they immediately say ﬁne things, look up to him, and gaze at him closely for a long time.
After gazing at him they look at him again, look up to him respectfully, and observe him while thinking of a love affair in their minds.
On their face an evil look is seen. They wish to take on other looks.
They bite their lower lips with the teeth. Their faces turn bluish-purple.
Because of their desires sweat beads on their foreheads.
When they sit idly they do not want to stand up .
When they stand up they do not want to sit down again.
Just as tree branches extend down to the ground, playfully wave both of their hands.
Some walk three steps and when they take the fourth step they look up to the left and right.
At the door, some frown, moan, or heave a sigh.
They wiggle, lift their garments with the left hand, and pat their thighs with the right hand.
In addition, they rub their teeth with their ﬁngernails, or they pick their teeth with grass or a twig from a tree.
They scratch lightly the back of their heads with the hand.
They expose their calves and make other men whistle.
They walk calmly but when they stumble and fall, they anxiously look in all directions.
From such characteristics you must know women only want to initiate a love affair.
Detest and leave ! Reject and abandon them! Do not cause yourself to transmigrate and to be born in the great darkness.” Moreover, the Zhengfanian jing says:
A heavenly bird spoke for the sake of all the heavenly gods in verse: Women are not eternal friends. They are just like lamp ﬂames that do not stay still. They really frequently have ill-will. They are just like patterns on talc. They are intimate only with wealthy men. 50 If has no property, they dislike him. If has property, women come close to him. He who has no property is rejected by women. Giving goods and offerings, make various merit.
51 minds are just like a ﬂame, Which cannot grasp in their hands. Men comply with in this way, Just as what wish for in their minds. are like this, But women always delude men. Just like a snake covered with ﬂowers, Or a ﬁre covered with dust. Form covers the mind in this way. 52 Women are also like this. Just as one sees a poisonous tree Which delights his eyes, but is unwholesome. Women are like poisonous ﬂowers. The wise should reject them and part from them. The Ahan koujie shier yinyuan jing further says:
There was an arhat who discerned with the divine eye and saw that numerous women fell into hell.
Then he asked the Buddha, “What are the reasons for this?” The Buddha said, “It is because of four causes and conditions.
First, it is because have numerous desires and are greedy for valuables, treasures, and clothes.
Second, it is because they feel jealous of each other.
Third, it is because they prattle.
Fourth, it is because they frequently have unrestrained manners and licentious intentions.
Because of these causes and conditions, who fall into hell are numerous.” Verses say: The ﬁve desires trouble the root of the spirit. The six thieves confuse the state of our mind and body. 53 Illusory ﬂames ﬂoat in the air, chasing our feelings. The net of attachment is woven following our mind. Even though the season has changed from autumn to winter, Murderous schemes have not come to the end. I look at a dove, but I have nothing to debate at all. An ape hangs on and rests here.
54 Entering the Way Introduction, Delight and Revulsion, Tonsure, and Quoted Testimonies. The clergy and secular people differ from each other in appearance. Pure and impure are distinguished from each other in destination.
Since good and evil are not equal to each other, reward and retribution are not the same.
When we, would like to see the ways of benevolence, justice, and great virtue we should seek models of decorum and the profound rules.
Accordingly, we can give up what we have treasured, part from our parents, and reject honored and inﬂuential positions.
We are temperate in eating delicious foods, adopt a vegetarian diet, and practice asceticism.
A plain robe covers the body. We do not care for adornments to amuse ourselves.
We use things complying with what we like and set our bodies at ease. We do not seek fame and wealth.
We suppress the three poisons and restrain desires.
With the eight superior qualities of the Buddha’s voice, in the three thousand Buddhist rules of deportment, and the manners of observing the ﬁve hundred precepts, our movements are proper. They all have standards.
There are twelve different divisions of eighty thousand sutras, which are expounded and by which Buddhist practitioners’ minds unite with the Buddha.
They beneﬁt sentient beings at all times.
It can be said that they are a model for heavenly and human beings and a boat to enter the Way.
As the Wenshu wen jing says:
The Buddha told Mañjuśrī, “In all various merits  are not equal to the minds of those who have renounced the world.
Because those who remain householders have immeasurable demerits and those who have renounced the world have immeasurable merits.
Those who remain householders have hindrances while those who have renounced the world have no hindrances.
Those who remain householders do various evil actions, but those who have renounced the world leave behind all evil actions.
Those who remain householders are in a place of dust and dirt while those who have renounced the world are in a place where dust and dirt have been removed.
Those who remain householders drown in the mud of desires, but those who have renounced the world are free from the mud of desires.
Those who remain householders follow the ways of the ignorant while those who have renounced the world stay away from the ways of the ignorant.
Those who remain householders do not attain right livelihoods but those who have renounced the world attain right livelihood.
Those who remain householders are in a place of anxiety, sadness, and anger, while those who have renounced the world are in a place of bliss.
“Those who remain householders are in a place of deﬁlements, but those who have renounced the world are in a place of liberation.
Those who remain householders are in a place of harm while those who have renounced the world are in a place without harm.
Those who remain householders are greedy for beneﬁt and happiness, but those who have renounced the world have no greed for beneﬁt and happiness.
Those who remain householders are in a place of confusion and noise while those who have renounced the world are in a place of tranquility.
Those who remain householders are in a humble place but those who have renounced the world are in a noble place.
Those who remain householders are burned by deﬁlements while those who have renounced the world extinguish the ﬁre of deﬁlements.
Those who remain householders always exist and behave for others but those who have renounced the world always exist and behave for themselves.
Those who remain householders consider suffering to be happiness while those who have renounced the world consider liberation to be happiness.
Those who remain householders grow harshness but those who have renounced the world can exterminate harshness.
Those who remain householders attain inferior teachings while those who have renounced the world attain the great Dharma.
Those who remain householders do not have the essence of the Dharma but those who have renounced the world have it.
Those who remain householders are reviled by the three vehicles while those who have renounced the world are praised by them.
Those who remain householders are never content, but those who have renounced the world are always content.
Those who remain householders are thought of fondly by the king of devils, while those who have renounced the world terrify the devils.
“Those who remain householders are often self-indulgent but those who have renounced the world are never self-indulgent.
Those who remain householders are servants of other people while those who have renounced the world are the masters of servants.
Those who remain householders are in a dark place, but those who have renounced the world are in a bright place.
Those who remain householders are in a place in which arrogance increases while those who have renounced the world are in a place in which arrogance is exterminated.
Those who remain householders are rewarded a little, but those who have renounced the world are bountifully rewarded.
Those who remain householders often act against their wills in order to ﬂatter others while those who have renounced the world have simple and honest minds.
Those who remain householders continually have anxiety and suffering, but those who have renounced the world continually hold joy in their minds.
Those who remain householders are under the law of deception while those who have renounced the world are under the law of truth.
Those who remain householders are often confused, but those who have renounced the world are never confused.
Those who remain householders are in a place of the transmigration  while those who have renounced the world are in a place free from transmigration.
Those who remain householders are just like poisonous drugs, but those who renounce the world are like nectar.
Those who remain householders lose introspection while those who have renounced the world attain introspection.
Those who remain householders have no place in which to take refuge, but those who have renounced the world have it.
“Those who remain householders frequently become angry while those who have renounced the world frequently practice acts of benevolence.
Those who remain householders have heavy responsibilities, but those who have renounced the world have parted from them.
Those who remain householders incur sins while those who have renounced the world have no sin.
Those who remain householders transmigrate in birth and death, but those who have renounced the world have a limit .
Those who remain householders consider property to be treasure while those who have renounced the world consider merit to be treasure.
Those who remain householders follow the current of birth and death, but those who have renounced the world go against the current of birth and death.
Those who remain householders are in the ocean of deﬁlements while those who renounce the world are on a great ship.
Those who remain householders are bound by deﬁlements, but those who have renounced the world leave behind deﬁlements.
Those who remain householders are led and admonished by a sovereign while those who have renounced the world are taught and admonished with the Buddhist Dharma.
Those who remain householders can easily obtain companions, but those who have renounced the world do not easily obtain companions.
For those who remain householders, to harm others is victory while for those who have renounced the world, to save sentient beings is excellent.
Those who remain householders increase deﬁlements, but those who have renounced the world leave deﬁlements behind.
Those who remain householders are just like in a patch of thorns while those who have renounced the world are free from the patch of thorns.
“O Mañjuśrī!
If I were to revile those who remain householders and praise those who have renounced the world, even if my words  ﬁll the empty air, my speech would still be inexhaustible.
This is called the demerits of those who remain householders and the merits of those who have renounced the world.” Moreover, the Nirvāṇa-sūtra says:
Those who remain householders are pressed as if they are in prison.
All deﬁlements arise because of this.
Those who have renounced the world are as magnanimous and open as the empty sky.
All good things increase and advance because of this.
People who remain householders anxiously think of their spouses and children internally, and outwardly they busily run about in the military services for a sovereign.
If they are wealthy, in a high position, and very successful, then they are self-indulgent.
If they are poverty-stricken and humble, then they lose their ambition because of hunger and cold.
They are disturbed in public and private and work diligently day and night.
Numerous duties drag and bind them. How can they have spare time to cultivate themselves in the Way?
Furthermore, the Yuqie changzhe jing says:
55 Those who remain householders have numerous deﬁlements.
They are bound by affection for their father, mother, wife, and children.
They always think of property or a love affair and greedily seek these things insatiably.
When they obtain them then they have numerous worries about protecting them.
They transmigrate in the six realms. They go against and are separated from the Buddhist Dharma.
They are regarded as enemies who hate the thought of good Buddhist teachers . They should develop revulsion for their home life and actively give rise to the ambition to renounce the world.
There is no chance for those who remain householders to receive training in the path to highest enlightenment.
Due to renouncing the world they all attain the highest path.
Those who remain householders are ﬁlthy while those who have renounced the world are excellent.
Those who remain householders are restricted while those who have renounced the world are liberated.
Those who remain householders frequently experience pain but those who have renounced the world are joyful.
Those who remain householders are humble while those who have renounced the world are noble.
Those who remain householders are servants while those who have renounced the world are masters.
Those who remain householders depend on others, but those who have renounced the world are unrestricted.
Those who remain householders have many anxieties while those who have renounced the world have no anxiety.
Those who remain householders have heavy responsibilities, but those who have renounced the world have abandoned responsibilities.
Those who remain householders must attend to their duties in haste, but those who have renounced the world are peaceful and calm in mind.
In addition, the Chujia gongde jing  says:
56 If one releases male and female slaves and other people, and renounces the world, his merit is immeasurable.
For instance, if one makes offerings to arhats who ﬁll the four continents on all sides of Mount Sumeru for a hundred years, such a person is not as good as someone who, for the sake of nirvana, renounces the world and receives the precepts even for a single day and night. This person’s merit is immeasurable.
Moreover, if one erects a high stupa of the seven treasures which reaches Trāyastriṃśa Heaven, the merit is not as good as that of one who has renounced the world.
Furthermore, the Dayuan jing says, 57 “Because of renouncing the world for even one day and one night, he will not fall into the three evil realms for twenty kalpas.” Moreover, the sengqi lü
Those who renounce the world for even a single day and night and who cultivate themselves in pure practice will leave behind the suffering of the three evil realms for six hundred six thousand and sixty years. 58 Again, the Chujia gongde jing says:
If one causes those who have renounced the world to suffer, disturbs their cultivation, and restrains them, that person precisely cuts off the seed of buddhahood.
All evils gather upon him just as the ocean.
He will get leprosy in his present existence, and after death he will enter the dark hell.
There is no chance for him to come out of it.
59 Furthermore, the Jiashe jing says:
60 At that time the great king and the crown prince heard that the merit of renouncing the world is very deep.
At the same time they all awakened the aspiration to renounce the world.
On the four continents on all sides of Mount Sumeru there was not even a single sentient being who was remaining at home.
61 Everyone awakened aspiration and wished to renounce the world.
Since all those sentient beings already renounced the world they did not need to plant .
On their land various nonglutinous rice and trees spontaneously grew, and their clothes were all supplied by heavenly beings.
Further, the Fozang jing says:
You must pursue the Way wholeheartedly and practice according to the Dharma.
Do not think of food and clothing!
There are necessary things in the white curl of hair between the Tathāgata’s eyebrows. One supply is enough for all generations to come. All disciples who have renounced the world are also unable to exhaust them. 62 Moreover, the Xianyu jing says:
It is just as even if there were a hundred blind men but there is an excellent doctor, he can cure their vision and immediately cause them to see clearly.
In addition, even if there were a hundred people whose eyes should be gouged out as punishment, if someone has the capability to rescue them from the punishment, he will cause them to not lose their eyes.
Even though the merit of these two people is immeasurable, it is still not as good as a person who causes other people to renounce the world and who renounces the world for himself. His virtue is boundless.
First of all, if you intend to renounce the world relying on the Vinayas, invite two masters in advance:
an upādhyāya and an ācārya.
The Sapoduo lun says:
Even if the upādhyāya has ﬁrst been invited, but when one receives the ten wholesome precepts the upādhyāya has not yet appeared, that person will still attain the ten wholesome precepts.
If one learns of the death , then he is unable to receive the precepts.
If he has not heard of the death , then he can complete receiving the precepts.
As for the ācārya, it is the same.
Furthermore, the Qingxinshi duren jing  says:
63 If you intend to take the tonsure, ﬁrst sprinkle fragrant hot water all over the ground of the place for tonsure, hang banners on four sides within a seven-chi circumference, arrange a raised seat intended for the one who is renouncing the world to sit, and then make two more distinctive seats intended for the two masters to sit.
He who wishes to renounce the world puts on his regular secular clothes.
He says goodbye to his parents and his esteemed relatives.
After that, he says in verse:
While I transmigrate in the three realms of existence, I cannot leave behind your kindness and love. Giving up kindness and entering nirvana are True requital for kindness. After reciting this verse, he removes his secular clothes.
The Shanjian lun says, “ should take a bath of fragrant hot water and remove the traces of a layman.” The Duren jing says:
64 Even though puts on monk’s clothes, he can only put on the nivāsana and saṃkakṣikā robes; he cannot yet put on the kaṣāya.
When he enters a the Buddhist seminary he should go before his upādhyāya and kneel on his right knee.
The upādhyāya should give rise to the thought a child and cannot give rise to a malicious or mean-spirited intention.
The disciple should give rise to the thought of his master as his father, and esteem and serve him.
The upādhyāya preaches the Dharma variously for , and admonishes and encourages his mind.
Then, goes before the ācārya and sits there.
The Shanjian lun says:
65 In addition to being sprinkled with fragrant hot water, is praised in verse:
Good, a real person! You can understand the world is impermanent. You abandon the secular world and go to nirvana. It is very rare and beyond the mind and language.
After this verse is spoken, he is directed to bow to the buddha lands in the ten directions. Again, a verse of praise is uttered:
You take refuge in the great World-honored One. You can cross over the suffering of the three realms of existence. You also wish that all sentient beings will Universally enter the happiness of nirvana.
After this verse is spoken, the ācārya then shaves his head.
The Duren jing says:
When he takes the tonsure, bystanders chant hymns of renouncing the world for him: You alter your appearance and abide by your ambition and moral fortitude.
You give up what you have treasured and have nothing to love. You forsake your home and enter the sacred way. You wish to liberate all people.
When he is tonsured he must leave a few hairs on the crown of the head unshaved, come before the upādhyāya, and kneel on his right knee.
The upādhyāya asks him, “Now I will remove the hair on the crown of your head for you.
Do you allow me to do so?” He answers, “Yes!” Then the upādhyāya puts a kaṣāya on him.
At the moment when the is put on, according to the Shanjian lun, a verse of praise is recited:
How great is the robe of liberation ! It is the formless dress of the ﬁeld of merit. You put it on as respectfully as practicing in accordance with the precepts. And extensively liberate all sentient beings. The Duren jing says:
After putting on a kaṣāya bows to the buddha and then walks around it chanting a sutra.
The Buddhist clergy and laypeople follow behind him and circumambulate three times.
recites a verse, developing the celebratory intention:
Good fortune! Of those who encounter the Buddha, Who is not happy? With my meritorious vow, I meet him in this existence. I now attain the merit of the Buddhist law.
66 After circumambulating while chanting a sutra, he again bows to the gathering and the two masters.
After that, he goes to his seat and stays there. He receives the respects his relatives of the six relations pay to him.
Bearing the intention of renouncing the world and leaving behind the secular world, he is happy in mind.
His parents and relatives all bow to him, and they are delighted with his aspiration for enlightenment .
Finally, at the midpoint of or before the tonsure ceremony meals should be provided to the Buddhist monks.
According to the Pinimu lun, 67 “He receives the tonsure and dons a kaṣāya.
Then his upādhyāya gives him the Three Refuges, the ﬁve precepts, and other teachings.” (If one has never attended a Buddhist service , it is impossible to completely explain .
If one makes allowances for at the time of taking it, his or her rebirth in a wholesome place will be more successful.) As the Zabao zang jing says:
Formerly there was a woman who was especially good-looking.
She renounced the world and cultivated herself according to a non-Buddhist teaching.
At that time someone asked her, “Your appearance is so beautiful.
You should have stayed in the secular world.
Why did you renounce the world?” The woman replied, “I was not bad looking, just as I am today, but I have detested licentious desire ever since I was young.
Therefore, I have renounced the world. When I was living at my home I was disposed early in life because I was good-looking, and soon I gave birth to a boy.
My son consequently grew up. He is inimitably handsome.
“He came to feel emaciated and weak; he looked like an ill person.
I then asked my son about the reason and condition of his illness.
My son was not willing to tell me.
I did not stop asking him.
He could not stop me and told me, his mother, ‘I dare not speak honestly because I am afraid I will not escape from death.
If I honestly explained all, I would feel extremely ashamed.’ Accordingly, he told me, his mother, ‘I wanted to possess you, mother, in order to secretly satisfy my carnal desire. I cannot have you.
Therefore, I simply became ill.’ I, his mother, immediately said, ‘Since ancient times on, how could there have been such a matter?’ Again, I thought to myself, ‘If I do not subordinate , my son will possibly die.
I would rather defy reason in order to keep him alive.’ Then I called my son and intended to meet his will .
When my son was climbing onto my bed, however, the ﬂoor split open and my son instantly fell into alive.
I was frightened. I tried to pull him back and caught my son’s hair in my hands.
Therefore, I still have my son’s hair today, which I keep in my bosom.
I was keenly moved by this matter and because of this event I renounced the world.” Furthermore, the zhidu lun says:
In the Buddhist Dharma, even if those who have renounced the world violate the precepts and are punished , they will attain liberation after their punishment comes to an end.
Just as the Youboluohua biqiuni bensheng jing says, 68 when the Buddha resided in this world, a bhikṣuṇī acquired the six supernatural powers and attained the fruit of arhatship.
She entered the residences of the nobility and always praised the teaching of renouncing the world. She told all the women of distinguished families, “My sisters!
You should renounce the world.” All the noblewomen said, “We are young and energetic, and very beautiful in appearance.
It is difﬁcult to observe the precepts.
Or we must now be violating precepts.” This bhikṣuṇī said, “If you violate the precepts, then violate them!
Just renounce the world!” asked, “Those who violate the precepts will fall into hell.
Why would we violate them?” replied, “If you fall into hell, then fall!” All the noblewomen laughed at this and said, “Hell is a place of punishment.
Why should we fall into it?” The bhikṣuṇī said, “I recollect my former existences.
At one time I was an actress, and I wore various costumes and spoke miscellaneous languages.
Then once I cracked a joke and laughed as I put on a bhikṣuṇī’s robe.
Because of this cause and condition, I became a bhikṣuṇī at the time of Kāśyapa Buddha.
Presuming on my distinguished family background and good looks, I gave rise to haughtiness in mind and violated the Buddhist precepts.
Therefore, I fell into hell and suffered various sorts of punishments.
After I had ﬁnished suffering from all the punishments, I met Śākyamuni Buddha. I renounced the world and attained the path of arhatship.
Even if I again violate the precepts I will be able to attain fruition of the Way .” In addition, when the Buddha resided at Jeta Grove Monastery, a drunken brahman came to the Buddha’s place and asked to make him a bhikṣu.
The Buddha ordered Ānanda to have head shaved and to put a Dharma robe on him. The brahman soon recovered from his drunkenness.
Frightened that he had suddenly became a bhikṣu, he promptly ran away.
All the bhikṣus asked the Buddha, “Why did you allow this drunken brahman to become a bhikṣu?” The Buddha replied, “This brahman has had no ambition to renounce the world for immeasurable kalpas, but now he got drunk. Therefore, he abruptly slightly awakened the aspiration.
Because of this cause and condition, later he will renounce the world and attain the Way.
Through various sorts of causes and conditions like this, the proﬁts and merits of renouncing the world are immeasurable.
Because of this, even though laypeople have the ﬁve precepts, they are not as good as those who have renounced the world, whose merits are great.” Further, the Zabao zang jing says:
In the past King Udāyi lived in the city of Roruka.
He was sagacious and perspicacious, and had great wisdom.
He had a wife called Candraprabhā a rare beauty who had virtuous conduct as well.
The king loved and respected her very much.
In the laws of his country at that time sovereigns did not play the lute themselves.
At that time, was in an inner chamber happily playing together with the king.
Presuming on being the king’s favorite, she sent a lute for the king to play and rose up and danced for him of her own accord.
When she raised her hands at the beginning, the king, who was originally good at physiognomy, saw that the shadow of death had already appeared on his wife’s face.
He counted the remainder of her life, which was no more than seven days.
The king immediately let go of the lute and sadly heaved a deep sigh.
said to the king, “I receive your favor and dared to ask you, king, to play the lute in the inner chamber, and I got up and danced for you of my own accord.
By doing so, we enjoyed ourselves.
What discomfort do you feel that you put down the lute and sighed deeply?
Please tell me.” The king was unwilling to answer. was polite but did not stop asking.
The king sincerely answered.
When his wife heard , she became very anxious and afraid.
She then said to the king, “I have heard from a bhikṣuṇī of the stone chamber that if one can renounce the world with faith for even one day, he or she will surely be able to be reborn in heaven.
I wish to renounce the world.
Please, king, listen to me and allow me .” The king loved his wife very much, so he told her, “At the beginning of the sixth day I will allow you to leave me.” They both honored one another’s intentions.
When the sixth day came, the king said to his wife, “You have a wholesome mind and wish to renounce the world.
If you are able to be reborn in heaven, be sure to come and see me.
I will then allow you to leave.” After taking this oath, she was given leave.
Then was able to renounce the world and received the eight precepts of abstinence.
Accordingly, on that same day she drank some syrup made of sugar candy, which coagulated and formed a lump in her stomach.
On the morning of the seventh day her life came to an end.
Due to the advantage of her wholesome condition she was able to be reborn in heaven.
remembered her original oath and went to visit the king.
Light brightly illuminated the entire palace.
At that time, the king asked, “Who are you?” The heavenly being answered, “King, I was your wife, Lady Candraprabhā.” The king happily said, “Please come and be seated.” The heavenly being answered, “King, I now see that you smell bad and are ﬁlthy. I am unable to come close to you.
Because of my previous oath, however, I came here to see you, king.” On hearing this, King Udāyi was fascinated and liberated in mind.
He exclaimed, “This heavenly being used to be my wife.
She renounced the world for one day and then was able to be reborn in heaven.
Her spirit is lofty and profound, so she now sees me to be vile.
Why shouldn’t I now renounce the world?
I once heard it said that one ﬁngernail of a heavenly being is worth one Jambudvīpa.
This country is not worthy for me to covet.” After saying this, abdicated the throne in favor of his son.
He renounced the world, cultivated himself according to the Way, and attained arhatship.
The zhidu lun therefore says in verse:
Even though peacocks adorn themselves with colors, They are not better than the wild swans and cranes that can ﬂy far. Even though laypeople possess wealth, high position, and power, They are not as good as those who renounce the world, whose merits are deep. Furthermore, the Za piyu jing says:
In the past, two brothers lived in the world.
They had wealth and rank; their property was immeasurable.
Their parents passed away and they had no one else on whom to rely.
Although they were brothers their ambitions differed.
The elder brother was fond of the Buddhist Dharma while the younger brother loved the family business.
The younger brother saw that the elder brother did not love their family business and frequently despised it.
“We are brothers, but our parents died early.
I diligently think of livelihood while you go against and desert our family business.
You chase after śramaṇas and receive the Buddhist scriptures through listening.
How can śramaṇas give you clothing, money, and jewels?
Our family has fallen into straitened circumstances. Our property is diminishing day by day.
We will become a negligent family laughed at by others.
To succeed to our parents’ is nothing more than ﬁlial piety.” The elder brother responded to him.
“ the ﬁve precepts and the ten wholesome acts, making offerings to the Three Treasures, and edifying our relatives with the Way are nothing more than ﬁlial piety.
It is the fate of nature that the clergy and the laity are contrary to each other.
What the clergy is delighted with is what the laity detests.
What the laity values is what the clergy despises.
The wise and the ignorant are not the same. There are light and darkness in strategies.
Therefore, the wise leaves behind darkness, goes to the light, and reaches truth through the Way.
What you are now delighted with is the counterfeit of distress.
How do you know about hardship?” The younger brother was angry. He tilted his head, not believing .
The elder brother saw that was like this.
Then he told his younger brother, “You are greedy for household affairs, and consider property to be valuable.
I am fond of the Dharma stated in sutras.
I take wisdom to be precious.
Now I want to leave home and take refuge in the ﬁeld of merit.
Counting the amount of time one has to live in the world, it passes as quickly as dust ﬂies.
is impermanent and suddenly arrives. We will be bound in punishments.
Therefore, I will renounce the world, avoid dangers, and go to the secure place.” The younger brother, seeing the elder brother’s inclination for the Buddhist Dharma, was silent and did not respond.
The elder brother left home and became a śramaṇa.
Day and night diligently sat in meditation and pondered.
His practice suited the teaching and he achieved the realization of the fruition of the Way.
The younger brother heard about this and his anger became more intense.
He became even more greedy in the family business, to a point to which he had never been.
Later his life came to an end and he fell among the cattle and became a tremendously fat ox.
A merchant bought him to carry raw salt to sell .
Coming and going several times, the ox consequently became emaciated and worn out. He could not advance further.
When he tried to climb a slope, he was exhausted, crippled in both legs, and he lay down and could not stand up. The merchant beat him.
Shaking his head, then and only then moved.
At that time, the elder brother traveled around by ﬂying through the air.
He saw his younger brother in the distance and said to him, “You, my younger brother, used to live in a farmhouse. Where are you now?
You threw yourself down among cattle.
Through my supernatural power I will illuminate and show you your original nature.
Accordingly you will recognize it yourself and reproach yourself, weeping.
You acted with unwholesomeness, you were stingy, greedy, and jealous.
You did not believe in the Buddhist Dharma and you were disrespectful to the sangha.
You did not trust in your elder brother’s words and butted against me, following only your own decisions, disregarding others.
Therefore, you  among cattle and you are now worn out and weakened.
Regret cannot mend matters.
I, your elder brother, know your innermost thoughts. I am brokenhearted and feel sorrow for you.” He accordingly told the owner of the ox the whole story of his brother.
When the merchant heard it he gave .
took the ox back to his monastery.
He caused to think of the Three Treasures.
The ox had food at all times.
After its life came to an end, it was able to be reborn in Trāyastriṃśa Heaven.
At that time, the merchant and the people all thought and said, “We make a living but we cannot make donations.
We do not know the Buddhist Dharma. Death is also fearful.” Then they all deserted their houses, giving up their wives and children.
They abandoned items of great value and became śramaṇas.
They were diligent and not negligent. They also all attained the Way.
Observing from this, worldly property and treasures are not beneﬁcial for people.
Admire and respect the Three Revered Ones! Cultivate yourselves and study the Way! Then you will obtain peace generation after generation.
Moreover, the Fufazang jing says:
In ancient times the arhat Sheyeduo, 69 one of eminent virtue, led all his disciples to visit the city of Takṣaśilā.
After arriving in the city he felt saddened and unhappy.
He went on for awhile and saw a crow in the road. He then smiled with pleasure.
His disciples asked their teacher, “Please tell us the story about this!” The eminent one replied, “When we ﬁrst arrived in the city, I saw under the city gate a young spirit.
He was starved and anxiously told me, ‘My mother entered the city to seek food for my sake.
Five hundred years have passed since the time I was separated from my mother.
I am impoverished with hunger and my stomach is empty. My life is coming to an end before long.
Eminent one, when you enter the city, if you see my mother please tell her about my hardship.
Pray tell her to come back soon!’ “Only then did I enter the city. Then I saw mother, to whom I completely explained her child’s wish.
The spirit mother answered to me, ‘Five hundred years have passed since the time I came into the city.
I have not been able to obtain even a single person’s nasal mucus or saliva.
My strength to produce is already weak and low.
Even if I am able to produce a small amount of saliva, all the other spirits snatch it from me.
I met a person and happened to obtain a little saliva.
I want to take it out of the city and share it with my child.
Under the gate, however, there are many powerful spirits.
I am afraid of them and do not dare go out.
Please, eminent one, send me out of the city. I am immediately going out.
Let me eat together with my child.’ I then asked the spirit, ‘When were you born?’ The spirit replied, ‘I have seen the rise and fall of this city seven times.’ I heard the spirit said, ‘I sigh over birth and death and suffering for a long time.’ Therefore, I was sad.
“As for the crow of that time, .
Ninety-one kalpas ago a buddha appeared in the world, called Vipassī.
At that time I was the child of a wealthy man of virtue.
I wished to attain renunciation of the world.
If I renounced the world at that point, I would have surely attained arhatship.
My parents, however, did not listen to me and compelled me to marry a charming wife.
Shortly after I married, I again sought to renounce the world.
My parents said to me, ‘If you have a son, we will release you.’ I subsequently received the teaching and later  had a boy.
When he became six years old, I again intended to leave home.
My parents taught my boy to hang on to my legs, crying, and say, ‘Father, if you desert me, who will bring me up?
You must ﬁrst kill me, then later you may go.’ At that time, seeing I became attached to him.
So I said to my son, ‘For your sake, I will not renounce the world again.’ Because of my child, from that time on I have transmigrated in the ﬁve realms for ninety-one kalpas and have been unable to see my son.
Now, with excellent discernment I observed that crow—my son from the previous existence.
I take pity on the ignorance under which he has been experiencing the transmigration of birth and death for a long time.
That is why I smiled.
“With this cause and condition, if someone again hinders another person from renouncing the world, that person will be retributively punished and continuously remain in evil realms, where he will receive extreme suffering.
There is nothing by which he may attain liberation.
After ﬁnishing the punishment of the evil realms, if he is reborn among human beings he will be blind, with no eyes.” Therefore, wise people, when they encounter someone who wishes to renounce the world, must exert themselves with expedient means to advise and help that person in his achievement.
Do not put obstacles in their way!
Again, the Chujia gongde jing says:
In ancient times when the Buddha resided in the world, he entered the city of Vaiśālī together with Ānanda.
At that time, they had come and begged for alms.
There was a prince, called Vīrasena, who amused himself with the court ladies on the top ﬂoor of a tall building.
Hearing a musical sound, the Buddha said to Ānanda, “I know that this person will most certainly die in seven days.
If he does not renounce the world, he will probably fall into hell.” After hearing this, Ānanda went to edify and exhorted him to renounce the world.
The prince listened to exhortation. For the ﬁrst six days exhausted his intention to take enjoyment, and on the seventh day he asked the Buddha to renounce the world.
For one day and night he practiced and observed the pure precepts.
Then, when his life came to an end, he was reborn in the realms of the four heavenly kings as a son of Vaiśravaṇa, the heavenly king of the northern direction.
Along with all his court ladies, he enjoyed the pleasures of desires arising in connection with the ﬁve senses.
His life in that heaven was terminated after ﬁve hundred years.
Later, he was reborn as a son of Śakra-devānām-indra in Trāyastriṃśa Heaven.
His life in that heaven was one thousand years.
Next, he was reborn as a prince of Yama .
His life span there was two thousand years.
Afterward he was reborn in Tuṣita Heaven again as a prince.
He died at the age of four thousand.
Next, he was born in Nirmāṇarati Heaven as the heavenly king’s son, and his life span was eight thousand years.
When his life in Nirmāṇarati Heaven came to an end, he was reborn in Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven, the sixth as a prince of the heavenly king.
He received the ﬁve desires along with all his court ladies.
following were extremely wonderful.
His life as a heavenly being was over after sixteen thousand years.
He received pleasures in this way.
He came and went seven times in the six heavens of the realm of desire and did not experience an early death.
He who renounces the world for even one day will not fall into evil realms for a full twenty kalpas, and will be continuously reborn in heaven, where he will receive happiness spontaneously.
He will be reborn last in the realm of human beings, where he will completely possess wealth, happiness, family property, and treasures.
He will feel revulsion toward the world when he approaches old age after passing through the prime of life.
Then he will renounce the world, cultivate himself in the Way, become a pratyekabuddha called Piliudili, 70 and extensively liberate limitless heavenly and human beings.
For this cause and condition the merit of renouncing the world is immeasurable, boundless, and beyond comparison.
Suppose that there are numerous arhats ﬁlling the four continents on all sides of Mount Sumeru, if a person completely exerts his mind to offer the four requisites to them without any shortage for a hundred years, or if someone erects a stupa for them when they enter nirvana and offers various things such as ﬂowers, incense, and necklaces, the merit they earn is still not as great as that of a person who seeks nirvana, renounces the world, and observes the precepts for even a single day and night.
From this, it is said that the virtue of renouncing the world is truly respectable.
You must not greedily become attached to secular matters such as not having enough money or women, wander about in the transmigration of birth and death, and give yourself pain.
The Zhong benqi jing speaks of Devadatta: [In the Qi dynasty he was called Tianre . When he was born, heavenly and human beings were all amazed and enthusiastic.
Therefore, he was given this name.] Moreover, the Wuxing she lun talks about Devadatta: [In the Tang dynasty he is called Tianshou or Tianyu , which means one who was obtained from heaven through entreating. Therefore, he is called Tianshou.] Further, the Zengyi ahan jing says:
Devadatta addressed the Buddha, “Please allow me to maintain the right path to attain the Way.” The Buddha said, “You should remain a householder, and be kind enough to give us alms.
It is really not easy to become a śramaṇa.” repeatedly asked the Buddha but  again told him, “You should not renounce the world.” Devadatta then gave rise to an evil thought, “This śramaṇa feels jealous of me.
I now had better shave my head by myself and study moral practices well.
Why do I have to take this śramaṇa’s words?” Devadatta later committed the ﬁve rebellious sins.
With an evil mind he intended to come to the Tathāgata’s place.
When landed on the ground, a big ﬁre and wind arose from underground and swirled around Devadatta’s body.
He was burned in the ﬁre.
He then wished to repent and call out, “Namas Buddha!” .
However, he was not actually able to ﬁnish it, and subsequently he entered hell.
Ānanda asked, sorrowfully sobbing, “How long will Devadatta remain in hell?” The Buddha replied, “He will be there for a great kalpa .
After his life there comes to an end he will be reborn in the heaven of the four heavenly kings.
He will wander from one heaven to another, and come to Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven.
He will pass through sixty kalpas without falling into the three evil realms.
Finally he will be reborn and become a pratyekabuddha called Namas, because he called out ‘Namas’ when his life was coming to an end.” At that time Mahāmaudgalyāyana said, “I would like to go to Avīci Hell, visit Devadatta, and console, cheer, and offer congratulations to him.” The Buddha said, “The sinners in Avīci Hell do not understand human beings’ sounds.” Maudgalyāyana addressed the Buddha, “I understand sixty-four kinds of sounds.
I should go and talk to him using these sounds.” Maudgalyāyana came to above Avīci Hell as quickly as the time it takes to bend and stretch out one’s arm.
From the air he commanded, “Devadatta!” A hell warden replied, “In this section there are  Devadatta from the time of Krakucchanda Buddha and from the time of Kāśyapa Buddha as well.
What do you command now?” Maudgalyāyana said, “I command Devadatta, a son of Śākyamuni Buddha’s paternal uncle.” The hell warden burned body to wake him up and said, “You, look up in the air!” saw that Mahāmaudgalyāyana sat on a lotus ﬂower made of treasures.
He asked Maudgalyāyana, “Eminent One, why did you come down here?” Maudgalyāyana replied, “The Tathāgata explained that you intended to kill the World-honored One.
Because of this condition you entered Avīci Hell.
In the end you will become a pratyekabuddha called Namas.” After hearing this, Devadatta happily said, “If today I lie down on my right side in Avīci Hell, even for the duration of one kalpa, I will have no fatigue and weariness at last.” Maudgalyāyana again asked him, “Is there an increase or decrease in pain?” Devadatta replied, “My body is run over by a hot iron wheel and destroyed.
71 Then my body is crushed with an iron pestle.
72 There is a black cruel elephant that treads on my body.
Moreover, there is a volcano ﬂows and covers my face.
My kaṣāya from the old days transforms into a copper metal plate. Something extremely vigorous [comes and attaches to my body. The origins and conditions of my pain are like this].
Now, entrusting it to your care, I will worship the World-honored One by bowing my head to his feet.
Furthermore, I will worship the Eminent One Ānanda.” Maudgalyāyana then used supernatural power to travel and return to the World-honored One’s place.
Moreover, the zhidu lun says:
Devadatta and a disciple Kokālika slandered Śāriputra and Maudgalyāyana.
When their lives came to an end they fell into Lotus Hell.
Further, the benqi jing calls Quheli .
What is more, the baoen jing says: As for Devadatta, in the remotest past, incalculable kalpas ago, a buddha appeared in the world.
His name was Yingxian .
73 After this buddha’s nirvana, during the period of the semblance Dharma, there was a meditation bhikṣu who lived alone in a grove.
At that time the bhikṣu was always troubled by a louse.
He made a pact , saying, “When I sit in meditation, you should silently hide yourself and remain quiet.” The louse did as prescribed.
Shortly after a local ﬂea approached the louse and asked, “Why are your body and muscles so plump and healthy?” The louse said, “The master on whom I depend always cultivates himself in meditation.
He taught me the time to eat and drink.
Since I eat and drink as he taught, my body has become bright and plump.” The ﬂea said, “I also want to learn that method.” The louse said, “You can do as you please.” Soon after the bhikṣu sat in meditation.
At that time the local ﬂea smelled the odor of blood and ﬂesh and immediately to eat them.
At that time distress arose in the bhikṣu’s mind and he immediately took off his robe and burned it in a ﬁre.
The Buddha said, “The bhikṣu who sat in meditation at that time is now Kāśyapa.
The local ﬂea of that time is now Devadatta, and the louse of that time is now myself.
Devadatta injured me in order to enrich and nourish himself.
Consequently today I attained buddhahood.
Again, since caused the Buddha’s body to bleed in order to enrich and nourish himself, he entered hell alive.
Devadatta continuously harbored evil in his mind and injured the Tathāgata.
If I were to speak more on this issue, it would take kalpa after kalpa without coming to an end.” The Zabao zang jing says:
The Buddha stayed in the kingdom of Kapilavastu. He entered the city, begging for alms, and arrived at the house of his cousin, Sundarananda.
It happened that Nanda had adorned his wife and applied a fragrant cosmetic on the middle of her forehead.
He heard that the Buddha was inside the gate and wanted to go out to see him.
His wife made an agreement with him, saying, “Go out and see the Tathāgata!
Come back here before the cosmetic on my forehead has dried up!” Nanda promptly went out, saw the Buddha, and worshiped him.
took a bowl, went back to the house, put food into the bowl, and offered it to the Buddha.
The Buddha did not take it and passed on it to Ānanda, who did not take it, either.
Ānanda said, “From whom did you get the bowl?
Go and return it to its original place!” Thereafter, went after the Buddha holding the bowl.
They arrived at the monastery of Nigrodhārāma.
The Buddha then ordered a barber to shave Nanda’s head, but Nanda did not agree.
Shaking his ﬁst in anger, said to the barber, “Can you shave the heads of all the people of Kapilavastu now?” The Buddha asked the barber, “Why did you not shave him?”  answered, “Because I am scared of him, and I dared not shave him.” The Buddha along with Ānanda personally approached .
Nanda was afraid of . Therefore, he did not dare to refuse to be shaved.
Even though his hair had been shaved, he always wished to return home, but the Buddha always led him about and he was not able to get away.
Later, one day had to take turns to watch over the residential quarters.
So was very happy for himself.
“Now it is truly my chance!
I can return home!
After waiting until the Buddha and the monks had all left, I will go back home.” After the Buddha entered the city, thought to himself, “I should draw water, ﬁll the water jars for them, and then go home.” Subsequently, he drew water  as soon as one jar was ﬁlled, another jar was overturned.
Time went by in this way and he could not ﬁll the jars.
Then he said, “It is impossible to ﬁll all .
I will let the bhikṣus draw water for themselves after they come back.
Now I will just put the jars in their room and leave them there.” He then closed the doors .
As soon as one leaf was closed, the other leaf opened again.
As soon as one door was closed, the other door opened again.
He further thought, “Since I cannot shut them all I will just leave as they are and go away.
Even if all the clothes and belongings of the bhikṣus are lost, I have abundant money and jewels enough to be able to compensate them.” then left the monks’ residential quarters, but he thought to himself, “The Buddha will certainly pass this way.
I will leave along a different path.” The Buddha knew intention and came along the different path that , too.
saw the Buddha approaching from a distance and hid behind a big tree.
The spirit of the tree lifted the tree up into the air, exposing standing on the ground.
The Buddha saw Nanda and took him back to the monastery.
then asked him, “Do you think of your wife?” replied, “Yes, I really do!” Immediately , taking Nanda with him, headed toward the top of Mount Anabo.
74 again asked Nanda, “Is your wife beautiful?” answered, “Yes, she is!” In the mountain there was an old blind monkey.
Once again, asked, “How beautiful is the countenance of your wife Sundarī, compared with that of this monkey?” Nanda felt remorseful and angry, and thought to himself, “My wife is a rare beauty among the people.
Why does the Buddha now compare my wife with a blind monkey?” The Buddha then went to Trāyastriṃśa Heaven, leading .
They went all over the heavenly palaces and saw them together.
saw that all the gods and the goddesses entertained each other.
He saw that in a palace there were ﬁve hundred goddesses but no god.
He sought out the Buddha to ask him .
The Buddha said, “Go and ask them yourself!” Nanda went and asked them, “In all the other palaces there are gods.
Why is there not even a single god in just this ?” All the goddesses answered, “The Buddha’s younger brother Nanda is in Jambudvīpa.
75 The Buddha compelled him to renounce the world.
Because of the cause and condition of renouncing the world, after his life comes to an end he will be reborn in this heavenly palace and become our god.” Nanda replied, “This is precisely myself!” and wanted to live there immediately.
The goddesses said, “We are goddesses, while you are now a human being.
The paths of human beings and heavenly beings differ from each other.
For the time being, if you return and give up your human life, and you are reborn in this place, then you will be able to live here.” then returned to the Buddha and fully told the World-honored One about the things mentioned above.
The Buddha said to Nanda, “Is your wife as beautiful as the goddesses?” Nanda answered, “Comparing the goddesses with is just like comparing her to the blind monkey.” The Buddha returned to Jambudvīpa, leading Nanda.
Nanda became more diligent in the observance of the precepts because he wished to be reborn in heaven.
Ānanda at that time said to in verse:
For instance, just as a castrated ram struggles To go forth yet it retreats more, You observe the precepts for your desires. What you do is also just like that. The Buddha led Nanda again and they arrived in hell.
saw that all the boiling cauldrons, without exception, were ﬁlled with people.
He saw one cauldron that bubbled up but it was empty.
Wondering why, he came and asked the Buddha.
The Buddha told him, “Go and ask them yourself!” Nanda accordingly went and asked a hell warden, “Without exception all the cauldrons are boiling and punishing sinners.
Why is this cauldron empty without anyone being boiled in it?” answered, “In Jambudvīpa there is a disciple of the Tathāgata called Nanda.
Because of the merit he earned by renouncing the world he will attain rebirth in heaven, because of the cause and condition of giving up the Way for desires, he will fall into this hell after his life in heaven comes to an end.
Therefore, I stoke the cauldron, waiting for Nanda.” 76 After hearing this, Nanda became afraid that the hell warden might detain him.
He said, “I will take refuge in the Buddha.
I will take refuge in the Buddha.
I only pray that you will protect me and take me back to Jambudvīpa!” The Buddha told Nanda, “Can you diligently observe the precepts and cultivate your heavenly merit?” Nanda replied, “I do not need to be reborn in heaven.
Now I only pray that I will not fall into this hell.” The Buddha expounded the Dharma for .
In seven days he achieved arhatship.
All the bhikṣus said in admiration, “It is very laudable and greatly distinguished that the World-honored One appeared in the world.” The Buddha said, “Not only today is like this, but also the past was like this, too.” All the bhikṣus said, “The past was just so, too.
What does this mean?
Please explain it for us!” The Buddha said, “Formerly there was the king of Kāśi, called Pūrṇamukha.
In the kingdom of Videha there was a licentious woman who was extremely beautiful.
At that time these two kingdoms continually held grudges against each other.
At his side had a ﬂattering courtier, who said with a sigh to the king of Kāśi, ‘In the other kingdom there is a licentious woman who is a rare beauty in the world.’ The king heard these words and gave rise to deluded attachment in his mind.
He sent a messenger to look for her.
That kingdom did not give .
again sent a messenger, saying, ‘I would like to see her for a short time.
In four or ﬁve days, she will be returned.
You must send her out.’ The king of the other kingdom then instructed the licentious woman, ‘Your ﬁgure is completely equipped with all good qualities.
Cause the king of Kāśi to become deluded and attached to you! Then he will be unable to leave you even for a moment.’ The king then sent her out and ordered her to go.
“Four or ﬁve days passed. Suddenly called out, ‘I would like to arrange for a grand sacriﬁce. I must get the woman back.
Return and release her for a while. Later I will send her again.’ The king of Kāśi immediately sent her back.
“After the grand sacriﬁce came to an end, sent a messenger and asked to return to him.
replied, ‘She will be sent tomorrow.’ On the next day, she was not sent back again.
While he continued to lie in this way, many days passed.
The king had deluded attachment in his mind. He wanted to go to the other kingdom, taking only a few men with him.
All his vassals remonstrated with him, but he was not willing to accept .
“At that time, on Immortal Mountain there was a monkey king who was intelligent, broadly learned with extensive knowledge.
His wife accidentally died and he took a female monkey .
The whole group of monkeys became angry. They scolded and blamed , ‘This female monkey is our common property.
For what reason do you monopolize her?’ The monkey king then ﬂed to the kingdom of Kāśi, taking the female monkey with him, and they stayed in the palace of the king .
The monkeys all chased him and soon arrived in the city, where they broke the houses apart and destroyed the walls. It was impossible to control them.
“The king of Kāśi said to the monkey king, ‘Why don’t you now return this female monkey to all the monkeys?’ The monkey king replied, ‘My wife has passed away.
I would no longer have a wife. O King!
Why do you now want me to return her to them?’ The king said , ‘Your monkeys are ruining and throwing my kingdom into disorder.
How can you not return her?’ The monkey king said, ‘Is this matter not good?’ The king answered, ‘No, not good!’ This went on again and again.
Since the king said that it was not good, the monkey king said, ‘In your palace there are eighty-four thousand ladies but you do not happily love them and want to go to another hostile kingdom chasing after a licentious woman.
I have no wife now and take only this one, but you say it is not good.
All your people live looking up to you.
Why do you abandon state affairs for one licentious woman?
“‘O great king! You must know that licentious desires bring only small pleasure and great suffering.
It is just like holding a ﬂaming torch against the wind.
An ignorant person does not let go of and is surely burned.
Desire is as impure as a heap of dung.
Desire appears on the external ﬁgure and is merely covered by a thin skin.
Desire has no requital of kindness, just like a venomous snake daubed with dung.
Desire, like a harmful bandit, is deceitful and intimately attaches to people.
Desire is like a loan that must certainly be returned.
Desire is detestable, just like a ﬂower growing in a toilet.
Desire is like sores from scabies when one comes close to a ﬁre; when they are scratched they become severe.
Desire is just like when a dog gnaws a dry bone; when his saliva mixes with  he thinks it is tasty, and although his lips and teeth are completely broken, he is never satisﬁed.
Desire is like a thirsty man drinking saltwater; his thirst increases more than ever.
Desire is like a piece of meat that a ﬂock of birds vie in chasing after.
Desire is like being greedy for the taste of a ﬁsh or an animal that causes one to die.
77 It is a very serious disaster.’ “The monkey king of that time is me.
The king of that time is Nanda.
The licentious woman of that time is Sundarī.
I, at that time, pulled Nanda out of the ditch of desires.
Now again I will pull him out of the suffering of the transmigration of birth and death.” The Weizengyou jing says:
Rāhula renounced the world and became a novice at the age of nine.
The king ordered ﬁfty princes of powerful families and various lords all to renounce the world, following Rāhula.
Śāriputra was the upādhyāya and Mahāmaudgalyāyana was the ācārya and they gave the ten wholesome precepts.
Rāhula’s mother, Yaśodharā, was the Crown Prince’s wife.
In less than three years she renounced the world. (Since matters concerning the other disciples are broad and numerous, it is impossible to explain them all in detail. A few important points will be presented.) As for novices, the Biography of Buddhayaśas says:
In the Sui dynasty it was called menial labor because cultivation in the Way is laborious.
Moreover, it was translated as xici, which means to stop worldly deﬁled feelings in order to deliver all beings through benevolence .
Additionally, even though the Buddhist Dharma was founded worldly feelings still exist.
So they must stop evil and do acts of benevolence. Furthermore, the Zengyi ahan jing says:
The Buddha told all the bhikṣus, “There are four castes  in the world, but those who have renounced the world have no original caste.
It is said, however, that śramaṇas are the sons of Śākyamuni.
The reason is that they were born following my birth and they became śramaṇas following completion of the Dharma.
They come out just as all the four great seas come out of Lake Anavatapta.” Moreover, the Mishasai lü
You, bhikṣus, have renounced the world from various family backgrounds.
All of you gave up your original family names and call yourselves the son of Śākyamuni, śramaṇa. Furthermore, the Chang ahan jing says:
When Maitreya appears in the world, all bhikṣus and disciples will be also called the Benevolent One’s sons, just as my disciples are now called the sons of Śākyamuni.” 78 (Maitreya is a family name. It refers to the benevolent family.) When I observe the modest incarnate form of the Great Awakened One , his posture to edify the people is equal to that found in earthly literature.
Therefore, descendants succeed to his wisdom and his followers increase, one after another.
At the same time, the conditions are revealed for innumerable kalpas. Therefore, we can assist and support his wonderful ediﬁcation.
Moreover, when the four rivers enter the sea, they are all called “the sea.” When the four castes take refuge in the Way, they are all called Buddhists.
It can be said that, after all, the origin of these differences is the same, only one taste!
Verses say: The divine help of the previous existence has consequently ripened.
Now I attain renunciation of and transcendence from the world. I gave up the secular world and banished deﬁlements. Being detached, I have joyfully realized. Wisdom lies in a peaceful mind free from prejudice. Wondrousness cannot be enumerated. When I was inspired, I encountered the Way. I cut off affairs to restrain and restrict me.
I am diligently eager for study. I take this nectar. My meritorious achievement is not reduced. I sense the sacred excellent shelter. Solemnly a spirit comes. Gracefully a deity takes steps. There are he and I without others. Dharma mates meet each other. Miracle Stories At Zhiyuan Temple in the metropolis of the Song dynasty there was Shi Zhiyan, a man from western Liangzhou . He renounced the world at the Chinese age of twenty and became famous for his dedication and diligence.
He traveled around the western countries for study and made inquiries into the ways of meditation. He was extensively well versed in sutras and discourses.
He returned from the Western Region with rare and precious scriptures.
He had not yet translated and copied the sutras and discourses he had acquired, but in the fourth year of the Yuanjia era of the Song dynasty he translated them together with such as Baoyun. did not accept special invitations from laypeople who intended to make offerings only to him . He always supported himself by mendicancy .
He was completely accustomed to the Buddhist ediﬁcation, inspiration, and the unseen and manifesting worlds.
Someone who had seen evil spirits said, “Inside the Grand Shrine of Xizhou I have seen evil spirits speak to each other.
They said, ‘When Eminent yan comes, we must retreat.’” This person did not understand it.
yan suddenly arrived there.
For the time being asked him his name. Sure enough, called himself Zhiyan.
stayed silent but recognized . secretly applied the rites for nonhumans.
Née Liu, the wife of Xiao Sihua, Director of Lanling , suffered from a disease.
She often saw evil spirits coming and cried out in fear.
At that time welcomed yan for a sermon.
yan had just arrived at the outer hall when née Liu saw that a group of evil spirits scattered away.
yan already advanced and spoke on a sutra for the wife.
She was cured of the disease because of this.
Accordingly she received the ﬁve precepts and the whole family believed in .
yan was clean, simple, and unselﬁsh. He gave away things as soon as he received them.
He roamed throughout the corners of the world when he was young and had no ﬁxed place to live.
He was submissive by nature and never talked about himself.
Therefore, even though he had much virtuous conduct, his virtue could not be fully transmitted in the world.
Formerly, before yan renounced the world, he received the ﬁve precepts on one occasion but he had a violation against them.
Later he entered the Buddhist Way and received a complete set of precepts as a monk, but he always doubted if he had not attained some precepts.
He was often afraid of this.
He meditated for years but could not understand it all by himself.
Consequently he crossed over the sea and arrived in India again.
He consulted with various intellectuals, arhats, and bhikṣus.
He questioned them about the issues in detail.
The arhats did not venture to conclude .
They then entered into meditation for yan’s sake and went to the palace of Tuṣita Heaven, where they consulted with Maitreya.
Maitreya replied, “He has attained the precepts.” yan was greatly happy.
Thereafter he walked back and arrived in Kaśmīra , where he died without having a disease.
At that time he was seventy-eight Chinese years old.
In that country there were various places to cremate monks, both common and saintly.
Even though yan was an expert on the precepts and moral principles, he was not recognized for putting them into practice.
His corpse initially was moved toward the graveyard for common monks but the corpse was too heavy to lift.
Then they changed direction, heading toward the graveyard of saintly monks. then spontaneously became airily light.
yan’s] disciples, Zhiming and Zhiyuan, came from the west . They reported this auspicious sign and then returned together to the foreign country .
Judging from this, yan truly attained the Way.
It is, however, unknown if he was midway to fruition and how deep was .
At Qiyuan Temple in the metropolis of the Song dynasty there was Guṇavarman, whose name translates as “Armor of Merit” here .
He was originally from the kṣatriya class.
was of the royalty of successive generations ruling in Kaśmīra.
He was smart and talented, and had deep magnanimity.
He was benevolent and extensively knowledgeable. He respected virtue and strived after wholesomeness.
He arrived at Jianye in the ﬁrst month of the eighth year of the Yuanjia era of the Song dynasty.
Emperor Wen (r. him questions.
Accordingly, said, “I, your disciple, would always like to observe the precepts and try to not kill, but I am compelled to follow ; I cannot realize my determination.
Since you, Dharma teacher, did not regard ten thousand li to be far and came to edify in this country, how can you teach me about this?” Guṇavarman replied, “The Way lies in the mind, not in affairs.
The Dharma is up to oneself, not up to others.
Moreover, a sovereign is different from ordinary people in what he must cultivate.
The words and orders of ordinary people of humble status and inferior position do not have power.
If they do not subdue and torment themselves, how would they be saved?
A sovereign takes the empire as a big family and the entire nation as his children.
When he speaks ﬁne words, all the men and women are happy.
When he governs well, the people and the gods harmonize.
If lives are not taken as punishment and there is no trouble with labor in the military services, the wind and rain arise in a timely manner and heat and cold match the seasons.
Then, all kinds of grain will grow luxuriantly and the mulberry leaves and hemp will be thick.
In observance of the precepts like this, puriﬁcation  is also great.
In the precept of not killing there are many .
Would you rather discern that going without a meal for half a day causes an animal to escape from death, and later will be a great salvation?” The emperor then touched a small table, exclaiming, “Worldly people are confused about the profound principles.
Śramaṇas stagnate in common teachings.
Those who are confused in profound principles say that the utmost way is false talk.
Those who stagnate in common teachings adhere rigidly to books.
Regarding what you, Dharma teacher, said, I truly think that it is an enlightened and intelligent man.
I should say it is the speech the ultimate heavenly being.” Then, he issued an imperial decree and invited to live at Qiyuan Temple, and he offered great kindness to .
Among princes and people of outstanding ability and virtue, none did not believe in and serve him.
His great translations of sutras and discourses are listed in full in the Biographies of Eminent Monks.
79 The meanings of his translations are also detailed and proper; his Chinese do not differ from the Sanskrit .
At that time, the nuns of Yingfu Temple, such as Huiguo and Jingyin, all invited Guṇavarman.
They said, “Formerly, in the sixth year  eight nuns came to the metropolis from Siṃhala  and said to us, ‘There has not been a nun before in the land of the Song dynasty.
How could you, two nuns, receive the precepts ?’ We are afraid that precepts is incomplete.” Guṇavarman replied, “The law of precepts originally came from multitudes of monks.
If  is not an original form, nothing hinders people from attaining the precepts.
It is just like the condition of being fond of the Way.” All the nuns were, furthermore, afraid that term was less than and they earnestly wanted to receive his further .
Guṇavarman told them, “Good!
If you wish to expand your understanding, I will greatly help you. It is my pleasure.
Nuns of western countries , however, are not yet old enough.
Moreover, the number of nuns is insufﬁcient.
Furthermore, you have to teach them the language of the Song dynasty .
Additionally, through the laypeople from Central Asia you should ask more foreign nuns to come . Ten or so more would be sufﬁcient.” In summer of that year held a retreat at Lower Dinglin Temple.
At that time, some believers picked ﬂowers and spread them out seats.
The colors of the ﬂowers under Guṇavarman’s seat were brighter than the others.
All the people worshiped him in the manner of worshipping a saint.
At the end of the summer returned to Qiyuan Temple.
On the twenty-eighth day of the ninth month of that year, before the end of the midday meal, got up and returned to his room before everyone else.
80 His disciples came later,  had suddenly passed away.
He was sixty-ﬁve Chinese years old.
After death he was held and seated on a rope couch.
His facial appearance had not changed. He looked as if he had entered into meditation.
Both the clergy and laypeople who attended numbered more than one thousand.
They all smelled something exceedingly fragrant, and they all saw a being whose appearance was similar to that of a dragon or snake, 81 which would measure about one zhang 82 long.
It rose up beside corpse and rushed straight up to heaven.
There was no one who could give its name.
was cremated with fragrant ﬁrewood that had been sprinkled with fragrant oil.
Five-colored ﬂames broke out, and a vigorous atmosphere hung in the sky.
The mournful voices of the four categories of Buddhists and the crowd of people moved heaven.
They wept hopelessly, unable to overcome their sorrow.
Shi Tanhui, a nun of the Song dynasty, was a woman from Chengdu in Shu prefecture .
Her original family name was Qingyang and her ﬁrst name was Baiyu.
At the age of seven she was delighted with sitting in meditation.
Every time she sat in meditation she could perceive something, but she had no idea of what it meant and she thought it was nothing but a dream.
One time was sleeping with her elder sister.
She entered into meditation at midnight.
Her elder sister found her behind a screen; her body was hard, like a piece of wood or a rock, and she was out of breath.
Her elder sister was greatly astonished and shouted out in a loud voice to their family members.
They nursed her by turns.
Even at daybreak had not yet recovered consciousness.
hurriedly went to sorcerers and asked them .
All said that was possessed by evil spirits.
When was eleven years old, a foreign meditation master called Kālayaśas came to Shu prefecture.
Tanhui asked him for his opinion about .
Kālayaśas thought Tanhui’s meditation had potential and he wished to encourage and edify her in order to cause her to renounce the world.
At that time, Tanhui was going to marry and the wedding date was already ﬁxed.
Fayu, who had not fully known and communicated with family, secretly took back with her to the temple where she lived.
Once her family realized this, they were going to force to marry.
Tanhui was unwilling and deeply swore an oath, “If my aspiration for the Buddhist Way is not achieved and consequently I am restricted and forced , then I must give up my ﬁlthy body by diving into a ﬁre or feeding it to a tiger.
I pray all the buddhas in the ten directions to testify to my sincerity.” Regional Inspector Zhen Fachong, who believed in and esteemed the true Dharma, heard about Tanhui’s ambition and conduct.
So he invited her for a meeting, and at the same time he summoned the magistrate, the assistant magistrate, and virtuous śramaṇas . He had them alternately put difﬁcult questions to Tanhui.
She replied to them without yielding.
All the people present were struck with wonder.
Fachong then approved her to leave the family into which she was going to marry, and allowed her to enter the Buddhist Way.
In the nineteenth year of the Yuanjia era King Kang of Linchuan invited her to a temple in Guangling.
Zhao Xi of the Huainan area of the Song dynasty became Adjutant of the Palace Guard Armory in the twentieth year of the Yuanjia era .
He was ill for a while and felt anxious that he would not ﬁnd relief .
He always took refuge in the Buddha with sincerity.
One night he dreamed that a man, who looked like a holy man with a striking countenance, granted him a small parcel and a razor from the top of a beam of the house, saying, “Take this medicine, use this razor, and you will certainly recover from your illness.” Xi was surprised and woke up.
Sure enough, he found a razor and some medicine .
He immediately took the medicine and, then became well.
Xi renounced the world and was called Sengxiu.
He passed away when he was over eighty years old. The Lun family of Dongguan had two daughters.
83 In the ﬁrst year of the Yuanjia era of the Song dynasty, the elder daughter was ten years old and the younger one was nine. Their village was located in the Yue region, which was a savage land.
So they did not know about the Buddhist teaching.
On the eighth day of the second month of that year, both girls suddenly went missing.
They returned three days later, and spoke roughly that they had met the Buddha.
On the ﬁfteenth day of the ninth month they again went missing and returned ten days later.
They spoke foreign languages, chanted sutras in Sanskrit, and when they met a monk from the Western Region they spoke  and he understood.
On the ﬁfteenth day of the ﬁrst month of the next year they disappeared again.
A farmer working in a ﬁeld saw that they ascended into the sky on the wind.
Their parents wept with sorrow and invoked spiritual beings’ aid.
A month later they returned.
They came back tonsured as nuns, wearing Dharma robes, and holding their shaved hair in their hands.
said, “When we met the Buddha and bhikṣuṇīs, said, ‘You will be my disciples due to relationships from your former existences.’ Then he patted us on the head and our hair fell off.
He gave us Dharma names:
Fayuan for the elder daughter and Facai for the younger one.
When we were sent back to home, he said, ‘You should build a nunnery.
You must give the Buddhist teaching .’” arrived at their house.
Immediately they removed the altar for spiritual beings and built a nunnery, where they performed worship and recited sutras every morning and evening.
Every ﬁve-colored light appeared and ﬂoated over mountains.
From this time on, the girls became graceful and gentle in their movements and manners, and their speech exactly conformed to the rules.
Even the customs of the capital city were not above .
Regional inspectors such as Wei Lang and Kong Mo all welcomed them and admired their extraordinariness, and so on. Can and Kui 84 Introduction and Quoted Testimonies.
We transmigrate in the three periods of existence, going around in the six realms.
Even if we possess spiritual intelligence there is no one who does not go through many places.
Since nothing is ﬁxed in our natural dispositions, there are those who are intelligent and those who are ignorant.
Because the nature each one receives is distinct from that of others, do good and do evil.
They practice virtue. Therefore they have can and kui.
They do evil. Consequently they have neither can nor kui.
In the conventions of ordinary people, however, each one harbors delusions.
If one has not been able to study the Way and remove , he should exert himself day and night and dedicate himself to learning can and kui. In profound emptiness he excuses himself from this world as well as the netherworld.
are ignorant from the beginning and do not know the highest truth.
They come to act with deﬁlements and embrace multiple heavy deﬁlements.
If they hope to avail themselves of a wholesome act and get rid of myriad nuisances, they should expel and wash away serious confusion and be open, clear, clean, and pure.
Therefore, the Great Sage attentively prevails with all the clergy and laypeople.
Arhats who deeply feel can receive the title of a ﬁeld of merit at will.
Śramaṇas who revere kui assume the title of bhaikṣāka without bias.
Bodhisattvas who advance to nonbeing concurrently have the ability to offer salvation .
Śrāvakas who retrogress have virtues with which to regulate themselves.
Those who humiliate their teacher monks or who fail to live up to donors’ expectations are unworthy of traveling in the sovereign’s land.
If one has nothing with which to repay his parents’ kindness, this matter is equal to breaking a bottle and its meaning is the same as scorching seeds.
Also, if a tāla tree has already been cut down, how can it grow again?
After a stone has been broken apart, nothing can put the pieces back together in the end.
Spirits always wipe out traces and cry, “We are evil ones!” The Tathāgata admonishes them, saying, “You are not my disciples.
You cannot become a ﬁeld of merit for the world.” How can spirits get the better of him and be worshiped?
In a familiar example they hinder heavenly and human beings, and in a far-reaching example they obstruct the way of sages.
If this sin is repeated, what more can be said about it?
Those who stay in the clergy are respectable and those who remain in the secular world would rather be delivered.
Therefore, once you lose your human body, you will move , kalpa after kalpa.
You will meet and use your original again; you will return to the same and meet the original .
Now you must wash out the dust of your mind with the water of can and kui, and taking the knife of expressing in your hands, cut the net of what you hide.
Ancient sages who revere kui deeply felt can for the merit of the future.
They repent with the utmost sincerity, thoroughly trace to the very source, and come to the ultimate.
When we look at all ordinary people and sages, they equally respect the Buddha’s thought.
They regulate their minds and humble their thoughts as if they were inferior thoughts.
If you have all faults in mind, do not give rise to even a single thought and privately hide your mind.
If you have all wholesomeness and always give rise to the intention to study, brieﬂy explain this intention.
This is what is called can and kui.
As the Nirvāṇa-sūtra says:
There are two wholesome elements that can save sentient beings.
One is can and the other is kui.
Can is to not commit a sin of one’s own accord, and kui is to teach others not to commit a sin.
Can is to have a sense of shame inwardly oneself, and kui is expressing it to others.
Can is to feel ashamed before others while kui is to feel ashamed before heaven.
These are called can and kui.
One has can and kui, and therefore he can be respectful to his parents and teachers.
All clergy members and secular people as well as nonhuman beings can esteem the Three Treasures and exterminate all evil acts.
Furthermore, the Jiayan lun says:
What is called wucan?
The answer is:
“It is to not be ashamed of what one should be ashamed of, to not prevent what can be prevented, to not be virtuous and respectful, and to not transmigrate in wholesome places.
This is called wucan.” What is called wukui?
“It is to not be abashed at what one should be abashed at, to not fear what one should fear, and to not fear vices.
Therefore, it is called wukui.
In addition, to transmigrate in unwholesome places is called wucan.
To not show fear of vices is called wukui.
The terminology mentioned above when reversed are therefore called can and kui.” Moreover, the Xin posha lun says:
When sentient beings of the world see wucan they say it is wukui, and when they see wukui they say it is wucan.
Do not think that the essence of these two is one.
85 I would now like to demonstrate the differences of their essential natures and characteristics, and to cause those who doubt this to attain an unfailing understanding.
Question: What differences are there between wucan and wukui?
Answer: In one of freedom no fear arises. This is wucan.
No fear is shown toward any vice. This is wukui.
Again, in one of freedom there is no arising of fear. This is wucan.
In all vices fear is not shown. This is wukui.
Furthermore, to be not respectful is wucan and to be not fearful is wukui.
Moreover, to not detest and despise deﬁlement is wucan.
To not detest and despise evil deeds is wukui.
Further, to indulge in evildoing and yet not reﬂect upon oneself is wucan, and to indulge in evildoing and not feel ashamed toward others is wukui.
Furthermore, to indulge in evildoing and not have a sense of shame is wucan, and to indulge in evildoing and be haughty and wayward is wukui.
Moreover, to commit a sin by oneself and not have a sense of shame is wucan, and to commit a sin against others and not have a sense of shame is wukui.
Again, if one commits a sin against a small number of people and yet does not have a sense of shame, this is wucan.
If one commits a sin against a large crowd of people and does not have a sense of shame, this is wukui.
Furthermore, if one commits a sin against sentient beings of evil realms and does not have a sense of shame, this is wucan.
If one commits a sin against sentient beings of good realms and does not have a sense of shame, this is wukui.
Further, if one commits a sin against the ignorant and does not have a sense of shame, this is wucan.
If one commits a sin against the wise and does not have a sense of shame, this is wukui.
Again, if one commits a sin against an inferior and does not have a sense of shame, this is wucan.
If one commits a sin against a superior and does not have a sin of shame, this is wukui.
Moreover, if one commits a sin against those who remain householders and does not have a sense of shame, this is wucan.
If one commits a sin against those who have renounced the world and does not have a sense of shame, this is wukui.
Further, if one commits a sin against those who are not his upādhyāya and ācārya and does not have a sense of shame, this is wucan.
If one commits a sin against his upādhyāya and ācārya and does not have a sense of shame, this is wukui.
Again, if one does not feel ashamed of himself in the sight of heaven when he indulges in evildoing, this is wucan.
If one does not feel ashamed of himself in the sight of people when he indulges in evildoing, this is wukui.
Furthermore, if one cannot be scolded and blamed in the matter of all evil causes, this is wucan.
If one cannot be loathed and feared in the matter of all evil effects, this is wukui.
Further, the homogeneity of cause and effect in avarice is wucan.
The homogeneity of cause and effect in ignorance is wukui.
These are the differences between wucan and wukui.
These two elements are merely bonds to the realm of desire, and they are unwholesome.
All unwholesome things are due to the functions of the mind.
They everywhere comply with each other but only the self-nature is deducted. Moreover, the Yuqie lun says:
What are wucan and wukui?
They mean to inspect oneself or others but feel shame at nothing, and then to intentionally violate the precepts and be unable to liberate oneself in accordance with the Dharma after the violation, and to take pleasure in engaging in various kinds of conﬂicts, accusations, disobedience, and disputation.
Furthermore, the Yijiao jing says:
Can is just like an iron hook.
It can properly control people’s unlawfulness.
Therefore, bhikṣus should always practice can and kui and not neglect it for even a short time.
If they leave behind can and kui they will lose all merits.
For those who have kui, there are wholesome things.
If one does not have kui, he is no different from birds and beasts.
Again, the zhidu lun says in verse: Those who have entered the Way and practice can and kui Bless the sentient beings holding a bowl. Why would they indulge in the dust of desire And sink in the ﬁve feelings? If one, wearing armor and holding a sword and cane, Sees his enemy and retreats by running , A timid person like this is Slighted and laughed at by all the people of the world. A bhikṣu is one who begs for alms. He shaves his head and puts on a kaṣāya. If he is controlled by the horse of the ﬁve feelings, He will also be laughed at in this way.
Moreover, if just like a powerful high-ranking person He wears dress, adorns himself, And goes begging for clothing and food, He will be laughed at by the multitude. If a bhikṣu who has removed the beauty of ornaments And who disﬁgures his appearance in order to regulate the mind Further seeks the pleasures of the desires, He will also be laughed at in this way. He has already given up the pleasures of the ﬁve desires, Abandoned them, and does not pay attention to them. Why would he still wish to obtain them Just as an ignorant person eats what he has vomited up? A greedy person like this does not know to see the original vow. Nor does he recognize beauty and ugliness. He is wildly intoxicated with craving attachment . Can and kui is the teaching of respect. All have already abandoned With virtuous and intelligent people are not intimate with, And what ignorant and unintelligent people like to be close to. All desires are suffering when one seeks, And they are very dreadful when one obtains them. When one loses them, he bears depression and annoyance in his mind. There is no happy time at all. 86 All desires are troublesome like this. How should you give them up? If you attain the happiness of various meditations, 87 Then you will not be deceived. If you attach to the pleasure of the desires insatiably, How can you wipe it out? If you attain the contemplation on the impurity of the body, This mind is spontaneously nothing. Furthermore, the Zhengfanian jing says:
If you violate the precepts, have many desires, and do evil things, you are not truly a śramaṇa.
Even if you call yourself a śramaṇa, you are just like a wild fox that disguised itself with a lion’s pelt, or just like a spurious treasure that is empty within and holds nothing.
Furthermore, the zhuangyan lun says in verse: Since you wear a motley robe, You must cultivate yourself in the good Dharma. With this garment you should be in nirvana. You always think to regulate yourself to be ﬂexible and gentle. Why do you, wearing this robe, Glare , with eyes opened wide, Knit your eyebrows, purse your cheeks together, And make angry looks? Anger is not suitable as a dwelling place For those who have renounced the world. Grudges and hatred can be compared to a butcher’s cangue.
Anger is really fear, A house of meanness, A seed of ugliness, A companion of abusive language, Raging ﬂames that burn the grove of thoughts, An act that indicates the evil realms, The gate of conﬂict, dispute, enmity, and harm, And the bed of an evil name. 88 suddenly becomes the foundation of evil. You must inspect yourself. With the mark of those who have renounced the world, Do your mind and appearance correspond to each other, Or do they not correspond to each other? The law of bhikṣus is To support themselves by begging alms from others. Why do you, eating donated by believers, Give rise to serious anger? While their food is in your stomach, Why do you give rise to anger And come to snuff out the donations from believers? This body is deﬁled. From its nine apertures ﬁlth is always discharged. Its offensive odor and dirtiness are very detestable. It is really a vessel of numerous sufferings. This body is extremely humble. It is the place where carbuncles gather. If it is slightly touched, 89 It gives rise to great distress. The body is just like a target of an arrow. When there is a target, the arrow accordingly hits it. When there is a body, numerous sufferings are added. When there is no body, there is no suffering. Mosquitoes, gadﬂies, ﬂies, and poisonous insects All can sting and kill human beings. You must diligently devote yourself to And maintain detachment from the body.
Therefore, you should know from what is recorded above that whether you are a monk or a layperson, you must always be careful of yourself and see right mindfulness before your eyes.
If you cannot understand even a small portion of the teaching, you will give rise to haughtiness and you will not develop can and kui.
Even though people like those in the four stages of sainthood  should not receive common retribution as human beings, they will still receive individual retribution.
Therefore, the Xianyu jing talks about those such as Aṅgulimāla.
Because he killed nine hundred and ninetynine people, even though he met the Buddha and became an arhat he stayed in his room where the ﬁre of hell came out of pores of his skin, and he was extremely distressed in pain; not to mention ordinary people who are outside of enlightenment and who have not given rise to the mind to correctly remove .
According to how you perform one act, it determines whether or not you will fall into the three evil realms.
It is really difﬁcult to obtain a human body.
If you encounter evil causes and conditions, then you will easily lose .
Because evil ﬂourishes while wholesomeness is scarce, one will have a hundred or a thousand evil thoughts and not one wholesome thought in a day.
Furthermore, the Jingdu sanmei jing  says:
90 Demerits and merits pile up against each other and they are often distinct.
Later we will receive retributions or rewards for these demerits or merits.
No one will avoid it.
By one thought one receives a body.
By a good thought one receives a body in heaven and the realm of human beings.
By an evil thought one receives a body in the three evil realms.
By a hundred thoughts one receives a hundred bodies.
By a thousand thoughts one receives a thousand bodies.
If one plants the root of transmigration of birth and death for even a single day and night, he will later receive eight hundred and ﬁfty million miscellaneous kinds of bodies.
If in a lifetime of a hundred years one plants a sapling for his next existences, he will receive so many bodies. It is hard to count them.
His transient spirit, complying with what he has planted, will receive forms throughout the trichiliocosm; bodies, bones, skin, and hair are all over the trichiliocosm. There is no space without them.
Moreover, the Pusa chutai jing (i.e., Pusa cong doushutian jiang shenmutai shuo guangpu jing, T. 384) says in verse:
From innumerable kalpas ago, I have transmigrated in the path of birth and death. Giving up one body and receiving another again, I have not left behind the law of existence. Counting what I have gone through, I remember one life but not others. I solely become a body of a white dog. My accumulated bones ﬁll Mount Sumeru. If sharp needles were planted on the earth, Every needle would pierce my body, Not to mention those of motley dogs Whose number is innumerable. Therefore, I regulate my mind In order not to be greedy and self-indulgent. Moreover, the Tiwei jing says:
91 It is just as if someone were to hang a tiny thread from the top of Mount Sumeru, while down below another person holds a needle to thread , and between them is a whirlpool of mist and a violent wind blows.
It would be extremely difﬁcult for the thread to go through the eye of the needle.
To obtain a human body is exceedingly more difﬁcult than this.
Again, in the Pusa chutai jing the World-honored One says in verse:
A blind tortoise and a hole in a ﬂoating piece of wood Can still often happen to encounter each other. Once a person loses his life, It is difﬁcult to recover even after a hundred million kalpas. Seawater lies deep and vast, Three hundred thirty-six fathoms. If a pin were thrown into the sea And you sought for it, you would still be able to get it. Once you lose your human life, It is more difﬁcult to recover than . Furthermore, the Dazhuangyan lun says in verse:
It is also difﬁcult to leave behind all difﬁculties. It is difﬁcult to obtain a human body. If you can already leave behind all hardships, You must be continuously diligent in . I formerly heard that there was a little boy.
A sutra (i.e., the Za ahan jing, T. 99) says, “A blind tortoise happens the hole of a ﬂoating piece of wood.
This matter is very difﬁcult.” At that time the boy intentionally bored a hole in a wooden board through which he could put his head.
He threw the board into a pond, and then himself entered the pond.
Lowering his head and then raising his head , he hoped to rise up through the hole .
Because the wooden board was drifting about in the water, he could not do it.
He then pondered to himself and gave rise to extreme loathsomeness.
“A human body is difﬁcult to obtain.
The Buddha explained it using the simile of the ocean.
A hole in a ﬂoating piece of wood is small and a blind tortoise has no eyes.
It may happen once in a hundred years.
It is truly difﬁcult to be able to happen .
Now, in my case, the pond is small and the hole in the wooden board is large.
In addition, I have both eyes . Even if I were to raise my head out a hundred times a day, I would still be unable to happen —how much less would a blind tortoise happen to do it!” Then he said in verse: The great sea is extremely vast. The hole in a ﬂoating piece of wood is moreover small. It happens once in a hundred years. It is very difﬁcult to be able to meet. Now, in my case, the water in the pond is but a small amount, And the hole in the ﬂoating piece of wood is extremely large. I often raise my head out Yet I am unable to encounter the hole in the wood. The blind tortoise encounters the ﬂoating piece wood. It is very difﬁcult that both meet each other. To recover a human body from the evil realms Is also as difﬁcult as this. I now happen a human body. I must not be indolent. There are buddhas as numerous as grains of sand in the Ganges River. I have not been able to meet yet. Today I can inquire and receive The words of the World-honored One of the ten powers. The wondrous Dharma spoken by the Buddha, I must learn and practice. If I am able to learn it well, Salvation from suffering will be extremely great. It is not that I can obtain what other people have made. Therefore, I will make effort. If I fall into the eight difﬁculties, How can I leave that condition behind? Karma made in the world follows us, And we will fall into the evil realms. We must now run away from them And be able to leave the prison of the three transmigratory existences. If I do not get out of this prison, How will I attain liberation? There are various different in the realm of animals. To go through a kalpa is an extremely long time. In hell and in the realm of hungry ghosts It is dark and the miseries there are deep. If I do not study diligently, How can I leave behind The dangers of all the evil realms? Today I obtain a human body. I have not exhausted the extremity of suffering. I have not left behind the prison of the three transmigratory existences. I must diligently practice with expedient means. I will surely leave behind the prison of the three transmigratory existences. Now I seek to renounce the world. I will certainly attain liberation. Furthermore, the Zuiye baoying jing (i.e., Zuiye yingbao jiaohua diyu jing, T.
724) says in verse:
Running water does not run permanently. Raging ﬁre does not burn for a long time. The sun rises and must set in a moment. The moon, after becoming full, wanes again. Those who are digniﬁed, honored, outstanding, and noble are more impermanent than these.
Therefore, you should know that the human body is difﬁcult to encounter and easy to lose.
Since it is easy to lose you must not become attached to life.
You should know that the human body is approaching death every moment, just like a hog or sheep being led to an abattoir.
Accordingly, the Nirvāṇa-sūtra says:
Observe this life!
It is always haunted by immeasurable ill-will and grudges.
It decreases every moment and there is no increase.
It can be compared to raging water that cannot stop, and also to drops of morning dew that do not last for a long time, or to a convict who is heading toward the marketplace , approaching death step by step.
Moreover, the Moye jing says in verse:
For instance, it is just as a caṇdāla Drives cattle to an abattoir. approach the jaws of death, step by step. Human life passes even faster than this. Since the time of the Great Sage, the essence has not yet been completely clariﬁed.
Even though we partially realize nonarising we still transmigrate because of the three characteristics of phenomenal things , not to mention ordinary, ignorant people who are far from the pure realm in the ultimate principle of the universe.
Wholesomeness and unwholesomeness are disordered, mixed and not clearly separate from each other.
How can we avoid a fault due to deﬁlement or a loss due to attachment?
Now, when we hear the virtue of renouncing the world and entering the Way, it cannot be said that  have no evil.
When we hear of the faults of laypeople and those who remain householders, we must not that they do not have any wholesomeness at all.
If one internally cultivates practice, then he will have virtue just like that of those who have renounced the world.
If one internally goes against faith, he will become a monk in vain.
Those who remain householders have various dependents and public as well as private troubles.
In providing for and treating with what they need, they should not be stingy.
Śramaṇas abide by pure conduct and are solely independent.
They require only the three kinds of robes and the six kinds of necessities for living, or in an extreme case, only one item from each category of the numerous necessities for monks.
They shut themselves off from the conditions of the external world. Why is it necessary for them to save up ?
the sutras and Vinayas completely denounce this, and it is clariﬁed in the sacred teachings.
If are stingy with the wealth of the Dharma and do not give it to ignorant and poor people, they do not accumulate intelligence and then they will lose the seed of buddhahood.
Consequently, even a minor offense is still a cause for great fear.
They should always be modest, respectful, and deferential to both their elders and juniors.
They must not be conceited and disrespectful to their predecessors.
If they commit a great offense, possess extensive livestock, farmland, and houses, if they undeservedly store up or assiduously engage in secular business, these are all prescribed as heinous offenses.
It is unnecessary to explain this further.
I now brieﬂy mention people of mediocre level and below.
They are not well educated and have only superﬁcial knowledge.
Yet they think they surpass others in intelligence and give rise to great arrogance, boast of their appearance, offend and disdain all other people, and lump heaven and earth together.
They sit before their teachers stretching out both legs , or they revile someone near an esteemed one.
The Way is originally harmonious and those who are obedient are monks.
If mind and appearance already go against each other, how can they become members of the sangha, Treasures?
Some exclusively read non-Buddhist texts, amuse themselves the qin or playing qi , or they recite the Book of Odes and the Book of History . They spend their time in vain. Buddhism is the Dharma medicine.
Saving sentient beings is urgent.
The literature is profound; its principle is deep; and its expression is splendid, mysterious, and abundant.
If we can understand even one sentence we will develop it into immeasurable meanings.
There are several thousands of fascicles of old and new sutras and discourses.
Formerly I did not investigate or pick up the meaning of even a single sentence.
Non-Buddhist texts were not an urgent matter. I diligently studied day and night.
I was afraid laypeople would laugh at my ignorance I did not study worldly books.
What would one think if I could not answer when a secular person asks me about the meaning of a sutra?
If I continue Buddhism while being unfamiliar with nonBuddhist teachings, this is not enough for me to be ashamed of myself. If I continue Buddhism without understanding Buddhism, my shame would be more serious.
It is truly because our time is the last and decadent Dharma. Human life hurriedly transmigrates.
Impermanence is very close to us. We fail to plan in the morning even for that very evening.
I am afraid that once we enter dark paths it is difﬁcult to come out of them for successive kalpas.
Even if we encounter the Buddhist Dharma again, we will think that we have no means by which to learn it.
If we have some sutras and Vinayas, studying non-Buddhist teachings is  to subdue the non-Buddhist Way.
This is of the highest class.
A wise man says, “First we are versed in the Buddhist teaching and concurrently we come to know non-Buddhist teachings.
we can make a remonstrant argument as sharp as the tip of a lance, and utter words related to authority.
Those who are well versed in both Buddhist and non-Buddhist teachings are worthy of being skilled teachers.
Those who can follow what the sutras say come to subdue the non-Buddhist Way.
Now we measure ourselves and contact phenomenal objects incompetently.
Our consciousness is continually covered up, ignorant, simple, and dark.
We have nothing on which to rely in order to save ourselves. What is able to save sentient beings?
Form and scent are not in common with each other. How do you distinguish beans from wheat?
I pray to retreat, examine, and study for myself.
Therefore, the Nirvāṇa-sūtra says: The Buddha told all the bhikṣus, “Those who have renounced the world should cultivate wisdom by studying the Buddhist teaching and make insistent effort to ﬁnd out in sutras.
They must not open and read non-Buddhist books, such as those of the Lokāyatika school.
They always stay out in the hills and valleys, in quiet places, or in meditation rooms, cultivate in meditation, recite sutras worshiping the Buddha, cut off wrong, and manifest rightness.
These are what you fundamentally respect.” 92 Moreover, the Shujia jing says:
93 Śuka-Todeyyaputra, a brahman’s son, addressed the Buddha, “If laypeople who stay at home can practice meritorious virtue and good deeds, they surpass those who have renounced the world.
How is this so?” The Buddha replied, “I do not have a deﬁnite answer for this.
Some of those who have renounced the world do not cultivate good deeds.
Accordingly they are not better than those who remain householders.
If those who remain householders can practice , then they surpass those who have renounced the world .” In addition, the sanqian weiyi says:
Regarding the duties performed by those who have renounced the world, ﬁrst is meditation; second is recitation of the written Dharma in sutras; and third is to convert people and advise them to donate .
If one completely conducts these three activities, that monk follows the for those who have renounced the world.
If he does not, he will live and die in vain.
He has only the cause to suffer from sin.
Furthermore, the Baiyu jing says:
Formerly there was an incident of a person who used ﬁre and cold water .
Attending the ﬁre, he put water into a washbowl and placed it on the ﬁre.
Later he wished to take the ﬁre but all the ﬂames had been extinguished.
He wished to take the cold water but the water ended up hot.
Both the ﬁre and the cold water were lost.
People of the world enter the Buddhist Dharma, renounce the world, and seek the Way.
They have already renounced the world yet they still miss their wives and children and the pleasures of the ﬁve desires.
Because of this, they lose the ﬁre of their meritorious virtue and concurrently they lose the water of observance of the precepts.
Those who long for desires are also just like this.
Moreover, the Nirvāṇa-sūtra :
The Buddha said, “After my nirvana some of my śrāvaka disciples will be ignorant, violate the precepts, cherish life, ﬁght, reject the twelve kinds of scriptures, read and recite various kinds of books, compositions, hymns, and literary works of non-Buddhist teachings, receive livestock or other impure things, and they will say that these are all allowed by the Buddha.
People like this will exchange good sandalwood for earthenware or wood, gold for brass, silver for pewter, silk for coarse woolen cloth, or nectar for evil poison.” Moreover, the Yijiao jing says:
Daytime is when you study and learn good things with a diligent mind, and nothing causes you to lose them.
During the ﬁrst and last parts of the nighttime do not lie down.
In the middle part of the night recite sutras and sleep according to your wish.
Do not allow yourself to spend your entire life in vain and to have nothing to attain through the cause and condition of sleeping .
Following this practice of the Way, you can attain the śramaṇa’s four fruits of sainthood leading to highest wisdom.
One who practices like this is worthy of being a master and a truly good ﬁeld of merit, and can accept donations from laypeople.
Again, the piposha lun says:
Just as when someone the sun his vision is not clear, the wisdom eye used when one ponders and seeks non-Buddhist writings and discussions is not clear.
Just as when someone looks at the moon and his vision is clear, the wisdom eye used when one ponders and seeks the sutras and discourses of the Buddhist Dharma is clear.
If we ponder and seek non-Buddhist or secular matters, just like beating a rhesus monkey, we only produce impurity.
If we ponder and seek the Buddhist Dharma, just like tempering true gold, the more we temper, the purer we will become.
Furthermore, the Pusa shanjie jing says:
Of bodhisattvas, those who neither read nor recite the Tathāgata’s true sutras but who read and recite worldly books, literature, hymns, writings, or annotations commit an offense.
Those who do not commit this offense can correct a wrong view if they enter into an argument.
Take two-thirds from the Buddhist scriptures and one-third from non-Buddhist scriptures.
Because one knows that non-Buddhist scriptures are deceptive and wild teachings, while the Buddhist Dharma is true.
Because one knows worldly matters, and therefore he is not disrespected by the people of the world.
By this composition, it is testiﬁed that if a person who studies the Buddhist Dharma once rejects the Buddhist teaching and seeks non-Buddhist teachings, then he has committed a sin.
If a person understands the principle and practices it, he will quickly learn and subdue the non-Buddhist Way.
He still must have revulsion for and renounce . To engage in advanced studies of Buddhist deeds causes him to increase his excellence.
If he becomes attached only to one side, he ruins the true Dharma.
Therefore, the dichi lun says:
If a bodhisattva says at the Buddha’s place, “I will give up and not study and will learn only wrong discussions of non-Buddhist teachings and worldly scriptures,” this is called committing numerous offenses.
This is the offense of giving rise to deﬁlements.
If the sharpest person can promptly receive learning, he will attain the immovable wisdom.
If daily or monthly he receives two-thirds of his learning from the Buddhist Dharma and one-third from non-Buddhist books, this is called a non-offense.
If he is interested in and happy with worldly books, the non-Buddhist Way, or paganism, and neither rejects them nor thinks to reject them, this is called committing numerous offenses.
This is the offense of giving rise to deﬁlements.
Verses say: A fox in winter has abundant fur. The string of a cocoon in spring is light silk.
As the body changes, one becomes distressed. As the mind and consciousness turn back, one deceives oneself. At the age of shedding milk teeth, I sang a song while drumming on my belly. Formerly when I was young, I drove a carriage following a man of chivalrous spirit, And I poured wine while playing with a seductive, charming girl. I thought only of the pleasing things before my eyes. How could I know of the sorrows of my next existence? Once I felt prudently ashamed of this, I left all attachments behind eternally. I wish to discern the foundation of truth and falsity. Then impurity and purity will spontaneously separate from each other. I am ashamed of stagnating under the ﬁve coverings. How can I know are the same as the four reliances ? Encouragement and Guidance Introduction, Quoted Testimonies, Giving Rise to Faith, and Karma and Cause. The noble and the humble are not constant; rich and poor have no ﬁxed .
It can be compared to that water and ﬁre alternately become intense or that coldness and heat arise in turn.
Accordingly, we see wealthy people whose rooms are warm, who have abundant clothing and enough food, and who make a living without having to do hard labor. These all spontaneously come to them.
On the other hand, we see those in poverty and hardship, starving and exhausted by corvée labor.
They run about seeking from the early morning when they wake up until nighttime when they go to bed.
Because of this their bodies are damaged and worn out and their hearts are troubled.
Even if they obtain something, it is scattered and lost in many ways.
They wish all day long to have abundant wealth but they have never been even for a short time.
Because of this suffering, consequently I exhort and encourage you to exert yourselves to be kind enough to donate, and I earnestly encourage you to do good deeds.
If, furthermore, there are those whose garments, necessary utensils, and amusing things are all attractive, splendid, beautiful, and clean, the energy of the full cycle of the seasons properly rotates in order; cold and warm repeats.
The four seasons change; each follows what awaits it without fail.
In addition, we see there are a less-than-one-chi cloth or tattered silk fabrics as long as one zhang.
They are ﬁlthy and dark, covered with dirt; they stink, and are greasy, decayed, and rotten.
They do not know of a hemp garment in the scorching heat of summer or silk or cotton fabric the ice and snow of winter.
Or their bodies are covered by nothing; both men and women are naked in mixed company. This is not only shameful, they also feel very ashamed of themselves.
If you see such hardship, how can you not keep away from it?
Consequently, I exhort and encourage you to exert yourselves to do good deeds.
You should give clothing as well as houses to them.
How can you not see that all other people have while you alone have nothing?
Therefore you must be brave and ﬁerce in cultivation and learning.
If, moreover, there are those who eat sweet things and are also offered rare delicacies and fully praise them; small tables are put together and seat mats cover the ﬂoor.
Aromatic tasty, good-smelling, and fragrant are arranged in a line.
On the other hand, there are those for whom even a meal of plain brown rice is insufﬁcient and a coarse soup is always lacking.
For a long time there have been neither salt nor plums and both ﬁsh and vegetables have been lacking.
Or such people can eat only on alternate days; they have only porridge and rice bran, again and again, which are mixed with fruit or to which greens are added.
They are weak, fatigued, and seriously in danger but they do not possess the right method to save themselves.
If you see such hardship, how can you not keep away from it?
Consequently, I exhort and encourage you to exert yourselves to do good deeds.
You should give drink and food as well as mixed starches. How would it be possible that all other people have sufﬁcient while you alone have only hardship?
Therefore you must be brave and ﬁerce in cultivating and learning.
If, again, there are those of honorable rank, who achieve prominence in ofﬁcial positions, who ride on well-fed horses wearing light garments, and who act freely as they desire, wherever they go heavenly and human beings look up to them and when they stop, the spirits treat them with respect.
On the other hand, we see mean, low, and vulgar people who are not even spoken of.
When they are born no one knows of their birth, and when they die no one knows of their death.
They exist on the side of a ditch full of mud and coals, they hope to be sitting and lying about in loam.
Even though they have loud voices with which to scold, , they invite the suffering of being beaten.
They are not respected by spirits, and are also harmed by dogs.
If you see such hardship, how can you not keep away from it?
Consequently, I exhort and encourage you to exert yourselves to do good deeds.
You should exterminate arrogance and uphold and practice modesty and courtesy.
How could it be possible that other people are always of a noble class while you are always living in a lowly way?
Therefore you must be brave and ﬁerce in cultivating and learning.
In addition, if there are those who have decent features and who speak the wind blows, they always keep in mind to extensively beneﬁt .
They are benevolent with universal love and their words do not cause harm to others.
On the other hand, there are those who have ugly boils on their faces and whose words are mean and cruel.
They know only how to beneﬁt themselves and do not consider others.
Because other people bear with them, they consequently attain victory, but because many people become enraged with them, they consequently invite evils.
If you see such hardship, how can you not keep away from it?
Consequently, I exhort and encourage you to exert yourselves to do good deeds.
You should exterminate anger and uphold and practice forbearance.
How could you cause other people to always achieve the place of excellence while you keep yourself eternally apart from the pure condition?
Therefore you must be brave and ﬁerce in cultivating and learning.
Moreover, if there are those whose possess strong willpower and who seldom become ill, they always sustain practice of the Way without hindrance.
On the other hand, there are those who are emaciated and distressed, and are frequently ill. They lose their vigor.
Every time they move their troubles increase. They are uneasy whether sleeping or sitting.
If you see such evils, you really had better go far away from them.
Consequently, I exhort and encourage you to exert yourselves to do good deeds.
You should give them medicine and provide relief for them at any time.
How is it possible that some people never have sickness or fatigue, while you are eternally in a stagnant state?
Therefore you must be brave and ﬁerce in cultivating and learning.
All is just like this matter.
I truly and strongly urge you .
If I do not urge you in this way, I am not diligent as those who study .
As the Nirvāṇa-sūtra says, “Staying at home is just like prison.
One’s wife and children are like shackles.
Property is like a heavy burden.
Relatives are like enemies.” 94 You, however, are able to receive and hold fast to the pure precepts for even a day and night, circumambulate a buddha image chanting a sutra during the six periods of the day , and also to have the three puriﬁcation months a year as well as the six puriﬁcation days a month.
Vegetables are moderately seasoned.
You check on yourself bodily, verbally, and mentally, not letting yourself go to other things.
You focus your attention on leaving secular life and highly admire the Buddhist Dharma.
There is nothing deﬁcient in your bending and lifting of the head and you have nothing to lose in sitting and lying .
Darkness is connected to the bright phase. In the daytime you think of the pure Dharma, deeply respect śramaṇas, and beneﬁt secular people with a mind of compassion.
If you can do things like these, even if you remain a householder, it is possible to cross over suffering. Thus, a sutra says:
95 the Buddhist Dharma is about to be exhausted laypeople protect the Dharma.
If they cultivate wholesomeness they will rise up and be reborn in heaven; as a snowﬂake falling through the air.
If a bhikṣu violates the precepts he will fall into evil realms, just as rain falls from the sky.
You must know that when you do good deeds while experiencing hardship, those good deeds are the greatest; if you commit a sin while in a state of happiness, that sin is not minor.
Therefore, if you enter happiness from hardship, you have not known  happiness in happiness.
If you go into hardship from happiness, you know hardship in hardship.
This saying is provable.
It is my earnest hope that you will understand it.
Moreover, the Faju jing says in verse: There is no greater heat than licentiousness.
There is no stronger poison than anger. There is no more intense suffering than a body. There is no greater happiness than extinction . The Buddha, after speaking this verse, said to all the bhikṣus, “In the remotest past, when there were innumerable worlds, there was a bhikṣu who possessed the ﬁve supernatural powers.
His name was Atibalavīryaparākrama .
96 Staying under a tree on the mountain, he quietly and peacefully sought the Way.
At that time there were four birds and beasts that always attained peace by relying on him and staying by his side.
First was a dove; second was a crow; third was a venomous serpent; and last was a deer.
These four animals went out to seek food in the daytime, and in the evening they came back to stay overnight .
“One night the four animals asked each other, ‘Among the suffering of the world, what is considered to be the most serious?’ The crow said, ‘Hunger and thirst are the most serious suffering.
When we are hungry and thirsty our bodies become weak; everything we see goes black and our consciousness is not at ease.
We throw ourselves into a net and ignore  the sharp points and edges of weapons.
There is no other reason than this for us to lose our life.
Because of this, I would say that hunger and thirst should be considered the suffering.’ “The dove said, ‘Licentious desire is the most serious suffering.
If sexual desires are vigorous, we care about nothing else.
There is no other reason except than this for us to be in danger and lose our life.’ “The venomous serpent said, ‘Anger is the most serious suffering.
Once we give rise to a malicious intention we no longer have scruples about closeness and remoteness.
We may kill a person or commit suicide as well.’ “The deer said, ‘Fear is the most serious suffering.
While I am in the forests and ﬁelds I am continually afraid and cautious.
I dread hunters and all ravenous and cruel beasts. If I hear any sound of them, I quickly throw myself into a hole in the ground or onto the bank of a river.
Even a mother and her fawns give up each other and palpitate with terror from the bottoms of their hearts.
Because of this I would say that fear is the suffering.’ “The bhikṣu heard and responded to them.
‘What you have discussed is merely the tail .
You have not investigated thoroughly the foundation of suffering.
In the suffering of the world, there is nothing more than having a body.
The body is the vessel of suffering in which anxiety and fear are immeasurable.
For this reason, I gave up the secular world to study the Way.
I uproot my intentions, cut off my thoughts, and do not covet the four great elements. I wish to destroy the foundation of suffering.
I maintain my ambition nirvana.’” Accordingly we know having a body is the great foundation of suffering.
Therefore, a book says that there is no greater trouble than having a body.
97 As the Naxian biqiu wenfo jing says:
At that time King Milinda asked an arhat called Nāgasena Bhikṣu, “ a man does evil when he lives in the world.
When he becomes a hundred years old and is about to die, if he thinks of the Buddha he will be reborn in heaven after his death.
I do not believe these words.
Moreover, it is said that if one destroys life, when he dies he will enter hell.
I do not believe this, either.” Nāgasena Bhikṣu asked the king, “If someone were to place a pebble he holds onto the surface of water, will the pebble ﬂoat?” The king replied, “No.
The pebble sinks.” Nāgasena asked, “If he has a hundred large pieces of slate and puts them on a boat, will the boat sink?” The king answered, “No, it will not.” Nāgasena said, “A hundred large pieces of slate on a boat will not sink because of the boat.
Even if someone possesses great evil, if he thinks of the Buddha even for a moment, because of this he will not enter hell and will be reborn in heaven.
Why do you not believe this?
The case where the pebble sinks is just like the case of a person who does evil without knowing Buddhist sutras will enter hell after he dies.
Why do you not believe this?” The king said, “Good!
Good!” Nāgasena Bhikṣu continued, “Suppose two people die at the same time, and one of them is reborn in the heaven ruled by Brahma, , while the other is reborn in the state of Kaśmīra.
Even though there is a great distance between these two people, when each dies they both reach  in an instant.
It is just as when a pair of ﬂying birds, one of which perches on a high tree and the other on a low tree, yet when the two birds ﬂy away together at the same time, their shadows reach the ground at the same time.” Nāgasena Bhikṣu said, “If an ignorant person does evil he will have great misfortune.
If a wise person does evil he will have only minor misfortune. This is like the case in which a heated iron is placed on the ground:
one person knows that it is heated iron but another does not; both people pick up at the same time but the hands of the person who did not know are heavily burned while those of the one who did know this are only lightly burned.
Doing evil is also like this.
An ignorant person cannot repent by himself; therefore his misfortune becomes heavy.
A wise person does evil yet he knows he should not have done so.
Everyday he is penitent; therefore, he has only minor misfortune.” Furthermore, the Sipin xue jing says:
Among ordinary people, some are not as good as animals.
Among animals, some are better than human beings.
What is the reason for this?
Those who do not stop committing sin enter hell after they die.
They become hungry ghosts only when their punishment is over.
After punishment of hungry ghosts they are reborn as animals.
After punishment of animals they come back to human status.
Therefore, they ﬁnish their punishment in of animals and only then they are able to become human beings.
For this reason, you should do good, admire the teaching of the Three Revered Ones, leave behind the three evil realms for a long time, receive bliss as a heavenly and human being, and later attain liberation for a long time.
What is more, the Sishierzhang jing says:
The Buddha said, “There are ﬁve difﬁculties in the world:
the difﬁculty of making donations faced by poverty-stricken people, the difﬁculty in learning the Way faced by wealthy and distinguished people, the difﬁculty in controlling life in order not to die, the difﬁculty of being able to see Buddhist scriptures, and the difﬁculty of being reborn in the world where the Buddha resides.” Moreover, the Za piyu jing says:
There are eighteen matters as serious difﬁculties in the world.
First is the difﬁculty of happening to be in the world where the Buddha resides; second is the difﬁculty of being able to be a human being even if one meets the Buddha; third is the difﬁculty of being reborn in the Middle Kingdom even if one becomes a human being; fourth is the difﬁculty of being reborn in the gotra family even if one resides in the Middle Kingdom; 98 ﬁfth is the difﬁculty of being completely possessed of four limbs and six sense organs even if one is in the gotra family; sixth is the difﬁculty of obtaining wealth even if one has four limbs and six sense organs; seventh is the difﬁculty of meeting a good virtuous friend or teacher who leads one to the Buddhist Way even if he obtains wealth; eighth is the difﬁculty of being endowed with wisdom even if he obtains a good virtuous friend or teacher; ninth is the difﬁculty of possessing a wholesome mind even if one attains wisdom; tenth is the difﬁculty of being able to donate even if one attains a wholesome mind; eleventh is the difﬁculty of intending to obtain a versatile, good, and virtuous person even if he can donate; twelfth is the difﬁculty of going to the place where the versatile, good, and virtuous person is even if one obtains him; thirteenth is the difﬁculty of getting a proper chance even if one goes to that place; fourteenth is the difﬁculty of being able to receive and listen to the speech even if one gets a proper chance; ﬁfteenth is the difﬁculty of attaining the wisdom to correctly understand even if one listens to the speech; sixteenth is the difﬁculty of being able to receive the profound teaching even if he can understand; seventeenth is the difﬁculty of being able to practice in accordance with the speech even if one receives the profound teaching; and eighteenth is the difﬁculty of being able to testify to the sacred fruition even if he receives the profound teaching and practices in accordance with the speech.
These are the eighteen matters of difﬁculties.
The Foshuo taizi shuahu jing says:
King Ajātaśatru’s crown prince, called Subāhu, addressed the Buddha, 99 “Through what cause and condition does a bodhisattva obtain a beautiful countenance?
Through what cause and condition is he reborn transformed in lotus ﬂowers without entering a woman’s womb?
Through what cause and condition can he know about former existences?” The Buddha told the crown prince, “Since can be forbearing, he is good-looking.
Because he is not dissipated and licentious, he can be reborn transformed.
He lives in the human for  seven days, 100 and then knows the matter of the innumerable worlds in former existences.” again, “Through what cause and condition does a bodhisattva have the thirty-two marks of physical excellence?
Again, through what cause and condition does he have the eighty minor marks ?
Furthermore, through what cause and condition do those who look upon the Buddha’s body never tire of seeing it?” The Buddha replied to the crown prince, “Originally when he became a bodhisattva, he was fond of donating various miscellaneous things and gave to all buddhas, bodhisattvas, teachers, parents, and other people whatever they need.
For this reason, he obtains the thirty-two marks of physical excellence. A bodhisattva should have benevolence and think with compassion of all beings, even the wriggling species, just as people regard a baby.
Everyone wishes for liberation.
For this reason, he obtains the eighty minor marks .
He looks on people of ill-will just as he regards his own parents; he has the mind of equality without discrimination.
Therefore, never tire of looking at the Buddha.” Again, , “Through what cause and condition does know the wisdom of the profound teaching and the practice of dhāraṇī?
Through what cause and condition does he know the immovable samādhi and attain the peaceful state of mind?
Moreover, through what cause and condition do those who listen to the wholesomeness spoken by the Buddha all happily receive it in faith?” The Buddha told the crown prince, “A bodhisattva joyfully copies, faithfully receives, recites, and learns .
For this reason he knows the wisdom of the profound teaching and attains the practice of dhāraṇī. Furthermore, he always focuses his thoughts on an object.
For this reason he attains the samādhi and a peaceful mind.
Whatever the Buddha says is of great sincerity.
For this reason, what said is entirely believed by the people, and those who listen to it are happy.” Again, , “Through what cause and condition is not reborn in evil realms?
Moreover, through what cause and condition can he be reborn in heaven?
Additionally, through what cause and condition does he not covet attachment and desires?” The Buddha replied to the crown prince, “A bodhisattva believes in the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha, generation after generation.
Because of this he is not reborn in the eight evil realms.
101 Since he observes the precepts completely he is reborn in heaven.
Because he knows that the foundation of the Dharma is emptiness he does not covet anything.” Again, , “Through what cause and condition are a bodhisattva’s bodily, verbal, and mental acts and what he intends to do all pure?
Moreover, through what cause and condition are devils unable to take advantage of him?
Again, through what cause and condition do not dare to slander the Three Treasures?” The Buddha replied to the crown prince, “A bodhisattva loves the Three Treasures.
For this reason he attains purity.
He is dedicated and diligent, without tiring .
For this reason, devils cannot take advantage of him.
All of his acts are done with the greatest sincerity.
Therefore, people dare not slander the Three Treasures.” Again, , “Through what cause and condition does a bodhisattva obtain a lofty voice like that of the king of Brahma Heaven?
Again, through what cause and condition does he possess the eight vocal superior qualities?
Furthermore, through what cause and condition does he know that all people’s thoughts can completely receive responses?” The Buddha replied to the crown prince, “A bodhisattva is greatly sincere and does not deceive, generation after generation.
Therefore, he obtains a good and lofty voice like that of the king of Brahma Heaven.
Because he does not use abusive language, generation after generation, he obtains the eight vocal superior qualities.
Since he neither utters words that cause enmity between people nor tells lies, generation after generation, all people’s thoughts can completely receive responses.” Again, , “Through what cause and condition can have a long life?
Further, through what cause and condition can they have good health?
Again, through what cause and condition can they maintain their families in harmony and comfort and not cause to separate?” The Buddha replied to the crown prince, “Do not destroy life.
Because of this you will be reborn as a human being with a long life span.
Do not wield a sword or cane in your hands and beat other people.
Because of this you will later be reborn as a healthy human being.
Reconcile people with one another when you see that they are ﬁghting, and make them happy.
Because of this you will later be reborn as a human being who cannot experience separation.” Again, , “Through what cause and condition can obtain wealth and not lose it?
Again, through what cause and condition can never be robbed by others?
Moreover, through what cause and condition can achieve an esteemed lofty position?” The Buddha replied to the crown prince, “If one does not covet other people’s wealth, because of this he will be wealthy and happy.
If he is fond of making donations and not stingy, because of this he will not lose his property.
If he is not jealous, because of this he will attain an esteemed lofty position at rebirth.” Again, , “Through what cause and condition can attain the divine eye and clairvoyance?
Furthermore, through what cause and condition can he attain the divine ear and the ability to hear any sound at any distance?
Again, through what cause and condition can he know the matter of birth and death in the world?” The Buddha replied to the crown prince, “If with a good intention one offers a lighted lamp before the Buddha, because of this he will  obtains the divine eye and clairvoyance.
If he joyfully performs music before a Buddhist temple, because of this he will obtains the divine ear and the ability to hear any sound at any distance.
joyfully concentrates his thoughts on an object.
Because of this he knows the mutation of birth and death in the world.” Again, , “Through what cause and condition can attain the ability to ﬂy anywhere at will and the four foundations of supernatural powers ?
Again, through what cause and condition can know the matter of former existences from innumerable past kalpas?
Moreover, through what cause and condition can attain the three bodies of the Buddha and further parinirvāṇa?” 102 The Buddha replied to the crown prince, “ is delighted to give things such as a vehicle, a horse, or a boat to the Three Treasures and to other people.
Because of this he can attain the ability to ﬂy anywhere at will and the four foundations of supernatural powers.
always devotes himself to concentrating his thoughts on all the buddhas and joyfully instructs others in the practice.
Because of this he is able to know the matter of former existences for innumerable kalpas.
A bodhisattva attains the path of proceeding to highest enlightenment without retrogressing to a lower spiritual stage .
Because of this he can sever the root of birth and death and, after attaining the Buddhist Way, he can enter parinirvāṇa.” Verses say: In a vast, deserted building, Moving busily about I am merely deluded. Abiding in suffering, I think it is happiness. Not being diligent, I do not exert myself. I do not follow the doctrine, And transmit a fanciful in vain. I externally follow the six sense organs and their objects, And internally go against the brightness of my mind. I am guided with kindness yet instead I am deluded. I tap sincerity and give rise to refreshment. Spiritual communication discloses brilliance. Darkness provides wonderful sounds. I trust my mind to right, perfect enlightenment. A ferry to enlightenment is a fortunate reward. As I touch it, it unites with me. My merit surpasses that of the past.
Miracle Stories Regarding Zhu Changshu of the Jin dynasty, his ancestors are from Central Asia.
His family had property through successive generations; they were wealthy.
The Zhu family moved their residence to Luoyang during the Yuan kang era of the Jin dynasty. Changshu believed in the Dharma wholeheartedly.
He was particularly fond of reciting the Sutra on Avalokiteśvara .
Later, his neighbor accidentally caused a ﬁre.
Changshu’s house was entirely straw-thatched, and furthermore it was exactly leeward of the ﬁre.
estimated that since the ﬁre was already so close to his house, even if he tried to take out some household effects almost nothing would survive.
He then ordered his family not to carry anything out on a cart.
No one tried to extinguish the ﬁre by pouring water onto it; they all simply chanted the sutra with sincerity.
After a while the ﬁre burned up the neighbor’s house Changshu’s house at the distance of the bamboo fence, the wind suddenly shifted.
The ﬁre stopped just at the edge of house.
At that time everyone thought this was a miracle.
In the village there were four or ﬁve frivolous and cunning boys.
They ridiculed , saying, “The wind happened to shift.
What kind of divine work would this be?
Let’s wait for a dry night and burn that house down!
If it cannot be burned we will accept .” After that, when the weather was very dry and the wind rose up and howled, the boys secretly got together and made torches, which they threw onto the roof of house.
They threw a lit torch three times and every time the ﬂames of the torch died out.
They were then greatly frightened and all ran back home.
The next morning, they all went together to Changshu’s house.
They confessed what they had done the day before, bowed their heads to the ground, and apologized.
Changshu replied, “I do not have supernatural powers at all.
I just recite Avalokiteśvara. It must be due to the help of awesome spiritual powers.
Boys, you should reform yourselves and take the path of believing in .” From that time on, all the people in the neighboring villages and local communities particularly revered .
Xing Huaiming of the Song dynasty was a man from Hejian .
He was the Adjutant General-in-Chief of the Song dynasty.
He once followed Zhu Xiuzhi, Governor of Nanjun  in an expedition to the north. were all captured by the enemy.
They then tried to catch the enemy off guard so they could all escape and go back.
They traveled at night and did not move in the daytime.
Three days passed but they were still afraid of their pursuers.
So they sent out a man beforehand to observe the enemy scouts.
Several days passed but the man had not yet returned.
One evening, in the darkness under the threat of rain, the man who had been sent out suddenly returned at daybreak.
He said in surprise, “A while ago I saw from a distance that the light from the campﬁre was very bright, so I dashed over here.
After arriving, however, it is instead quite dark.” Xiu and other people were surprised and startled by this.
Huaiming believed in the Dharma from early on.
Since the time he went on the expedition he always placed the Sutra on Avalokiteśvara his head and never stopped reciting it.
That evening he was reciting .
Everyone wondered if the supernatural power of the sutra.
Thereafter, they always also offered prayers .
Consequently, they were able to escape from and they resided in the capital city.
In the seventeenth year of the Yuanjia era , a śramaṇa visited Huai ming and said, “I see that particularly on this lane and in your house there is a bloody vapor ﬁlling the air.
You should relocate in order to avoid it.” After saying this, he left.
Huaiming saw him off.
As went out of the gate he disappeared.
felt very displeased.
Twenty days later, Zhang Jingxiu, neighbor, injured his father and killed his father’s concubine.
Huaiming thought that this was a sign of the bloody vapor and prayed that all would be well.
At that time adjoined those of Liu Bin and Liu Jingwen, and they all lived on the same lane.
It is said that in that year all the people were considered to be partisans of Liu Zhan and they were punished with death.
103 Wang Qiu of the Song dynasty, whose pseudonym is Shuda, was a man from Taiyuan .
He was the Governor of Fuling , but in the ninth year of the Yuanjia era he had failed to defend his prefecture and was put in prison.
Since then he was shackled with heavy chains.
Qiu had earlier practiced vegetarianism and from the time he was imprisoned he was especially careful about his diet.
There were more than one hundred people in the prison and most were starving. Qiu shared every meal with others.
Every day he observed the precept of not eating after noon and thought of Avalokiteśvara with sincerity.
One night he had a dream in which he ascended a raised seat and saw a śramaṇa, who gave him a one-fascicle sutra.
The title of the sutra was The was given together with all the bodhisattvas’ names. Qiu took in hand, opened it, and read it.
He forgot the ﬁrst bodhisattva’s name but the second was Avalokiteśvara and the third was Mahāsthāmaprāpta. Furthermore, he saw one wheel of a vehicle.
The śramaṇa said, “This is the wheel of the ﬁve realms.” When Qiu woke up, all the chains came off.
He realized that this was due to supernatural powers. He concentrated his attention on the prayer more and more.
Because of this, he was able to refasten the chains by himself.
Three days later he was pardoned for his offense. Speaker and Audience Introduction, Quoted Testimonies, Rites, and Violation of the Dharma.
(The remaining ﬁve parts of this The signiﬁcance of relationships between a teacher and his disciples is valued, and the wisdom cultivated by studying is distinctive.
Cultivating by righteousness, adjusting one’s actions, and being erudite are wholesome.
Therefore, Aśvaghoṣa saved the large rope that was about to be cut, and Nāgārjuna imparted large and small volumes of debates. The wheel tracks of wisdom are evident.
Pure expositions have been outstandingly put forth.
Those who have faith can completely understand the names and numbers , numerous trainings, and longstanding doubts.
On the other hand, to learn and to not speak are the concerns of Con fucius, 105 while to not understand meanings is what Śākyamuni admonishes against.
Therefore, sūtra says, “Worshiping the Dharma surpasses all worship.” 106 Consequently a non-Buddhist scripture says, “A good man is a teacher for a bad man. A bad man is a help for a good man.” 107 If you receive statement without disobedience, truth exceeds the storehouse of your feelings.
If you listen to as stated and yet go against the foundation, is rare it is difﬁcult to remove hardships by explaining about the contradictions between various teachings.
On this account, once the Xiang  is entirely lost, then the hexagrams will fail.
Once you lose words you will suffer misfortune for successive kalpas.
Therefore it is known that the transmission of the Dharma is not easy and receiving and following is extremely difﬁcult.
It is truly because we are apart from the Sage; as time goes by the sublime words have gradually become obscure.
It is also a difﬁcult practice to ﬁrmly receive every statement .
Be wary of being concerned about fame and wealth and of hardship to purify deﬁled feelings! The Zhong lun says in verse:
It is difﬁcult for an audience to obtain The true Dharma and a speaker. Therefore, if things are like this, The transmigration of birth and death is neither ﬁnite nor inﬁnite. Moreover, the Shidi lun says:
Since both speaker and audience do not conform to the Dharma, each of them has two faults.
One is the fault of not speaking equally, and the other is the fault that the Buddha does not feel happy .
Therefore the daji jing says in verse:
If all sentient beings have no capacity to receive the Dharma, The Tathāgata then cultivates nonattachment, Sets up great expedient means, and waits for a ripe opportunity to come. This is because he causes them to attain true liberation. The Dazhuangyan lun says in verse: You attain realization following that you hear.
If you have not yet heard it, then exercise caution and do not slander. Without hearing more than immeasurable things, Disparaging will result in acts of folly. The baoxing lun says in verse: The ignorant and the self-conceited Are fond of practicing the lesser teaching.
If they slander the Dharma and Dharma teachers, They will be scolded in a loud voice by all buddhas. Even though they may externally show a digniﬁed mien, They do not know the Tathāgata’s teaching. If they slander the Dharma and Dharma teachers, They will be scolded in a loud voice by all buddhas. I now see young laypeople and clergy in the beginning stage of learning .
They start with delusions.
In regard to the meaning of a text they give rise to thoughts of self-satisfaction.
Relying on themselves, they try to tower over others and shift humiliation onto others.
Accordingly, the Dichi lun says:
108 There are ﬁve kinds of faults of taking the meanings in following texts.
First is to believe incorrectly, second is to retrogress in making heroic effort, third is to delude sentient beings, fourth is to slight the Dharma, and ﬁfth is to libel the Dharma.
Even one who can preach the Dharma still has deﬁlement in mind, not to mention the question that listeners can give rise to faith.
If he preaches the Dharma with a pure mind, even if the transmigration of birth and death, he transforms nirvana.
On the other hand, if he preaches with a deluded mind, even if nirvana, he transforms the transmigration of birth and death.
Furthermore, the Nirvāṇa-sūtra says: The Mahayana is nectar.
It is also called a poisonous drug.
If it can eliminate , then it is nectar, but if it cannot it becomes a poisonous drug.
It is just like how putting a man into poisonous milk can kill him.
109 Therefore, the Baoxing lun says in verse:
110 If one has neither knowledge nor a wholesome consciousness, Bad friends will damage his right practice. a spider falls into milk, The milk is poisonous. Moreover, the shilun jing says:
If caṇdāla people who belong to the kṣatriya class see those who have renounced the world relying on my Dharma, from śrāvakas and pratyekabuddhas to the Dharma teacher who peaches the Mahayana teaching, 111 and if they slander, revile, disgrace, or deceive the true Dharma and interrupt the cultivation and confuse the mind of the Dharma teacher, because of these causes and conditions they will fall into Avīci Hell.
If you see one who has renounced the world relying on my Dharma, and you frequently direct anger toward that person, and revile and disgrace the Dharma I expound, unwilling to faithfully receive it, if you destroy a stupa, resident priests’ quarters, or temple buildings, or if you kill a bhikṣu, all the good deeds you had previously made will be completely wiped out.
When you are about to die your four limbs and the joints of your bones will all ache as acutely as if they are being burned by ﬁre.
Your tongue will be as if fastened and bound and you will be unable to speak for many days.
After you die you will fall into Avīci Hell. As the sanqian weiyi says:
There are ﬁve issues at the time of ascending the upper seat to chant a sutra.
First, must ﬁrst worship the Buddha; second, he must worship the Dharma of the sutra and a senior monk who is supervising the rite; third, he must ﬁrst take a step over the asengti, 112 ascend, and be correctly seated; fourth, he must face the senior monk who is supervising the rite; and ﬁfth, he must ﬁrst place his hands on the seat and then withdraw them.
After being seated there are ﬁve matters to which to attend.
First, the buddha must be placed on a seat; second, after the sound of the ghaṇṭā verses and hymns must ﬁrst be chanted; third, concerned with the service must be chanted; fourth, even if there is an offensive person present  cannot show anger while seated on the seat; and ﬁfth, if there is a person who has donated his possessions, must be arranged in order and placed before .
Moreover, there are ﬁve issues for asking about the sutra.
First, you must rise up from seat and ask a question in accordance with the Dharma; second, you cannot ask a question while sitting together with ; third, if there is something you do not understand, you must frankly ask a question about it; fourth, you cannot hold fast to your views and you should think in your mind that this is due to an external cause and condition; and ﬁfth, when you understand, you bow your head to the ground, face toward the opposite direction, and depart through the door.
Further, the Shizhu piposha lun says: When the Dharma preacher places himself on the lion seat , there are four kinds of laws.
What are the four?
First is that when he is ascending the raised seat he must ﬁrst respectfully bow to the assembly and then ascend the seat.
Second is that if there are females in the assembly, he must practice the contemplation on impurity.
Third is that he have the seal of physical excellence of a great person in his deportment and his eyes, and if he has a peaceful and happy countenance while expounding the Buddhist teaching every one of the audience will faithfully receive it; he must not speak of non-Buddhist scriptures; and he must have no fear in mind.
Fourth is that in dealing with abusive language and difﬁcult questions he must practice forbearance.
In addition, there are four more laws .
First is to give rise to the thought of beneﬁting all sentient beings.
Second is to not give rise to the thought of self as a real substance in all sentient beings.
Third is to not give rise to the thought of things as real substances in all written languages.
Fourth is to pray that all sentient beings will not retrogress from proceeding toward highest, perfect enlightenment by hearing the Dharma from you.
Again, there are four more laws.
First is to not slight yourself.
Second is to not slight your audience.
Third is to not slight what you speak.
Fourth is to not beneﬁt and support yourself.
Moreover, the Wenshushili wen jing says:
Mañjuśrī addressed the Buddha, “When can the four categories of your disciples not give voice or make sounds with their bodies or mouths, a piece of wood, a stone, or any other thing?” The Buddha replied to Mañjuśrī, “They cannot make any noise during the six periods of the day, when worshiping the Buddha, when listening to the Dharma, when all the people assemble, when begging for alms, during meals, and when relieving themselves.” “Why must they not make noise during these time periods?” The Buddha replied to Mañjuśrī, “During these time periods all heavenly beings come to us.
All the heavenly beings continually have a pure mind, a mind without deﬁlement, a mind of emptiness, a mind to follow prajñā, and a mind to contemplate the Buddhist Dharma.
Those noises make their minds unstable. Since their minds become unstable, they all return to .
Because all the heavenly beings leave us, all the evil spirits come to us and cause unbeneﬁcial and disturbing things.
They come in to this and cause various disasters.
People starve and further mutually encroach upon each other’s rights.
For this reason, Mañjuśrī, must be quiet when worshiping the Buddha.” The Buddha spoke in geya :
Do not make a noise whether with one’s body or mouth, Or any other noises by a piece of wood or a stone. One who quietly worships the Buddha is Praised by the Tathāgata. Furthermore, the Fo benxing jing says:
The Buddha said to all the bhikṣus, “From today on I will control all my disciples.
You cannot invite those of stupid and dull faculties, those who violate the precepts, and those who do not possess all the precepts to deliver any teachings.
From now on, if you request someone to preach the Dharma you must invite only people of excellent conduct who completely possess the precepts, or those who have accomplished wonderful bodhisattva conduct among all sentient beings.
“If there are who can clarify many sutras and Vinayas, and who understand the people of the mātaṅga , you should choose those who can distinguish written language clearly and who fully possess the ability of eloquence and have them preach the Dharma.
These bhikṣus will be sent one by one from a lower position to preach the Dharma for the people.
If the ﬁrst one becomes tired, the second one is invited. If the second one is exhausted, the third one should be requested.
If the third one is weary, the fourth one should be invited.
If the fourth one is tired, the ﬁfth one should be requested.
Consequently, some who are capable of preaching the Dharma should be invited one after another to expound the Dharma for the people.” At that time the people saw that the Dharma preacher possessed eloquence and could expound the Dharma.
They then scattered incense and ﬂowers and over him.
At that point, none of the bhikṣus accepted these things and they gave rise to feelings of disgust and wished to leave.
Why is this so?
Because the Buddha had decided that those who have renounced the world cannot own powdered perfume and incense powder, or any other incense or ﬂower decorations.
At that time, all the people heard and saw this matter.
They said, abusively, “These bhikṣus are still not worthy of receiving offerings like this, not to mention that surpasses them.” All the bhikṣus then went to the Buddha and closely questioned him about these facts.
At that time the Buddha said to all the bhikṣus, ‘O bhikṣus!
If there are all lay donors who, with a joyful mind, bring various offerings of incense, ﬂowers, powdered perfume, incense powder, and ﬂower decorations and scatter them over the Dharma preacher because it is auspicious, you must accept them.’ At that point all the lay donors arrived, bringing various items, treasures, and kaṣāya robes that they offered to the Dharma preacher.
Those bhikṣus were all dreadfully overwhelmed with shame and did not accept the items.
The people in the world said, in an abusive and gossipy way, “The Buddha’s disciples such as these śramaṇas are not worthy of receiving even a few unimportant offerings, not to mention that surpasses them.” At that time the bhikṣus, after hearing of this matter, went to the Buddha and closely reported it to him.
The Buddha then said to all the bhikṣus, “O bhikṣus!
If there are secular people who bring various material goods and kaṣāya robes to offer to the Dharma preacher, it is because they are happy. I approve of their almsgiving.
If there are useful things , I approve of you to accept them.
If there are things that are not useful, I approve of you to return them.” At one time a bhikṣu took the meaning of a summary of various sutras and spoke about it for others, but did not follow the sequential order.
On that occasion the bhikṣu felt ashamed of his conduct and was afraid. He worried that he had disobeyed the sutras and precepts. He closely told the Buddha.
The Buddha then said to all bhikṣus, “I approve you to select and take important meanings from various sutras as you like, and to preach the Dharma through examining and comparing phrases for the people.
You, however, may not damage the text of a sutra by making out malicious meanings.” Again, the Fo benxing jing says:
Once the bhikṣus had gathered in a hall.
There were two bhikṣus who preached the Dharma , and therefore they interfered with each other.
Accordingly, two halls were set up .
In each of the two halls, the two monks separately preached the Dharma but they still obstructed each other, just as before.
of one hall went to the other hall, leading his group.
In the other hall there were various bhikṣus. alternately lured and caused them to visit their hall.
The promiscuous coming and going  intersected. Consequently many people were disordered; some people came and some left.
The Dharma event was cut off.
Some bhikṣus were not happy to hear the talk in this Buddhist teaching.
So all the bhikṣus closely reported it to the Buddha.
The Buddha told all the bhikṣus, “From now on, two people cannot preach the Dharma in the same hall.
Again, two halls cannot be so close to each other that the preachers’ voices can be heard and interfere with each other.
Once again, the people of one cannot visit the people of the other and the people of the other cannot go over to that .
Again and again, you cannot loathe the Buddhist teaching and you cannot be unhappy to hear the talk.
If you loathe it, you will have to be punished in accordance with the Dharma.” What is more, the Sifen lü does not allow for two Dharma preachers to speak in the same hall, for the raised seats to be close to each other, or for to speak while seated side by side. The voices of singing praises and speaking and the chorus of chanting hymns are all entirely unapproved. Other Vinayas do not allow for the Dharma preacher to receive ﬂowers scattered by laypeople. If any ﬂowers touch his body he must brush them off. Furthermore, the Shanjianlü
When the Dharma preacher expounds the Dharma for the people, the females in the audience should cover their faces with a fan.
Be prudent to not grin!
If someone laughs, drive that person out!
what the Highest Perfect Enlightened One speaks with his golden mouth, out of compassion for sentient beings.
You must give rise to the mind of shame for your sins and listen.
Why do you laugh? Drive him out!
Dharma As the Fozang jing says:
The Buddha said, “Śāriputra, in the future bhikṣus will be fond of reading non-Buddhist scriptures.
When they preach the Dharma they will revise the diction to make the people happy.
At that time devils will help confuse the people and hinder the wholesome Dharma.
If there are those who are covetously attached to sounds and words and who skillfully elaborate on the diction , or those who are fond of reading non-Buddhist scriptures, then all the devils will misguide the people and cause their minds to be agitated.
All these people will be deluded by the devils.
Their eyes of wisdom will be covered and obstructed, and they will deeply covet what beneﬁts and nourishes them.
Looking at various nonBuddhist books can be compared to a group of blind people who are deceived by a con man and who are all made to fall into a deep pit and die.
“Next, Śāriputra, an impure Dharma preacher does not know the Tathāgata’s intention to comply with propriety.
He does not properly understand himself and yet he speaks for others. This person has ﬁve faults in this existence.
What are the ﬁve?
First, at the time of preaching the Dharma he harbors fear and is afraid that the people will reprove him.
Second, he internally harbors anxiety and fear but externally he speaks for others.
Third, this is none other than an ordinary person who has true wisdom.
Fourth, what he speaks is impure and is merely words.
Fifth, there is no sequence to his words and in all respects he has extracted them .
Therefore he gives rise to fear among the people.
An ordinary person like this has no wisdom and no unfailing attainment in mind. He simply seeks a worldly reputation.
Doubts and penitence consist in his mind and yet he speaks for others.
“For this reason, Śāriputra, if one sits on the raised seat before he has testiﬁed to the Dharma, this is a case where one teaches others without having personal knowledge.
By law he will fall into hell.” 113 Moreover, the Zengyi ahan jing says:
At that time the World-honored One said to all the bhikṣus, “You should know that there are four kinds of birds.
What are the four ?
First, there are birds with good voices but whose appearance is ugly. This called a kokila.
Second, there are birds with good appearance but whose voices are ugly.
These are called birds of prey .
Third, there are birds whose voices are ugly and whose appearance are ugly, too.
This is what is called an owl.
Fourth, there are birds whose voices are good and whose appearance is good as well.
This is what is called a peacock.
“There are also four types of people in the world. You should all be aware of this.
What are the four ?
First, there are bhikṣus who have pleasant facial features and a perfectly digniﬁed demeanor, yet they are unable to skillfully chant the teachings in the beginning, the middle, and the ﬁnal parts.
This means that these people have good appearance but a bad voice.
Second, there are people who have a good voice but an ugly appearance, who are incomplete in every action and lack a digniﬁed demeanor, yet they are good at preaching and they are diligent, observe the precepts, well in the beginning, the middle, and the ﬁnal parts, and have profound understanding of the principles.
This means that these people have a good voice but an ugly appearance.
Third, there are people who have a bad voice and an ugly appearance. It means that they violate the precepts and are not diligent.
In addition, they do not learn much and further they lose what they have learned.
This means that these people have a bad voice and an ugly appearance.
Fourth, there are people who have a good voice as well as a good appearance.
It means bhikṣus who have good facial features and who completely possess a digniﬁed demeanor.
Moreover they diligently cultivate the good Dharma and learn extensively without forgetting .
They can skillfully chant all the teachings in the beginning, the middle, and the ﬁnal parts.
This means that these people have a good voice as well as a good appearance.” Again, the Zengyi ahan jing says:
At that time the World-honored One said to all the bhikṣus, “There are four kinds of clouds.
What are the four ?
First, there are clouds that cause thunder without rain.
Second there are clouds that cause rain without thunder.
Third, there are clouds that cause rain as well as thunder.
Fourth, there are clouds that cause neither rain nor thunder.
These are the four kinds of clouds, which resemble the four types of people in the world.
First, what does it mean that bhikṣus can cause thunder without rain?
There are bhikṣus who learn the twelve kinds of scriptures by reciting aloud. Reciting them, they do not lose their meanings but they do not extensively preach the Dharma for people.
This means thunder without rain.
Second, what does it mean that rain without thunder?
There are bhikṣus who have good facial features and who entirely possess a digniﬁed demeanor.
However, they do not learn much; they do not learn the twelve kinds of scriptures by reciting aloud.
Again, they do not forget what they have received from others.
They are fond of mutually accompanying virtuous friends or teachers .
They are fond of preaching the Dharma for others, too.
This means rain without thunder.
Third, what does it mean that neither rain nor thunder?
There are bhikṣus who do not have good facial features and who do not possess a digniﬁed demeanor.
They do not cultivate the good Dharma and they do not learn much.
Further, they do not preach the Dharma for others.
This means these people cause neither rain nor thunder.
Fourth, what does it mean that rain and thunder?
There are bhikṣus who have good facial features and who entirely possess a digniﬁed demeanor.
They are very happy to study and fond of preaching the Dharma for others.
They exhort others and cause them to receive .
This means that these people cause rain as well as thunder.” Speaker and Audience Selecting People, Gradual and Sudden, The Gift of the Dharma, The Requital of Kindness, and Beneﬁt.
When the Dharma preacher ascends the seat, he must ﬁrst respectfully worship the Three Treasures and purify his own mind.
When he sees the virtuous selected, he should generate the benevolent thought to save all sentient beings and beneﬁt the people.
Then he should preach for them.
Therefore, the baoen jing says:
If the audience is seated but the preacher is standing, should not speak for them.
If the audience asks the preacher to go beyond the proper limits, should not speak for them.
If the audience relies on a person but does not rely on the Dharma, or if they rely on words but do not rely on the meaning, or if they rely on a sutra that does not reveal the whole meaning of the Buddhist Dharma but do not rely on a sutra that reveals the whole meaning of the Buddhist Dharma, or if they rely on cognition but do not rely on wisdom,  should not speak at all.
Because such people are unable to respect the pure Dharma of all the buddhas and bodhisattvas.
If the preacher venerates the Dharma, the Dharma audience also gives rise to reverence and listens to with sincerity. They do not give rise to disrespect.
This is called the pure preaching.
Therefore, the Ahan jing says in verse: 114 The audience’s correct mind is just like the craving for drink .
They absorbedly enter into the meaning of words. By listening to the Dharma their minds leap with sorrow and joy. should be preached for people like this. Furthermore, the Wufenlü
115 should remove his greed.
He should establish states of mind such as a mind of no self-abasement, a mind to not slight the masses, a benevolent mind, a joyful mind, a mind to beneﬁt others, and an immovable mind.
Consequently, he fully preaches a four-line verse.
If he causes the people concerned to understand things as they really are, then they will enjoy immeasurable comfort and beneﬁt for a long time.
Successively, the Nirvāṇa-sūtra says:
116 If you hold fast to, recite, copy, or preach , do not preach at the wrong time, in a wrong country, or when you are not requested , if you preach recklessly, slighting others, pitying yourself, or here and there, or if you preach going against or destroying the Buddhist Dharma, consequently you will cause immeasurable people to die and fall into hell.
This is a bad friend or teacher for sentient beings.
Moreover, the Shisong lü
There are ﬁve types of people who ask questions. should not be preached for all of them.
First are those who ask for trials .
Second are those who ask without having any doubts.
Third are those who do not ask for the reasons they should repent their offenses.
Fourth are those who ask without receiving a preaching.
Fifth are those who ask only in order to reprove.
These cannot be entirely answered.
If the people concerned really have goodwill, they do not possess the intentions listed above.
For those who wish to give rise to wholesomeness and destroy evil, the Dharma preacher speaks for them, according to their faculty through expedient means with goodwill.
If has not clearly understood himself or has doubts about the Dharma, then he cannot speak for others.
I am afraid that he will cause the people concerned to have the fault of erroneous transmission.
He will commit a sin in that case.
Further, the Baiyu jing and the Pitan lun (i.e., Apitan piposha lun, T. There are four lines of arguments in question-and-answer form.
First, there is the determined answer .
For instance,  if all sentient beings die.
For this there is a determined answer.
Second, asks if one who dies will certainly have rebirth.
This must be answered through discretion .
When one’s attachment to existence is exhausted there is no rebirth, but when one is still attached to existence, he or she certainly has rebirth.
This is called an answer through discretion.
Third, if someone asks whether or not human beings are the most wonderful, you should ﬁrst question that person in return, “Are you asking the three evil realms or with all heavenly beings?” If that person asks  the three evil realms, human beings are truly the most wonderful.
If that person asks  all heavenly beings, human beings are certainly not the most wonderful.
connotations are called an answer through asking a question in return .
Fourth, if someone asks about the fourteen difﬁculties, or if someone asks whether or not there is a limit to the world and sentient beings, or whether or not there is a beginning and end of the world and sentient beings, connotations are called an answer that remains open .
Arguments to such questions are similar to a argument. Various non-Buddhists are ignorant but they consider themselves to be intelligent.
They are not familiar with the four lines of argument .
They follow only one line of argument: answer through discretion.
Furthermore, the Youposai jie jing says:
The Buddha said, “Those who abide in accordance with the Dharma can beneﬁt themselves and others.
Those who do not abide in accordance with the Dharma cannot be called those who beneﬁt themselves and others.
Those who abide in accordance with the Dharma have eight kinds of undeﬁled wisdom.
What are the eight ?
First is wisdom of the Dharma ; second is the wisdom of reason ; third is the wisdom of time ; fourth is the wisdom of contentment ; ﬁfth is the wisdom of self and others ; sixth is the wisdom of the multitudes ; seventh is the wisdom of spiritual faculties ; and eighth is the wisdom of superiority and inferiority .
One who completely possesses the eight kinds of undeﬁled wisdom like these generally has sixteen characteristics in his speech.
First is to speak timely; second is to speak with sincerity; third is to speak in sequence; fourth is to speak harmoniously; ﬁfth is to speak following the meaning; sixth is to speak joyfully; seventh is to speak freely; eighth is to speak without slighting the audience; ninth is to speak without scolding the audience; tenth is to speak in accordance with the Dharma; eleventh is to speak in order to beneﬁt oneself and others; twelfth is to speak without disorder; thirteenth is to speak summarized meanings; fourteenth is to speak true and correct things; ﬁfteenth is to not give rise to arrogance after speaking; and sixteenth is to not wish for a reward in a future life after speaking.
One like this can listen to others.
When he listens to others he possesses sixteen things.
First is listening in a timely way; second is to listen happily; third is to listen with sincerity; fourth is to listen respectfully; ﬁfth is to listen without trying to ﬁnd fault ; sixth is to listen not for the sake of argument; seventh is to listen not to gain victory over ; eighth is to not slight the speaker when listening; ninth is to not slight the Dharma when listening; tenth is to not slight oneself after listening; eleventh is to leave far behind the ﬁve coverings when listening; twelfth is in order to hold fast to and recite when listening; thirteenth is in order to remove the ﬁve desires when listening; fourteenth is in order to have complete faith when listening; ﬁfteenth is in order to harmonize sentient beings when listening; and sixteenth is in order to cut off stupid and dull faculties when listening.
117 Good people!
Those who possess the eight kinds of undeﬁled wisdom can speak and listen.
People like this can beneﬁt themselves and others.
Those who do not possess them cannot be called those who beneﬁt themselves and others.
Next, regarding those who can preach the Dharma, there are two types.
One is pure and the other is impure.
There are ﬁve issues regarding an impure .
First is to preach for proﬁts; second is to preach for reward; third is to preach in order to surpass others; fourth is to preach for worldly rewards; 118 and ﬁfth is to preach with doubts.
There are ﬁve issues regarding a pure , too.
First is to offer food ﬁrst and then preach after that; second is to preach in order to enhance the Three Treasures; third is to preach in order to cut off one’s own deﬁlements and those of others; fourth is to preach in order to discern unrighteousness and righteousness; and ﬁfth is to preach in order for the audience to attain the supreme .
Good people!
An impure preacher of the Dharma is called ﬁlthy, one who betrays the Dharma, a disgrace, an erroneous preacher, and one who is disappointed.
Moreover, the Faju yu jing says:
Thereupon, the Buddha spoke in verse:
Even though one may recite a thousand chapters, If the meaning of the sentences is not right, This is no better than being able to annihilate a thought Through hearing the essential . Even though one may recite a thousand words, If they are not righteous, what advantage would they have? This is no better than being able to be liberated Through hearing of a single righteousness and practicing it. Even though one may recite a sutra many times, If it is not understood, what advantage would it have? Through understanding a single Dharma phrase And practicing it, one can attain the Way. What is more, the Dafaju tuoluoni jing says:
If people who receive the Dharma wish to cause the Dharma to not be cut off through practicing dhāraṇī, when all the Dharma preachers are about to expound the Dharma, they carefully adjust their appearance, sit properly, and ﬁrst recite the dhāraṇī:
Dadieta tuojiana ajiananjiana jiana jiana najia jiajianajia ajiajianajia jiana jiana jianaajiana jiajiana pobisha diyetapobisha yetaqieqiena duotapobishadi duotamojiashe najiashe jiajiashe.
119 At that time, the Dharma preacher surrounded by his dependents can immediately achieve the expedient means of divine protection, which causes that Dharma preacher’s mind to be undisturbed, his preaching of the Dharma to not be cut off, and desires and attachments to be exterminated.
He causes all those in the audience including rākṣasīs to not be disturbed by devils in their cultivation.
What the Dharma preacher needs is not to cause obstructions.
As the Baiyu jing says:
In the past there was a village ﬁve yojanas from a capital city, and in that village there was good, tasty water.
By imperial ordinance the king had the villagers regularly send some of the good water to him every day.
The villagers were exhausted and suffered . They all wished to move away from and stay away from the village.
At that time, that village headman said to all the people, “You must not leave!
I will address the king for your sake to change  from ﬁve yojanas to three yojanas.
If you can go and return for a shorter distance you will not be tired.” Then went and addressed the king.
The king reformulated and pronounced that it was three yojanas and they were greatly happy after hearing this.
Someone then said, “Since it is fundamentally ﬁve yojanas this makes no difference.” Even though heard his words they were not willing to give up since they believed what the king had said.
People of the world are like this, too.
As they cultivate the true Dharma in order to ferry over the ﬁve realms and head toward the city of nirvana, they give rise to fatigue in their minds and want to give up .
They are promptly driven by birth and death and they cannot move further.
The Tathāgata, the Dharma King, has great expedient means.
Dividing the Dharma of One Vehicle, he speaks of three .
The people of the lesser vehicle hear this and are happy.
They consider it to be an easy practice.
Doing good acts and improving virtue, they seek to ferry over birth and death.
Later, they hear someone say that there are not three vehicles; therefore this must be the One Vehicle.
Because they believe the Buddha’s words they are not willing to give up at last.
Like those villagers they are also just like this.
Moreover, the Garland Sutra says:
O Buddha’s disciples!
For instance, it is just as when the sun rises: the light shines upon all the kingly big mountains; next it shines upon all the big mountains; and then it shines upon Mount Diamond Treasure.
Afterward it shines all over the earth.
The sunlight does not think, “I should ﬁrst shine upon all kingly big mountains and then shine upon one after another , leading up to all over the earth.” It is simply because there are variations of high and low in mountains and lands and there are things are ﬁrst and last in being shone upon.
The Tathāgata, Arhat, Samyak-saṃbuddha is also like this.
120 He completed the sun of wisdom in the immeasurable, boundless Dharma realm and always emits the immeasurable and unhindered light of wisdom.
The light shines upon the kings of all big mountains, such as bodhisattvas; next it shines upon pratyekabuddhas; next it shines upon śrāvakas; and next it shines upon sentient beings who unfailingly attain good conduct and receive ediﬁcation in accordance with each being’s own way.
Afterward it shines upon all sentient beings, leading up to those who have an evil nature . For them makes beneﬁcial causes and conditions in the future.
The Tathāgata’s sunlight of wisdom does not think, “I must ﬁrst shine upon bodhisattvas, leading up to those who have an evil nature.” simply emits the sunlight of great wisdom to universally illuminate all beings.
O Buddha’s disciples!
For instance, it is just as when the sun and moon appear: in the lands leading up to steep mountains and deep valleys everything is shone upon.
The sun and moon of the Tathāgata’s wisdom are also like this.
It shines upon all beings clearly.
Sentient beings are simply not the same in terms of their hopes and good conduct.
Therefore the Tathāgata’s light of wisdom has various differences.
the Dharma As the Shizhu piposha lun says:
If a bodhisattva wants to give the Dharma to sentient beings, he should study and comply with the Dharma preacher’s merits, the meaning of preaching the Dharma, and precepts, just as is praised in the “King of Determination,” the Mahayana scriptures.
It means that he should conduct the four ways of preaching the Dharma.
What are the four ?
First is to learn extensively to be able to maintain all words, chapters, and sentences.
Second is to attain unfailingly good knowledge of the characteristics of the arising and extinguishing of all phenomenal things in the mundane world, as well as the world beyond the mundane world.
Third is to attain meditation and wisdom and to comply with all the teachings stated in sutras without dispute.
Fourth is to act according to what is stated  without increasing and decreasing.
Furthermore, the Zhengfanian jing says:
If there is a sentient being who honestly practices good deeds and preaches the Dharma in a single verse for the sake of someone who has a wrong view, thereby causing that person to purify his mind and believe in the Buddha, after the death of he will be reborn in yingsheng Heaven , where he will receive various pleasures.
Then, after leaving that heaven he will transmigrate according to his karma.
If one preaches the Dharma to others only in order to gain money or material goods, does not beneﬁt sentient beings with compassion, and takes the money or material goods, .
If he drinks wine or drinks and eats together with a woman using , or if he sells himself to seek money just as an actor does, then the reward for giving the Dharma in these ways is very small.
He will be reborn in heaven and become a bird of wide information that can speak verses.
This is called the lowest grade of giving the Dharma.
What is called the middle grade of giving the Dharma?
for others only in order to attain fame, to surpass others, or to surpass other great Dharma preachers.
Or he expounds the Dharma for others with a jealous mind.
The reward for giving the Dharma in these ways is small, too.
He will be reborn in heaven where he will receive the middle rank of reward, or he will be reborn in the human realm.
This is called the middle grade of giving the Dharma.
What is called the highest grade of giving the Dharma?
With a pure mind one wishes only to enhance sentient beings’ wisdom and expounds the Dharma not for money and proﬁts; because of this, he causes sentient beings of wrong views to abide in the true Dharma.
Giving the Dharma in this way beneﬁts himself as well as others.
It is as superlative and supreme as nirvana. Its merits are inexhaustible.
This is called the highest grade of giving the Dharma.
Moreover, the Jiashe jing says: 121 At that time the World-honored One spoke in verse: If the trichiliocosm Were ﬁlled with jewelry and valuables, And one uses them to make donations, The merits one earns are few.
If one expounds the Dharma in a single verse, The merits of this are numerous. If all the pleasant things of the three realms of existence were Entirely donated to one person, This would not equal giving even a single verse; The merit for this is supreme. This merit surpasses that , And can cause all suffering to be left behind. If worlds as numerous as grains of sand in the Ganges River Were ﬁlled with jewelry and valuables, And one donates them to all the tathāgatas, This is no better than giving a single the Dharma. Even though giving valuables produces numerous merits, It does not equal giving a single the Dharma. The merit of a single verse is much better, Not to mention that it is more difﬁcult to surmise. Again, the Shizhu piposha lun says:
Laypeople should practice giving material goods, and clergy must practice giving the Dharma.
Laypeople’s gifts of the Dharma are no better than that of the clergy, because those who listen to and receive the Dharma, laypeople, have shallow faith.
Moreover, laypeople possess much money and goods.
The clergy recite and understand clearly all the teachings stated in sutras and explain them for the people.
They have no fear among all the people.
On this point laypeople cannot come close to them.
In addition, are inferior to the clergy in causing an audience to give rise to a respectful mind.
Moreover, are no match for the clergy in wishing to expound the Dharma and convincing an audience.
Verses say:
Cultivate and practice the Dharma for yourself ﬁrst! Later, teach other people! Then you should speak these words, “You! Follow what I have practiced!” If you do unwholesomeness personally, How can you cause others to be wholesome? If you do not attain tranquil, complete extinction yourself, How can you cause others to achieve extinguishment?
Furthermore, if the clergy practice giving material goods, they will damage their remaining wholesomeness, they will leave their hermitages far behind, and they will certainly come to villages or towns where they will become engaged in with laypeople.
will make many statements, begin to give rise to the three poisons, and slight the six pāramitās in their minds.
Consequently they will come to greedily cling to the ﬁve desires, abandon the precepts, and return to secular life.
Therefore, this is called death.
Or they will go against the precepts and easily commit a felony.
This is called the various deﬁlements and miserable perils, including death.
Because of this cause and condition, for the clergy the giving of the Dharma is admired and for laypeople the giving of material goods is praised.
Moreover, the jin’guangming jing (Suvarṇaprabhāsa-sūtra, T.
In preaching the Dharma there are ﬁve kinds of issues.
First, the gift of the Dharma beneﬁts both himself and others, but the giving of material goods does not.
Second, the gift of the Dharma can cause sentient beings to escape from the three realms of existence, but the giving of material goods cannot cause them to even get out of the realm of desire.
Third, the gift of the Dharma is beneﬁcial for the dharmakāya, but the giving of material goods fosters and nourishes only the material body .
Fourth, the gift of the Dharma inexhaustibly grows, but the giving of material goods can certainly be exhausted.
Fifth, the gift of Dharma can break ignorance, but the giving of material goods stops one from conquering greed.
Therefore, it is known that giving material goods is not better than  the Dharma.
While giving the Dharma there is a spontaneous sequence.
If one has within his understanding that which is not necessary for other people to know, and being afraid that others are better than himself he keeps it unknown and does not speak of it, then he will not be able to personally listen to the Dharma eternally in the future.
The zhidu lun further says, “If one is stingy in the Dharma, he will be eternally reborn in a remote place where there is no Buddhist Dharma.” Because of being stingy in the Dharma, he hinders other people’s intelligence.
This would be no better than betraying the Dharma.
On the contrary, other people would be superior to such a person.
Moreover, the Chengshi lun says:
If a person can simply preach the Dharma for others, this is called beneﬁting others.
Even if this person does not practice in accordance with the Dharma personally, because he preaches for the sake of others he will also attain beneﬁt for himself.
On this point, regarding giving , there are brieﬂy three grades.
The lowest of giving the Dharma is to preach the Dharma of donation but not wisdom.
The middle of giving the Dharma is to preach observance of the precepts.
The highest of giving the Dharma is to preach wisdom.
In order to speak about wisdom, one who teaches others has an insight into truth.
Thus he can cut off deluded knowledge and the two kinds of hindrances , escape from the transmigration of birth and death, and achieve the highest wisdom and the happy fruition of nirvana in the future.
Even if he is merely able to offer only the Hinayana teaching, he will edify one person and cause to observe that life is empty.
To have faith and understanding is to rely on practices.
Even if he has not attained the Buddhist Way , he excellently ediﬁes all sentient beings in Jambudvīpa and causes them to practice the ten wholesome acts.
By having faith and understanding of the Buddhist teaching a person clariﬁes and cultivates the sacred Way.
He then has the cause to go out from . He will certainly attain nirvana.
Moreover, the Zhufayongwang jing says:
Suppose all sentient beings that exist on land and water and ﬂy in the air in Jambudvīpa attained a human body.
If someone teaches all those people and causes them to peacefully abide in the ﬁve precepts and the ten wholesome acts, the merit that person earns is not equal to that of someone who teaches one person and causes to attain faith in and practice .
Again, the Shizhu piposha lun says:
There are four ways by which one can lose wisdom.
These are what bodhisattvas must leave far behind.
What are the four ?
First is to disrespect the Dharma and the Dharma preacher.
Second is to secretly hide important teachings and to be stingy with them.
Third is to make hindrances for those who are delighted with the Dharma and to destroy their intention to hear .
Fourth is to be haughty, self-conceited, and to despise others.
There are also four ways by which you can attain wisdom, and which you should always cultivate and follow.
What are the four ?
First is to be respectful of the Dharma and the Dharma preacher.
Second is to speak in accordance with the Dharma that you hear, and which you recite for the sake of others with a pure mind, without seeking proﬁts.
Third is to diligently and continually seek , just as you would brush off sparks of ﬂame from your hair, because of knowing how to attain wisdom by following the learned.
Fourth is to hold fast to the Dharma in accordance with what you hear and to not forget, to esteem to practice according to what is spoken, and to not value language.
Kindness As the Shan’gongjing jing says:
The Buddha said to Ānanda, “If you hear a four-line verse from others, either copy it or write down names on bamboo tablets or textiles.
For several kalpas you will recall those such as upā dhyāyas and ācāryas and carry them on your shoulders, or even sometimes on your back, or continually carry them on your head.
practitioners take all musical instruments to offer to these teachers.
Even if you do these things you still cannot fully repay your indebtedness to your teachers.
“If in the life to come someone gives rise to disrespect for his teacher and upādhyāya, and if he continually speaks of their faults, I would say that such an ignorant one will have extreme suffering frequently and will certainly fall into evil realms in his future life.
Therefore, Ānanda, I instruct you to always practice the mind of reverence.
You must attain the supreme Dharma like this, which is what is called the very profound Dharma of respectfully loving and valuing the Three Treasures.” Moreover, the Fanwang jing says:
O Buddha’s disciples!
If you see that a Mahayana Dharma preacher, a companion who has the same views as yours, or someone who practices alongside you is coming into the priests’ living quarters, entering buildings, or entering a city, or if approaching from over a hundred li or a thousand li, immediately welcome him and see off him , worship, and give offerings to him.
Make an offering at the three times every day.
Daily meals, three taels of gold, drink and food of every taste, and bedding and a seat mat are offered to the Dharma preacher.
All necessities should be entirely given to him.
Regularly ask the Dharma preacher to expound the Dharma during the three times every day.
Worship at the three times every day.
Do not give rise to a mind of anger or a troubled mind.
Even if you would ruin yourself for the sake of the Dharma, ask for the Dharma.
If you do not do so you commit a minor offense of deﬁling pure conduct.
Again, the Youposai jie jing says:
After a layman receives and holds the six important precepts, if there is a Dharma lecture in a place within a distance of forty li, and he is unable to go and listen to it, he commits a minor offense .
Furthermore, the Dafangdeng tuoluoni jing says:
The Buddha said to Ānanda, “If someone has parents, a wife, and children who will not let him go to a Buddhist seminary, while facing those such as his parents he should burn various incense before them, kneel upright with joined palms, and make this statement, ‘I now wish to go to a Buddhist seminary.
Please have compassion on me and accept !’ He also should admonish and explain to them in various ways. He should expound the Dharma complying with propriety.
He should make this request three times as well.
If they will not grant his request, then while staying in his house he should keep silent, ponder by himself, and recite and hold fast to sutra.” Again, the Zhengfanian jing says:
If someone makes an offering to the Dharma teacher who expounds the Dharma, you must know that that person precisely makes an offering to the World-honored One of the present time.
That person, complying with what he offers in this way, will achieve that for which he has made a vow.
Consequently, he will attain highest, perfect enlightenment because he can make an offering to the teacher who expounds the Dharma.
Since he hears the Dharma he can control his mind.
Since he controls his mind he is able to break the darkness of ignorance and transmigration.
If you depart from listening to the Dharma, there is no chance to be able to control your mind by a single Dharma.
Furthermore, the Shengsiwei jing says: To not give rise to an evil, sinful act, acts which produce merit and happiness, or acts which cause an immovable mind is called an offering to the Buddha.
122 Moreover, the Huashou jing says:
If you offer things such as ﬂowers, incense, clothing, food, and decoctions of medicine to all the buddhas, this is not called the true offering.
If a person follows and is able to cultivate and learn the subtle Dharma he has attained in the place of enlightenment, where the Tathāgata sits, this is called the true offering.
Therefore, verses say:
Flowers, powdered perfume, Clothing, food, and decoctions of medicine— If these things are offered to all the buddhas, This is not called the true offering. In the place of enlightenment where the Tathāgata sits, If a person can cultivate and learn The subtle Dharma he attained, This is the true offering to the buddhas. Again, the Shizhu piposha lun says:
The Buddha said to Ānanda, “Sending incense and ﬂowers from heaven is not designated as making offerings and paying respect to the Tathāgata.
If bhikṣus, bhikṣuṇīs, upāsakas, and upāsikās absorbedly, without being self-indulgent, intimately cultivate the sacred Dharma and accrue merit, this is called the true offering to the Buddha.” Moreover, the Baoyun jing says:
Do not offer gifts of material goods to the Buddha.
The Tathāgata’s dharmakāya does not need gifts of material goods.
Offer only the gift of the Dharma to the Buddha.
In order to complete the Buddhist Way, the offering of the Dharma is the best.
Again, the Shan’gongjing jing says:
The Buddha said, “Suppose there is a bhikṣu who is unable to learn and understand a Dharma phrase like this even though he has had numerous summer retreats.
He must rely on other for learning.
What is the reason for this?
He still does not understand for himself, not to mention the case where he wishes to help others and become a teacher who supervises new monks.
Even if he is a good, senior, elder bhikṣu who has experienced numerous summer retreats, if he cannot understand the hidden matters of śramaṇas or if he does not understand things such as the Dharma and Vinaya, he must speak only while relying on someone for learning, too.
If there are bhikṣus who have received the Dharma from another should give rise to a mind of reverence and to have high regard for that teacher.
“When you are about to receive the Dharma, you must not smile, even slightly, bare your teeth, cross your legs, look at your feet, move your legs, nor walk with a limp before your teacher.
Before the teacher begins questioning, you cannot arbitrarily speak. Generally, if there is a duty for which you are employed, you cannot disobey orders.
Do not look at your teacher’s face.
Keep three zhou away from the teacher. 123 When you are ordered to take a seat, sit down at that place.
You cannot disregard his teaching.
You should give rise to a merciful mind at the teacher’s side.
If you have a doubt about some point, you should ﬁrst inquire of him .
If you see that the teacher has listened to you, ask him later about his judgment.
“You must know that at the three times of the day you should visit and ask him for instructions on your actions.
If you do not visit to ask for instructions during the three times, the teacher must punish you in accordance with the Dharma.
When you go to visit your teacher but do not ﬁnd him, you should take up a lump of earth, a piece of wood, or a blade of grass to mark and prove .
If you then ﬁnd the teacher in his room, at that time you, the student, should give rise to sincerity, circumambulate his room three times, worship him by bowing your head to the ground, and then depart.
If you do not ﬁnd the teacher, stop all duties. You cannot do them.
An exception is an order to answer the call of nature.
“Furthermore, you disciples must not speak roughly in your teacher’s place.
You should not refute him for whatever he may scold or blame you.
The mat on which the teacher sits and sleeps should ﬁrst be spread out and cleaned. You should make sure it has no dust, stains, insects, or ants.
When the teacher sits or lies down and also stands up, you should cultivate the activity of reciting.
“At the time the sun rises in the east, you, the student, should go to the teacher’s place.
Keep track of the time very well, and approach the teacher often and ask what he may need:
‘What shall I do for you?’ Moreover, you disciples cannot shed tears or drip snot or saliva in front of your teacher.
When walking within the temple, out of respect for the teacher do not cover your shoulder with the kaṣāya.
You cannot cover your head.
If the climate is hot, fan the teacher at the three times every day, offer water three times, and prepare a bath for him.
Additionally you should offer a cold drink to the teacher at the three times.
For everything the teacher does, you should exert all your physical powers to help manage them for him.” The Buddha said to Ānanda, “If in the future world there is one among the bhikṣus who does not give rise to respect at the teacher’s place, who speaks malicious criticism of his teacher monk, that person is not the srota-āpatti-phala.
He is not even an ordinary person, either.
That ignorant person must be punished in this way.
Even if a teacher really has a fault, still cannot speak about it, not to mention the case where certainly has no fault.
“If there is a bhikṣu who does not pay a respect to his teacher by his side, I would say that there is separately a minor hell called Duipu , and that person will fall into it.
After falling into that place, he will have a body with four heads. His entire body will be burned.
In appearance will be just like a big ball of raging ﬂames, sending out violent blazes. will burn vigorously without cessation; after burning, it burns again.
In that hell there are also numerous insects called gouzui .
Those numerous poisonous insects will continually eat away his tongue.
“That ignorant person will then abandon his body from that and will be reborn in the realm of animals.
This is all because he reviled and disgraced his teacher in the past. Because of the fault committed by his tongue, he will always eats excrement and urine.
After abandoning that body, he will be reborn in the human realm but will be always reborn in a remote place and possess only a wrong teaching.
Even though he is able to obtain a human body, he will not look like a human being; he cannot possess a human appearance.
He will be continually slighted, slandered, and maltreated.
Away from the Buddha, the World-honored One, he will always lack wisdom.
After he exhausts that and dies, he will fall back into hell, where he further receives the lessons of immeasurable and boundless suffering.” As the Zhengfanian jing says:
There are ten merits in the exposition of the Dharma. There are many beneﬁcial points.
What are the ten?
First is to possess time and place.
Second is to discern and easily understand.
Third is to correspond to the Dharma.
Fourth is to act not for proﬁts.
Fifth is to control the mind.
Sixth is to follow the exposition of the Dharma obediently.
Seventh is to afﬁrm that a donation has a reward.
Eighth is to afﬁrm that there are various hindrances in the law of birth and death.
Ninth is to afﬁrm that heavenly beings can fall down .
Tenth is to afﬁrm that there are always results for what one has done in a previous existence.
If a Dharma preacher has these ten ways, he causes those who listen to the Dharma to attain much merit, many beneﬁts, and peace, leading to nirvana.
If you hear the Dharma you have merit. You achieve the profound mind.
The root of faith is puriﬁed. You believe in the Three Treasures earnestly with a pure mind.
You visit a place to listen to the Dharma. Due to listening to the true Dharma, every time you raise your foot to step, you entirely give rise to the virtue of the king of Brahma Heaven .
Furthermore, the Dapusa zang jing says: 124 Give rise to deep affection and pleasure for all bodhisattvas just as you do for a great teacher.
Give rise to affection and pleasure for the place of the true Dharma just as you do for your own body.
Give rise to affection and pleasure for the Tathāgata’s place just as you do for your own life.
Give rise to affection and pleasure for a respectable teacher just as you do for your parents.
Give rise to affection and pleasure for all sentient beings and see them just as you do your only child.
Give rise to affection and pleasure for the place of the ācārya, the teacher from whom you received the teachings, and respect him just as you do your own eyes.
Give rise to affection and pleasure for all right conduct just as you do for your ears, eyes, body, and head.
Give rise to affection and respect for the pāramitās just as you do for your hands and feet.
Give rise to affection and pleasure for the Dharma preacher just as you do for many treasures of great value.
Give rise to affection and pleasure for the true Dharma you seek just as you do for good medicine.
Give rise to affection and pleasure for one who can name and recollect his sins just as you do for a good doctor.
Moreover, the Sengqiezha jing says:
At that time, Yiqieyong Bodhisattva addressed the Buddha, “O Worldhonored One!
If there are sentient beings who hear this Dharma, how many kalpas are their life spans?” The Buddha replied, “Their life spans are fully eighty kalpas.” Yiqieyong Bodhisattva asked, “How is a kalpa measured?” The Buddha replied, “For example, suppose a large city of twelve yojanas both in length and width and three yojanas in height is abundantly ﬁlled with sesame seeds.
There is a man who has lived a long time. Every hundred years he takes one away.
In this way, even after all the sesame seeds in the city have been taken away, a kalpa has not yet been exhausted.
Moreover, it can be compared to a large mountain twentyﬁve yojanas in length and width and twelve yojanas in height.
There is a man who has lived a long time. Once every hundred years he comes and whisks with a light silk fabric.
In this way the mountain is entirely removed, yet a kalpa has not been exhausted.
This designates the span of a kalpa.” Yiqieyong Bodhisattva then addressed the Buddha, “O World-honored One!
Once a person makes a vow he attains multiple merits in this way and a life span as long as eighty kalpas, let alone those who extensively cultivate all practices in the Buddhist Dharma.” Furthermore, the Nirvāṇa-sūtra says:
Even if one were to try to attain nirvana leaving behind the four teachings, there is no case like this.
What are the four ?
First is to associate with good friends. Second is to devote oneself to listening to the Dharma.
Third is to ponder concentrating on one object.
Fourth is to practice in accordance with the Dharma.
For this reason, through the cause and condition of listening to the Dharma, one is able to draw close to great nirvana .
Because he opens the Dharma eye.
There are three kinds of people in the world.
First are those without eyes . Next are those with one eye . Last are those with two eyes . Those without eyes refer to the people who do not often listen to the Dharma.
Those with one eye provisionally listen to the Dharma but their minds do not abide in it.
Those with two eyes devote themselves to listening to and receiving and practice in accordance with what they have heard.
Because of listening to the Dharma, you can know of these three kinds of people in the world. In addition, the Faju yu jing says:
In the past the Buddha stayed in the Jeta Grove Monastery in Śrāvastī, where he expounded the Dharma for all heavenly and human beings.
At that time King Prasenajit had a widowed called Vajrakumāri.
parents felt pity for her so they built a separate good house for her and gave her ﬁve hundred female entertainers to amuse her.
Among the people in an elder’s there was a maidservant called Kubjottarā.
She often went to a marketplace to buy cosmetics, incense, and ﬂowers.
One time she saw numerous people, both men and women, holding incense and ﬂowers for offerings, who were going out of the city to visit the Buddha.
She asked some passers-by, “Where are you all going?” They answered, “The Buddha has appeared in the world.
He, the Honored One in the three realms of existence, liberates sentient beings and they will all attain nirvana.” On hearing this Kubjottarā was very happy. Accordingly, she thought to herself, “I am now old.
It must be merit from my previous existences that I can see the Buddha.” She then took a portion of her money for incense, with which she bought beautiful ﬂowers.
Following the crowd, she arrived at the Buddha’s place. She worshiped him, withdrew, and stood .
She scattered the ﬂowers, burned incense, and listened to the Dharma absorbedly.
As she passed by the marketplace she bought some incense.
Due to the merit due to listening to the Dharma and her karma from previous existences that followed her, the fragrance of the incense ﬂoated and the weight  was double that of her last .
complained to her about her lateness and they all berated her.
Because she respectfully served the Way, Kubjottarā told them the bare facts.
“In the world there is a sage teacher, the Honored One in the three realms of existence, who beats the drum of the supreme Dharma and shakes the trichiliocosm. Innumerable people go and listen to the Dharma.
In fact, I followed them and listened to the Dharma.
That is why I was late.” Vajrakumāri’s followers heard say that the World-honored One’s Dharma and its meaning are profound and subtle, not what is heard in the world.
They felt terriﬁed and yet they were also pleased.
They sighed to themselves and said, “What sins do we alone have that hinder us from hearing the Dharma?” Accordingly, they asked Kubjottarā, “Please try to expound it for us!” Kubjottarā replied, “I am of humble origins and my mouth is ﬁlthy.
I dare not easily propagate it.” , “In the rule of expounding the Dharma, ﬁrst prepare a raised seat.” Kubjottarā received the decree and closely propagated the sacred decree.
All of the ﬁve hundred maidservants were greatly joyful.
Each of them took off a piece of clothing and piled them up to make a raised seat.
Kubjottarā bathed, received the Buddha’s awesome power, and expounded the Dharma properly.
Vajrakumāri and the ﬁve hundred maidservants all the doubts with which they had been fettered, broke evils, and attained the path of srota-āpatti-phala.
exposition of the Dharma was very good.
So no one was aware that had accidentally caught on ﬁre.
They were all burned to death in an instant and then reborn in heaven.
The king came, leading his men, intending to save the people from ﬁre, but he saw that they had been already burned.
He cleared the ruins away, had their bodies placed in cofﬁns, and completed burying them.
then went to the Buddha’s place and worshiped the Buddha.
He addressed the Buddha, joining his palms together in worship, and said, “Vajrakumāri was unfortunately not aware of the outbreak of ﬁre. All the people, regardless of high and low positions, were burned.
The burials just ended.
I am not convinced . What sin did they incur to have been killed by this ﬁre?
I pray to you, World-honored One, to clarify to me what I have not yet heard.” The Buddha told the great king, “In a past world there was a city called Vārāṇasī in which a wealthy man’s wife lived.
She went outside of the city leading ﬁve hundred maids and held a great worship ceremony.
The teaching was difﬁcult and rigorous.
People of the other gender could not approach them.
Regardless of their closeness or lack of closeness to the women, if anyone came to them was thrown into a ﬁre.
In the world at that time there was a pratyekabuddha called Kāla, who lived in a mountain.
He came out at daybreak to beg for alms, and always returned to the mountain in the evening.
Kāla came to a small shrine in the outskirts of a town begging for alms.
The wealthy man’s wife saw him and became furious with anger.
Along with she caught Kāla and threw him into a ﬁre. His entire body was scorched and broke out in sores.
Then manifested supernatural power and soared up into the air.
All the women were frightened and showed penitence, with tears in their eyes.
Kneeling upright and raising their heads, they all said, ‘We, women, have been ignorant and silly. We did not recognize an arhat.
We are deluded and our haughtiness increased. We abused and disgraced a divine spirit.
We ourselves think that our faults, sins, and vices are as large as a mountain.
We beseech you to grant us honor and virtue in order to remove our serious misfortune.’ Shortly after they spoke, came down and entered great nirvana.
All the women erected a stupa and gave offerings to the relics.” The Buddha spoke in verse for the great king: The ignorant and silly engaged in vice. They cannot understand it themselves.
Disaster chases them and they are burned. Their sin becomes vigorous ﬂames. The ignorant do not wish for such a place , without thinking they arrive at suffering. At the moment of falling into the place of adversity, They then realize their unwholesomeness.
The Buddha said to the great king, “The wealthy man’s wife of that time is currently your daughter, Vajrakumāri.
The ﬁve hundred maids are today the ﬁve hundred female entertainers, including Kubjottarā.
Sin and merit follow after people. Everything manifests over a long time.
Good and evil follow people, just as the shadow follows the form.” When this Dharma was expounded, all people, regardless of high and low position, who had come there immediately attained the practice of the Way.
Furthermore, the Ayuwang jing says:
In ancient times King Aśoka had a Buddhist teacher expound the Dharma, when all the women were made to stay behind with a bamboo fence with curtains and were blocked from listening to the Dharma.
At that time a Dharma preacher expounded the Dharma for all the women.
He continually preached the discourse on offering donations, the discourse on precepts, and the discourse on rebirth in heaven.
There was one woman who violated the king’s law and came out from behind the curtain to face the Dharma preacher.
She stepped forward to ask a question to the Dharma preacher, “When the Tathāgata, the Great Awakened One, realized all phenomenal things under the bodhi tree, did he become aware of donations and precepts?
Did he further realize other things?” The Dharma preacher replied, “The Buddha realized that all deﬁled things are only suffering.
It is just like melting iron.
This suffering is associated with arising from causes.
It is just like a poisonous tree.
Cultivate the eightfold holy path in order to exterminate suffering and its cause.” This woman could hear these words and attained the path of srotaāpatti-phala.
She was put in the pillory under a blade and came to the king’s place.
She addressed the king, “Today I violated the king’s important law.
I pray that you, O King, will punish me according to the law.” The king asked her, “What matter did you violate?” She replied, “I broke the king’s prohibition and went to the place of the Buddhist .
Just like a thirsty cow that does not avoid death, I was really thirsty for the Buddhist Dharma.
Therefore I imprudently offended against and listened to the Dharma.” 125 The king asked her, “When you listened to the Dharma, did you gain much?” She answered, “Yes, I attained the Dharma.
I saw the Four Noble Truths, understood the ﬁve skandhas, the twelve sense ﬁelds , and the eighteen realms, and furthermore I understood that all great elements are nonself.
126 Consequently I attained the Dharma eye.” The king heard these words and was very happy.
Immediately he bowed to her.
Then he gave an order, “From now on, do not make a fence and block anyone from hearing .
Those who are delighted with listening to the Dharma may hear it. They can directly go to a Dharma teacher’s place, meet face to face with him, and listen to the Dharma.” He exclaimed, “Wonderful!
From within my own palace a human treasure has appeared!” Because of this cause and condition, you must know that listening to the Dharma has great beneﬁt.
Moreover, the Zabao zang jing says:
At that time, the state of Pañcāla made a present of ﬁve hundred wild white geese to King Prasenajit.
127 The king ordered that they be sent to Jeta Grove Monastery.
At the sangha’s meal time beg food from the local people.
When the geese saw the monks gathered, they came and stood before .
Whenever the Buddha expounds the Dharma in one voice, each sentient being understands in accordance with their species.
Just at that time the ﬂock of geese also understood the monks’ speech.
They listened to the Dharma and were greatly delighted.
Crying out in a chorus, they returned to their pond.
Later the birds migrated a long distance and arrived at another place, where a hunter caught them all in a net and killed them.
As  one goose cried out and all the other geese cried out in harmony.
It is said that the sound they made when they heard the Dharma.
Taking advantage of this wholesome mind, they were all reborn in Trāyastriṃśa Heaven.
For the way to be reborn in heaven, there are three thoughts in the Dharma.
First is to think of the place from which you originally came.
Second is to think and decide where you will be reborn.
Third is to think what action you ﬁrst made that enabled you to attain a future rebirth in heaven.
So thought to themselves, “When we see the causes we made in our previous existences, we have no other wholesomeness.
We only listened to the Dharma near the Buddha and the monks.” After had this thought, ﬁve hundred heavenly beings immediately descended to be near the Tathāgata.
The Buddha expounded the Dharma for them and they all attained srota-āpatti-phala.
King Prasenajit happened to be at the Buddha’s place.
had often seen the ﬁve hundred geese spread out before the Buddha but he did not see them on this day.
So he asked the Buddha, “Where have all geese that used to be here gone?” The Buddha said, “You wish to see all the geese.
Earlier the geese ﬂew away to another place where they were killed by a hunter.
They were reborn in heaven after death.
All these ﬁve hundred heavenly beings, who are wearing good heavenly caps and who are well formed and extremely distinguished, used to be .
Today they listened to the Dharma and they all attained srota-āpatti-phala.” The king asked the Buddha, “What karmic conditions caused this ﬂock of geese to fall into the realm of animals, to be reborn in heaven after death, and then to attain the Way today?” The Buddha replied, “Formerly, at the time of Kāśyapa Buddha ﬁve hundred women all together received the precepts, but they were not ﬁrmly careful and they transgressed the precepts they had received.
Due to the cause and condition of their violation of the precepts they fell into the realm of animals and became these geese.
Because of having received the precepts, however, they were able to meet the Tathāgata, listen to the Dharma, and attain the Way.
Because of the cause and condition of having listened to the Dharma while they were geese, they were reborn in heaven.” Further, the Jiu zapiyu jing says:
In former times there was a śramaṇa who recited sutras day and night.
A dog used to lie down under bed, listening to the sutras wholeheartedly, and it never thought of eating.
was like this for years.
After death obtained a human form and was reborn as a woman in Śrāvastī.
When she grew up, she saw a śramaṇa begging for alms.
So she ran after him, carrying food by herself, and gave it to the śramaṇa. She was delighted.
Later she became a bhikṣuṇī and attained the path of arhatship.
Verses say: The Way of the sovereign administers the external . The Way of the Spirit soothes the internal . The imperial realizes the true Dharma. This is the highest, virtuous teacher.
You respectfully receive the profound teaching. The esteemed, virtuous one stirs up brightness. A teacher speaks and disciples receive. Fragrant leaves brilliantly grow. The Four Noble Truths are realized. The three transcendental knowledges are amiable and cordial. Open your mind and the sutras! Expound and instruct the divine plan! Emptiness and existence equal each other. The profound truth penetrates subtlety. Remove until there is nothing more to reserve! The way to reach truth is not far from you. Miracle Stories Zhu Daosheng, of Longguang Temple in Chang’an during the Song dynasty, was a man from Julu whose secular family name was Wei.
He renounced the world when he was young. He was sharp, marvelous, and outstanding.
Therefore, when he was at the age to dedicate himself to the pursuit of learning , he ascended the Dharma seat. His questions and answers were as rhythmical as the musical notes of gong and shang.
Both Buddhist monks and laypeople esteemed him and submitted to him.
When he became the age to be ordained, his caliber deepened day by day.
His disposition was sharp and quick-witted. His mind was pure and majestic.
At ﬁrst he entered the Mount Lu and lived apart from society for seven years in order to abide by his spiritual ambition.
He always considered realization through wisdom to be the foundation in the pivot of entering the Buddhist Way.
Therefore, he intensively studied numerous sutras with reverence and took miscellaneous discourses into consideration.
He followed the Dharma endlessly through thick and thin.
Later, he traveled with Huirui and Huiyan to Chang’an, where he received instructions from Kumārajīva.
All the monks in Guanzhong  thought was a genius.
He later returned to the capital city and stayed at Green Garden Temple .
The third emperor of the Song dynasty, Emperor Wen (407–453; r.
424– assembly, in which he, the emperor, casually sat on a bamboo mat spread on the ground, in the same way as did the ordinary people.
He dined with them for a while. All the people wondered if it was the afternoon.
128 The emperor said, “Noontime has just begun.” sheng said, “The sun hangs in the sky.
The emperor said, ‘Noontime has just begun.’ How could it not be noontime?” He then took up his bowl and ate.
Thereafter, all the people followed him.
Everyone praised Daosheng for his prudent and quick wit.
Later, examined absolute and relative reality and researched causality.
He then advocated that those who do good conduct do not receive retribution and that buddhahood is attained through sudden enlightenment.
Moreover, he authored discourses such as the Discourse on the Twofold Truth , the Discourse on the Existence of Buddha-nature , which completely cover old theories and have subtly profound purposes.
Those who stuck to language, however, greatly gave rise to ill will and raised their voices in disorder for and against , vying with each other.
Moreover, the Nirvāṇa-sūtra in six fascicles was ﬁrst introduced to the capital city.
sheng analyzed the doctrine of the sutra, had an insight into what is profound and subtle, and then elucidated that even icchantikas are able to entirely attain buddhahood.
At that time the larger version had not yet been transmitted.
alone announced the explicit statement ﬁrst, but his unique view grated upon the people.
Thereupon, those of the old learning considered theory to be heretical, giving rise to much slander and indignation toward him. was put on public display, to be exiled and driven away.
sheng stood up straight before the masses and took an oath, “If my theory goes against the meaning of sūtra, I request that a serious disease will immediately erupt on my present body.
If is not contrary to ultimate reality, I wish I will be able to occupy the lion seat when I pass away.” After ﬁnishing his speech, he adjusted his robes and departed.
He ﬁrst stayed on Mount Huqiu of Wu prefecture .
Within ten days he had several hundreds of disciples.
In the summer of that year, thunder shook the Buddha Hall of Green Garden Temple and a dragon ascended into the sky, and the light  reﬂected on the west wall .
Accordingly, the name of the temple was changed to Dragon Light .
At that time, the people lamented, “The dragon has already left us.
sheng too must leave us.” Soon went to live in on Mount Lu and disappeared into a cave on the mountain peak.
All the monks on the mountain admired him.
Later, the larger version of the Nirvāṇa-sūtra was introduced to Nanjing.
As a matter of fact, it afﬁrms that all icchantikas have buddha-nature, thus agreeing with what had previously asserted, just as two pieces of a tally ﬁt together.
sheng had obtained this sutra and soon he explained it.
On the gengzi day of the eleventh month, in winter of the eleventh year of the Yuanjia era of the Song dynasty , ascended the Dharma seat at the monastery on Mount Lu.
He was openminded and his virtuous voice profoundly rang out.
Discussions were held several times. His way of probing into the very root of things was completely wonderful.
Everyone among the audience comprehended it with joy.
When the Dharma assembly was about to end saw whisk suddenly fall down.
He then sat properly, straightened himself, leaned on a small table, and passed away.
His countenance did not change; he looked as if he was entering into meditation.
Both the Buddhist monks and laypeople were in shock with grief. People, both those who were close to him and those who were far from him, whimpered in lamentation.
Thereafter, all the monks of the capital city felt ashamed of themselves, felt hatred toward themselves, and admired after his death.
The utmost degree of his marvelous insight manifested as an auspicious sign like this. He was buried in a mound on Mount Lu.
At the beginning was a fellow student of rui, 129 yan, and guan, and attained fame equally with them.
Therefore, the people of that time commented, “sheng and rui displayed the pure nature given by heaven. yan and guan attained awakening with unremitting zeal.
Huiyi advanced with pride and smugness.
Kou and Yuan stayed away from society and kept silent.” sheng and rui alone put a mark on the pure nature given by heaven.
Therefore, they were outstanding among many scholars.
In an earlier time, Sengzhao of Guanzhong  annotated the Vimalakīrtinirdeśa-sūtra for the ﬁrst time.
All the people of the world appreciated it.
sheng furthermore showed the profound purpose of the sutra, and expressed a new and different interpretation.
His annotations on various sutras were treasured by all the people of the world.
Wang Wei compared sheng with Guo Linzong , and wrote a biography in order to make known inﬂuence.
The people of the time thought, “sheng deduced that even icchantikas attain buddhahood.
His word on this has authority.” assertions sudden enlightenment and not receive retribution were also chartered.
The third emperor of the Song dynasty gave an account of sheng’s doctrine of sudden enlightenment on one occasion, and śramaṇas such as Sengbi all raised serious objections.
The emperor said to them, “If I could bring the dead back to life, would I be talked down to by you all?” In Dragon Light Temple there was also a śramaṇa called Baolin.
At ﬁrst he stayed in Chang’an, where he received the learning.
Later, he expounded various theories of sheng.
The people of that time called him One who Befriends Profound sheng .
130 He authored the Records of Nirvana and annotated the Discourse on Different Tenets , the Manifesto to Evil Spirits , and other texts.
Fabao, a disciple of lin, studied both Buddhist and non-Buddhist teachings .
He authored the Discourse on Those Who Have Mastered Vajra and other texts.
Moreover, he also expounded sheng’s theories.
Furthermore, in recent times there is Shi Huisheng, who also stays at Dragon Light Temple.
He keeps a vegetarian diet and is well versed in many sutras.
Concurrently he is skilled in cursive and clerical styles of calligraphy.
The people of the day called the Great and the Young , the “Two Shengs,” as they succeeded one after another in the same temple.
131 Fei Chongxian of the Song dynasty was a man from Wuxing .
He was an avid believer in the Dharma from the time he was young.
When he was over thirty years old, he became more devoted and industrious in .
In the third year of the Taishi era he received the bodhisattva precepts.
He resided temporarily at Xie Huiyuan’s house and performed puriﬁcation.
For twenty-four days, both day and night, he was not negligent .
Every time he heard sutra chanting, he always placed a long-handled incense burner in front of himself as he knelt.
On the third evening of the puriﬁcation he saw a man of outstanding appearance and clothing who came to him, lifted up the incense burner, and was about to leave.
Chongxian looked at the incense burner in front of his knees, which was still there.
He again looked at the man in close detail. and saw very clearly the man departing, carrying .
Chongxian then realized that this was beyond human power.
He thought that his personal clothing was freshly washed and there was nothing impure.
There was, however, a spittoon at the side of his seat.
After had the spittoon removed, he saw again that the man returned the incense burner , in front of his knees.
Before the one burner had been returned, the two incense burners were still seen as separate but when the burner came back, both burners united to become one.
In this case, was what the holy man carried a shadow of the incense burner?
Moreover, Chongxian heard some people say that in Fuyuan Temple there was a nun called Sengqin who was dedicated and diligent in and who had attained the Buddhist Way.
He was delighted and wished to meet her. Before he was able to go to see her, his anticipation grew extremely.
At one time he performed puriﬁcation in other people’s house.
At midnight he suddenly saw a nun whose deportment was upright and respectful.
She wore a kaṣāya of red cloth and stood upright before the seats for the puriﬁcation rite.
Around meal time she disappeared.
Later, when Chongxian met the nun, her appearance and clothing were exactly the same as what he had seen before the window .
During the Yuan-Wei dynasty there was Ratna mati, a śramaṇa from Central India.
In the Wei dynasty he was called Baoyi .
132 He was from a western state but it is unknown what clan .
He was versed in the entire Tripiṭaka and excellent in reciting dhāraṇīs.
At the beginning of the Yongpin era of the Wei dynasty came all the way to Eastern China.
Emperor Xuanwu asked him every day to lecture on the Garland Sutra.
He read it dedicatedly and diligently; he did not give up for even a single day.
He sat straight on the raised seat .
Suddenly there appeared a man holding a ceremonial tablet and a title.
His appearance was just like that of a high-ranking ofﬁcial.
He said, “I am here having received with respect the orders of Śakra-devā nāmindra, who asks you, Dharma preacher, to lecture on the Garland Sutra.” yi replied, “Now this Dharma assembly has not yet come to an end.
Please wait for me to conclude the text of the sutra. I should come and follow this order.
Nevertheless, a Buddhist service is done with assistance, it cannot be done alone.
The chief of the lecture meeting burns incense and lights a candle for the service, and the Buddhist deacon chants hymns.
This is all completely necessary.
I must ask you to make them ﬁxed.” The messenger, as had been asked, saw the lecture and all the monks.
The Buddhist service was already about to end.
Again, the aforementioned messenger said, “Since I have received the order of Śakra-devānām-indra, I came down to meet you.” yi then smiled amiably, and cordially said goodbye to the people.
He immediately passed away on the Dharma seat.
The four monks, including the chief of the lecture meeting all died at the same time.
The monks and laypeople in the territory of the Wei dynasty learned of this extra ordinary incident. Everyone grieved.
In the Qi dynasty there was śramaṇa Sengfan at Dajue Temple in Yedong .
His secular family name was Li, and he was a man from Pingxiang.
He was good at understanding a multitude of books. At that time he was called the “treasury of archives.” In his later years he renounced the world.
He was well versed in sutras and discourses. His statements and deeds complemented each other. Auspicious signs frequently appeared.
Once the Regional Inspector of Jiazhou, Du Bi was at Xianyi Temple in Ye and requested fan to hold a winter lecture meeting.
When fan came up to the section of the sixth stage of the Garland Sutra, a wild goose suddenly ﬂew down. From east of a stupa it came along and entered the hall.
lay down on the ﬂoor right across from the raised seat , listening to the Dharma.
When the lecture meeting adjourned, slowly went out, returning along the west side of the stupa, and then soared away.
Furthermore, held a summer lecture meeting at this temple.
A sparrow came and alighted in the southwestern , and it listened to , remaining for ninety days.
Moreover, once lived in Jizhou .
An owl ﬂew into  and listened to too. After the lecture ended it left.
In addition, there was a monk who harbored anger and slandered , calling him names, “Stubborn, stupid old monk!
What do you know?” On that very night a god struck , who almost died.
Unless one harmonizes themselves with the Way and accords with the unseen world, how could they have the Buddha’s responsive activity in conjunction with their faith and meritorious acts like these?
On the second day of the third month of the sixth year of the Tianbao era died at Dajue Temple at the Chinese age of eighty.
At Yanxing Temple in the metropolis of the Sui dynasty there was Shi Tanyan, whose secular family name was Wang.
He was a man from Wanquan in Puzhou .
133 His family was wealthy and inﬂuential and they successively served as government ofﬁcials in the Qi and Zhou dynasties.
Moreover, they were associated with books by nature. The people of their local area lauded their deeds.
investigated and awoke to the profound principles . He knew clearly without fail.
He intended to write a great annotation on the Nirvāṇa-sūtra, but he was afraid that he would stagnate in the delusions conceived by an ordinary person.
He prayed sincerely every night before he went to bed and also every morning after he woke up, wishing to attain good signs.
One night he dreamed of a man wearing white clothes and riding a white horse, the mane and the tail of which brushed the ground; orally instructed on the purport of the sutra and yan, holding the horse’s mane by hand, asked to discuss it with him.
After woke up, he thought and said, “This must have been Aśvaghoṣa Bodhisattva who instructed me with a clue of the meaning.
Since I held the mane and knew its purport, it may be seen that I have reached the issue.” Even though he felt that this was an auspicious sign, he was still afraid that it was illogical.
Furthermore, holding the sutra and the annotation, to Chenzhou . He examined them in front of a stupa of the Buddha’s relics at Renshou Temple.
He burned incense and made an oath, “I, yan, respectfully fathomed your sacred thought with my ordinary ability.
The evaluation and explanation have already been done. All are just as you see in the separate fascicle.
If it is a profound achievement and a subtle accomplishment, I pray that you will display a supernatural wonder.
If  does not move you, I swear not to transmit it .” After he ﬁnished speaking, the axes of the scrolls of the Nirvāṇa-sūtra emitted light all at the same time.
There were auspicious signs all through the night.
Both clergy and laypeople congratulated him.
The relics in the stupa also emitted light, and the bright light did not cease for three days and three nights.
It illuminated the Milky Way above and shone upon the mountains and rivers below.
All the people of the local regions saw the light and everyone came to see and pay respects.
All the people were moved by the auspicious signs and they were humbly instructed in .
The sovereign and subjects valued virtue, , “This is a rare man.” On the thirteenth day of the eighth month of the eighth year of the Kaihuang era of the Sui dynasty, passed away at Yanxing Temple at the Chinese age of seventy-three.
At Jingying Temple of the metropolis of the Sui dynasty there was Shi Huiyuan, whose secular family name was Ji.
He was a man from Dunhuang .
Later he lived in Gaodu in Shangdang .
He was well versed in the Tripiṭaka and had clear knowledge of the nine schools.
134 He was sharp by nature and his manners were graceful.
He led by lecturing on ; this was his occupation. The people of the world all counted on him.
Formerly he resided in Qinghua . He raised a goose, which attended and listened to lectures.
In the seventh year of the Kaihuang era , he was summoned by imperial decree to the capital city.
The goose was left behind in the original temple. Its nest was in a small place in a corridor .
Day and night it honked and many felt pity for it.
So it was sent along with a messenger and arrived at the capital city. was released when they reached the great outer gate of Jingying Temple.
It ﬂew about in a lively way, honking, and then entered Huiyuan’s room.
Just as before, obediently listened to without shrinking from cold or hot weather.
When it heard the sound of the bell for the Dharma assembly, regardless of whether it was during the morning or evening, entered the lecture hall together with all the other people, quietly bowed down, and listened.
When the monks and laypeople left in an orderly way, also went out of the hall and soared aloft, honking.
If there was a regular meeting of monks and other members of the order , even though heard the bell sound it did not enter to listen to a lecture .
At the time, all the people thought this was strange.
If yuan lectured and explained in the usual way, quietly listened to it, according with the Dharma.
If offered an anecdote midway , however, honked and ﬂew out.
It is truly known that the Way is propagated relying on the people and a sacred bird is a good response .
No one is allowed to ascend the Dharma seat except for one who has testiﬁed the Dharma.
he will surely fall into hell.
This is also a suggestion for the time of parting .
You cannot follow another blindly and reject all.
passed away during the Kaihuang era at Jingying Temple.
In the Sui dynasty there was Shi Fayan at the Zhenji Buddhist seminary of the Western Capital .
His secular family name was Zhang.
resided in Luozhou , far from their original native place. He was determined to cause the great Dharma to ﬂourish.
He was sharp, well known, and outstanding among his peers in the same generation.
Even though he was versed in the entire Tripiṭaka, he was well known solely for the Mahāprajñā pāramitā-śāstra .
He was engaged in Dharma assemblies here and there. No one dared to refute .
In the sixteenth year of the Kaihuang era an imperial decree was issued to appoint yan as the leader of the Mahāprajñāpāramitā-śāstra.
He resided in Zhenji Temple.
The town was led and ediﬁed for a long time. Stupas were built during the Renshou era .
was again summoned to send relics to Ruzhou .
In the fourth year , in obedience to another imperial decree sent relics to Shanying Temple in Yizhou .
dug down more than one zhang under the foundation , where they obtained alluvial gold that was two sheng altogether, after it had been reﬁned into pure solid gold.
135 Its brightness dazzled people’s eyes.
136 Furthermore, people became aware that a common Chinese ox came before the stupa, bent its knees and forelimbs, and stopped after bowing twice.
turned around, and again saluted Emperor Wen and reverently bowed to an image of the Buddha.
When were placed into a stone container, about thirty thousand people all saw a ﬁve-colored cloud in the sky, more than ten zhang long and three or four zhang wide.
It was surrounded by white clouds and looked like thin silk cloth.
The cloud ﬂoated in the air just above the foundation. It remained from 12:00–2:00 P.M.
and then it disappeared.
After the ﬁve-colored cloud appeared again. came back from the four directions.
The situation was as auspicious as before.
Moreover, became aware that ﬁve black cranes came from the northwest, circled above the stupa four times, and then left and came back again.
They were also aware that white cranes ﬂew around above and after a while they were gone.
Furthermore, they perceived that a ﬁve-colored snake coiled up outside of the container ; it was about three chi long and its head faced toward the relics.
were surprised but they were not afraid of it after all.
Things like this happened several times.
Regional Inspector Zheng Shanguo said in a memorial to the Throne:
I have heard that when we respect Heaven and support all things, celestial phenomena reveal their powers, and when we follow Earth and nourish the people, the Great Earth shows its virtues.
Therefore, when Tao Tang disciplined himself and was not negligent, the hidden energy manifested auspicious omens.
When Xiahou made achievements in controlling water and earth, the black jade tablet was bestowed.
We exactly know that the inﬂuences between opportunities of time vouchsafed by Heaven and human affairs are like divine . I humbly think, Your Majesty, that you hold plans in your mind and act in a humble and gentle way.
You accepted the mandate of Heaven, became an emperor.
No dust remains in your territory, and you have completely uniﬁed the imperial cultural education for the people.
You have the great virtue to encompass all things; you are glorious and majestic; you are benevolent and compassionate; and you are vast and expansive.
Heaven and all the buddhas show the model and sent down these honors and auspicious omens.
At the six places under the stupa the extraordinary alluvial was obtained.
dazzlingly shines, and it is the same as all gold treasures.
It has never been experienced from ancient times that an ox performs worship.
Now we see that the clouds soar in the ﬁve colors.
Furthermore, we perceived that a snake manifested with miscellaneous bright colors and coiled on the foundation of the stupa, and that cranes, both black and white, ﬂew around in the sky.
Even though Xuanhuang had happy auspicious omens, he vainly passed on the old system .
Emperors of the Han dynasty had signs of blessings, which were written in books in vain.
Except for one whose virtue makes the Three Treasures ﬂourish and whose way stands alone above all kings, who else can cause to perceive these good blessings and invite mysterious and extraordinary ?
The emperor was greatly happy about this.
It was written in a separate record.
In the third year of the Daye era , passed away at  he resided at the Chinese age of sixty.
In the Tang dynasty there was Shi Daozong at Shengguang Temple in the western metropolis.
His secular family name was Sun.
He was a man from Jimo in Laizhou .
He was versed in the Tripiṭaka and had a particularly thorough knowledge of the Mahāprajñā pāramitā-śāstra .
Every time he lectured on the Mahāprajñā pāramitā-śāstra numerous ﬂowers rained down from the sky.
circled around the lecture hall then ﬂew into the hall through the door.
None of fell on the ground and after awhile .
All the people in the gathering exclaimed on seeing this rare auspicious occurrence.
In the sixth year of the Wuda era passed away at  where he resided at the Chinese age of seventy-one.
In the Tang dynasty there was Shi Daosun at Renshou Temple in Puzhou .
137 His secular family name was Zhang.
He was a man from Yuxiang in Hedong .
He had a lofty air. He was generous and guileless in mind.
He had good knowledge of the pivot times and was proﬁcient in the way to govern .
Even though he was well versed in a large number of books, he earnestly considered the Nirvāṇa and the Mahāyānasaṃgraha to be the foundation for his spirit to abide.
In a month of the winter of the second year of the Zhenguan era , was asked to lecture on the Nirvāṇa.
He knew beforehand that was coming to an end, so he politely declined the invitation.
The aforementioned person could not fathom and respectfully invited .
said, “I cannot excuse myself from your intention.” He went to he was invited and ascended the seat.
He gave the subject and told all the four categories of Buddhists .
They lamented, “We personally think that the holy one will leave us far behind.
The subtle words will be secretly cut off!” replied, “What I, an ignorant person, transmit is not worthy to be emulated.
Devote yourselves earnestly to with faith, and you should attain enlightenment by yourselves.
Now I will stop lecturing here on the seat. After saying some verses, .
138 The world will spontaneously come to an end in a short time.
Since the time is coming closer, I hope that everyone will exercise caution.” Consequently he expressed himself in written form.
Just at the time when he came to the beginning of the verse, he lost consciousness.
He died without any suffering at the Chinese age of seventy-ﬁve.
In the twelfth month of that year was sent to a recess of the southern mountain in Ziwu Valley in the royal city.
All the people of the area wailed together, just as if they had lost their parents.
That night it snowed all around within a distance of three or four li.
So they cleared the road and passed through. The corpse was placed in the mountain range. After that night strange ﬂowers suddenly grew.
Circling around burial site, burst out from the ground.
There were about ﬁve hundred branches and they were around two chi high.
They illuminated brightly and luxuriantly above, and their color looked like that of a butterbur , 139 but they were completely different in form and characteristics.
The masses were astonished. Sad and joyful people were clamorous on the mountain.
They plucked the ﬂowers, entered into the city, and showed them to all the respected elders.
Thereupon they put in a vase with water.
still had not withered in the ﬁfth month of the next year.
Except the case where were given through the divine help of a previous existence, how could the people receive such a good and auspicious response from the unseen world?
There was a man in Jinzhou who loved hunting by nature.
At ﬁrst he did not believe in . Someone gave him information on the people’s receptivity .
Therefore, he went to the mountain to see himself but he only found an empty place.
He repented by himself and said, weeping mournfully, “While was alive I did not receive an opportunity to believe in , and did not meet with auspiciousness after his death.
Why do I alone have no receptivity ?
There must be the Way of the Spirit. I pray that hidden auspiciousness will be revealed.” After he spoke , a wonderful ﬂower burst out of the ground, two chi high as well.
The man was gratiﬁed with the good response. He awakened the aspiration and remained a strong thereafter. Views : Introduction and Quoted Testimonies.
The mind undergoes changes; its noumenon is impermanent.
Understanding and delusion overthrow each other. What incarnation is the Sage?
He paciﬁes your spirit and shines with freedom from all preoccupation, responding to your capability just like an echo.
What is called nirvana is motionless. You perceive it and consequently reach it.
For enlightenment one needs the condition and the opportunity, and later the divine ediﬁcation.
Therefore, written language is utilized and spreads throughout the universe.
The Sage’s transformation is in conformity with every place and completely contains the Dharma realm .
Except for the utmost Sage of the six supernatural powers who else could grant ediﬁcation to those of the ﬁve realms?
As the Fenbie gongde lun says:
The reason the Tathāgata extensively expounds the ﬁrst principle for each of the four categories is precisely for the future.
In the Dharma left the four social classes and Buddhist monks have different views from each other.
Together they discuss right and wrong and proclaim their own group to be superior and those of the others to be inferior.
People like this are innumerable.
Therefore, prevents this from occurring and opens the self-sufﬁcient path.
It is just as among light, sunlight is superlative; among constellations, the moon is superlative; among ﬂowing water, the ocean is superlative; among the six heavens , Pāpīyas is considered to be superlative; among the eighteen heavens of the realm of form Śuddhāvāsa is considered to be superlative; among the ninety-six schools, Śākyamuni’s monks are considered to be superlative; and among the ninety-six kinds , the Buddhist Way is considered to be superlative.
Thereupon, of the ﬁve hundred śrāvaka disciples it is impossible to minutely list each of them separately according to their spiritual understanding.
140 First is precisely Ājñāta-kauṇḍinya Bhikṣu, the ﬁrst disciple ediﬁed and given the Dharma ; he was the ﬁrst monk welcomed .
Therefore, he is called the foremost. Then Gavāṃpati Bhikṣu was good at protecting from being slandered and loathed, and he hid himself in heaven. Therefore he is called the foremost.
Therefore, the gongde lun says:
Gavāṃpati Bhikṣu could not reside in the world for two reasons.
Because this bhikṣu’s feet looked like cow’s hooves and when he was full he chewed .
Because of these two matters he could not reside in the world.
If non-Buddhists were to see him they would have thought that all śramaṇas have no ﬁxed time for eating and they woud give rise to a mind of slandering .
For this reason, the Buddha sent to heaven and had him meditate in the Good Dharma Lecture Hall .
Suprabuddha Bhikṣu often went on errands to heaven for the sangha.
After the Buddha’s nirvana Kāśyapa tolled a bell and called monks from far and wide.
He ordered Aniruddha to check all over the world and see if anyone was not coming.
Aniruddha immediately saw the world and everyone had come.
Only Gavāṃpati Bhikṣu remained in heaven.
Accordingly Suprabuddha was sent to summon .
When Suprabuddha arrived in Trāyastriṃśa Heaven he saw that  had entered the meditation in which mental functions are completely annihilated in the Good Dharma Lecture Hall.
snapped his ﬁngers to wake and said, “Fourteen days have passed since the World-honored One entered nirvana.
Kāśyapa has gathered all the monks, and he ordered me .
You should come down to the world and go to the sangha’s gathering place.” Gavāṃpati replied, “The world is already empty. I cannot bear to return there.
I would rather enter nirvana.” Accordingly he handed his robe and bowl over to Suprabuddha to return them to the sangha.
Then he entered nirvana.
Due to this cause and condition he is good at protecting and he peacefully placed himself in heaven.
Therefore, he is called the foremost.
Second, the lun says:
The reason Uruvilvā-kāśyapa is called the foremost is that from the time of his previous existence he and his two brothers continually had a thousand disciples who followed them.
Now that they have encountered the Buddha they have been liberated and altogether they have attained arhatship.
offered the four requisites . Because of this he was happy.
Since he helped and protected the Buddha’s disciples, he is the foremost in offering.
Third, the lun says:
As for why Śāriputra is called the greatest in wisdom, the World-honored One , 141 “If you want to know how much wisdom Śāriputra has, imagine Mount Sumeru as an inkstone, the water of the four great seas as ink, all the bamboo trees and forests of the four continents as writing brushes, the people ﬁlling the four continents as calligraphers, and even then if you wished to record all of Śāriputra’s wisdom, you would still not be able to complete it, much less could you survey it with an ordinary person’s ﬁve supernatural powers.
Therefore he is called the greatest in wisdom.” Fourth, the lun says:
As for why Mahāmaudgalyāyana is called the greatest in the supernatural power of travel, the World-honored One has spoken this testimony.
when the three calamities spread, all the people were greatly famished. intended to reverse the great earth and take the fertile soil from under the land in order to offer it to the lives of the people.
The Buddha stopped him and would not allow him to do so, because he was afraid  would harm the sentient beings .
also wished to hold the sentient beings by the hand and reverse the earth with his other hand.
The Buddha would not allow this, either.
Therefore it is known that was the greatest in the supernatural power of travel.
As the Miji jingang lishi jing says:
142 Maudgalyāyana received the Buddha’s sacred decree.
In the western direction there is a world called Flag of Light , where a buddha called King of Light presently expounds the Dharma.
Maudgalyāyana arrived there and heard the buddha’s speech.
He saw that the buddha was forty li tall, all the bodhisattvas were twenty li tall, and the almsbowls in which those bodhisattvas have food were all one li in height.
Maudgalyāyana walked on the edge of an almsbowl.
At that time all the bodhisattvas addressed the World-honored One, “O Great Sage!
From where has this insect come?
It wears a śramaṇa’s robe and goes along the edge of a bowl.” On that occasion Buddha said, “Good people! Be careful!
Do not give rise to a mind of disrespect toward this virtuous man!
Why is this?
This elder is called Mahā maudgalyāyana.
He is the greatest in the supernatural power of travel among Śākyamuni Buddha’s śrāvaka disciples.” Then Light Buddha said to Mahāmaudgalyāyana, “The bodhisattvas and all śrāvakas in my land see your small body and they have all given rise to disrespect.
You, virtuous one, must manifest your supernatural power of travel and receive the inﬂuences of Śākyamuni’s awesome virtue.” Maudgalyāyana bowed his head to feet, circumambulated him seven times, and then jumped up and ﬂoated in the air.
After extensively manifesting his supernatural power of travel, again went before Buddha.
All the bodhisattvas exclaimed at such an unprecedented event.
The buddha said, “He wished to try to discover how far Śākyamuni Buddha’s voice travels.
Therefore he came to this land.” “You, virtuous one, should not try to discover the Tathāgata’s voice travels.
The Tathāgata’s voice travels limitlessly without any ﬁxed distance.
Its extent and range are immeasurable.
It is incomparable.” The World-honored One said, “How did you reach this world by your supernatural power?
Originally it was established by the awesome virtue of the World-honored One, Śākyamuni Buddha.
If you worship Śākyamuni Buddha who is far away in the distance, you will return there spontaneously.
Even if you intend to return to your homeland through your own supernatural power of travel you will not arrive there even after a kalpa.” Maudgalyāyana knelt with his right knee on the ground, faced the eastern direction, and worshiped Śākyamuni Buddha.
He joined his palms in salute and took refuge in . As quickly as the time it takes to bend and stretch out his arm, he was able to return .
Therefore, it is known that Maudgalyāyana is the greatest in the supernatural power of travel.
Fifth, the lun says:
As for why Aniruddha is called the greatest , once when the Buddha was expounding the Dharma for a great assembly Aniruddha fell asleep on his seat.
The Buddha saw him and said, “At present the Tathāgata is expounding the Dharma.
Why did you fall asleep?
Sleeping blocks the mind and intentions.
It is no different from death.” Aniruddha felt ashamed of himself, kept this in mind, and took an oath to dare not fall asleep again.
Consequently, he did not sleep for a long time and he lost his eyesight.
The causes require altogether six conditions.
There are two conditions for the eyes; one is to see forms and the other is sleep.
There are also two conditions for each of the ﬁve objects of the ﬁve sense organs.
When these conditions are obtained, the six sense organs are then perfect.
Since eyes did not receive a condition , he lost his eyesight.
The Buddha ordered Jīvaka to cure . said, “Sleeplessness is incurable.
has already lost his physical eyes. He will be unable to see anything ever again.” All ﬁve hundred disciples gave up on him and quickly scattered away.
once hired someone to thread a needle and he mended his own clothing by touching lightly with his ﬁngers. The thread completely and repeatedly passed through .
There was no one he could hire so he said to some people nearby, in a voice that was like chanting, “Someone who wishes to seek merit, please thread a needle for me!” The Worldhonored One unexpectedly came before “I will thread for you.” asked, “Who are you?” replied, “I am the Buddha.” said, “Buddha, you already have sufﬁcient merit.
Do you seek more merit?”  “Should seeking any merit be detestable?” Aniruddha pondered “Even the Buddha still seeks merit, to say nothing of an ordinary person.” became depressed so he quickly looked toward the Buddha.
Due to his sincerity he suddenly attained the divine eye.
He pondered this again and then attained arhatship.
Generally, all those who have attained arhatship have three types of eyes; ﬁrst are the physical eyes, second is the divine eye, and last is the eye of wisdom.
Those who see with all three types of eyes may become confused since the physical eyes compete with the divine eye for merit, and reﬁnement and coarseness are mixed up.
Therefore exclusively used only his divine eye, observed the trichiliocosm, and saw reﬁnement and coarseness completely.
Therefore, he is called the greatest in having the divine eye.
Sixth, the lun says:
As for why kātyāyana is called the greatest in being good at discerning meanings, he merely wanted to collect and write down the store of the Dharma.
He thought, “Human beings are confused in their minds and agitated.
They do not concentrate with profound thought.” So he hid himself in the earth for seven days. After collecting and writing down the great Dharma, he submitted it to the Buddha.
said, praising him, “Good!
This is approved by the Sage and is considered to be a collection .” The meaning of this is subtle and subdues non-Buddhists.
Therefore, he is called the greatest .
In addition, the Buddha praised, “The virtuous one is the greatest in eloquence, interpretation, and elaboration of truth as well as understanding meanings.” Seventh, the lun says:
As for why Bakkula is called the one of extreme long life, he gave offerings to sixty-thousand buddhas in former times, he continually acted with benevolence at various buddhas’ places, he always offered kindness to tangible living creatures, such as insects that ﬂy and wriggle, and he never had even the slightest thought to kill them.
The Buddha said to Ānanda, “As I celebrate my eightieth birthday today, I, the Tathāgata, follow the world and intend to adapt myself to sentient beings; I will not reveal any difference from them.
Therefore, I am eighty years old.
Bakkula receives merit for the benevolence  his former existences.
Therefore, he is a hundred and sixty years old, twice as long as .
“In the past, when Vipaśyin Tathāgata appeared in the world, there was an elder who abided in knowledge, who virtuously cultivated, and whose natural disposition was good and modest.
He invited the Buddha and all his disciples and offered the four requisites to them for ninety days.
A bhikṣu came to ask for medicine.
The elder asked him, ‘In what part are you suffering?’ said, ‘I have a headache.’ The elder responded to , ‘This must be due to water upon the diaphragm.
ﬂowed upward and is causing harm to your head.
Therefore you have a headache.’ then gave  a fruit called harītakī.
After eating it illness was cured.
Due to the meritorious reward ,  has never fallen ill for ninety-one kalpas.” Ānanda asked Bakkula, “Why do you not preach the Dharma for the people?
Do you not preach because you do not possess the four kinds of unhindered speech and wisdom?” replied, “I am not deﬁcient in the four kinds of unhindered speech and I have a quick wit.
I am simply delighted with tranquility and unhappy to feel confusion and agitation.
Consequently, I do not preach the Dharma.” is therefore the greatest in having a long life and avoiding trouble.
Eighth, the lun says:
As for why Upāli is called the greatest in observance of the precepts, he was the tonsure master for ﬁve hundred boys of the Śākya clan. He did this duty neither lightly nor heavily; he removed in a very smooth manner .
The Buddha said to him, “You are welcome, bhikṣu .” immediately became a śramaṇa.
The Buddha then gave him the precepts and he attained arhatship.
Next gave the precepts to the ﬁve hundred boys of the Śākya clan, and made Upāli a senior monk. All the Śākya boys said, “This man was a servant of our family.
Due to what condition must we now have to bow to him?” The Buddha said, “This is not so!
There are no ranks in the Dharma. A precursor is considered to be your elder brother.
Bow down to him and look up to him incessantly!” They controlled their impulses and bowed to .
Immediately heaven and earth shook greatly.
All the gods above said in praise, “Good!
Today all  the Śākya clan subdued their self-conceit.
This meaning is beyond our perseverance.
Therefore the earth shook for them.” At the very same time that the ﬁve hundred boys of the Śākya clan became Buddhist , there were ninety-nine thousand people who also renounced the world and became Buddhist .
From the time Upāli received the precepts from the Buddha, he did not violate them even to as small a degree as a hairbreadth.
Therefore he is called the greatest in observance of the precepts.
Again, there was a bhikṣu who lived north of Jeta Grove Monastery.
He became ill and did not get any better for a period of six years. Upāli went and asked , “In what part are you suffering?
What is it that you want to use?” replied, “There is something I want to use, but since it goes against the Buddha’s teaching I should not say it.” said, “Just speak up!
Then you will have no suffering.” said, “I think only of wine. If I could obtain ﬁve sheng then my sickness will be gone.” Upāli said, “Just stay here!
I will ask the Buddha for your sake.” Upāli returned and asked the Buddha, “There is a bhikṣu who needs wine as medicine for his illness. I do not know about this.
Should he be able to drink or not?” The World-honored One said, “The rule I instituted excludes those who are suffering from illness.” Upāli then returned, asked for some wine, and gave it to the sick bhikṣu.
His illness was gone at once.
Additionally preached the Dharma for , who then attained the path of arhatship.
The Buddha praised Upāli, “You asked me about this matter and enabled the sick bhikṣu to recover and to attain the path .
If he had not attained liberation, later he would have fallen in the three evil realms and would never have had a chance to escape from there.
143 You can precisely establish an institution for future bhikṣus.
You caused to gain knowledge to a degree of relative importance and were able to save him from a perilous difﬁculty.
You really observe the precepts.
I will consign the collection of the precepts to you.
Do not allow it to be neglected and lost.
You must not show it to novices and laypeople.” Again, Upāli is called the greatest .
Ninth, the lun says:
As for why Nandika Bhikṣu is called the best-looking, 144 all of the other bhikṣus have characteristics .
Śāriputra has seven characteristics and Maudgalyāyana has ﬁve.
Ānanda has twenty characteristics.
Only Nandika has thirty characteristics.
Nandika wore a golden-colored and Ānanda wore a silver-colored one; their garments were radiant.
Putting on shoes enchased with gold and holding an almsbowl made of lapis lazuli in his hands, entered a city to beg for alms.
Everyone who saw him was delighted.
Except for the Tathāgata, there was no one among all other disciples who could match .
Therefore he is called the best-looking.
Āmrapālī invited the Buddha.
She saw Nandika outside and gave rise to a deep feeling of affection and enjoyment.
She worshiped him by bowing her head to his feet and then rubbed with her hands.
Even as saw beautiful ﬁgure, he was peaceful without any feeling or thought .
When  sense each other, they indulge in impurity.
Āmrapālī’s did not reach , however. She doubted if had any thought of desire.
The Buddha, aware of her intention, said to Āmrapālī, “Do not give rise to doubt.
Nandika will attain arhatship seven days after returning.” For this reason it is said that knew mind did not change. Therefore is called the best.
Tenth, the lun says:
As for why Bhadra Pātaliputra Bhikṣu is called the greatest in dissolving people’s impediment of doubt, all the buddhas of the three periods of existence together take the eighty-four thousand to be the way of practice.
Sentient beings who have attained the Way do not necessarily practice everything.
Among numerous practices they follow that to which they awake and consider it to be their foundation.
The reason for this is because sentient beings’ deﬁlements differ from each other.
There are more and less in illness and relative severity of deﬁlement.
For this reason, the Tathāgata established several ways to teach.
There is a medicine that can cure many diseases, or many medicines may be required to cure a single disease.
It is just as the six pāramitās unify each other:
when one practice is principal, all other practices follow it.
A single practice is not specialized. When many diseases follow one upon another and break out, the appropriate medicine should be given according to the cause of each disease.
If someone thinks of permanent arising, respond to it with impermanence.
If one thinks of giving rise to the mind of attachment, respond with the mind of emptiness.
Just at the moment you undertake to practice with impermanence, all practices are of impermanence.
It is just as if someone donates to create eightythousand ; all the are created through donation.
It is also just as among the eight superior qualities of the Tathāgata’s voice one quality uniﬁes all the eight sounds, one sound uniﬁes a hundred teachings, and one teaching uniﬁes a hundred principles.
Each mutually undertakes another and reach a huge number.
One voice rewards myriad numbers .
Its mutability is just like this.
simply speaks and uniﬁes all practices. His illustrations are also exactly like this.
This bhikṣu solely considers simple speech to be the principal practice.
Therefore  is called the greatest .
Eleventh, the lun says:
As for why Deva-Subhūti is called the best dressed, there were two men called Subhūti among ﬁve hundred disciples; one is a royal descendant and the other is from a wealthy family.
Deva-Subhūti is a royal descendant.
He is called Deva because he was continually reborn in heaven for ﬁve hundred generations, and he descended from Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven and was reborn in a royal family.
145 He was spontaneously blessed with adequate food; he has never gone hungry.
When the Buddha returned to his original country, he ordered  to renounce the world.
“You must live frugally, keep your principles, content yourselves with plain clothes and coarse goods, and take a grass mat as a bed and feces and urine to be medicine.” This bhikṣu heard the Buddha’s rigorous teaching, withdrew, and intended to return home.
The Buddha accepted King Prasenajit’s invitation.
then went to the Buddha’s place, excused himself from there, and returned.
Ānanda said , “Just stay the night!” Subhūti replied, “How can I stay in a Buddhist facility?
I will go to a layperson’s house and stay overnight there.
I should return home tomorrow.” Ānanda said, “Stay here!
Now I must arrange it neatly and properly.” then went to the king’s place.
Various sitting mats, streamers, ﬂowers, incense, oil, and solemn decorations were all provided.
This bhikṣu was surrounded and stayed overnight.
Because everything was suitable for his original intention, mind attained concentration.
He pondered the Four Noble Truths. Late that night he attained arhatship.
Ānanda addressed the Buddha, “Deva-Subhūti has already attained arhatship.
Now he can ﬂy and ﬂoat in the air.” The Buddha said to Ānanda, “There are two kinds in garments; those to which you should be close and others to which you should not.
If a good garment that you put on increases your aspiration for bodhi , that is what you should be close to.
If it decreases your aspiration for bodhi, that is what you should not be close to.
For this reason, Ānanda, some people attain the Way through wearing good garments, and some people attain the Way with coarse garments made of piece and scraps from various old clothes.
What one realizes lies in his mind and is not restricted by his body and clothing.” Therefore, it is said that Deva-Subhūti is the best-dressed.
Twelfth, the lun says:
As for why Rāhula is called greatest in the observance of the precepts without slandering , someone said, “Rāhula is fond of telling lies” and “Rāhula likes to get angry because the Buddha gave up the throne of a wheel-turning noble king and became a śramaṇa.
Shouldn’t feel ashamed of himself for going from east to west begging for alms?” Rāhula disliked the Tathāgata so he made a false statement.
If someone asked him about the Tathāgata’s whereabouts, even if was then in fact at Jeta Grove Monastery, he answered, “ is in Andhavana,” or if was in fact in Andhavana, he answered, “ is at Jeta Grove Monastery.” told repeatedly told lies  and deluded visitors.
Ānanda addressed the Buddha, “Rāhula has told a lie.” The Buddha summoned Rāhula “Did you really tell a lie?” replied, “Yes, I did indeed.” “The reason why I gave up the throne of the wheel-turning noble king is because it is impossible to rely on ; everything comes to impermanence.
Even if one surely becomes Śakra-devānām-indra or King Brahma, it is entirely impossible to maintain , not to mention that of a wheel-turning noble king.
Would it be possible to rely on it?” The Buddha continued, 146 “O Rāhula!
It is impossible to enumerate how many times I have given up this from beginning to end.
Do you, however, still resent me at the present time?” The Buddha said to Rāhula, “Go get water, and come back!” Rāhula immediately ﬁlled a bowl with water and gave it to the Tathāgata.
Taking water from the bowl, the Tathāgata said to Rāhula, “Do you see this water?” replied, “I have seen it.” The Buddha said, “The water that ﬁlls the bowl does not decrease.
This can be compared to the observance of the precepts and the perfect possession of them, without anything missing.” Further, drained a half of water from the bowl and asked Rāhula, “Do you see this water?” replied, “Yes I do.” The Buddha said, “Losing half of this water can be compared to the incomplete possession of the precepts.” Again, drained off the rest of the water completely and then showed the bowl to Rāhula, saying, “Do you see this empty bowl?” answered, “I have seen it.” The Buddha said, “Violating the precepts completely can be compared to an empty bowl.” Again, he placed the bowl face-down on the ground and showed it , saying, “Do you see this?” replied, “I have seen it.” The Buddha said, “One who has already violated the precepts completely must fall into hell.
This can be compared to the opening of the bowl facing down into the earth.” After Rāhula was personally instructed and admonished in this way, he never violated the precepts again, even to as small a degree as a hair’s breadth.
Therefore, he is called the greatest in observance of the precepts .
Rāhula is also the greatest in the practice of forbearance.
Formerly, Śāriputra entered Śrāvastī with Rāhula to beg for alms.
At that time a brahman saw Rāhula following behind and gave rise to an evil intention.
He attacked Rāhula, hitting his head, and blood ﬂowed down face.
Rāhula immediately gave rise to a malicious thought:
“I must undertake expedient means and repay this enemy.” Śāriputra, already aware of thought, wiped away the blood and said to Rāhula, “You should recall your father .
In the past when he was a king, a man came and asked him for his eyes, so he gouged his eyes out and gave them .
When his hands and legs were cut off, he did not feel remorse for that, either.
Again, when he was an elephant he gave his tusks to a man and yet he did not get tired of it, either. Why do you now give rise to this malicious thought?” Rāhula heard what said and reproached himself rigorously.
“Why do I now face with an evil mind?” He maintained his forbearance as as the earth.
He never gave rise to a harmful mind, even to as small a degree as a hairsbreadth.
At that time the man who attacked Rāhula fell into Avīci Hell.
Due to this cause and condition, is the greatest in observance of the precepts  and in the practice of forbearance.
Thirteenth, the lun says:
As for why Cūḍapanthaka Bhikṣu, who was extremely dark-skinned, is called the greatest in the ability of transformation, 147 it is truly because the Buddha taught him and caused him to recite the words sao and zhou .
When he intoned zhou, he forgot sao; when he intoned sao, he forgot zhou.
For six years he concentrated with his whole mind on the recitation of these words. Consequently, he realized the meaning.
He thought to himself, “Zhou is hui and sao is chu .
Hui can be precisely compared to the eightfold holy path and fen can be compared to the deﬁlements of the three poisons.
Cleaning off the deﬁlements of the three poisons with the broom of the eightfold holy path is the meaning of sao and zhou.
Does it precisely refer to this?” 148 He thought deeply about this reasoning, his mind ﬂashed, and he understood. He attained the path of arhatship.
Furthermore, a brahman called King of Brahma Heaven, or Shidian .
He extensively read various books, maps, and secret books about omens, and he was involved in studying everything, including astronomy and geography.
Therefore, he was called Shidian.
He considered himself to be highly virtuous. So he commanded to debate with him.
He said to Cūḍapanthaka, “Are you able to debate with me?” Cūḍapanthaka replied, “I can still debate your grandfather, King of the Brahma Heaven, let alone you, an eyeless blind man.” The brahman, seeking for what meant, asked, “What difference is there between a blind man and an eyeless man?” Cūḍapanthaka stayed silent and did not answer.
“I have nothing with which to reply to him.” Then, with his supernatural power of travel, he responded to . He soared into the air and sat with crossed legs four zhang and nine chi above the earth.
The brahman looked up at and respect arose in his mind.
At that time Śāriputra knew that had exhausted his words and had responded to by manifesting an extraordinary event.
“If I do not go there will be humiliated and will not be liberated.” Immediately transformed himself into Cūḍapanthaka through his supernatural power of travel and then caused Cūḍapanthaka’s original body to disappear.
In his transformed ﬁgure asked , “Are you a heavenly being or a human being?” answered, “I am a human being.” asked again, “If you are a human being, are you male?” answered, “Yes, I am male.” Again asked, “What difference is there between a human being and a male?” answered, “There is no difference.” asked again, “A human being is a generic name and the word “male” is on the basis of the body.
Why are they no different from each other?
A blind man whom I previously mentioned means one who does not see the rewards or retributions for good or evil acts in present and later existences.
An eyeless man means one who has no eye of wisdom to cut off deﬁlements.” The brahman’s mind was liberated and he attained the pure Dharma eye .
Due to this cause and condition, Cūḍapanthaka is called the greatest in transformation. (This arhat is called the greatest being partially on the basis of a single good point. As it is discussed, he is the greatest in all true virtue and spiritual liberation.) As the Zengyi ahan jing says:
149 One time the World-honored One expounded the precepts on the ﬁfteenth day, when the entire bhikṣu sangha and a group of ﬁve hundred bhikṣus visited Anavatapta from Jeta Grove Monastery.
At that time the dragon king  came to the World-honored One’s place. He worshiped by bowing his head to feet, and then took a seat to one side.
saw that many bhikṣus ﬁlled the place, and said, “Śāriputra is not here.” The Buddha said to Maudgalyāyana, “Go quickly to Śāriputra’s place and give him my message.” Maudgalyāyana received instruction and went to Śrāvastī.
He said to Śāriputra, “The Buddha summons you.
The dragon king Anavatapta wishes to have a chance to see you.” Śāriputra took off the sash of his saṃkakṣikā by himself and put it before Maudgalyāyana.
He said to Maudgalyāyana, “If you have the supernatural power of travel, lift up this sash and tie it .” Maudgalyāyana picked up the sash but he could not move it.
When he exerted all his powers to lift it, the entire earth shook greatly.
Śāriputra then lifted . Maudgalyāyana fastened to the eastern continent, Pūrva videha.
Then bound to Mount Sumeru.
Maudgal yāyana then lifted and moved Mount Sumeru.
Śāriputra again bound the sash to the Tathāgata’s seat.
Maudgalyāyana consequently could not move it, let go of the sash, and returned to the dragon king’s place.
He saw Śāriputra in the distance, who had already arrived and was sitting with crossed legs before .
Thinking continuously before , Maudgalyāyana addressed the Buddha, “Have I lost my supernatural power of travel?
How did Śāriputra who left later than I did arrive here before I did?” The Buddha said, “ has not receded.
It is only because Śāriputra has great wisdom.” The Buddha said to Maudgalyāyana, “Many bhikṣus have no respect for you.
They say that Śāriputra’s supernatural power of travel surpasses yours.
You should therefore reveal your awesome power here among the assembly of bhikṣus.” replied to , “I receive your instruction.” He immediately rose from his seat and went to the summit of Mount Sumeru.
He trod on the top of the mountain with his foot, raised his other foot, and placed it upon Brahma Heaven.
He kicked Mount Sumeru and caused the earth to quake in six times.
At that time all the bhikṣus exclaimed at the unprecedented event.
When Maudgalyāyana spoke in verse, because of this sixty bhikṣus exhausted their deﬁlements and their minds were liberated.
Moreover, the Wenshushili panniepan jing says:
The Buddha said to Bhadrapāla Bodhisattva, “Mañjuśrī has great compassion.
He was born in the Brāhṃa-puṇyatva brahman family of Tāla village in this country.
At the time of his birth, his house transformed into one like a lotus ﬂower.
He emerged from his mother’s right armpit and his body was purplish-gold in color.
When he descended to the earth he could already speak.
Just like a heavenly youth, a canopy of the seven treasures was suspended above him.
All ninety-ﬁve types of debaters were incapable of responding to him.
In the Buddha’s place he renounced the world and studied the Way.
He abided in the śūraṃgamasamādhi .
“Four hundred and ﬁfty years after the Buddha’s nirvana, came to the Himalayas, where he exalted the twelve kinds of scriptures for ﬁve hundred hermits.
After edifying and causing them to abide in the stage of nonretrogression on the path to realizing highest, perfect enlightenment, he returned to his birthplace.
Under a nyagrodha tree in a marsh in an open ﬁeld, he sat with crossed legs and entered the śūraṃgamasamādhi.
Golden light radiated from all pores of the skin of his body and illuminated all over the worlds of the ten directions. He liberated those who had created the conditions .
“ his body was just like a purplish-gold mountain.
He was exactly one zhang and six chi tall.
A halo manifested majestically. Its surface equaled one fathom in diameter.
Within the halo were ﬁve hundred transformed buddhas, and each of the transformed buddhas had ﬁve transformed bodhisattvas as attendants.” The Buddha said to Bhadrapāla, “Mañjuśrī possesses immeasurable supernatural powers and transformations, which are impossible to completely explain.
If there are sentient beings who merely hear the name of Mañjuśrī, their sin of transmigration in birth and death will be removed for one billion two hundred million kalpas.
If there are those who worship and give offerings to him, in every rebirth they will always be reborn in a buddha land.
If someone has been unable to see , he must hold fast to recitation of the Śūraṃgama-samādhi and call the name of Mañjuśrī for seven days, and Mañjuśrī will certainly come to that person.
If someone has hindrances due to actions committed in previous existences, he will be able to see in a dream.
Those who can see in a dream, if they seek to become a śrāvaka in the present existence they will attain the srota-āpatti-phala, or anāgāmi-phala because they have seen Mañjuśrī.
If those who have renounced the world see , they will achieve arhatship in one day and night because they could see .
If there are those who deeply believe in the Mahayana sutras, the Dharma Prince  will expound the profound Dharma for them in the midst of meditation.
To those who are frequently deluded, will speak the meaning of truth in their dreams and cause them to become stable and attain the stage of nonretrogression to proceed to the highest path.
“After my nirvana some sentient beings who can hear the name of Mañjuśrī or who see his image will not fall into evil realms for a hundred or a thousand kalpas.
If there are those who hold fast to recitation of the name of Mañjuśrī, even if they have grave hindrances, they will not fall into the atrocious raging ﬂames of Avīci Hell.
They will be continually reborn in other pure lands, meet a buddha, hear the Dharma, and attain the clear cognition of the unproduced nature of all existences .” Furthermore, the Xianyu jing says:
The Buddha resided on Vulture Peak near Rājagṛha.
At that time, the king of Vārāṇasī was called Brahmadatta.
The king had a prime minister who had just had a new baby boy.
fully possessed all the marks of physical excellence and his body was purplish-gold in color.
appearance was remarkable and extraordinary.
Seeing his son, the prime minister’s joy was redoubled.
Previously, the temperament of the mother was neither capable nor good.
Since the time she became pregnant, she felt sad and sorry for others’ hardships, mercifully beneﬁted people, and protected and supported them with a mind of equality .
The father invited a physiognomist and asked him to foretell fortune through reading his physical marks and signs.
When saw he was happy. Accordingly, he established an alias ; his pseudonym was Maitreya.
That boy was exceptionally praised. circulated throughout the land.
The king heard them and he was very afraid that usurp the throne.
He learned that had not yet come of age, and thought, “ must be put to death in advance.” immediately ordered the prime minister, “I have heard that you have a son, whose appearance has extraordinary characteristics.
You should bring him here.
I would like to see him.” At that time someone in the palace came to the father.
The father became aware of the king’s avaricious scheme and he fell into great misery. The boy had an uncle called Bāvarī, the most reverend priest in Bopofuluo state.
150 He was sharp, lofty, learned, intelligent, prominent, and very talented.
Five hundred disciples always followed him, sought his advice, and received his commands.
At that time the prime minister felt pity and love for his son, and was fearful that his son would be killed.
He secretly made a plan. He dispatched a man to put on an elephant and send .
The uncle met and saw appearance was good.
He raised with love, paying special attention. Looking at him with respect, had a thought.
The boy gradually grew up and got older. taught and had him engage in study.
the boy’s seeking advice and receiving instructions, for one day surpassed those of other people for an entire year.
In his studies, before one year passed he had understood all the classic books.
151 At that time Bāvarī saw that his sister’s son had mastered all the books even though he had not studied for a very long time. intended to hold an assembly for to praise his virtue.
sent one of his disciples to Vārāṇasī to talk with the prime minister and tell him what his son had studied.
asked for jewelry and valuables, with which he intended to arrange the assembly.
That disciple had gone halfway when he heard that people spoke of the Buddha’s immeasurable virtuous conduct.
He longed for and wanted to go see him.
Immediately went to the Buddha’s place, however, before reaching the midpoint he was eaten by a tiger.
Due to the advantage of his virtue he was reborn in the heaven of the four heavenly kings, the ﬁrst .
Bāvarī then used all of his possessions to arrange the assembly for .
All the gathered and when the arranged assembly had come to an end the property was given to .
One person obtained ﬁve hundred gold coins.
After all the property and goods were exhausted a brahman called Raudrākṣa was the last to arrive .
, “Only I alone was not able to have a meal.
Just give me ﬁve hundred gold coins!” Raudrākṣa further said, “I have heard that you planned offering property and food. Why has all already been exhausted?
If you surely reject me and I am not given anything more, in seven days your head will break into seven pieces.” At that time Bāvarī fearfully , “There are evil curses as well as other paths in which spells are cast over people.
This matter should not be taken lightly.” He was deeply afraid of the threat.
His former disciple, who had previously served as a messenger and who had been reborn in heaven after death, saw from far away that his teacher was unhappy and haggard and had nothing on which to rely.
Immediately he descended from heaven and came before , and asked him, “Why are you so sad?” The teacher extensively explained .
The heavenly being addressed the teacher, “Raudrākṣa does not know of mūrdha-avasthā .
He is a stupid, deluded, evil man.
What can he do in the end? However, you are worried about this.
At present there is only the Buddha, who superlatively elucidates mūrdha-avasthā.
He is the inﬁnite Dharma King.
Especially you should take refuge in him.” At that time Bāvarī heard the heavenly being speak of the Buddha so he again asked , “What kind of a person is the Buddha?” The heavenly being explained, “The Buddha’s merit and wisdom are incalculable.
He currently resides on Vulture Peak near Rājagṛha.” When Bāvarī heard exclaimed the Buddha’s virtue he thought to himself, “He must be the one recorded in my book as the sage who was born just when the constellation Puṣya appeared and heaven and earth greatly moved.
Now everything matches this .” He immediately ordered sixteen people, including Maitreya, “Go and see the major and minor marks of his physical excellence!
Think to debate him , ‘How many marks of physical excellence do you think our teacher Bāvarī has?
How old is he?
What family background is he from?
How many disciples does he have?’ If can answer and he knows all, he must be the Buddha.
You must send one disciple to me and report the information to me.” Maitreya and the others went to Rājagṛha and approached Vulture Peak.
They saw the Buddha’s light, various wonders, and all of the astonishing marks of physical excellence of the Buddha.
They were more and more delighted and respectfully carried out their teacher’s order. From far away they tried to debate tacitly.
The Buddha responded to them from the distance.
Everything was correct.
They gave rise to deep respect for him.
After they had worshiped by bowing their heads to his feet, the Buddha expounded the Dharma for them. Fifteen people among attained the pure Dharma eye and sought to renounce the world.
The Buddha said, “You are welcome !” The beards and hair  spontaneously fell off and they donned Dharma robes.
again expounded the Dharma achieved arhatship.
Among the sixteen disciples there was a man whose alias was Piṅgiya.
He was Bāvarī’s elder sister’s son and the one who was sent back to report the information .
He returned to his homeland and told everything that he had heard and seen.
Bāvarī was happy to hear it.
He got up from his seat and kneeled upright with palms joined.
Facing toward Rājagṛha he sincerely begged the Buddha, “I pray only that you could oblige me by coming to see me and save me!” The Tathāgata was aware from the distance.
As quickly as the time it takes to bend and stretch out one’s arm appeared before .
On raising his head after bowing, saw the Buddha and was pleasantly surprised.
The Buddha expounded the Dharma for him. attained the anāgāmi-phala.
At that time the World-honored One soon returned to Vulture Peak. (Only Maitreya alone did not accept the minor fruition. Instead he made a vow for the great aspiration .
His purpose and interest were enlightenment.) The Buddha said to all the bhikṣus, “In the future this land of Jambudvīpa will be a regular square space, ﬂat, and wide, without mountains and rivers.
On the ground soft grass will grow. will be just like a heavenly robe.
At that time people’s life spans will be eighty-four thousand years. They will be eight zhang tall.
Their uprightness will be extremely wonderful.
The people will be kind and peaceful in nature. They will completely cultivate the ten wholesome acts.
“At that time there will be a wheel-turning noble king called Śaṅkah.
152 On that occasion in a brahman family a boy will be reborn.
The boy’s alias is Maitreya.
His body is purplish-gold in color and will possess all of the thirty-two major marks and all minor marks of physical excellence. “The light will be particularly bright.
He will renounce the world, study the Way, and achieve highest, right, perfect enlightenment.
He will extensively turn the noble Dharma wheel for sentient beings.
He will liberate a category of nine billion three hundred million sentient beings at his ﬁrst great assembly, nine billion one hundred million at the second assembly, and nine billion at the third great assembly.
Those who are able to attain liberation through the Dharma preached in these three assemblies are all of the sentient beings who will plant seeds of merit in the Dharma left by me.
All people will be able to be present at those three assemblies.” Ānanda addressed the Buddha, “I am not convinced.
How was the name Maitreya established?” The Buddha replied, “In the remotest past he learned the concentration on benevolence .
His stable mind is soft and tender. Moreover, he has no malicious intent.
Therefore his alias is Maitreya.” (As for the Sanskrit name Maitreya, it means the buddha family of benevolence.
Maitreya is also a family name.
Other sutras say that in the past there was a buddha whose alias was Maitreya.
One who had met the buddha made a vow to have the same name, Maitreya.
As for the alias Ajita, it means to be wusheng .
His intelligence goes beyond that of others.
Therefore he is called Wusheng.) 153 Verses say: 154 If virtuous ones follow the profound liberation, Those who left home in their youth ascend into the air. 155 If a teacher has thorough knowledge, his disciples will give rise to aspiration by themselves. Mystic light shines upon those related . In responding to wonders everyone differs. The Sage’s book is the same as the signs and marks that portend good fortune. takes advantage of heaven and accords to the virtue of heaven. 156 His outstanding sound is clear throughout the trichiliocosm. The Dharma drum rouses the profound teaching. A dragon ﬂies and responds to human and heavenly beings. undisturbed wisdom is profound and extremely subtle. Far and faintly he sings what is extremely profound. He circumambulates the forty-nine–storied Maṇi Palace. 157 With good fortune he arrives at the central banner. Sustaining his appearance with the thirty-two major marks of physical excellence, He will be shining and luxuriant in the Majestic Grove Garden .
Miracle Stories (Just as in the school of Daosheng or Sengzhao, or the class of Fotudeng or Daoan, there are many great virtuous people, who are discussed in a separate chapter in order to avoid complication and duplication. Therefore, just two stories are brieﬂy quoted here.) During the time of the Jin dynasty, Kumārajīva was in Chang’an.
He was called Tongshou here .
He was a man from India.
His family had been ministers through successive generations.
Kumārajīva’s grandfather, Kumāradatta , had the great aspiration and remained apart from others, and his name was valued in his country.
Kumārajīva’s father Kumārayāna was sharp and had virtuous ﬁdelity.
When Kumārayāna succeeded to the position of minister, he declined and renounced the world.
He headed east and crossed the Pamirs.
The king of Kucha heard that had given up his honorable , and revered him with admiration.
went out to the outskirts of the capital city to personally meet him on arrival and asked him to become the Most Reverend Priest .
The king had a sister who had just turned twenty years old.
She was talented and intelligent; she could understand whatever she took in with a single glance, and could recite from memory whatever she had heard only once.
Furthermore, she had a red mole on her body, which indicates the fate of giving birth to a sagacious son.
Royal families of various countries asked for her in marriage, but she did not accept any of their offers.
When she saw Ku māra yāṇa she wished with all her heart to take him as .
So forced him to marry her. Before long, she became pregnant with Kumārajīva.
While Kumārajīva was in her womb, the mother’s intelligence and comprehensive faculties doubled.
She heard that Śahra Great Temple had already produced many eminent monks, and moreover there were monks who had attained the Buddhist Way.
158 Along with noblewomen of the royal family and many nuns of virtuous conduct, she held a religious service, asked for puriﬁcation, and listened to the Dharma for many days.
Kumārajīva’s mother suddenly and spontaneously became proﬁcient in the Indian language.
No matter how difﬁcult the expressions of questions were, she deﬁnitively mastered their profound principles.
All the people admired her.
Dharmaghoṣa Arhat said, “This lady must have conceived a sagacious child,” and he told her of the miracle of Śāriputra when he was in his mother’s womb.
After Kumārajīva was born, however, his mother forgot what she had been told previously.
After a while she wished to renounce the world but her husband did not allow her to do so.
Thereupon she gave birth to another boy, called Puṣyadeva .
Incidentally, later went out of town and traveled for sightseeing, and she saw some dried-out bones scattered here and there in a graveyard.
She then pondered the origin of suffering and decided to seek to renounce the world.
She made a vow to never eat and drink if she was not allowed to take the tonsure.
On the night of the sixth day her energy was weak and exhausted and it was doubtful if she could live to the next morning.
Her husband, fearful of this, then allowed her .
Since she had not yet received the tonsure she still would not eat.
Accordingly ordered someone to shave her head and she ﬁnally took food and drink.
The next morning she received the precepts and then began meditation practice and concentrated all her effort on the practice. She was not negligent in her studies and attained the ﬁrst fruit of the four stages of sainthood.
Kumārajīva renounced the world at the age of seven accompanied by .
Following a teacher monk, he received sutras. He recited one thousand verses in a day.
There are thirty-two syllables in a verse, so, he recited thirty-two thousand syllables in total .
had already ﬁnished reciting the Abhidharma and a teacher gave him the meanings.
He immediately mastered them; nothing was obscure and everything was easily understood.
At that time, the people of Kucha offered much beneﬁt and support to since his mother was the king’s sister.
Accordingly his mother guided him in order to avoid .
When Kumārajīva was nine years old, he followed his mother, crossed the Indus River, and arrived at Kaśmīra, where he met the highest virtue Dharma teacher Bandhudatta, a cousin of the king of Kaśmīra. had profound and perfect knowledge and was broadminded.
Talented, sharp, and erudite, he was unrivaled at the time.
He was completely versed in the Tripiṭaka and the nine kinds of scriptures.
From morning until noon he handcopied one thousand verses and from noon until the evening he also recited one thousand verses.
His name spread throughout the countries and the people, regardless of where they were, considered him to be their teacher.
Kumārajīva came to and immediately revered with great courtesy as his teacher.
received from him the Kṣudraka-piṭaka and two kinds of Āgama sutras, the Madhya māgama and the Dīrghāgama, altogether four million syllables. 159 Bandhudatta always praised Kumārajīva for his outstanding talent.
Consequently reputation reached the king .
The king immediately invited .
He gathered non-Buddhist disputants for to debate.
When  ﬁrst began to exchange words with , they thought little of him since he was so young, and their speech was very arrogant.
Kumārajīva took advantage of their weakness and defeated them.
The nonBuddhist disputers submitted to him. Ashamed of themselves and regretful, they were left with nothing to say.
The king respected and marveled at more and more.
He gave him the salted and dried meat of a pair of geese, three pecks each of nonglutinous rice and ﬂour, and six sheng of milk per day.
This was a traditional votive offering of a foreign country .
The abbot of the temple where resided sent ﬁve senior monks and ten novices to take care of and clean , just as if they were own disciples.
He was greatly revered in this way .
When turned twelve years old, his mother took him back to Kucha.
All the various countries invited him, offering good noble titles, but Kumārajīva did not care about any of that at all.
At that time, Kumārajīva’s mother led him to the Northern Hill of the Yueshi tribe.
An arhat saw and felt that he was unusual. The arhat told his mother, “You should protect this novice always.
If he does not violate the precepts until the age of thirty-ﬁve, he will cause the Buddhist Dharma to ﬂourish greatly and will liberate innumerable people.
He will be no different than Upagupta.
160 If he is unable to observe the precepts completely, he will not be able to accomplish anything great and will be merely nothing more than a talented and superior scholar monk.” Kumārajīva further advanced and arrived at Kashgar.
He carried a Buddhist almsbowl upon his head and thought, “This bowl is very large in size.
Why is it so light?” Then ] the bowl became too heavy .
So he unexpectedly cried out and put it down.
His mother asked him why he had done so.
He replied, “Because I have prejudiced views I merely feel that the bowl is light and then heavy.” After all Kumārajīva stayed in Kashgar for a year.
That winter he recited the Abhidharma.
Regarding various chapters, such as chapters on The Ten Gates and The Cultivation of Intelligence , there was nothing he had to be instructed about, and he mastered the marvelous principles.
Moreover, concerning all ﬁelds of the six fundamental discourses , nothing of them was unclear to him.
In Kashgar there was a śramaṇa named Priyadarśana , who was well versed in all the three divisions of the Buddhist teaching.
told the king, “You must not underestimate this novice.
Your Majesty, you should ask him to open the Dharma gate  for the ﬁrst time. Generally there are two merits for this.
First, śramaṇas in this country will feel ashamed of themselves for being inferior to him and will certainly be encouraged .
Second, the king of Kucha must be thinking, ‘ is from my country and is respected in that country .
This means that my country is respected.’ He will then surely come to have a friendly relationship with this country.” The king approved of this.
A great assembly was arranged and Kumārajīva was asked to ascend the raised seat and expound the Dharmacakra-pravartana-sūtra .
The king of Kucha, as had been expected, sent an envoy in order to reward for his friendship .
In between periods of expounding the Dharma, Kumārajīva looked for non-Buddhist scriptures and learned the Vedaśata-śāstra well.
He clariﬁed many issues such as diction, composition, and question and answer.
He read widely the scriptures of the four Vedas  and all of the commentaries on the ﬁve ﬁelds of studies .
161 He studied the arts of yin-yang and astrology; everything was investigated thoroughly.
He was wondrously proﬁcient in fortunetelling; what he said matched the fact just as two pieces of a tally ﬁt together.
He possessed a generous nature.
Kumārajīva ﬁrst learned Hinayana and later specialized in Mahayana .
He lamented, “I formerly learned Hinayana .
I was just like someone who does not recognize gold but considers brass to be wonderful.” Accordingly, he widely sought the essence of principles.
He received and recited the Zhong lun and the Bailun , as well as the Shiermen lun and others.
Soon, following his mother, Kumārajīva moved on to Akush , the northern boundary of Kucha.
At that time, a brahman in Akush had a marvelous ﬂuent tongue and was outstanding; his name pervaded various countries.
He personally beat the drum of the royal palace and made an oath, “If anyone who debates bests me, I will accept being beheaded to apologize to him.” Kumārajīva had already arrived examined the two principles thoroughly. The brahman immediately became confused and dazed.
He bowed his head to the ground and took refuge in .
Thereafter rose in fame in the area east of the Pamirs, and his honor spread throughout the area beyond the Yellow River.
The king of Kucha went to Akush in person, greeted Kumārajīva, and returned to the country with him.
extensively expounded various sutras.
Scholars in remote countries in the four directions held him in high esteem; there was no one who could oppose him.
At that time, there was a princess who had become a nun.
Her pseudonym was Akṣayamati.
She read extensively many sutras. In particular she had profound knowledge of the heart of meditation.
She said she had been certiﬁed as having attained the second fruit .
When she heard the Dharma she was greatly happy.
She then set up a great assembly and asked for the essence of the Mahayana sutras.
Kumārajīva explained for that all phenomenal things are entirely empty and there is no self, and that the discernment of in the sensory realm are merely provisional names; they are not reality 162 At that time, none among the audience in the assembly was not moved and impressed, and all the people regretted that they had taken so much time to awaken.
When turned twenty years old he received the precepts  in the royal palace.
He learned the Shisong lü from Vimalākṣa .
163 Soon after Kumārajīva’s mother was to leave for India.
She said to Bo Chun, the king of Kucha, “Your country is gradually declining.
I am now leaving for India, where I will advance up to the third fruit .” Before departing she told Kumārajīva, “The profound teaching of Mahayana must be widely propagated in China. To transmit it to the eastern land depends only on your power.
There is, however, no beneﬁt for yourself in doing so.
What do you think you should do?” Kumārajīva replied, “The way of the mahāsattva lies in beneﬁting others without thinking of oneself.
If I can surely transmit the great ediﬁcation  and help enlighten ignorant people, even if my body experiences the suffering of boiling in a cauldron over a ﬁre, I will have no regrets.” So stayed in Kucha and resided at xin Temple.
Later, in the former palace near the temple, the text of the Fangguang jing was found for the ﬁrst time.
ﬁrst picked it up, unrolled it, and was reading it when a devil came and covered over some passages of the scripture so that it looked like a blank sheet of paper.
Kumārajīva realized that this was the work of a devil and redoubled his vow.
The devil left and the inscriptions reappeared.
then repeatedly recited them.
Again, he heard a voice in the air, “You are a man who has plenty of knowledge.
Why do you need to read this?” Kumārajīva answered, “You are a minor devil. You should promptly leave .
My mind is as stable as the earth.
You cannot move it.” stayed for three years, during which time he extensively recited Mahayana sutras and discourses, and he clariﬁed the secret principles .
The king of Kucha had a lion seat of gold made for and spread a cushion covered in Chinese brocade on it.
bade Kumārajīva to ascend the seat and expound the Dharma.
Kumārajīva said, however, “My teacher has not yet understood Mahayana Buddhism.
I would like to go in person and teach him with respect and courtesy.
I will not be able to stay here.” Suddenly Great Master Bandhudatta came without reference to the long distance .
The king said, “O Great Master!
Why did you come all this way from such a distance?” Bandhudatta replied, “First, I have heard that what my disciple realized is uncommon.
Second, Your Majesty, you propagate and praise the Buddhist Way.
Therefore, I traveled , braving difﬁculties and dangers, to come all the way to your country.” Kumārajīva was able to welcome his teacher and was glad that he could fulﬁll his long-cherished plan.
He expounded for the Sutra on the Virtuous Woman’s Questions , 164 and fully clariﬁed that arise from causes and conditions; they are empty and false. This was something that both he and his teacher had not believed in formerly.
Therefore, explained it ﬁrst.
The teacher asked Kumārajīva, “What different characteristics did you ﬁnd in Mahayana by which you have come to esteem it?” Kumārajīva replied, “Mahayana Buddhism is profound and pure and clariﬁes that all existing things have no reality, while Hinayana is one-sided and is very much stagnant in name and form .” The teacher said, “You explain that all things are entirely empty.
This is a very frightening theory.
Why have you given up the view that all things exist and stick to the view that everything is empty?
You are just like the insane man of former times who ordered a spinning artisan to make beautiful yarn, extremely thin and high-quality yarn.
The spinning artisan paid special attention and made yarn as thin as ﬁne dust, yet the insane man still resented that the yarn was too thick.
The spinning artisan became very angry and said, pointing into the air, ‘This is thin yarn.’ The insane man asked, ‘Why is it invisible?’ The spinning artisan said, ‘This yarn is extremely ﬁne.
Even a skilled worker of my studio cannot see it.
How could other people see it?’ The insane man was very happy and paid money to the spinning artisan, who imitated , too.
All the workers received a good payment but in fact they had produced nothing.
Your teaching of emptiness follows this .” Kumārajīva then explained it again, giving similar cases in succession.
They earnestly traded questions and answers.
More than a month passed. Only then was convinced.
The teacher said in wonderment, “This is something that I, your teacher, could not master, yet to the contrary, you, my disciple, have opened up my determination. I verify it right now.” He then bowed to Kumārajīva and had him for his teacher. said, “O upādhyāya!
You are my teacher of Mahayana , and I am the upādhyāya’s teacher of Hinayana .” All people in the countries of the Western Region completely admired Kumārajīva’s excellent talent.
Every time gave a talk, all the kings of various countries knelt upright to the side of the raised seat, requiring Kumārajīva to step on them in order to ascend the seat.
He was valued in this way. Kumārajīva’s teaching ﬂowed throughout the Western Region and his reputation reached the Eastern River . At that time, Fu Jian was a pretender to the throne in Guanzhong .
In the foreign regions there were the king of Qianbu and the younger brother of the king of Kucha. They came together and offered a tribute to Jian, who granted an audience to them.
These two royal members said to Jian, “In the Western Region many rare and precious things are produced.
Please dispatch troops and subjugate the region.
Then we will submit ourselves to you.” In the ﬁrst month of the year of Dingchou, the thirteenth year of Jianyuan , the Grand Astrologer reported to , “A star appears in the celestial sphere above the foreign countries.
There must be a person of great virtue and a wise person who will come to help China.” Fu Jian said, “I have heard of Kumārajīva in the Western Region and Śramaṇa Daoan in Xiangyang.
Could it mean these people?” He immediately sent messengers to ﬁnd them.
In the second month of the seventeenth year , the king of Milan, the king of Qianbu, and others again talked to and asked him to dispatch troops to subjugate the Western Region.
In the ninth month of the eighteenth year , Fu Jian sent Cavalry General Lü Guang and the Lingjiang General Jiang Fei, who led the king of Qianbu, the king of Turfan, and others and commanded seventy thousand soldiers to subjugate the countries in the west, such as Kucha and Karashahr.
When departed Fu Jian held a farewell dinner for Lü Guang at the Jianzhang Palace.
Jian said to Guang, “The sovereign rules over the world in accordance with the mandate of Heaven, and considers his affection for the people, as if they were his own children, to be the foundation.
How could he covet other lands and subjugate them?
is precisely because he wants to ﬁnd one who has the true teaching in mind.
I have heard of Kumārajīva in the Western Region, who deeply understands the essential nature of things, is well versed in yin and yang, and is the head of the scholars of later generations.
I admire him very much.
Those who are outstanding in virtue and learning are the great treasures of the country.
If you gain victory over Kucha, swiftly send Kumārajīva by stagecoach to me.” Before Lü
Guang’s troops arrived, Kumārajīva warned the king of Kucha, Bo Chun, “Fortune has deserted this country.
There is a formidable enemy.
The people of the national capital are coming from the east.
You should respectfully cater to them. Do not oppose their vanguard.” Chun, however, did not listen to him and fought against .
Guang consequently defeated Kucha, killed Chun, and made Zhen, Bo Chun’s younger brother, the ruler.
Guang had already obtained Kumārajīva but he did not infer how intelligent was.
He saw that was still young.
So he made fun of and treated him as an ordinary person.
On the way back , Guang halted his troops at the foot of a hill, where the ofﬁcers and soldiers were already resting.
Kumārajīva said , “You should not stay here; you will certainly ﬁnd yourself in a difﬁcult position.
You had better move your forces to the hilltop.” Guang, however, did not accept his admonition.
When night came, just as had warned, it rained heavily and ﬂoods suddenly arose.
The water became several zhang deep and the fatalities numbered in the several tens of thousands.
Guang secretly thought for the ﬁrst time that was indeed extraordinary.
Kumārajīva said to Guang, “This is an unfortunate place. You must not stay here long. I inferred our misfortune and foresaw our fate.
You should promptly order , ‘Go back !’ On your way back, I am sure that there will be a land of good fortune in which you can reside.” Guang followed .
When they arrived at Liangzhou , they heard that Fu Jian had already been killed by Yao Chang (330– clothes and advance south of the city.
then usurped the title of ruler outside of Hangu Pass, and the era was named Taian.
In the ﬁrst month of the second year of Taian , a gale blew in Guzang . Kumārajīva said, “This is an inauspicious wind.
There will be a vicious riot but it will be spontaneously settled without much trouble.” Later, Kumārajīva’s prediction of this event was veriﬁed.
Kumārajīva stayed in Liangzhou for years. Since Lü
Guang and his son did not propagate the Way, profound views were kept within him; he had no chance to propagate the teaching.
Fu Jian had already died so he and did not see each other after all.
When Yao Chang usurped the throne in Guanzhong, he also heard of high reputation and disinterestedly requested to come to .
Because Kumārajīva possessed deep tactical skill and understood various things, Lü
’s family was afraid that he would contrive plots to beneﬁt Yao . So was not allowed to go into the eastern land. When Chang died and his son Xing succeeded the throne, again made a sincere request.
In the third month of the third year of the Hongshi era during Xing’s reign, trees with interlocking branches sprang up in the imperial court, and in the Peripatetic Garden scallions were transformed into leeks .
thought these were good omens, saying, “A wise man must be coming.” In the ﬁfth month, Xing dispatched Shide, a lord of Longxi, to subjugate Lü Long in the west. Long’s troops were utterly defeated.
In the ninth month, Long presented a memorial to Xing and surrendered.
Finally could greet Kumārajīva, who entered Guanzhong. arrived at Chang’an on the twentieth of the tenth month of that year.
165 Xing treated with due honors as the Most Reverend Priest.
was extremely favored.
Whenever met they alked to each other for an entire day.
When they examined the niceties to reach the ultimate, they spent a year tirelessly.
From the time the great Dharma reached the east and began during the reign of Emperor Ming of the Later Han dynasty, it went through the Wei dynasty and the Jin dynasty , and the sutras and discourses gradually increased.
Most of the texts translated by Zhi and Zhu , however, were literally incomprehensible and regulated with the principles of Daoist philosophy.
166 Xing worshiped the Three Treasures from the time he was young.
With an earnest intention he gathered people to talk .
After Kumārajīva arrived and stayed in Chang’an, asked him to go to the Western Light Pavilion and the Peripatetic Garden and translate numerous sutras.
Kumārajīva had already recited most of them from memory and there was nothing he had not thoroughly studied.
He became  competent in the Chinese language and his transliteration was ﬂuent and appropriate.
He looked at the texts of old translations and found many mistakes in meanings.
This was entirely because the texts translated previously had failed to follow their purpose and did not correspond to Sanskrit texts.
Xing arranged for more than eight hundred monks, such as the śramaṇas Senglüe, Sengqian, Faqin, Daoliu, Daoheng, Daobiao, Seng rui, and Sengzhao, to inquire and receive instructions on the doctrines from Kumārajīva.
Furthermore, he had the Mahāprajñāpāramitā-sūtra translated.
Kumārajīva held the Sanskrit text in his hands, Xing took the old translation sutra in his hands, and they collated one with the other.
The meanings newly translated , which were different from the old translation, completely made sense.
All the people were satisﬁed with them and submitted willingly to him; everyone joyfully praised him.
Xing thought, “The Buddhist Way is profound and all the practices are entirely wholesome.
It is truly a good ferry to escape from suffering.
It is the great law to govern the world.” Therefore Xing felt some inclination toward the nine kinds of scriptures and thought deeply about the twelve kinds of scriptures.
He then composed the Discourse on Understanding Thoroughly the Three Periods of Existence in order to encourage  and show the law of cause and effect.
All of the people under the princes respectfully praised his way of ediﬁcation.
Xian, the Great General and Duke of Changshang, and Song, the Left Army General and Marquis of Ancheng, deeply believed in the Buddhist Dharma.
They often invited Kumārajīva to the Great Temple in Chang’an to speak on new sutras. Kumārajīva translated both Mahayana and Hinayana sutras and discourses one after another; more than three hundred ninety fascicles in total.
The titles of his translations are listed in another biography of him.
They all clearly reveal the mysterious origin of the teaching and illuminate the profound principles.
At that time, righteous people most certainly gathered from throughout the four directions, regardless of distance.
grand work lasts long; it is still admired as the model today.
Among the Buddhist monks and laypeople who came from every direction there were outstanding people such as Shi Huiyuan .
had learned numerous sutras thoroughly and was a leader of the ediﬁcation of the teaching left by .
His time, however, was far distant from that of the Sage , and he could not settle some doubtful points of the doctrines.
Therefore, he wrote a letter and asked questions to .
“When people have an audience with a sovereign , they certainly praise his virtue.
In the rites to see the Buddha, singing praises is considered to be valuable.
The gāthās and ślokas used in sutras are all examples of this.
Through merely translating Sanskrit texts into Chinese, however, much of the elegance and grace  is lost.
Even though the gist is retained are very different from in their literary style.
It is just as if one chews some food and then gives it to someone else; not only loses its taste but also causes the other person to feel ill.” once composed verses and presented them to Śramaṇa Fahe.
The mind a mountain produces the highest virtue, and ﬂoating fragrance spreads throughout ten thousand yojanas.
The luan bird that cries sorrowfully perches alone on a paulownia tree, and the clear sound of his cries reaches the highest point of heaven.
ten verses in total.
The literary style of all  was like this.
Kumārajīva was originally fond of Mahayana Buddhism and his determination lay in promulgating it.
He often lamented, “If I put pen to paper and write the Abhidharma of Mahayana , what Kātyāyanīputra wrote (i.e., the Apitan bajieandu lun, T. 1543 and the Apitan piposha lun, T. 1546) will be nothing compared to it.
At present in China, those who have profound knowledge about this are few.
I will give up writing here.
What do I have left to discuss?” stopped writing, sadly.
He wrote only two fascicles of the Discourse on Ultimate Reality for Yao Xing’s sake and annotated the Vimalakīrti nirdeśa-sūtra.
The words that came out of his mouth formed a complete composition; there was nothing to correct and delete.
His literary style was smooth and courteous, and everything was profound and subtle.
As for Kumārajīva’s personality, his frame of mind was clean and pure, and his self-conﬁdence stood conspicuous.
He understood everything according to circumstances. Few people could match him.
He had a generous nature; he was benevolent and generous. He kept philanthropy in mind.
He effaced himself and was good at inducing others , doing so tirelessly all day long.
Lord Yao always said to Kumārajīva, “O Great Master!
You are sharp and incomparably awakened. There is none equal to you in the entire world.
When you leave this world one day, how can you depart with no one to inherit the Dharma seed?” Furthermore, Beidu Bhikṣu, who resided in Pengcheng heard that Kumārajīva was in Chang’an.
He lamented, “It has been more than three hundred years since I separated from this boy for my amusement.
I have heard nothing from him and I have not met him again.
I only hope that I will have a chance to meet him in my next existence.” Before his death, Kumārajīva realized that the four great elements would not recover from illness.
He said, “I wish that all that I have translated will be transmitted and circulate in later ages, and that it all will be greatly popular.
Today, before many people, I make a sincere vow.
If in what I have transmitted there is no mistake, then my tongue will not be burned even after my body is cremated.” On the twentieth day of the eighth month of the eleventh year of Hongshi of the Later Qin dynasty, passed away in Chang’an.
This was the ﬁfth year of Yixi of the Jin dynasty.
Immediately in the Peripatetic Garden, following foreign customs, his body was cremated.
The ﬁrewood burned completely and his body was reduced to ash and bone, but his tongue was not destroyed.
In Xin Temple in Jiangling of the Song dynasty, there was Shi Faxian, whose secular family name was Gong.
He was a man from Wuyang in Pinyang prefecture .
His determination and conduct were intelligent and diligent, and in upholding the rules of deportment he was orderly and majestic.
He frequently lamented the disorder and shortage of sutras and Vinayas. So he became determined to seek them out.
In the third year of the Long’an era of the Jin dynasty along with his monk colleagues including Huijing, Daozheng, Huiying, and Huiwei, left Chang’an for the west and crossed the quicksand.
There were no birds ﬂying above and no animals running on land below.
They saw nothing but emptiness all around; there were no landmarks to help determine where to go.
They conjectured the direction of east or west only by observing the sun, and just indicated their course by human bones.
There were frequent gusts of hot air and evil spirits.
If anyone encountered them he would die.
xian entrusted himself to , left himself to fate, and passed through dangerous areas.
After a while arrived at the Pamirs , where the snow accumulates all year round.
There was an evil dragon that emitted a poisonous wind and rained down pebbles and grit.
Crossing the mountain pass was dangerous and the cliffs stood a thousand ren high. 167 There were roads that had been made in the past by cutting rocks, alongside of which wooden stairways were attached.
crossed altogether more than seven hundred such places.
Furthermore, they had to walk on a hanging braided rope bridge cross rivers at more than several tens of spots.
All of these were places that Zhang Qian and Gan Fu of the Han dynasty had never reached.
Subsequently, they crossed over a snow-covered mountain where they encountered a freezing wind that suddenly came up.
Huijing could not speak and shuddered . 168 He could not advance.
He said to xian, “I will die here.
You should go on and leave me.
We cannot die together.” As soon as he uttered these words he passed away.
xian patted and said in tears, “It was his fate that he could not accomplish his original intention.
What can I do now?” So he kept traveling alone through his own effort and passed through the dangerous mountain area.
He traveled through more than forty countries altogether and was about to reach India.
There was a temple more than thirty li from Rājagṛha. was passing by there as the evening closed in.
xian intended to visit Vulture Peak .
A monk of the temple warned him against going there and said, “The road is very difﬁcult and there are many obstructions. Moreover, there are many black lions that have often eaten people.
How will you be able to reach there?” xian replied, “I have already traveled over several tens of thousands of from a great distance and I made a vow to go to Vulture Peak.
We cannot expect our life and we cannot keep breathing .
How could I give up when I have already come this far with sincerity I have cherished for many years?
Even though there are dangers and difﬁculties, I am not afraid of them.” Many people tried to stop him but none could.
Accordingly two monks  and they saw them off.
xian had already arrived at the Vulture Peak in the dusk of the evening.
So he intended to stay overnight.
The two monks felt misgivings about this, so they abandoned and went back.
xian stayed alone on the mountain, where he burned incense and worshiped.
He longed dearly for the distant at the old site just as seeing the sacred image .
At midnight three black lions appeared, and they approached and crouched down in front of xian. They licked their lips, waving their tails.
xian chanted a sutra without cessation and thought of the Buddha wholeheartedly.
The lions then lowered their heads, dropped their tails, and prostrated themselves at of xian’s feet.
xian patted them with his hands and said an incantation, “If you want to kill me, just wait until I ﬁnish chanting .
If you are here to test me, you should withdraw from this place.” The lions left after a while.
Next morning, he returned .
The road was difﬁcult and dark with many obstructions.
There was only one path he could follow to pass through.
Before he had walked one li or more, he suddenly came across a monk, about ninety years old.
was shabbily dressed but he had a superior and profound air.
Even though xian was aware that was elegant and lofty, he did not realize that was a holy man.
Moreover, after that met a young Buddhist monk and asked him, “Who is the old man I saw earlier?” replied, “He is the great disciple , the dhūta Kāśyapa.” xian greatly regretted .
Following after he came to a mountainous place.
There was a horizontal rock blocking the entrance to house and could not enter.
xian wept and then left that place.
went on and arrived at the Kāśi kingdom.
There was a whiteeared dragon in the kingdom and every came to an agreement with many monks and caused the state to be prosperous.
All the people had faith in and were devoted to .
Śramaṇas set up a house for the dragon and arranged food of merit.
At the end of the summer retreat every year, the dragon was always transformed into a small snake with white ears.
All the people knew that this was the dragon.
They put some cheese on bronze plates and the dragon was placed in the center .
from the superior to the inferior performed this rite. The dragon then turned into a small snake from head to tail and left there.
This was performed once a year.
xian saw with his own eyes, too.
Afterward arrived in Central India.
At Heavenly King Temple south of King Aśoka’s stupa in Pāṭaliputra, in Magadha, he obtained the Mahāsāṃghika-vinaya .
Furthermore he obtained the Extract of the Sarvāstivāda-vinaya , the Za apitanxin, the Xian jing, 169 the Fangdeng niyuan jing , and other texts.
xian stayed there for three years, studying the Indian language and scriptures.
He transcribed in his own hand.
Thereafter he entrusted sutras and images to merchants. reached Siṃhala .
more than ten people had been traveling with xian.
some stayed and some others had died.
Looking at his shadow, he was always alone and he lamented in his mind.
When he unexpectedly saw a merchant offer a moon-shaped silk Chinese fan before a jade image he unwittingly shed tears in sadness.
stayed for two years.
He obtained the Mahīśāsaka-vinaya ; two Āgama sutras, the Dīrghāgama and the Saṃyuktāgama; and the Zazang , none of which had yet been introduced into China.
entrusted all to some merchants on a big ship, and then he crossed the sea to return .
There were about two hundred people on the ship. They encountered a windstorm and the ship sprang a leak.
All the people were uneasy and afraid.
They grabbed up miscellaneous things and threw them .
xian was afraid that they might throw out his sutras and images, so he wholeheartedly prayed to Avalokiteśvara, and took refuge in all the Buddhist monks of China.
The ship went on, following the wind, and sustained no damage.
More than ten days later the ship reached Yepoti.
170 After staying there for ﬁve months, again followed the other merchant east, to Guangzhou.
More than twenty days after setting sail a sudden gale came up at night, and the ship were terriﬁed.
All the people discussed among themselves and said, “Having this śramaṇa on board puts us in a difﬁcult position.
We cannot allow all the people to die for the sake of one person.” They all wanted to push .
Faxian’s donor raised his voice and scolded the merchants in a loud voice, “If you throw this śramaṇa off the ship, then drop me off, too.
Otherwise, you will be killed.
The sovereigns of China believe in the Buddha and respect Buddhist monks.
If I reach there, I will tell a ruler and surely you will be accused of the crime.” The merchants turned pale and looked at each other, and they stopped the plot.
They had already run out of water and all the provisions were used up as well.
They did nothing and resigned themselves to the wind, following the current.
Suddenly they reached shore and saw the green of pigweeds and beans growing profusely.
They knew Chinese land but they could not surmise what area it was.
They immediately went on board and entered into a creek.
They looked for a village and found two hunters.
xian asked them, “What region is this?” The hunters replied, “This is the south shore of Laoshan in Changguan prefecture in Qingzhou .” The hunters returned and reported  to Governor Li Yi, who originally believed in  respectfully.
He suddenly heard the śramaṇa arriving from a distance and personally came out to greet and showed appreciation of his efforts.
xian, carrying the sutras and images, followed [the governor to .
Soon thereafter intended to return to the south.
The Regional Inspector of Qingzhou asked to stay over the winter.
xian answered, “I cast myself into a land to which I had not expected to return.
My resolution lies in spreading throughout the world. I have not yet achieved what I had hoped to.
I cannot stay here for a long time.” Consequently he left for the south and arrived at the capital city .
Following the foreign meditation master Buddhabhadra, in Daochang Tem ple, translated more than a million words of sutras, Vinayas, and commentaries on sutras .
were widely circulated for ediﬁcation, and they all helped learn .
A family, whose name has been lost, lived near the Zhuque Gate and had believed in the ediﬁcation of the true from generation to generation.
had copied a sutra with their own hands, chanted it, and offered to it.
They did not have a room exclusively for the sutra; was placed in the same room along with miscellaneous other books.
Later, wind and ﬁre abruptly started up and spread to their house. All their property and goods were burned.
Only the Nirvāṇa-sūtra remained, completely untouched, and was found undamaged amid the ashes. There was no change in its physical condition.
was passed on to all the people of the capital city, and everyone sighed in wonderment at the marvel.
Some other sutras and Vinayas .
171 later came to Jingzhou , and passed away at Xin Temple at the age of eighty-six Chinese years old.
All the people grieved extremely and lamented .
There is a separate large biography about his pilgrimage to various countries (i.e., Biography of the Eminent Monk Faxian, T.
Previous Existences Introduction, Quoted Testimonies, Habits from Former Existences, and The Five Supernatural Powers. Actions are diverse.
Paths of relationships from previous existences are numerous.
There is long and short in life span.
The principle of brightness and darkness is transitory.
Truly it is because of good or evil karmic causes.
Due to these causes, there is obscuration or clarity in reward or retribution, a person has recollection for many kalpas, or he thinks of an object generation after generation, or he has remembrance in only one existence, or he only knows present .
Therefore, ordinary people and sages are far apart from each other and previous existence lengthens and shortens.
Even if you entrust to divinity and are grateful for sacredness, the habitual vapor remains.
If you remove delusion and see the truth, the playful mind still exists.
Except for who ascend the ten stages in rank, practice fully takes a trikalpaasaṃkhyeya .
172 How can you eternally cut off the cause which brings about an effect of the same nature and gratefully receive a wonderful reward in the present ?
First, the posha lun says:
In the heavenly realm there are also those who know others’ thoughts with the wisdom of knowing the locus of their former existence and that of others .
This, however, goes into particulars. Therefore it is not explained separately here.
It is just as I have already explained completely in reward and retribution in the height of the heavenly realm .
It is also the same as what is explained below about the realms of animals and hungry ghosts.
Therefore, the posha lun says:
What is the reason for this?
This is because they do not possess the ability of the ﬁeld of merit .
It is because have excellent wisdom, such as that of seeing, hearing, and speaking, which obscures and damages .
It is because they have the ability to know others’ thoughts, and wisdom such as the wisdom that arises from a vow , and  is concealed .
Commenting on this, I should make this explanation.
In reason there is nothing wrong in that in the four realms  through the wisdom of knowing the locus of their former existence and that of others.
Second, someone asks, “In the human realm there is also a kind of wisdom that arises from innate thought , through which people should be able to know others’ thoughts.
Why do you not explain about this?” I answer, “As for why I should explain it and yet do not, you must know there is something incomplete in this meaning.
Furthermore, such instances are few. Therefore, I do not explain.
That is to say, since in the human realm there are very few who attain this wisdom, I do not explain it.” The posha lun further explains:
This wisdom originates from inoffensive conduct .
If there is a sentient being who can uphold bodily and verbal actions and who does not annoy others, when he is in his mother’s womb he must be magnanimous; he is not troubled by the two tactile senses of cold and hot, and he does not cause his mother’s stomach to be troubled by impure, vitiated blood; when he comes out of the womb he is not pressed hard by  his mother’s vagina and does not cause his mind to become distracted, either.
Because of these causes and conditions, this person is clearly conscious and awakened. He knows what happened in his previous .
If you do not know now , it is truly because you went against the matters mentioned above.
Since you have forgotten  and are confused, you cannot know it.
Someone asks, “Do the beings in each realm know how many realms of existence there are?” I answer, “It is also just as the posha lun explains.
Heavenly beings know about the ﬁve realms; human beings know about the four realms, ; ghosts know about the three realms; animals know about the two realms; and beings in hell only know about matters in hell.
Beings in the upper realms are superior so they can know of the lower , but beings in the lower realms are inferior and therefore they cannot know of the upper .” Someone asks, “If are inferior and therefore they do not know of the upper realms, why do sutras say that dragon kings such as Susaṃsthita and Elāpattra can know what the eminent one Śakradevendra thinks?” I answer, “Just as the posha lun explains, these are all inferences, not right cognition.
It is just as when Śakra-devendra intended to ﬁght against the asuras, the bones on the back of the dragon king Susaṃsthita spontaneously produced a sound.
He then thought to himself, ‘I have now produced a loud voice from the bones of my back.
Surely I know that all heavenly beings will certainly ﬁght against the asuras with me.
They must need me.’ After having this thought he immediately left to go to Śakradevendra’s side.
“Moreover it is just as when Śakra-devendra wanted to play, fragrant hands spontaneously appeared on the dragon king Elāpattra’s back.
Then he thought to himself, ‘Now fragrant hands have appeared on my back.
I surely know that Śakra-devendra wishes to play in a garden.
He must need me.’ After having this thought he immediately transformed himself and created thirty-two elephants; there were altogether thirty-three .
On the head of each six tusks emerged.
On each tusk seven great treasure ponds emerged.
In each pond seven stems of lotus ﬂowers appeared.
Each lotus ﬂower produced seven leaves.
On each leaf seven jeweled raised platforms showed themselves.
On each raised platform seven jeweled screens arose.
In each screen there were seven heavenly maidens.
Each heavenly maiden had seven attendants.
Each of the attendants had seven girl musicians.
Every girl musician played heavenly music.
After making this transformation, in as brief a moment as it takes to ﬂex and stretch out one’s arm, came before Śakra-devendra’s palace, where he stayed.
After seeing , Śakra-devendra ascended onto original head together with his dependents.
Other assistant ministers from Trāyastriṃśa Heaven, each leading their dependents, ascended onto the heads of the remaining thirty-two .
After every being , then ﬂew up and traversed the sky, and quickly went to a pleasure garden.
“With this testimony it is also known that these are inferences, not right cognition.
From this quoted incidence it is testiﬁed and known that  the upper realms know of the lower realms but the lower realms do not know of the upper realms.
This reason, however, has not yet been settled.
It is just as if a wolf of the lower realm was aware of the woman’s mental state and took her child’s life.
173 This precisely indicates that  the lower realms can know of the upper realms.
Why do you say that the lower realms do not know of the upper realms?
On the basis of many cases it is said that the upper realms can know of the lower realms and the lower realms cannot know of the upper realms.
If you seek to know more about this, the upper and the lower realms may know each other in common.
It is impossible to quote in detail.” Again, as the Xin posha lun says:
In Rājagṛha there was a butcher called Qiezha.
174 He was King Ajātaśatru Vaidehiputra’s intimate childhood friend.
He had once addressed Crown Prince , “When you ascend the throne, which of my wishes will you grant me?” The crown prince told him, “I should grant you whatever you wish.” Later Ajātaśatru Vaidehiputra killed his own father and established himself .
Qiezha thereupon attended to the king and begged him to grant his wish.
The king said, “Ask me whatever you like!” Qiezha addressed , “I wish for you, king, to allow me to monopolize the butchering trade in Rājagṛha.” The king then said, “Why do you ask me now for this evil wish?
Aren’t you afraid of suffering in future ?” The butcher addressed the king, “For all good and evil conduct there is entirely no effect.
What are you afraid of?” The king thereupon asked him, “How do you know this?” Qiezha said to the king, “I recall that in my past six existences I always worked in the butchering trade here in Rājagṛha.
In my last existence I was reborn in Trāyastriṃśa Heaven, where I received much pleasure and happiness.
Following my death in that heaven, I was reborn here in the human realm.
I was able to have an intimate friendship with you, king, when I was a child.
Accordingly, I know that for good and evil conduct there is certainly no effect.” When the king heard this, he gave rise to doubt.
So went to speak to the Buddha.
The Buddha said to the king, “This is not a lie.
That butcher however, once gave a meal to a pratyekabuddha.
He made an evil vow, ‘Please let me always monopolize the butchering trade in Rājagṛha and later attain rebirth in heaven.’ Due to the cause of his good conduct his wish was fulﬁlled.
The fruition he was given for the previous distinctive conduct has now been exhausted, .
In seven days he will surely die and will be reborn in Raurava Hell.
He will receive the retribution of sufferings one after another for his previous conduct in the butchering trade.
Therefore, with this wisdom people may know of their seven existences at the maximum.
“Moreover, someone said, ‘With this people are able to recall matters of their ﬁve hundred existences at the maximum.
Namely, there was a bhikṣu who remembered that he had fallen in the realm of hungry ghosts in his past ﬁve hundred existences.
When he thought of the suffering of starvation he had endured, sweat ran all over his body and he was terriﬁed and distressed deep in his heart.
So he stopped all activities and vigorously puriﬁed himself.
Later, after a long period of time, he attained the srota-āpatti-phala.’ “Again, there was a bhikṣu who remembered that he had fallen into hell for his past ﬁve hundred existences.
When he thought of the suffering he had received in hell, blood poured out from the pores of his skin.
His body and clothes became terribly ﬁlthy and stank.
Every day he went to a river to bathe and wash his clothes.
The people said, ‘He clings to a river and considers to be pure.’” 175 Furthermore, the Sapoduo lun says:
Question: “What differences are there between the wisdom that arises from a vow and the wisdom of knowing former existences?” Answer:
“The wisdom of knowing former existences is about knowing the past, while the wisdom that arises from a vow is about knowing the three periods of existence. The wisdom of knowing former existences is about knowing deﬁlement , while the wisdom that arises from a vow is about equally knowing both the deﬁled and the undeﬁled.
The wisdom of knowing former existences is about knowing one’s past , while the wisdom that arises from a vow is about knowing  of both oneself and others.
The wisdom of knowing former existences is about knowing from one’s present existence to the next in order, while the wisdom that arises from a vow is about knowing  skipping over a hundred kalpas in an instant.
Regarding the reason why animals could talk in ancient times and why they cannot talk at the present time, it is thought that at the beginning of a kalpa there were ﬁrst only human and heavenly beings and the three evil realms did not yet exist; all were from the human and heavenly realms.
Since had habits close to that of their previous existences , they could talk.
Presently animals mostly come from the three evil realms.
Therefore they cannot talk.” Moreover, the Posha lun explains:
176 It is said that with self-nature wisdom of knowing the locus of one’s former existence one is able to know past former existences as well as others’ thoughts.
Even if people did not cultivate causes  at the place of their rebirth, their self-nature knows.
This wisdom spreads throughout the ﬁve realms, but there  strength .
In the four realms, the three evil realms and the heavenly realms, the operation is strong.
In the realm of human beings it is weak.
Why is this so?
It is because in the realm of human beings there are wisdoms such as the wisdom of speaking and looking at each other , the wisdom revealed through cultivating meditation , up to the methods to know others’ thoughts .
is obscured and hidden by these wisdoms.
Therefore, even though  operates to some extent, it is weak and obscure, and does not reveal.” Just as the Xin posha lun says:
If all sentient beings, when they see a precipitous and narrow place, repair and widen it, thereby allowing passers-by to have no difﬁculty , due to the power of that karma they will not have the suffering from the pressure in their mother’s womb.
177 Therefore they attain this wisdom.
There are other views.
If all sentient beings give various great, wonderful food and drink to others, due to the power of that karma they are able to attract this wisdom.
If all sentient beings do not do actions that trouble and disturb others and always do things to plentifully beneﬁt others, due to this karma they are not afﬂicted by diseases such as a cold, a fever, asthma, or a chest ailment when they are in their mother’s womb.
When they come out of the womb they have no suffering from pressure .
Therefore they can recall all the events of their former existences.
Accordingly there is this view, “If all sentient beings do not receive suffering from numerous diseases and pressure when they are in their mothers’ wombs and when they come out of the womb, they should all be able to recall the things that happened in their past existences.
They, however, forget all of this due to their mothers’ diseases and the suffering of the pressure .” Third, In the realm of hungry ghosts there is the wisdom of knowing the locus of one’s former existence and that of others and know others’ thoughts.
How is this known?
In olden times there was a woman who was bewitched by a spirit, and was emaciated and about to die.
A master of the black arts asked the spirit, “Why do you annoy this woman now?” The spirit replied, “This woman continually destroyed my life during my past ﬁve hundred existences.
During my past ﬁve hundred existences I always destroyed her life as well.
We have resentfully taken reprisal against each other and it has not yet come to an end.
If she can give up, I can do so, too.” The master of the black arts consequently reported this to the woman, “If you hold your life dear, you must give up your hatred .” The woman replied, “I have already given it up.” The spirit saw that the woman had not given up the hatred in her mind at all, that she was afraid of losing her life, and that she had lied about having already given up.
Thereupon killed her, disregarded her, and departed.
Fourth, “How is it known that there is the wisdom of knowing one’s former existences in the realm of animals?” The answer is found in the posha lun:
In ancient times there was a woman who left her child in a place and then went to another place by chance.
A wolf took her child away.
The mother saw it happen and chased them, saying, “Wolf!
Why have you taken my child away?” The wolf replied, “You are my enemy.
Formerly, during ﬁve hundred existences you continually ate my child.
Now I also wish to kill your child for ﬁve hundred existences.
This is the resentment between foes, mutual reprisal. This must be due to natural law.
Why do you bear anger?” After making this response, further said, “If you can give up killing with hatred, I will then let your child go.” The child’s mother replied, “I give up my hatred.” At that time the wolf immediately stood up and pondered.
observed the woman’s mind and then knew that she had not given up .
said, “Although you said , you still have not given it up in your mind.” After saying this, swiftly took her child’s life and left.
This is the spontaneous cognition of former existences and is good testimony that knew the woman’s mind.
other realms, from spirits to heavenly beings, also recognize their former existences and know others’ thoughts.
It is thoroughly explained in all the chapters before and after, in sutras and discourses.
I do not trouble you by repeatedly explaining this.
These two wisdoms, however, are not the seed wisdom .
Regarding the two kinds of wisdom, that of knowing others’ thoughts and that of knowing one’s former existences, they arise and are attained only according to quiet thought or meditation. is spontaneously acquired as a reward and exercised even in distracted thought.
Therefore it is known are not .
Fifth, “How can those who have the self-nature wisdom of knowing their former existence and that of others be reborn in hell?” The answer is found in the Nirvāṇa-sūtra:
178 Five hundred brahmans came into hell after being killed by the king of the Xianyu kingdom.
179 They gave rise to the three kinds of wholesome thoughts and recalled what they had originally been.
This is precisely a testimony for it.
Moreover, as a discourse explains, sentient beings in hell are also able to know the hell wardens’ thoughts.
This is also a testimony for it.
Existences Just as the Foshuo shiziyue fo bensheng jing says:
180 The Buddha stayed in the Kalandaka Bamboo Garden near Rājagṛha together with great bhikṣus, a thousand two hundred and ﬁfty bhikṣus, and a hundred bodhisattvas.
At that time among the crowd there was a bodhisattva-bhikṣu called Vasumitra.
He wandered around the bamboo garden and climbed up and down a tree.
His voice sounded like that of a rhesus monkey.
Or he did a performance, spinning three bells.
At one time various wealthy people and passers-by gathered to watch .
When the people gathered his body was suspended in the air.
He jumped to a branch of a tree and spoke in the voice of a rhesus monkey.
Vulture Peak is a bodhisattvas’ place where eightyfour thousand golden-colored rhesus monkeys gathered.
Bodhisattvas repeatedly performed various kinds of transformations, which made happy.
At that time all the people said, “These śramaṇas, Śākyamuni’s disciples, are just playing like children, confusing and deluding people.
No one gives any credence to the evil they do.
Moreover, they do unlawful things with birds and beasts.” This bad reputation spread all over Rājagṛha.
There was a brahman who reported this to Great King Bimbisāra, and when the king heard this report he detested all Śākyamuni’s disciples.
Then he issued an imperial edict to Elder Kalandaka.
He asked, “What are all of Śākyamuni’s disciples and the numerous rhesus monkeys that gather in your garden doing?
Does the Tathāgata know about this?” The elder reported to the king, “Vasumitra frequently performs transformations and makes all the rhesus monkeys happy for a moment.
All the heavenly beings rain down ﬂowers, which are used as offerings.
I have no idea what they are doing.” At that time the great king, leading in front and behind, went to visit the Buddha’s place.
From the distance he saw the Worldhonored One, whose body emitted light. looked like a purplish-gold mountain and caused all of the great assembly to be equally golden-colored.
Reverend mitra, as well as eighty-four thousand rhesus monkeys, became golden-colored too.
At that time all the monkeys saw that the great king was coming and they made various wonders.
One among them picked ﬂowers and offered them to the great king.
After seeing this, the king together with the great assembly came to the Buddha’s place.
bowed to the Buddha, circumambulated in a clockwise direction three times, withdrew, and sat to one side.
addressed the Buddha, “What merit did these all rhesus monkeys make in their former existences that their bodies are now golden-colored?
And what sin did they commit to have been reborn in the realm of animals?
What merit, moreover, did Reverend Vasumitra plant in his former existences in order to be reborn in a wealthy family and to renounce the world and study the Way?
Furthermore, what sin did he commit by not practicing the observance of the precepts, to now perform accompanied by rhesus monkeys, to possess a singing and talking voice like that of a rhesus monkey, to cause nonBuddhists to laugh at him, even though he was reborn in the human realm and fully possesses all the faculties ?
Please, Heavenly Honored One, discriminate for me and make me understand.” The Buddha said to the king, “Listen attentively!
Think of this with good intentions!
I will discern and explain it for you.
In ancient times, innumerable kalpas ago, a buddha called Dīpaṃkara appeared in the world.
After that buddha passed away, all the bhikṣus practiced the Buddhist Dharma in hills and valleys.
They observed the Buddhist precepts as ﬁrmly as a man protects his eyes.
Because of this they attained arhatship.
“At that time there was a rhesus monkey in a desert valley. came to an arhat’s place.
When he saw the arhat sitting in meditation and entering into samādhi, he grabbed the arhat’s sitting cloth and wore it like a kaṣāya.
Following the śramaṇas’ way he bared his right shoulder, lifted up a bronze censer, and circumambulated the bhikṣu.
“At that time that bhikṣu emerged from samādhi and saw that this rhesus monkey had a good, wholesome mind.
He snapped his ﬁngers and told the rhesus monkey, ‘O Dharma child!
This very moment you should awaken the aspiration for highest bodhi.’ The rhesus monkey heard this and jumped about in joy.
prostrated, respectfully worshiping the bhikṣu.
He stood up, picked ﬂowers, and scattered them over the bhikṣu.
At that time the bhikṣu explained the Three Refuges to the rhesus monkey. Then the monkey immediately rose up and said, with his paws clasped in prayer, ‘O Great Virtue!
I would like to now take refuge in the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha.’ The bhikṣu endorsed the Three Refuges for him ‘Next you must show repentance and completely confess your sinful acts.
I attained arhatship and I can remove the immeasurable serious sins of sentient beings.’ Politely, in this way, completed the  the monkey’s taking the Three and repentance, and said to it, ‘O Dharma child!
You are now clean and pure.
This is called a bodhisattva.
You are now completing your life. After receiving the ﬁve precepts, seek highest, perfect enlightenment!’ At that time, relying on the teaching, the rhesus monkey received , having already completed making a vow, and jumped about in joy.
“ then ran up a high mountain and climbed up into a tree, then fell down and died.
Because he had received the ﬁve precepts he terminated the karma of animal rebirth.
He was then reborn in Tuṣita Heaven, where he met a bodhisattva who takes up a buddha’s place in the next life.
spoke to him about the aspiration for highest bodhi.
Then held heavenly ﬂowers and sent them down to the desert valley as an offering to the arhat.
The arhat saw and immediately smiled.
He said, ‘O Heavenly King!
Reward and retribution for good and evil conduct are just like a shadow that follows a form. They are not separate from each other after all.’ He said in verse: Karma can adorn you yourself. In all places it follows your next existence. The Dharma that is retained is just like a certiﬁcate. Karma is just like a loan. You are now reborn in heaven, Because of the karma of the ﬁve precepts. Your former self fell down as a monkey, Following the existence in which you violated the precepts. The existence in which you observe the precepts is a ladder to heaven. Violation of the precepts results in being boiled in a cauldron. I see a person who observes the precepts, Whose body is adorned with light. In a wonderful tall pavilion of seven treasures, All heavenly beings serve him. His bed and curtains are made of many treasures. He has maṇi gems, ﬂowers, and a necklace of precious stones. He meets a future buddha, Who gives him pleasure by speaking the excellent Dharma. I see a person who violates the precepts. He falls into hell. His tongue is plowed by an iron plow. He must lie on an iron bed. Molten copper ﬂows on all four sides of his body. It burns and destroys his body. Or he is placed on a mountain of blades, In a forest of swords, in boiling excrement, In a river of ashes, or in the cold icy hell. He must eat iron pellets and drink molten copper. Sufferings like these are Continually put on him, just like a necklace of precious stones.
If you want to leave behind numerous difﬁculties, Not fall into the three evil realms, Wander about the path of heaven, And go beyond and attain nirvana, You must diligently observe the pure precepts, Give donations, and cultivate a pure life. “After speaking this verse the arhat remained silent.
A son of Heaven, the former rhesus monkey, addressed him, ‘O Great Virtue!
What sin did I commit to have been reborn in the realm of as a rhesus monkey in my former existence?
And what merit did I have in order to have encountered you, Great Virtue, and to be able to escape from the realm of animals and be reborn in heaven?’ “The arhat replied, ‘In ancient times, in this Jambudvīpa world a buddha appeared.
He was called Baohui Tathāgata.
181 After he entered nirvana, during the period of the semblance Dharma, there was a bhikṣu called Padmagarbha.
He often befriended sovereigns, wealthy people, and laymen.
He lived a dishonest life; he engaged in ﬂattery and perversion, and did not practice observance of the precepts.
After death he fell into Avīci Hell.
Just like when lotus ﬂowers spread over , he fully covered the eighteen divisions where he received all sufferings.
A life span is one kalpa.
After the completion of one kalpa he was again reborn .
In this way he experienced all the great hells for fully eighty-four thousand kalpas.
He came out of the hells and fell into the realm of hungry ghosts.
He went through eighty-four thousand years , swallowing molten copper.
He came out of the realm of hungry ghosts and again fell into the realm of , cows, pigs, dogs, and monkeys.
He experienced ﬁve hundred rebirths into the bodies of each of .
Due to the condition of having previously made offerings, observed the precepts, and taken the vow as a bhikṣu that are essentially important, you have now encountered me and attained rebirth in heaven.
The bhikṣu who observed the precepts is precisely myself, and the self-indulgent bhikṣu was exactly yourself.
The son of Heaven, the former rhesus monkey, heard these words and was astonished; his hair stood on end.
He repented his former sin and then returned to heaven.’” The Buddha told the great king , “As for the rhesus monkey, although he was an animal, once he encountered the arhat he received and held the Three Refuges as well as the ﬁve precepts.
The merit conditioned by his former existence surpasses the extremely serious evil karma of a thousand kalpas.
So he could be reborn in heaven and meet a bodhisattva who takes up a buddha’s place in the next life.
From this time on, he will meet a buddha inumerable times, purely cultivate moral practices, possess the six pāramitās, and abide in the stage of nonretrogression for realizing highest, perfect enlightenment.
In his very last existence he will come after Maitreya and later he will achieve highest, perfect enlightenment and a buddha called Shiziyue Tathāgata.” The Buddha said to the great king, “If you wish to know who Shiziyue Buddha of that country is, it is Vasumitra Bhikṣu, who is here in this assembly now.” When the king heard this statement he promptly stood up, and with joined palms.
There was a sweat all over his body and he wept sorrowfully, dripping tears. He repented, reproaching himself.
Facing Vasumitra, he bowed his head to the ground, took feet in his hands, and placed his head on them in worship. He repented of the sin he previously made.
The Buddha said to the great king, “If you wish to know what these eighty four thousand golden colored rhesus monkeys were, in ancient times, during the period of Krakucchanda Buddha, there were altogether eightyfour thousand bhikṣuṇīs in the two states of Vārāṇasī and Kauśāmbī.
They engaged in unlawful activities and violated various important precepts.
They were as wildly stupid and ignorant as crazy rhesus monkeys.
When they met a good bhikṣu they looked upon him as if he was a traitor.
“At that time there was an arhat bhikṣuṇī called Shan’anyin.
182 She preached the Dharma for at great length. harbored indignation .
Then the arhat bhikṣuṇī saw that all the evil did not engender wholesome minds.
Accordingly, she gave rise to benevolence.
She soared up into the air and made eighteen transformations.
On that occasion all the evil , seeing the transformations, took off their gold bracelets and scattered them over the arhat bhikṣuṇī, , ‘We pray that we will be reborn with a golden-colored living body.
We now repent of all our former evils.’ At that moment the bodies of all the evil bhikṣuṇīs broke down and they died and fell into Avīci Hell.
They passed through in sequence for ninety-two kalpas, continually reborn in hells.
Then they came out of the hells.
For the next ﬁve hundred existences they were always hungry ghosts.
They came out of hungry ghosts.
In the next thousand existences they were always rhesus monkeys .
Their bodies were golden-colored.
“O Great King!
You must know that the eighty-four thousand bhikṣuṇīs who violated the precepts and who reviled the arhat bhikṣuṇī of that time are now all the eighty-four thousand golden-colored rhesus monkeys in this assembly, and the one who made offerings to all the evil bhikṣuṇīs at that time is now you, Great King.
Because of the habits from former existences, all the rhesus monkeys hold ﬂowers and incense and offer them to you, Great King.
Those corrupted bhikṣuṇīs at that time are now Kokālika and the king’s ﬁve hundred eunuchs.” The Buddha told the great king, “You must be careful in all your bodily, verbal, and mental acts.” At that time King Bimbisāra heard what the Buddha said.
Facing the Buddha, he repented and felt ashamed of and reproached himself.
He was suddenly liberated in mind and achieved the anāgāmi-phala. The eight thousand men led by the king asked him for permission to renounce the world and They all accomplished arhatship.
All the remaining sixteen thousand people awakened the aspiration for enlightenment .
All eighty thousand heavenly beings together awakened the aspiration for enlightenment, too.
When eighty-four thousand golden-colored rhesus monkeys heard the story of their past existences they felt ashamed and reproached themselves.
They circumambulated the Buddha a thousand times and repented before the Buddha.
They all awakened the aspiration for highest enlightenment.
They follow each life span and after death they are reborn in Tuṣita Heaven, meet Maitreya, and attain the stage of nonretrogression for realizing highest, perfect enlightenment.
Furthermore, after incalculable nayutas or asaṃkhyas , as many kalpas as there are grains of sand in the Ganges River have passed, they will be able to attain buddhahood.
Eighty-four thousand will appear in the world, one after another.
Each of them will last a kalpa.
The kalpa will be called “great light” .
They will all equally be called King Fujin-guangming Tathāgata.
Furthermore, the chuchu jing says:
The Buddha said, “Gavāṃpati, who already attained the path of arhatship, chews the cud.” A disciple asked the Buddha, “Why?” The Buddha replied, “In his former existences he was a cow for seven hundred generations.
In the present world he attained the Way.
Since the habit  has not yet come to an end, he chews the cud .” is also in accordance with the zhidu lun .
Someone asks, “Why was he a cow?” I answer, “It is because in the past he passed through someone else’s grain ﬁeld, took ﬁve or six grains of millet, tasted them, and spit them out on the ground.
Since he damaged another person’s millet, he a cow.
Because he was a cow for many , he has a cow’s feet and chews the cud.” Powers Just as the Pusa chutai jing (i.e., the Pusa cong doushutian jiang shenmutai shuo guangpu jing, T. 384) says:
At that time Miaosheng Bodhisattva 183 addressed the Buddha, “O Worldhonored One!
What Dharma does a bodhisattva who possesses the ﬁve supernatural powers learn in order to attain the path of the supernatural powers?” The Buddha replied to Miaosheng, “All good men and women here in the realm of desire do not need the supernatural power of the eye.
When they are born they clearly see all the species of sentient beings, their roughness and ﬁneness, their beauty and ugliness, the inner and outer city walls, and the trees in Jambudvīpa.
Some people’s eyes can see two, three, or four worlds.
They do not need the supernatural power of the eye; when they are born, they can see.
Some people do not need the supernatural powers of the eye and the ear.
They clearly and thoroughly hear male and female voices and all the sounds in the world.
They can precisely distinguish and recognize them.
They do not study the supernatural power of the ear at all yet they understand everything.
Some people never learn the spontaneous cognition of former existences, but they can completely distinguish and recognize from what place they came to be reborn here in the human realm, and their parents, clans, and the ﬁrst and last names .
Certain people, without learning the supernatural powers, know others’ thoughts, their good or evil conduct, and their destination , the place of rebirth to which they are going. They can completely know which sentient beings related to a buddha or bodhisattva in the past and which are not.
Or certain people can go around or come and go by ﬂying.
Without studying the supernatural powers they can ﬂy.
There is nothing to offend or obstruct them.
They walk in the sky just as on land, and they walk on land just as they do in the sky.” The Buddha said, “Good men and women!
If you cultivate the sacred supernatural power of the eye, you will remove objects of vision and cut off deﬁlements.
By means of the concentration on three gates of liberation you can see a thousand worlds, two thousand worlds, and the trichiliocosm; some people can hear all the various sounds of a thousand worlds, two thousand worlds, and the trichiliocosm.
Good and evil as well as the six realms can be completely understood.
Or certain people remove the cognitive deﬁlements. Their inner and outer are free from blemish.
They attain the sacred supernatural power of thoughts and the spontaneous cognition of former existences.
They completely know their last existence, the second from last, up to innumerable kalpas ago, the places from which they came, their parents and dependents, and the purity of the lands .
“Some people cultivate the ten supernatural powers. They understand the ultimate nature of things, have a good memory, and never forget.
They are further able to know others’ thoughts.
They completely know all their existences from the last, the second from the last, up to innumerable kalpas ago, the places from which they came, their parents and dependents, the purity of the lands, their ﬁrst and last names, and the clans .
Or some people see things by means of pondering.
They manage their bodies by their minds and their minds by their bodies.
When they sleep or awaken from sleep, their thoughts are just like emptiness.
They can easily raise their bodies, travel to another world, two worlds, 184 up to the trichiliocosm, and enter into the earth just as they enter the sky.
In mountains and rivers or upon precipices there is nothing to hinder them.
Or some people are approaching the attainment of buddhahood.
By the power of wisdom they have removed sentient beings’ deﬁlements.
They are seated under a bodhi tree and do not rise from their seat.
Therefore they can attain buddhahood and with the six supernatural powers they purely penetrate into things.” At that time the World-honored One said in verse: Supernatural powers ordinary people attain are Just like those of all ﬂying birds. Some are close and some are far. They do not leave behind the path of birth and death. The Buddha’s supernatural powers are of the unhindered Dharma. They are truth and purity. When he thinks, they go to the ten directions. When they come and go they are not weary.
If you think of sentient beings with benevolence, You will attain the supernatural powers that are unhindered. A hermit’s wisdom of the ﬁve supernatural powers Regresses and is not accomplished. My supernatural powers are of the stable Dharma. They are essential to enter the gate of nirvana. At that time in the assembly there was a bodhisattva called Puguang.
185 He stepped forward and addressed the Buddha, “I have not discerned the law of consciousness of the six supernatural powers.
Is it a single or an undetermined number ?
If consciousness is single, then the Tathāgata is golden-colored, and  at the seminary of the supernatural power of travel one wanders about all buddha lands.
He has consciousness that develops into a bodily or he has a bodily that develops into consciousness. If a bodily develops into consciousness, then there are not the six supernatural powers.
If consciousness develops into a bodily , this is called a single .
If there is no body, there is no consciousness.
Please, World-honored One, respond to me regarding this meaning.” The Buddha said to Puguang Bodhisattva, “You ask a question about the ﬁrst principle .
This is a question about the meaning of the secular .
If the meaning of the secular is asked, there are some types of consciousness but there is no ﬁxed characteristic.
If the ﬁrst principle is asked, then there is neither body nor consciousness.
When we discriminate consciousness, its self-nature is empty and tranquil.
Nothing comes and nothing goes.
There is no attachment, either.
You asked about golden color. This is a thing of the phenomenal world, accomplished by the ﬁve skandhas.
It is neither a spontaneous thing nor the ﬁrst principle.
“I will now explain for you the law of consciousness and conception.
Bodhisattvas possess the six supernatural powers in both body and consciousness.
It is neither that consciousness comes ﬁrst and the body comes later, nor that the body comes ﬁrst and consciousness comes later.
Characteristics of things are spontaneous.
Consciousness does not separate from the body and the body does not separate from consciousness, either.
It is just like when two cows are yoked together.
If a black cow comes before a white cow, planting is not accomplished, or if a white cow comes before a black cow, planting is not accomplished, either.
If it is neither the former nor the latter case, then planting is accomplished.
The fruition in the path of the supernatural powers of travel is also like this.
Both body and consciousness are accompanied by each other and there is neither front, behind, nor middle .
The physical form of the Tathāgata has front, rear, and middle. This is a matter of the secular world but it is not the ﬁrst principle.
In the law of emptiness and tranquility there is no divergence.
Verses say: Good and evil are habits implanted in former existences. Receiving reward and retribution, each one goes to a different destination. One who was once a spirit kills his enemy. Or one becomes a wolf and takes revenge with a misfortune. A butcher recalls his butchery. Vasumitra has fun at the monkeys’ village. Those who removed troubles through divine help from their former existences Live and roam in paradise. Establish a clean encounter by touching virtue. See through the nonduality of things at the ﬁrst glance. Ordinary people and sages respectfully have a happy assembly. The wise and the stupid rejoice, immortalizing their names. Beings of the four modes of birth practice good deeds. Beings of the six realms are grateful for mystic light. Even though they differ from each other in their joys and sorrows, They equally know the relative length of their life spans.
Miracle Stories Yang Hu , the Grand Mentor of the Jin dynasty, whose pseudonym was Shuzi, was a man from Taishan prefecture . As a distinguished ofﬁcial of the Western Jin dynasty he had the best reputation in China.
When he was ﬁve Chinese years old, he importunately asked his wet nurse to get for him a ring he used to play with.
The wet nurse said, “You do not have such a thing originally.
From where shall I get it for you?” Hu replied, “In former days I played with it around the eastern fence and dropped it in a mulberry tree.” The nurse said, “You should look for it by yourself.” Hu replied, “This is not my former house.
So, I have no idea about that place.” Another day, Hu took a trip and went straight toward the east.
The nurse followed him.
When they arrived at Li’s house, entered and went to the eastern fence, where he searched in a tree and found a small ring.
The Li family was surprised and said, resentfully, “My son had this ring in the past and he often loved to play with it.
When he was seven Chinese years old he died suddenly.
After his death the ring was missing.
This belongs to my deceased son.
Why do you want to take it with you?” Hu grasped the ring and ran away.
Li chased after him and asked why .
The nurse explained what Hu had told her.
Li had a mingled feeling of joy and sorrow, and consequently wanted Hu back to be his son. The neighbors dissuaded .
Later they could stop him from doing so.
Hu grew to adulthood but always suffered from headaches.
A doctor intended to treat him.
Hu said, “On the third day after I was born, I lay with my head pointing to the north door and I felt the wind blow upon the crown of my head. I was very worried about it.I could not yet talk then, however.
Since the cause of my disease happened a long time ago, it cannot be cured.” Later, Hu became the Commander-in-Chief of Jingzhou and was garrisoned at Xiangyang .
He made donations to Wudang Temple more than to other monasteries.
Someone asked the reason for this but Hu remained silent.
After a time, on the occasion of repentance he narrated the causality from his previous existence.
Then he said, “In my previous existence I committed various sins.
Through building this temple I ﬁnally could be relieved from the sins.
Therefore, I make my mind of offering much more courteous and serious.” Wang Lian of the Jin dynasty, whose pseudonym was Xuanming, was a man from Langye .
He was a palace attendant in the Song dynasty.
His father Min , whose pseudonym was Jiyan, was the Secretariat Director of the Jin dynasty.
Among his acquaintances there was an Indian monk.
186 Every time looked at Min’s appearance he was respectfully delighted with it.
He always said to his fellow monks, “If I can be the son of this person in my next existence, my present vow will be fulﬁlled.” Min heard this and said joking, “O Dharma Master!
You have just good enough talent and conduct to be able to become my son!” Soon thereafter the śramaṇa died from an illness.
More than a year after his death, Lian was born.
From the time was born he was able to speak; he also understood foreign languages.
Regarding rare and precious things such as silver instruments, pearls, and jewels from remote countries, Lian had not seen these nor heard their names since the time of his birth, but he immediately mentioned their names and recognized where they had been produced.
Furthermore, he spontaneously made friends with various Indian people, more than with Chinese people.
All the people thought that the śramaṇa was indeed former self.
Therefore, Min gave him the pseudonym Alian.
187 It is said that later became famous.
Xiang Jing of the Jin dynasty, whose pseudonym was Fengren, was a man from Henei .
When he was residing in Wuxing prefecture he lost his young daughter.
In the early days, after the daughter fell ill, she used to play with a small knife.
Her mother tried to take it away from her but the child would not give it to her mother and wounded her mother’s hand.
One year after the child’s death, her mother gave birth to another daughter.
When this daughter was four Chinese years old, she asked her mother, “Where is my knife from former times?” The mother replied, “It is nowhere.” The daughter said, “In former days we fought for it and I wounded you on the hand because of it.
Why do you say it is nowhere?” The mother was quite amazed and puzzled. So she gave a detailed account of this to Jing.
Jing said, “The knife of that time still exists, doesn’t it?” The mother replied, “Since it is painful to remember our deceased daughter, I do not often take in my hand.” Jing told her, “You should look for several more knives, put them together with the knife concerned in the same place, and let our daughter choose one.” The daughter saw the knife with great joy.
She immediately took the one formerly used and said, “This is what I expected!” Her parents and family members then realized that the deceased daughter was the former incarnation of this daughter.
During the Song dynasty there was Shi Tandi on Mount Kunlun.
His secular family name was Kang and his ancestors were people from Kangju .
They migrated to China during the reign of Emperor Ling of the Han dynasty.
During the revolt of the end of Emperor Xian’s reign they relocated to Wuxing .
Tandi’s father Rong once served as the Mounted Escort of Jizhou.
His mother, née Huang, took a nap and had a dream that a Buddhist monk called her “Mother” and entrusted a whisk and two engraved iron paperweights to her.
She woke up and found both of the objects were there.
In virtue of this she became pregnant and gave birth to di.
When di was ﬁve Chinese years old, his mother showed him the objects, such as the whisk.
di said, “Those are what the king of Qin presented to me as a gift.” His mother asked him, “Where did you put them?” He answered, “I do not remember.” When became ten Chinese years old he renounced the world.
He studied without following a teacher and attained realization spontaneously.
Later he went to Fandeng following his father, where he came across the Buddhist monk Lüe, from Guanzhong .
suddenly called Lüe’s name.
Lüe asked him, “Boy, why did you call the name of an elder monk?” di replied, “The reason I suddenly spoke to you earlier is that you, upādhyāya, used to be my novice.
Once when you were harvesting vegetables for the monks, you were hurt by a wild boar.
Unconsciously I cried out.” Lüe had been Dharma Master Hongjue’s disciple.
He gathered vegetables for other monks and had been injured by a wild boar.
Lüe did not remember this in the beginning.
So he visited di’s father, who completely retold the whole story and showed him the objects, such as the paperweights and the whisk.
Lüe then realized and said, in tears, “My former teacher is Dharma Master Hongjue.
My teacher discoursed on the Lotus Sutra for Yao Chang , when I was in charge of questioning him.
Yao Chang gave my teacher these two kinds of objects.
Consequently, here they are now!
Counting back to the date when Hongjue passed away, today is precisely the day when these things were given .” Moreover, recollected the matter of gathering vegetables.
He had deeper admiration with sadness.
di, later, studied and read scriptures and found the record of this event.
Afterward he entered Huqiu Temple in Wu, where he discoursed on the Book of Rites , the Book of Changes , and the Spring and Autumn Annals , seven times each of them, and the Lotus Sutra, the Mahā prajñā pāramitā-sūtra, and the Vimalakīrtinirdeśa-sūtra, ﬁfteen times each.
Furthermore, he was good at collecting literary writings. There are six fascicles in the collection that have also been circulated in the world.
His nature was of love for the forests and springs .
Later he returned to Wuxing and entered Mount Kunlun in Guzhang, where he led a quiet life, drinking water from a mountain stream, for more than twenty years.
He passed away at his mountain residence at the end of the Yuanjia era of the Song dynasty, at the age of over sixty Chinese years old.
During the Yuan-Wei dynasty , there was the meditation master Sheng in Beidai.
He always held fast to the Lotus Sutra. He was devoted and industrious, and not negligent.
After he died, in the intermediate state between death and the next life , he was consigned to the Xue family of Hedong  and born as the ﬁfth son. Soon after he was born, he was able to speak; he related the good and bad deeds he had done in his past life.
He was not willing to stay in the secular world.
His father was appointed Regional Inspector of Dizhou  in the north.
The ﬁfth son followed appointment, went to Zhongshan, and arrived at Qidi Temple.
He looked for and found his disciple when he had originally been in his previous existence.
said to , “You remember that following me you crossed over a river and went to Mount Lang, don’t you?
Meditation Master Sheng is precisely myself.
The table before the altar in our room should be promptly removed.” disciple, hearing this testimony embraced teacher. was extremely grieved and mourned.
All the people, both clergy and laymen, felt that it was a wonder and was a great sign.
parents had love and fondness for him, and they were afraid he would renounce the world. So they kept him in their room.
After that he forgot about the matters of his previous existence, but he often gave rise to a feeling of revulsion for and the desire to leave .
He was always delighted with leading a tranquil life.
, came to town on an inpection round.
Astonished and pleasantly surprised, he told his attendants, “Formerly I was once someone’s wife in this town.
Now I know where the house was located.” On horseback he entered an alley, followed its winding path, and came to a house.
He had knock on the door.
The householder, an old man, ran out and paid his respects to .
Yanwu entered the house.
He ﬁrst went to the hall and looked at the upper part of the east wall.
There was a raised part six or seven chi from the ﬂoor. The guest said to the householder, “I formerly concealed in this wall Lotus Sutra I used to read, as well as ﬁve golden hair clasps.
The raised portion is the spot . The last part of the paper of the seventh fascicle has been burned and some of the text is missing.
Even now, every time I recite this sutra, when I come to the last part of the seventh fascicle I always forget ; I cannot recall it.” Accordingly, ordered his attendants to bore a hole in the wall.
As expected, they found the sutra case and opened it. The last part of the seventh fascicle that was burned and the golden hair clasps were all just as had described.
The householder said, weeping, “When my late wife was alive she often recited this sutra.
The hair clasps were also hers.” Yanwu pointed to a locust tree in the courtyard “When I was about to give birth, I cut off my hair by myself and placed it in a hole in this tree.” He ordered someone to search for it in the tree as a test. Sure enough, the hair was found.
So, the householder had joy and sorrow.
Yanwu left some clothes and other items as gifts of courtesy to the householder, and departed.
Minister Cui Dunli told me .
Later in the past when I met Lu Wenli, he also told me almost the same , but he said that  the Regional Inspector of Qizhou and his full name was unknown.
Since was not as detailed as Cui’s, I have relied on Cui’s record . there was Shi Daochuo .
His secular family name was Wei, and he was a man from Wenshui in Bingzhou.
He was clean and modest in his daily conduct. His intelligence and realization spontaneously were revealed.
The successor of the past master luan, devoted himself to respectfully learning the practices .
On the eighth day of the fourth month of the second year of the Zhenguan era, chuo knew that his life was coming to an end.
He notiﬁed of his situation.
Those who heard about this and went to see him ﬁlled the mountain temple.
All the people saw Master luan on a seventreasure boat and said to chuo, “Your hall in the Pure Land has been completed but the rest of your reward and retribution have not been exhausted.” In addition, they saw that transformed buddhas abode in the air and heavenly ﬂowers scattered down.
Men and women received them in the skirts and collars of their robes.
were delicate, smooth, and lovely.
Furthermore, lotus ﬂowers were placed in dry ground and they did not wither even after seven days later.
Moreover, there were many other good signs that cannot all be recorded here.
When was seventy Chinese years old, suddenly a new set of his permanent teeth grew in. were just like his former teeth ; there was absolutely no difference.
The power of his reward and retribution was reinforced.
If his actions and receptivity had not been well comprehended , how could he have met these good responses?
of the Tang dynasty, was lovingly raised by his widowed mother when he was a child.
His mother always learned and read Buddhist texts throughout her life, and she was diligent in ascetic practice.
She died in the twenty-ﬁrst year of the Zhenguan era .
Shanjing was more consumed by grief than was customary.
His tearful cries did not stop.
The next year, while in a trance Shanjing saw his mother, who said, “I am able to receive a male body for the merit I earned by cultivation when I was alive.
Now I will be reborn in the Song family of Shizhao village, south of this county.
If you wish to meet me, you can immediately go there.” She disappeared after saying this.
Shanjing went to the place she had mentioned and quickly arrived there without a moment’s delay.
On that day a boy was born to the Song family.
Shanjing accordingly presented clothes and other things. He related the history in detail and entrusted with the boy he now saw before him.
Shanjing always served him with the courtesy he had shown to his mother.
Shanfu, a śramaṇa of Xizhou , and Shanjing had been acquainted with each other for a long time.
examined what Shanjing and the villagers said and had them relate to me.
There is the monk Xuangao at Zhili Monastery in Fuyang county in Xiangzhou , whose secular family name is Zhao.
His elder brother’s son was a son of the Ma family of the same village as his former existence.
The son of the Ma family died at the end of the Zhenguan era .
In his last moments the son looked at his mother and said, “I have a relationship from my former existence with the head family of Zhao.
After death I will become a grandchild of the head family.
The head is in the same village as .” The mother did not believe this she marked her son’s left side with a black spot a large mole.
A wife of the Zhao family also had a dream in which this boy came to her and said, “I will be your son.” In virtue of this she became pregnant.
What she saw in her dream was like a child of the Ma family.
After childbirth the mole on the boy’s body was veriﬁed, still in the same spot as on his former body.
When the boy became three Chinese years old, with no one leading him he went to the Ma family’s house by himself and said, “This is my former house.” This boy still lives and has already reached the age of fourteen or ﬁfteen Chinese years old.
Monks of Zhili Monastery in Xiangzhou, such as Huiyong and Fazhen, spoke of this.
Greatest Sincerity Introduction, Seeking Treasures, Seeking the Precepts, Seeking Forbearance, Seeking Diligence, Seeking Concentration, Seeking Fruition, and , Relief from Difﬁculties. On the occasion of being touched by greatest sincerity there is no deity who does not respond to it.
Mahāsattvas feel some inclination toward , but without potential to receive the teaching they do not proceed. encourage themselves and devote themselves to eternally.
Consequently, in all of the great vows there is none that does not comply with patience and knowledge .
Their minds are extensive and they all abide in the stage of nonretrogression for realizing highest, perfect enlightenment .
Except for cultivating their minds through meditation, they value immutable integrity, make vows that are more ﬁrm than metal and stone, protect and maintain the profound mind for relief until death, propagate the Way in order to repay the four kinds of favors, and nourish their virtue in order to help beings of the three realms of existence.
This is merit spreads over incalculable time. The fruition goes throughout the ten stages .
The Dazhi jing says:
In ancient times in a country called Happiness , 188 there was a layman called Mahājanaka and his wife’s name was Sandaka.
She gave birth to a boy who had ﬁne features that were rarely seen in this world.
he stood on the ground and spoke.
He made a vow, “I will surely donate and give alms to the poor and beneﬁt them.” His parents accordingly called him Daiyi .
189 When he turned seventeen years old, he resolved for the sake of sentient beings to enter the sea and collect maṇi-ratnas  in order to aid them.
After he entered the sea for the ﬁrst time he came to Silver City.
A dragon king gave him a maṇi-ratna, “Twenty li farther on there is a treasure gem.” advanced and then came to Gold City.
A dragon king gave him a maṇi-ratna “There is a treasure gem in forty li.” Again, went on and arrived at Shuijing City.
190 A dragon king gave him a maṇi-ratna “ this gem for sixty li where there is a treasure gem.” again went on and came to Vaiḍūrya City.
A dragon king gave him a maṇi-ratna “ this gem for eighty li where there is a treasure gem.
Later, when you attain the Way, I wish to be your disciple.
I will make more offerings to you than I have today with a pure mind.
Please cause me to advance and attain wisdom.” Daiyi received the gem and left.
intending to return to his home country, traveled through the sea.
All the kings of the sea gods accordingly discussed among themselves and said, “Even though there are numerous precious valuable treasures in our sea, there are no gems like these.” So they ordered a sea god to wrest at a key place.
The god transformed into a man and met Daiyi.
He said, “I have heard that you have obtained unusual things.
Could I borrow and look at them?” Daiyi opened his hand and showed him the four gems.
The sea god then shook hand and caused the gems to fall into water. Daiyi thought to himself, “When the to me, they said that it is difﬁcult to keep them, yet fortunately I obtained them.
Now they have been snatched away by this boy.
This is not a joke!” immediately said to the sea god, “I worked by myself diligently, defying hardships, passed through dangerous places, in order to obtain these gems.
You snatched them away from me. Now they will not return to me.
So I must completely remove the seawater.” The sea god understood and asked, “Your resolution is wonderful and lofty.
The depth of the sea is three million three hundred sixty thousand yojanas. Its width is boundless.
What can you do to exhaust ?
This would be like the sun not setting at all or like trying to grasp and restrain a strong wind.
Even if the sun would set or the wind could be grasped, it is impossible to remove all the water in the great sea and to cause it to be exhausted.” Daiyi answered with a smile, “I remember the sequence of receiving a body, birth and death, the decay , the bones that accumulate higher than Mount Sumeru, and the blood that runs through the ﬁve rivers.
I still intend to cut off the root of transmigration of birth and death.
This small sea is merely not worthy for me to drain.
Formerly I made offerings to all buddhas, took a vow, and said, ‘ cause my resolution and conduct to be brave and that there will be no difﬁculties in judging what is upheld in the Way.’ I will surely be able to move Mount Sumeru and exhaust all the water in the great sea.
I will not withdraw my intention until the end.” Then he attentively began removing the seawater with a utensil.
his pure and sincere intention, the four heavenly kings came and helped Daiyi.
They removed two-thirds .
Thereupon, all gods in the sea became greatly alarmed.
They discussed together and said, “If we do not return the gems to Daiyi now, this will not be a minor matter.
If the seawater is exhausted and even the mud  is taken out, our mansions will be destroyed.” So the sea gods took out numerous treasures to give to Daiyi, but Daiyi would not accept them.
“I want only to get back the gems .” held back in the end; they knew intention was ﬁrm. So they took out gems and returned them to him.
Daiyi took the gems and returned to his home country.
He made a great donation as was his wish.
From that time on, in his area no one ever suffered from starvation or cold.
The Buddha said to all the bhikṣus, “I am the one who formerly was Daiyi.” Ānanda addressed the Buddha, “Due to what merit was presented these four gems and the numerous treasures that followed them?” The Buddha replied, “Formerly, at the time of Vipaśyin Buddha, Daiyi erected a stupa with four treasures for that buddha, made offerings to the Three Revered Ones, and fasted after noon for puriﬁcation for seven days.
At that time ﬁve hundred people built a temple together at the same time; some installed silk canopies and lit lamps; some burned incense and scattered ﬂowers; some made offerings to the sangha; and some recited sutras and explained and discussed them.
Today everyone is able to meet the Buddha and they all attain liberation.” Therefore, the sengqi lü
At that time a sea god thought in this way, “Even if he draws out this seawater for a hundred years, he will ultimately not be able to decrease it even as little as a hair’s breadth.” was moved by devotion and diligence and immediately returned the treasure to him.
At that moment the sea god uttered these verses for the brahman:
With the power of devotion, diligence, and expedient means, His resolution does not abate. Because I was moved by his devotion and diligence, Although he had lost , he got it back. Just as the Za piyu jing says.
191 In earlier times there was a man called Sārthavāha.
He heard that there were extraordinary treasures in a foreign country and wanted to go and make a living there.
There were, however, troubles with rākṣasa demons between the two countries . So it was impossible to travel there.
As Sārthavāha roamed, he saw at the west gate of a marketplace a Buddhist seated on a couch without a mat.
said, “I am selling the ﬁve precepts.” Sārthavāha asked, “What are the ﬁve precepts?” replied, “They are formless.
They are received by your mind directly from my voice. If you observe them, later you will be able to be reborn in heaven.
In this existence you can drive away the troubles caused by rākṣasa demons.” Sārthavāha wished to buy and asked how much he was asking for them.
answered, “A thousand gold coins.” soon completed receiving .
said, “When you head toward a foreign country and come to the national border, if a rākṣasa demon comes to you just say, ‘I am a disciple of Śākyamuni’s ﬁve precepts.’” Sārthavāha shortly arrived at the border between two countries.
He saw rākṣasa demons who were one zhang and three chi tall.
Their heads were as yellow as straw and their eyes as red as a scorpion’s tail. Their entire bodies were covered by hard scales.
They, one after another, opened and closed their mouths just like the gills on a ﬁsh-shaped woodblock.
When they looked up, their height was close to that of a ﬂying swallow. When they trod on the earth, they sank down up to their knees.
Hot blood spilled from their mouths.
There was a crowd of several thousands there. directly took hold of .
Sārthavāha said, “I am a disciple of Śākyamuni’s ﬁve precepts.” The rākṣasa heard this yet he was not willing to release him for a long time.
Sārthavāha struck lightly with the both ﬁsts.
He was drawn into its hard scales and could not escape.
He was able to step on it with his feet and butted it with his head, but he still could not escape.
His entire body was subsumed in the hard scales.
He could move only his back.
The rākṣasa said in verse:
Your entire body, hands, and feet are Completely restrained. You should just die. What are you jumping about for? Sārthavāha’s willpower remained ﬁrm.
He said to the rākṣasa in verse:
My body, hands, and feet are Temporarily bound. I, however, regulate my mind to be as ﬁrm as metal and stone. I will not in the end be killed by you. The rākṣasa again said to Sārthavāha:
I am a king among demons With stronger physical powers than human beings. Up to now I have eaten like you. I cannot recall the number . You should just die. What are your words of self-consolation for?
Sārthavāha was about to curse in rage but thought to himself, “I, myself, have been transmigrating in the three realms of existence. I have not given to other people.
By sacriﬁcing I will cause this rākṣasa immediately to eat to the full.” Then he said in verse:
I have intended for long To be separated from this foul-smelling body. If a rākṣasa captures me, Take all of me as my donation. I aspire and seek the Great Vehicle . I will achieve the fruit of all-knowing wisdom. The rākṣasa was sharp and understood what Sārthavāha said.
then gave rise to a feeling of shame and let Sārthavāha go.
He knelt upright with palms joined, faced , and made his apologies.
You are a master to liberate the people. You are very rare in the three realms of existence. You aspire and seek the Great Vehicle. You will attain buddhahood certainly within a short time. Therefore I will take refuge in you. I will bow my head to your feet and worship you. The rākṣasa ﬁnished his repentance and sent off Sārthavāha.
arrived in the foreign country where he obtained many pieces of jewelry and valuables.
He was again sent off and returned home.
He greatly cultivated himself, earned merit, and consequently attained the truth of the Way.
Therefore, it is known that the power of precepts is miraculous.
Those who diligently conduct all practices should ﬁrmly observe the Buddhist precepts and also, just like this man they should set their resolution and be brave and ﬁerce.
Just as the zhidu lun says:
There was a poisonous dragon of great strength.
A weak person would immediately die simply from the glance of , and a strong person will die simply from exhalation.
At one time the dragon received the precepts for a day.
It renounced the world and entered a wood.
It sat pondering for a long time. Then it became tired and negligent and fell asleep.
In the manner of dragons, when they sleep their form is just like that of a snake. was made of seven treasures and multicolored.
A hunter saw it, and said in pleasant surprise, “Wouldn’t this very rare and scarce pelt be good to present to a king for the decoration of a ship?” Then held down head with a stick and began ﬂaying it with a knife.
The dragon thought to itself, “With my physical strength I could cause the land of a nation to collapse.
How can this petty man trouble me?
Since I now observe the precepts, however, I do not look to myself. I must follow the Buddha’s words.” therefore bore .
It closed its eyes and did not look at .
It stopped its breath without panting and felt compassion for the man. Because observed the precepts, while it was being ﬂayed it never gave rise to the remorse .
It soon lost all its skin and the bare ﬂesh was on the ground.
At that time the sun grew hotter.
meandered across the ground, intending to go to a large pond. It saw various small insects come and eat its body.
Because of its observance of the precepts, it dared not move any further.
Pondering to iself, it said, “I now give my body to various insects because it is for the Buddhist Way.
I now give my ﬂesh in order to nourish their bodies.
Later, I will expound the Dharma in order to beneﬁt their minds.” The dragon’s body was consumed and it died.
It was then reborn in Trāyastriṃśa Heaven.
Even animals can ﬁrmly observe the Buddhist precepts.
did not violate them right up until its death.
how much more so should we human beings be?
How could those who intentionally violate be forgiven?
The wufen lü
The Buddha said, “In ancient times there was a black snake that bit a calf and then returned to its burrow.
A master of the black arts incanted using a black sheep; through the incantation he tried to get to come out of the burrow, but he could not do so.
The master of the black arts then built a ﬁre in front of the calf and incanted to it.
transformed into a ﬁre bee.
entered the snake’s burrow and bit and burned the snake.
The snake felt unbearable pain and later came out of its lair.
The black sheep then seized with its horns and placed it in front of the master of the black arts.
The master of the black arts said, ‘You, ! Lick and take the venom back into yourself or I will throw you into this ﬁre!’ The black snake then said in verse:
Since I have already spit out the venom, I cannot take it back after all. Even if I come across a fatal event and die, I cannot get back.
“Thereupon, did not take the venom back and threw itself into the ﬁre.” The Buddha said, “The black snake of that time is now Śāriputra.
Formerly he experienced the agony of death in this way, and yet he did not take the venom back, much less will he take the discarded medicine now.” Just as the Zabao zang jing says:
The Buddha said, “In times past there was a great prairie between the two countries of Kāśi and Videha, where there lived a demon called Śleṣaloma.
damaged a road so that no one could pass through there.
A chief merchant called Siṃha intended to pass through this road, leading ﬁve hundred merchants.
They all feared and were afraid that they would not be able to pass through. The chief merchant said, ‘Be careful, but do not be afraid of it!
Just follow me!’ “So they advanced and arrived at the demon’s place.
said to the demon, ‘Have you not heard my name?’ replied, ‘Yes, I have heard your name.
That is why I am here and wish to ﬁght against you.’ asked, ‘What can you do?’ He then took up a bow and arrow and shot the demon.
All ﬁve hundred arrows he shot pierced the demon’s belly.
His bow, swords, and weapons entered the demon’s belly, too. then advanced and directly struck with his ﬁst, but his ﬁst also entered .
When he went to push with his right hand, his right hand became stuck to .
When he trod on with his right foot, his right foot also got stuck to .
When he stepped on with his left foot, his left food was stuck to , too.
Successively he butted with his head, and his head became stuck to as well.
The demon said in verse:
You tried with your hands, feet, and head, All these things were, however, just became stuck to me. What else is not stuck to me? The chief merchant replied in verse:
I have tried with my hands, feet, head, All money, swords, and weapons. Although all these things were subsumed by you, Only my diligence remains and it is not stuck to you. If I persevere in being diligent, The ﬁght against you will continue to the end. Now I persevere in being diligent. I do not rouse awe in you to the end.
“At that time the demon responded and said, ‘Now, because of you, I will let all the ﬁve hundred merchants pass.’” Just as the Xin posha lun says:
The king of devils, ﬁnally found the Bodhisattva sitting under the bodhi tree. Sitting to attention in an upright posture, immovable, made a vow to attain enlightenment.
quickly went out of his palace and came to the Bodhisattva’s place. He said to the Bodhisattva, “You, son of the kṣatriya class! You should rise from your seat.
Now is the time of corruption and evil, when sentient beings are tough and strong.
You deﬁnitely cannot testify to highest enlightenment.
For the time being you should at present receive the throne of a wheel-turning noble king .
I will offer the seven treasures to you.” The Bodhisattva said, “What you have said is like what is promised to induce a child.
You can cause the sun, the moon, and Mercury to fall , and the mountains, groves, and the great earth to ascend into the sky.
If you wish to cause me to not attain the great realization now and arise from this seat, you deﬁnitely have no power of distinguishing right .” Later devils led his military forces of thirty-six koṭi of devils .
192 All appeared in various horrible forms.
They had arms of inﬁnitely varied shapes and types, and they covered an area over thirty-six yojanas in size.
Then they all rushed to the bodhi tree and tried to disturb the Bodhisattva, but they could not do so.
In his body and mind the Bodhisattva was even more immovable than Mount Sumeru.
193 Just as the Zabao zang jing says:
The Buddhist Dharma is extensive; it saves and liberates limitlessly.
Those who seek the Way with sincerity will invariably attain fruition. Consequently they will be allowed to laugh and enjoy themselves in fun.
Happiness is not vainly given up.
It is just like a case in the past of an elderly bhikṣu.
He was senile; his spirit was confused and clogged.
He saw that all the young bhikṣus preached the Dharma in various ways.
When he heard them explained the four fruits , he gave rise to praise and respect for them in his mind.
He said to the young bhikṣus, “You are intelligent!
I wish you will give me the four fruits.” All the young bhikṣus said with a scornful laugh, “We have the four fruits.
We need to obtain good food.
Then we will give them to you.” At that time the elderly bhikṣu heard this and was greatly delighted.
He immediately arranged for various kinds of dishes and food, invited the young bhikṣus, and begged them to give him the four fruits.
The young bhikṣus ﬁnished eating the food.
They all commanded the elderly bhikṣu, mocking him, saying “O great virtuous one!
You, be seated at a corner of this building.
We will surely give you the fruit.” When the elderly bhikṣu heard this he felt great delight.
He sat as they had said.
All the young bhikṣus then hit him on the head with a leather ball and said to him, “This is the srota-āpatti-phala.” The elderly bhikṣu, on hearing this, focused his attention without becoming distracted.
He then attained the ﬁrst fruit of the four types of sainthood.
All the young bhikṣus again said, mocking him, “Even though we gave you the srota-āpatti-phala, you still have seven more births and deaths.
Move further to another corner!
Next we will surely give you the sakṛdāgāmi-phala.” At that time, because the elderly bhikṣu had already attained the ﬁrst fruit, his mind was developed and improved.
He immediately moved and sat down.
All the young bhikṣus again hit him on the head with a leather ball, saying, “We give you the second fruit.” At that time the elderly bhikṣu focused his attention more and more.
He accordingly testiﬁed to his attainment of the second fruit.
All the young bhikṣus again said, mocking him, “You have already attained the sakṛdāgāmi-phala but you still have the difﬁculty of the transmigration of birth and death.
You, move again and sit down!
We will surely give you the anāgāmi-phala.” Then, the elderly bhikṣu, just as he had been told, moved and sat down again All the young bhikṣus again hit him with a leather ball, saying, “We now give you the third fruit.” The elderly bhikṣu heard this and was greatly delighted.
He doubled his sincerity and promptly testiﬁed to his attainment of the anāgāmi-phala.
“You will, however, still receive the impure body in the realm of form and the formless realm .
Everything is impermanent, it changes and is gone. Every thought-moment is suffering.
You, again move and sit down! Next we will give you the fruit of arhatship.” The elderly bhikṣu then moved and sat down, just as he had been told.
All the young bhikṣus again hit him on the head with a leather ball, saying, “We now give you the last one, the fourth fruit.” At that moment the elderly bhikṣu pondered with his whole heart and testiﬁed to his attainment of the fruit of arhatship.
After attaining the four fruits the elderly bhikṣu was extremely happy.
He arranged various dishes and foods and much incense and ﬂowers, invited the young bhikṣus, and rewarded them for their kindness.
discussed with the young bhikṣus practices for attaining nirvana and the highest pure merit.
When all the young bhikṣus’ comments grew stagnant and their speech was blocked, the elderly bhikṣu simply said to them, “I have already testiﬁed to my attainment of the fruit of arhatship.” When all the young bhikṣus heard his words, they repented and apologized to him for their sin of having made fun of him.
Therefore, those who are engaged in religious practice must think of wholesomeness.
Even an who has been teased still attained a real reward, not to speak of someone who has sincerity.
Again, the Zabao zang jing says:
If a person seeks the Way, a pivot lies in diligence and sincerity, which move with each other, and he will be able to attain fruition of the Buddhist Way .
It is just like the past of a woman who was bright and intelligent and deeply believed in the Three Treasures.
She always invited a bhikṣu according to the sangha’s seating order, 194 and went to her house and received her offering.
One time an elderly bhikṣu came to her house.
He was old and dull-witted; he originally had no knowledge for realization.
At that time, the meal in the Buddhist service had already ended and the woman asked the elderly bhikṣu to preach the Dharma for her.
She spread out a mat for herself, closed her eyes, and was silent.
The elderly bhikṣu, aware that he himself was an imbecile and did not know how to preach the Dharma, watched to see that she closed her eyes.
195 Then he deserted her and ran back to the monastery.
The woman, however, ponder with sincerity on the truth that things in the phenomenal world are impermanent, full of suffering, and empty, and therefore nothing exists by itself.
She observed these things deeply in her mind and then attained the ﬁrst fruit of the four stages of sainthood.
After she had already attained the fruit, she sought out the elderly bhikṣu in order to repay his kindness.
This elderly bhikṣu knew that he himself was ignorant, had deserted her, and had run away.
His feeling of shame doubled. He again abandoned her and hid from her.
The woman, however, continued to seek for him earnestly.
Just then appeared.
The woman then told him in detail that she had received and had attained fruition of the Buddhist Way.
Consequently, she gave him a present and made an offering to him in order to repay his great kindness.
At that time, feeling extremely ashamed of himself, the elderly bhikṣu deeply reproached himself. He then attained the ﬁrst fruit of the four stages of sainthood.
Therefore, those who are engaged in religious practice must have sincerity.
If you have sincerity, you will certainly attain what you seek.
Difficulties Just as the Sengqie luocha jing says:
196 Formerly the Bodhisattva was in the form of a parrot that always perched on a tree.
The wind blew the tree, which brushed against other trees and caught ﬁre.
The ﬁre gradually became stronger and consequently burned up the entire mountain.
The parrot pondered, “Just as a ﬂying bird that perches on a tree must repeatedly give rise to gratitude for the tree, so too must I myself, who perched on it for a long night .
Can I extinguish the ﬁre?” He then went to the great sea and drew up some seawater with both his wings. He ﬂew above the ﬁre and sprinkled the water over it, and let spill from his beak. He rushed about, from east and west.
At that time there was a good deity who was moved by working so diligently despite hardship.
then immediately extinguished the ﬁre for .
In addition, the zhidu lun says:
In the past a brush ﬁre burned a grove.
In the grove there was a pheasant that industriously exerted itself to jump into a pond and then sprinkle the grove with water.
went back and forth and became exhausted, yet did not consider it as suffering.
At that time Śakra-devendra came and asked, “What are you doing?” replied, “I am trying to rescue this grove because I feel pity for sentient beings.
This grove is a place to shelter and to nourish them. They dwell here for a long time and it is a nice, cool, and joyful place.
All the species of birds like me and all the members of the same ancestry as mine, everyone entirely relies upon .
I have physical strength.
Why would I stand around and not try to rescue it?” Śakra-devendra asked, “For how long are you going to be so dedicated and industrious like this?” The pheasant replied, “I consider my death to be the limit.” Śakra-devendra asked, “Who can testify to this for you?” immediately took an oath by himself:
“I have the greatest sincerity in my mind.
If is true and not false, I pray that the ﬁre will promptly extinguish itself.” At that moment the deity of Śuddhāvāsa Heaven knew of the pheasant’s great oath and immediately extinguished the ﬁre for .
From that time on the grove is always exuberant and never burns in a ﬁre. (Therefore, a sutra says that when a person makes a good oath, the deities certainly listen to it. This saying is testiﬁed.) Verses say: With determination and sincerity I embrace purity. My life closes in, just as the sun sets in the west. I sigh over the swiftness of a raging river. How sad is the limitation of life! Here all my years have been harvested. I am afraid to become emaciated at the close of my life. With pure sincerity, I seek the practices of giving , observing the precepts , Forbearance , diligence , meditation , and the eyes of wisdom . Making a friend and gathering together are both far from me. At a wonderful spot, however, minds accord with each other. The merchant did not fear death. The rākṣasa could not yet transgress. Seeking treasure, a person drained the great sea. The gods, afraid, offered maṇi-ratna to him.
I will send a message to those who seek the Way. Make a resolution! Reward or retribution is not unreal. Miracle Stories (When we clarify things, in ancient and modern times, whether one is Buddhist clergy or a layperson, one should have nothing but the greatest sincerity. When people restrain themselves, they will certainly perceive a sign. Here I simply enumerate three cases from non-Buddhist sources and eleven cases from Buddhist sources; I brieﬂy explain altogether fourteen stories of nonBuddhists and Buddhists.)  Emperor Ming of the Jin dynasty condemned the strongman Han Xuan to death.
Xuan told the person who held the sword , “I have many thick muscles in my neck.
If you try to cut through it, will immediately break.
I will repay you .” The executioner did not exercise caution and consequently he brought his sword down on ; he had to make several blows before was severed.
Shortly after, he saw Xuan, wearing a deep red-colored cap and vermilion garments. With a red bow and a scarlet arrow shot .
The executioner cried, “Han Xuan paid me back belatedly!” Soon after he died.
Xiong Qu of Chu state was traveling at night when he saw a rock, which he thought was a tiger lying on the ground.
He drew his bow to the full and shot at it.
The arrow pierced so deeply that the arrowhead disappeared and the feathers on the shaft ﬂew off.
Only when he dismounted from a horse and looked did he realize that  was a rock. Then he shot it again, but the arrow broke and there was no trace that the arrow had hit the rock.
At the time of the Han dynasty, when Li Guang was governor of Wubeiping , he shot what he thought was a tiger but it was a rock, just as in the case of .
Liu Xiang said, “With the utmost sincerity even metal and stone can be pierced, to say nothing of a human being.
If when you express your opinion no one agrees with you, or when you take an action but no one follows you, then you must have something incomplete in yourself.
If the one who sits on the high-ranking seat wishes to reform the world, he should ﬁrst improve himself.” Gan Jiang and Mo Ye .
tempered swords for the king of Chu.
He took three years to complete the swords.
The king became angry at him and intended to kill him. There were a pair of swords, male and female.
His wife, was in the last month of pregnancy.
He said to her, “I took three years to make these swords for the king.
He is angry with me. If I go to see him, he will certainly kill me.
If you give a birth to a boy, when he grows up tell him, ‘Go out of the house and look for the mountain to the south.
There is a pine tree coming out of a rock. The sword is placed behind it.’” Thereafter, took the female sword and went to be received in an audience with the king of Chu.
The king of Chu was greatly angered. He had investigate.
It was found that the swords formed a male and female pair, and that  the female sword without the male one.
Furious, the king killed .
After this incident, Mo Ye a son and named him Chi.
When he grew up he asked his mother, “Where is my father?” His mother replied, “Your father took three years to make swords for the king of Chu.
The king became angry and killed him.
Before he left home he asked me to tell you, ‘Go out of the house and look for the mountain to the south.
There is a pine tree coming out of a rock. The sword is placed behind it.’” So, the son went out of the house and looked to the south, but he did not see a mountain.
He only saw a pillar made out of a pine tree standing on a foundation stone in front of the main hall .
So he cut a hole in the back of with an ax and obtained the sword.
He schemed night and day about how to retaliate against the king of Chu.
The king of Chu had a dream in which a boy with a space one chi wide between his eyebrows intended to retaliate against him.
The king immediately offered a thousand catties of gold for the boy’s arrest.
The boy heard about this and ﬂed into the mountains. As he walked, singing a song, he came across a traveler.
asked him, “You are still young. Why are you crying so sadly?” answered, “I am a son of Gan Jiang and Mo Ye.
The king of Chu killed my father and I wish to retaliate against the king.” The traveler said, “I have heard that the king has offered a thousand catties of gold for your head.
I will bring your head along with the sword to him and avenge your father’s death for you.” The boy said, “I would be very much blessed if you would do so.” Then he immediately beheaded himself, and holding his head and the sword in both hands, he offered them , standing upright.
The traveler said, “I will never let you down.” corpse then ﬁnally fell to the ground.
The traveler, carrying the head, went to have an audience with the king of Chu.
The king of Chu was very happy.
The traveler said, “This is the head of a brave person.
It must be boiled in a cauldron of hot water.” The king, as instructed, boiled the head three days and three nights but it was not yet completely cooked .
The head jumped up from the boiling water and its face had a maniacal expression of rage.
The traveler said, “This boy’s head cannot be boiled to softness.
Please, king, approach and see for yourself.
Then it will certainly cook completely.” The king promptly came to and the traveler drew the sword and struck the king.
The king’s head fell into the boiling water.
The traveler again raised the sword and severed his own head as well, which also fell into the water.
The three heads cooked together until they were dissolved and could not be distinguished from one another.
The ﬂesh remaining in the hot water was divided into three portions and buried.
Therefore, these were collectively called the Three Kings’ Tombs, which exist even today in the vicinity of Xuanchun county, in the northern part of Runan prefecture .
During the time of the state of Song , Grand Master Han Ping married a woman.
Because she was so beautiful, King Kang stole her away from him.
Ping bore a grudge against the king.
Because of this, the king captured and imposed on him the penalty of city wall construction work.
Ping’s wife secretly sent a letter to him.
She took precautions about the expressions, writing, “There has been a long rain.
The river is large and the water is deep. The sun rises and illuminates my heart.” The king obtained the letter and showed it to his attendants, but no one understood its meaning.
A retainer called He gave an answer, “The expression ‘there has been a long rain’ means to sorrowfully think .
The phrase ‘the river is large and the water is deep’ means to be unable to see him.
The words ‘the sun rises and shines upon me’ means to have in mind the determination to die.” Soon after Ping committed suicide.
His wife secretly damaged her clothes to make the fabric fragile.
When she ascended a tower with the king, she threw herself from there.
Attendants tried to grasp her but they could not catch her clothes in their hands . So she died.
Her will was written on her sash.
It said, “King, you took advantage of my body while I was alive.
I will take advantage of my death .
I wish you will give my corpse to Ping and bury it along with his.” King , however, was angry and would not consent to this. He had the villagers bury both bodies so that that their graves faced each other.
He said, “They, husband and wife, are endlessly in love with each other.
If they can unite their graves, then I will not stand in their way.” Soon, from the end of each of the two graves two catalpa trees began to grow.
In ten days, each of the two trees grow larger than an arm’s width across. The trunks of both trees bent and came close to each other.
The roots mingled with each other below and the branches were entwined above.
Furthermore, a pair of a male and a female mandarin ducks always roosted on the trees. They never left there from morning until night, crying sadly and entwining their heads against each other.
Their cries moved people.
The people of the state of Song pitied , and they called the catalpa trees the “trees that are in love with each other” .
The term “to be in love with each other ” began with this.
Today, in Luoyang there is Han Ping’s city wall.
The ballad  is still handed down to the present day.
Fu Wanshou of the Song dynasty was a man from Pingchang .
In the nineteenth year of the Yuanjia era , he was Acting Administrator of the Imperial Garrison in Guangling .
As his vacation came to an end he was returning to his province .
Around the early part of the fourth period of the night he began to cross the Yangzi River.
When he began to cross the river’s ﬂow was calm and peaceful. But as he reached midstream a wind as sharp as an arrow arose.
Furthermore, at that time it was extremely dark. No one knew which direction was going.
From his earlier days Wanshou believed in the Dharma very diligently.
he took refuge solely in Avalokiteśvara wholeheartedly, and prayed without stopping.
Suddenly, together with several other people on the boat, saw a light on the north bank, which looked like the lights of a village. The people on the boat were glad and said to one another, “That must be the light of Ouyang .” The boat veered and headed toward the light and it reached before daybreak.
When asked the people of the village , they all said, “No one lit a ﬁre last night.” Only then they realized that it had been a supernatural power. They all returned and arranged for a puriﬁcation .
Gu Mai of the Song dynasty was a man from Wu prefecture .
He believed in the Dharma very diligently.
He became Acting Administrator of the Imperial Garrison.
In the nineteenth year of the Yuanjia era , he was returning from the capital city to Guangling.
He started from Shitou City and went upstream on the lake. A north wind howled turbulently.
The wind’s power did not diminish but the boatmen strove hard, pushing forward.
When they reached the middle of the course of the Yangzi River, the waves were haphazard and ﬁerce.
Only Mai’s boat was sailing. He was anxious and restless, and felt powerless.
He chanted the Sutra on Avalokiteśvara. After he had recited it about ten times, the wind gradually weakened and the waves became slightly smaller, too.
When was in the middle reaches smelled a wonderful fragrance that did not abate, and he secretly praised it.
Therefore he devoted himself to chanting the sutra without stopping.
Consequently, he was able to safely cross over.
Śramaṇa Huihe of the Song dynasty was a monk of Zhongzao Temple in the capital city.
At the time of the coup during the Yijia era of the Song dynasty, he was still a secular layman.
He followed Liu Hu,  as a subordinate.
At one time Hu sent scores of ofﬁcers and soldiers to the east as spies.
Huihe also took part in the march.
They arrived at Quezhu where they met the imperial army which was headed toward the west.
The spies scattered, and they all escaped into thickets.
Huihe could only ﬂee .
When he reached the area of Xinlin , he came across a rural old man whose clothes were worn to tatters.
Huihe then exchanged his neat trousers and jacket for the old man’s clothes.
He disguised himself as a farmer holding a basket and carrying a load on his back.
At that time mobile forces were out catching the scattered spies.
They saw Huihe’s appearance and, suspicious, they questioned him.
Huihe’s responses were incoherent.
Because of this, he was whipped, and was soon to be beheaded.
From the time Huihe had ﬂed, he constantly recited the Sutra on Avalokiteśvara.
As he was about to be beheaded, his prayer became the most sincere.
When the soldier raised his sword , he made a wrong step again and again.
He raised the sword three times and every time the sword broke.
Astonished, the people freed Huihe.
After this, Huihe renounced the world and consequently accomplished the attentive cultivation.
As for Han Hui of the Song dynasty, his original domicile was unknown.
He resided in Zhijiang .
His uncle  Youzong became Adjutant of the Section for Inner Troops of the Xiangzhou ofﬁce toward the end of the Song dynasty.
In the ﬁrst year of the Shengming era , Shen Youzhi , Regional Inspector of Jingzhou, raised an army and came to the east.
Yu Peiyu, Administrator of the Xiangzhou ofﬁce, relied on the troops under his command and guarded the area by himself.
It was unknown how matters were going.
Youzong came under suspicion and was killed.
The death sentence included his wife and children.
Because he was the son of Youzong’s elder brother, Hui was imprisoned in the prefecture.
Iron and wooden implements of punishment covered his entire body, and he was ﬁrmly bound in chains and shackles.
had to thoroughly investigate the situation and the implicated parties, with the intent to eradicate all the members.
Hui was fearful and distressed but he was helpless.
He could only await the day .
Hui originally served the Buddha and often chanted the Sutra on Avalokiteśvara.
So he recited the sutra day and night, several hundreds of times.
Precisely at noon the chains suddenly began to jangle spontaneously, sounding just like rocks or tiles that are burning and crackling.
A little later he saw that the chains had fallen off by themselves.
Hui was afraid that wardens might think he had removed them somehow or cut them off.
So, he hurriedly called out and told them .
The wardens, surprised, refastened the chains and shackles on him. Hui chanted the sutra as usual.
A day later the chains jangled and spontaneously came off again.
The circumstance was just like that of the ﬁrst time.
The wardens then reported in detail to Peiyu, who took the chains and closely examined them.
He was awestruck that Hui’s prayers had been answered, and immediately released .
Hui is still in good health and is extremely diligent in religious service.
Peng Ziqiao of the Song dynasty was a man from Yiyang county .
He was appointed as Assistant Magistrate of his home prefecture, and served Crown Prince Shen Wenlong.
In the ﬁrst year of the Jianyuan era he was imprisoned because of an offense.
Ziqiao had once renounced the world when he was a young boy.
Even though he had returned to secular life, he still continually practiced recitation of the Sutra on Avalokiteśvara.
At that time, Wenlong was greatly angered. Zigiao’s imprisonment was very strict and Wenlong certainly intended to kill him.
Anxious and fearful, Ziqiao had no other alternative than to recite the sutra with sincerity. He did so up to more than one hundred times, then he became tired and took a nap.
At that time there were about ten prisoners and they were all asleep.
Du Daorong, an ofﬁcial of Xiangxi county, was imprisoned, too.
He was off and on asleep and awake; he was not able to fall into a deep sleep.
Suddenly a pair of white cranes appeared and perched on Ziqiao’s screen.
Soon one of the cranes ﬂew down to Ziqiao’s side.
At that time felt that looked like a beauty.
Daorong got up and watched Ziqiao.
A pair of the fetters came off from legs but the carbuncles caused by fetters were still there.
Daorong was startled. After he had been looking at for a while, Ziqiao also awakened.
inspected the fetters together and sighed .
asked Ziqiao if he had dreamed.
Ziqiao replied, “No, I did not.” Daorong told Ziqiao what he had seen a little while before.
Even though Ziqiao knew he would certainly die, he still was concerned that the wardens would doubt if he tried to escape. So he put the fetters that had fallen off back on to his legs, over the carbuncles.
Four or ﬁve days later was released.
Lian, Yan’s cousin, who was closely acquainted with both Ziqiao and Daorong, heard what they had talked about. What each said individually was the same, just as related above.
There was a śramaṇa called Shan, is either shan or shan , in the Zhao dynasty.
His pseudonym was Daokai.
His original domicile is unknown.
In another biography it is said that he was a man from Dunhuang and his original family name was Meng.
had renounced the world when he was young.
Since he wanted to live in seclusion in a rocky valley, he ﬁrst abstained from eating grains.
At the beginning he took noodles. Three years later he ate only a paste of pine resin. Thirty years later, he only swallowed a pebble every once in a while.
When the pebbles went down , he then abstained from wine, dried and seasoned meat, and miscellaneous fruits.
When he was concerned about catching a cold he took only pepper and ginger.
He was feeble but his complexion was sleek.
He walked as if ﬂying.
The mountain deity tried several times but he was never moved.
Immortals frequently visited him but he could not stand it.
So every time they visited him, he chewed on garlic in order to drive them away.
He sat upright, calmed his mind, and never slept, day and night.
He resided in Baohan for a long time.
In the second year of the Jianwu era Shi Hu sent a messenger from Xiping to invite . So left for the city of Ye .
He did not travel on a boat or vehicle, and yet covered more than seven hundred li a day.
When he passed by Nan’an , he ordained a boy and made him his novice .
The boy, who was thirteen or fourteen years old, also traveled as fast as Daokai.
After arriving , they resided at Zhaode Buddhist Temple.
garments were worn to tatters, so his back and shoulders were always bare.
A covered platform eight or nine chi high was constructed in a room, with a curtain woven of cogon grass suspended from the ceiling.
meditated in this . He abstained from eating grains for seven years.
He usually took miscellaneous medicines, in which there was a smack of pine resin or tuckahoe.
He was an expert in curing eye diseases, and often traveled around the countryside treating the peasants.
Presents sent to him by princes from far and near accumulated. He received them and gave them away to others, not even a single item remained .
In the last year of Shi Hu’s reign, he foresaw that turbulent times were coming.
So he took refuge with his disciple in the south, in Xuchang .
In the third year of the Shengping era , they came to Jianye .
Then they went to Panyu and resided on Mount Luofu.
lay down in the shade of the woods, joyful and contented with living in isolation.
He passed away in the seventh month of that year.
His last wish was for his body to be left exposed in the woods.
His disciple followed his will.
Yuan Yanbo 198 of Chen prefecture became Governor of Nanhai in the ﬁrst year of the Xingning era .
Together with his brother, Ying, he went up to and wandered about the mountain, and paid respect to Daokai’s body, worshiping it by offering incense.
During the Zhenguan era of the Tang dynasty there was Dong Xiong in Hedong .
He became Aide in the Court of Judicial Review.
From the time he was young, he was faithful and respectful to .
He kept a vegetarian diet for ten years.
In the fourteenth year he was implicated in the incident of Li Xiantong.
199 His Majesty, in high dudgeon, ordered Attendant Censor Wei Cong to conduct a rigorous judicial investigation.
Accordingly, several dozen men were imprisoned.
The Aide in the Court of Judicial Review, Li Jing xuan, and the Rectiﬁer, Wang Xin, were also both implicated in the crime.
Xiong was imprisoned and bound in fetters in a cell along with them. Lotus Sutra].
He could chant it three thousand times a day.
One night, as sat and recited the sutra, his fetters suddenly fell off spontaneously and dropped to the ground.
Xiong was surprised and related this to Xin and xuan.
Both Xin and xuan saw that the fetters were intact on the ground, yet the lock and fetters were separated from each other by several chi.
promptly reported this to a jailkeeper.
That night the Investigating Censor, Zhang Shou, 200 was on night duty.
ordered an ofﬁcial to unlock the fetters. lit the area with a torch and saw that the fetters separated from before it had been unlocked.
Greatly surprised at this,  bind with the fetters again, sealed with some paper on which he inscribed something, and left.
Xiong recited the sutra as usual.
During the ﬁfth period of the night, 201 his fetters again fell off and dropped, causing a noise.
Xiong again told Xin and xuan .
At dawn reported to Jingxuan, and saw for himself.
The seal and the inscription were just as they had originally been and the fetters had again spontaneously separated from each other.
Jingxuan usually did not believe in the Buddhist Dharma.
his wife reading a sutra, he always thought, “Why does she read this scripture and be misled by a non-Chinese deity?” When he came to see the incident with Xiong, he deeply realized the fault of his impiety.
Just then knew that the Buddha is the Great Sage.
At that time Xin also recited the names of the eight bodhisattvas. In the daytime when his recitation reached thirty thousand times, his fetters fell off and dropped to the ground.
He saw it was just as what had happened in Xiong’s case.
These incidents were completely related within and outside the imperial court.
Soon both were released together.
In the Tang dynasty there was Shi Daoji at Pujiu Temple in Puzhou .
He was from Anyi county in Hedong .
His secular family name was Xiangli, and his ﬁrst name was Zicai.
After he entered the profound Dharma gate, he changed his name to Daoji.
Regarding his ancestry, he was probably a descendant of Zichan, a high ofﬁcial of Zheng state .
In the past, when Zichan was born, he emerged making a ﬁst.
He opened his hand and saw that the Chinese characters xiang and li  were .
Because of this,  the family name.
father, Xuanhui, was broadminded and ambitious.
was fond of studying and he was erudite and respectful toward his father.
202 From his youth ji studied the writings of Confucius as well as books by the Three Augusts .
He had an honest and virtuous air.
Extensively versed in sutras and discourses, he penetrated clearly major things as well as minor matters.
He became a teacher of clergy and laymen; enriching red and blue  at the same time.
He formed his brief in the teaching of benevolence, which diffused far and near without obstruction, and he profoundly protected from deﬁlement.
He repeatedly investigated doubtful points with care.
From the beginning, Daoji would not take into consideration allowing nuns to take refuge in him .
He often said, “Women are disgraceful to the precepts.
The sacred scriptures frequently state that the Buddha liberated and allowed them to renounce the world but by doing so this damaged the true Dharma.
Even by only hearing the word our minds will be stained.
Moreover, how could there be no deﬁlement if we meet them?
Furthermore, in the Way, cleanness and clarity are valued. If do not take part in it will not be abused.
The common people value that I avoid suspicion, while gentlemen calmly serve .
Even though I am inadequate, if ask me , then I will comply with and deliver them.
For this reason, I give them the precepts and instruct them, and yet I have never ascended to to have an audience with and now I am very old.
When come to ask me questions, I do not let them enter my room.” In this way was honest, kept himself free from immorality, was clean and pure, and was aloof from the world.
The distinguished and talented men of Hedong did not have the same manner as .
Before time, at the beginning of the Sui dynasty , 203 Śramaṇa Baocheng had begun construction on a large image, as tall as a hundred zhang, at Pujiu Temple.
All the workers could only reach as far as one part of it.
Before he was able to fulﬁll his vow to complete this , cheng died at a young age.
The elders of the community asked ji to continue .
thought that the large image had not yet been completed.
Leading seven noble people , completed the lofty .
It took ten years to repair and construct; the elegant decorations were all complete.
Both clergy and laymen happily relied on . They were drawn up with joy.
At the beginning, on the night ji was asked , he saw in a dream two lions on the side of a cliff. They spit out maṇi-ratna gems beside a large image successively and ceaselessly.
He soon awoke and thought to himself, “The king of animals is unrestricted.
This shows that the current of the Dharma has not stagnated.
The maṇi gems spontaneously appeared in succession.
This also explains that ﬁnancial donation will not be exhausted.
Unseen fortune secretly improves and my accomplishment is indicated.” Immediately ordered artisans to make an illustration in front of a great image of Maitreya what he had seen in the dream.
still remain today.
The temple is south of a hill in Puban . is high and is pleasant; it is a gorgeous and abundant place.
borders communities of numerous families to the east, and commands a view of rivers and mountains to the south.
The image is set up three stories with rock hallways surrounding it on all four sides.
The upper building of monks’ residence and the lower building magniﬁcently face each other.
A garden, large piles , rice ﬁelds, and vegetable gardens surround , in harmony with it.
is small but it forms is large. This is all completely due to ji’s accomplishment.
To brandish emptiness and establish existence are entirely due to ji’s ability.
Moreover, wore a worn-out robe, ate coarse food, despised wealth, valued life, extensively saved all beings, and kindly supported them.
He withdrew to a calm life and returned to a peaceful life. He acted and yet did not rely on .
204 He maintained a reclusive life.
Heaven held the idea to oppose him, and stopped him from cutting off the mundane world.
did not intend , but all the people spontaneously valued him highly.
He did not go out but people came to him of their own accord.
Vice Director Pei Xuanzhen was favored and occupied the position of prime minister.
respected good reputation, and frequently gave beautiful clothes to him.
Regional Inspector Du Churong knew the signiﬁcance of personality.
He visited and asked him for the Dharma.
tenderly and wonderfully moved people entirely in this way.
Living during the last year of the Sui dynasty , conﬁned himself .
Yao Junsu, Vice Governor of Hedong, garrisoned troops in a desolate city, and some of his troops committed atrocities.
At that time, people did not dare to even glance at .
were planning to summon all the śramaṇas to the city in order to guard them there.
Those who dared to admonish were killed.
All the monks and laypeople were anxious but no one could disobey him.
ji felt anger and lamentation within himself.
Disregarding his body and life, he said to his subordinates, “There are ups and downs in  the times, but there is no rising and falling in the Dharma.
Here we have a law that Heaven has not lost.
Moreover, śramaṇas are guests from the world beyond this world.
Their actions are virtuous and lofty in the world.
How could they take up weapons, put on armor, and become soldiers to guard against insults ?” Consequently, leading śramaṇas such as Dao sun and Shensu, he went up on the road to the mail hall, step by step.
With a threatening look, he admonished , “I have heard this.
If you were not afraid of death you could not frighten others by death.
I now see death is just like living.
I fear only that I will not attain death like that.
Death has an advantage.
This should be eagerly wished for.
To strive for the fate of the city depends on your strategy, Lord, and the peace of the world depends on your destiny.
“How could the Five Thearchs and the Three Augusts save if they were untrue and lacking in courage?
Formerly, in the Han dynasty, the Four Brilliant Old Men were respected, 205 and the world was prosperous and peaceful.
In the state of Wei Gan Mu was honored and all the nations were well-governed.
Today you wish to detain the people in order to have them attend military services.
You go against the convention of Heaven in order to assemble the deities of heaven and earth.
I simply fear to accept this inauspicious sign.
I dare to announce my true thoughts and feelings.
I pray that you deeply consider it; do not become a case similar to that of an empty shop that collapses spontaneously one day and later becomes the laughingstock of the world.
We, monks, rely only on sacred and sincere words, practice the Way, worship, and chant sutras.
For the sake of the country we revere happiness, and beneﬁt common people unobtrusively.
Gods protect us and help us. If you would rather demand my head, I will give it to you.
That is still my original vow.
Surely, if I am forced to devote my remaining life to being a foot soldier, I have no idea of the meaning of birth, why I was born, or of the meaning of death, why I am dying.” When ji spoke these words, the bystanders felt their blood run cold .
su ﬁrst listened to the admonition, and he valued the persuasive manner of ji’s speech. He looked directly at with eyes wide open and said, “How extraordinary it is to meet this person!
Why is his spirit so signiﬁcant and strong?” Then relented and let go.
After was released he returned to his original temple.
Later it was known that submitted to ; he visited and expressed repentance .
Yao su had killed without restraint, had given free rein to his malicious mind, and furthermore had slighted and disparaged others.
Therefore, even though he stopped  at that time, misfortune later revealed its omen and he was unexpectedly killed by Xue Zong, a man of the city.
Generally speaking, Daoji’s nature was strong and brave.
Once he determined , he never withdrew, even if he unexpectedly encountered someone’s anger and was about  ﬁsh meat.
After he had already renounced the world, he blamed himself for his original condition, and he controlled his original nature.
He turned to peacefulness and forbearance and enhanced those qualities. When he attained the Chinese age of sixty, his practice was even more vigorous.
It became his nature learning. These words are infallible.
On the seventeenth day of the ninth month of the tenth year of the Zhenguan era , passed away at his original temple at the age of sixty-nine Chinese years old.
At the onset of his illness ji mentioned it but he did not complain of any clearly.
He himself knew that he was weakening.
He told his disciple, “I am now seventy-ﬁve years old.
I will die this year.” His disciple replied, “Teacher, you are sixty-nine years old.
Why do you suddenly say this?” said to him, “Death and birth are spontaneous workings of the universal law.
I am not afraid of them.
Moreover, I am about to turn seventy years old.
The Regional Inspector showed a respectful manner to me and added six years .
Therefore, . Our life is transitory.
You should deeply overcome your and exert yourself.
Look at what I have practiced.” Furthermore, he said, “Haven’t you learned from the sutras that the world is truly insecure and there is nothing stable?” For three days following his death the bell was not tolled.
After passed away, things were just as they had been. All the people bemoaned . They admired him and showed love for him.
Few people worked their lands . In the Tang dynasty there was Shi Facheng at Wuzhen Temple on Mount Zhongnan .
His secular family name was Fan, and he was a man from Wannian county in Yongzhou .
renounced the world when he was a child and lived at Wangxiao Temple in Landian .
He served Śramaṇa Senghe as his teacher.
he was also supported by a group of villagers who respectfully believed him; he was comparable to a sage.
Once someone wanted to kill and went to his room at night.
saw raging ﬂames inside the door; the ﬂames rose up along a curtain.
Thereupon, he immediately repented .
he’s nature was pure and clean .
206 A person had tried to deceive him by secretly immersing a sheep bone in the water and then drank from it.
he originally did not know this; yet when he drank he vomited.
His hidden perception and latent consciousness were like this.
cheng received with respect and sustained his instruction. He considered that encouraging himself to chant the Lotus Sutra every day was his regular activity.
He eagerly upheld and practiced the lotus samādhi.
He cleansed himself both inside and outside, and was always gentle and modest.
He perceived in a dream that Samantabhadra encouraged him to inscribe the great teaching.
cheng said, “The great teaching is Mahayana . All the buddhas’ wisdom is what is called the great wisdom, prajñā.
I will immediately enter into puriﬁcation and circumambulate a buddha image, chanting a sutra.
I will call on artisans and pay them well.” ordered to copy the eight volumes of the Prajñāpāramitā-sūtra and incense burner stands and scrolls of the sutra were solemnly completed.
Furthermore, on a mountain ridge on the south side of the temple built the Garland Hall .
After the mountain was leveled and the valley ﬁlled in, 207 the eaves laid in a row and the roof ﬁtted with tiles, .
The front faces the high mountains above, and looks out on a sloping gorge to the right.
Clouds and fog come and go, and a sudden peal of thunder can be heard from above.
208 and it is really a spectacular sight.
In addition, exhausting my attentive determination I copied the sutra and I hold fast to it.
The Academician of the Institute for the Advancement of Literature Zhang Xiaojing is Zhang Zan’s father.
At that time he was called Yingou , and few could surpass him.
came to the mountain as he had been requested. He was ordered to receive the precepts.
He puriﬁed himself, washed his body and cleansed his mouth, rinsed his mouth with some fragrant juice, and put on new clothes.
jing had begun copying the sutra on his long journey, but ﬁlled less than ﬁfty sheets of paper. Nonethless cheng paid double the price.
With admiration he inspired to work intensively and diligently.
Taking advantage of the money , jing did his best to copy .
After each volume was complete, everyday cheng burned incense and held a religious service before of a long table .
Between ink drops he recognized the external object with his mind and saw it with his own eyes. There was almost no omission.
Therefore, he imprinted it on his mind and deeply studied it with concentration.
Once he perceived an uncommon bird whose form and color were very rare.
ﬂew into the hall, ﬂew around, and stirred up .
It ﬂew down to the sutra table and then went to perch on an incense burner.
It looked peaceful and watched ; it was naturally tame and was friendly .
After a good while it soared away.
Next year, when the sutra project had been completed and were preparing the celebration , the bird returned.
Just as the previous year, it was tame and disported itself, crying out mournfully.
In the ﬁrst year of the Zhenguan era images of one thousand buddhas were made .
209 The bird returned again and perched on one of the artists’ back.
meals for the Buddhist monks were offered and all were celebrated. 210 It was already noon.
wondered why had not yet arrived.
cheng, gazing at the mountain peak, said, “The bird will not come. I cannot perceive it.
will cause no auspicious sign since it detests all wicked acts and giving alms to frivolous beings.” Soon after he said this, returned.
It circled over the people, singing, entered into the fragrant water, and swiftly took wing; after bathing it departed.
Before and after these events, phenomena appearing as auspicious signs happened one after another. It is difﬁcult to describe them all.
cheng was originally good at literary pursuits and the people living in rural areas knew this.
Verses and wonderful phrases from sutras engraved on rocks in the mountains and in remote places with rough roads were copied by himself, and he had recite them.
These are all cheng’s writings.
211 Moreover, copied the Lotus Sutra by his own hand, and it was placed exactly in the middle of an open ﬁeld.
He was engaged in a service somewhere else and forgot to take it back.
Suddenly a huge rainstorm occurred and the ditches and mountain streams .
212 ran out to look for .
Only 213 the table it was on were dry; the other items had been completely washed away.
He tried to block the streams by pulling a pine tree down sideways across them. Consequently fell into the ﬂowing water. had not gone down the mountain stream.
did not realize it, but these things had landed up on a high bank, and no item, not even an insigniﬁcant one, had been damaged.
We truly know that this was due to the power of the sutra.
Furthermore, there was an old Buddhist niche beside Qingni Temple.
The Zhou family had ﬁlled in , and it has still not been revealed to the present day.
One night cheng saw in a dream a large respectable ﬁgure there.
He soon woke up and went there to open up . He found an image in the niche just as .
With the lapse of many years all had come off ; it was damaged.
was repaired right away.
Monks and laymen praised his good conduct.
This is entirely the merit due to protection from the unseen world, which was developed by cheng.
On the last day of the summer of the fourteenth year of the Zhenguan era felt a complication set in and he spontaneously knew that he would soon leave the world.
He prayed for rebirth in Tuṣita Heaven.
He asked for water and ﬁnished washing , and then again asked to repair to his sedan chair.
At the side he examined it himself, as he did not wish for a luxurious .
Precisely on the last day of the month, as a bright sign was about to be revealed, suddenly spoke with no warning, “I wished to come to and now I have just entered into it, but I have not yet availed myself to play my lute and sing.” Looking at his attendants, he said, “I have heard that all things are impermanent and birth and death go around incessantly.
Rebirth in the nine grades will testify to these words.
Now there is a boy who welcomes me. He has stayed outside the door for a long while.
I am leaving this world now.
All of you, live in good spirits!
You have the Buddha’s rightful precepts. You must have no deﬁciency .
Do not cause grief and regret later.” After he spoke these words, a bright light came from his mouth and illuminated surrounded by pillars.
Moreover, a rare fragrance of superlative degree permeated.
simply saw sitting upright and solemnly pondering.
They did not realize that his spirit had already departed.
He was seventy-eight Chinese years old at that time.
Regarding cheng’s practice of reciting sutras, the number of his recitations of the Lotus Sutra was calculated at ﬁve hundred times in one summer.
214 On leisure days he chanted , and as well he practiced it concurrently So he reached a couple more of times .
Even if a visitor came, requesting to speak with him, he would not speak with before ﬁnishing the recitation of the sutra.
In brief, the number of times  is calculated at more than ten thousand times over ten years.
During the Wude period of the Tang dynasty, there was a nun called Faxin, who practiced for many years in the Hedong area .
She frequently recited the Lotus Sutra.
She found a skillful calligrapher, to whom she offered several times more than a normal wage, .
She specially set up a pure room for the calligrapher to copy the sutra.
On awakening, ﬁrst bathed and his garments were perfumed with incense burned .
In addition, made a hole through one wall of the sutra-copying room and placed a bamboo tube into the hole.
She bade the sutra-copier to take the other end of the bamboo tube in his mouth when he wanted to exhale so that his breath would go out of the room.
It took eight years to complete copying the seven fascicles of the Sutra. With much enthusiasm held a special commemorative service to mark the completion of copying the sutra, and exerted all her respects for the sutra.
Faduan, a monk of Longmen , frequently assembled large groups of people and expounded the Lotus Sutra.
After the nun had made a copy of the sutra in an accurate recension, he sent someone to ask her for it.
The nun refused ﬁrmly and would not give the sutra to him.
Faduan upbraided her.
So, the nun reluctantly brought the copy to Faduan herself.
When Faduan and others opened , they could only see the yellow paper without even a single character.
They then opened the remaining scrolls, which were all the same.
Faduan and others felt ashamed and fearful, and immediately returned the sutra to the nun.
received it, in tears, and washed the sutra container with fragrant water.
After bathing, she placed the sutra on her head and circumambulated a buddha image while chanting the sutra.
For seven days and nights she did not rest even for a short time.
Soon she opened the sutra and saw that the inscriptions had been restored, just as before.
It is known that since puriﬁcation was particularly promoted for copying sutras, this incident happened.
The reason there is no miraculous virtue  is simply that is not as assiduously practiced.


Thus have I heard. Once the Buddha was staying in the city of Rājagṛha, on the mountain called Gṛdhrakūṭa, together with a great assembly of twelve thousand monks, all of whom were arhats whose corruption was at an end, who were free from the confusion of desire, who had achieved their own goals, shattered the bonds of existence, and attained complete mental discipline. 
Their names were Ājñāta kauṇḍinya, Mahākāśyapa, Uruvilvakāśyapa, Gayā kāśyapa, Nadī kāśyapa, Śāri putra, Mahā maudgalyāyana, Mahā kātyā yana, Aniruddha, Kapphiṇa, Gavāṃ pati, Revata, Pilinda vatsa, Bakkula, Mahā kauṣṭhila, Nanda, Sundarananda, Pūr ṇa maitrā yaṇī putra, Subhūti, Ānanda, and Rāhula. 
All of them were great arhats, known to the assembly. 
There were in addition two thousand others, both those who had more to learn and those who did not. 
The nun Mahā prajāpatī was there, together with her six thousand attendants; and also the nun Yaśodharā, Rāhula’s mother, together with her attendants. 
There were also eighty thousand bodhisattva mahā sattvas, all of whom were irreversible from highest, complete enlightenment . 
They had obtained the dhāraṇīs, were established in eloquence, and had turned the irreversible wheel of the Dharma. 
Each had paid homage to countless hundreds of thousands of buddhas, planted roots of merit in their presence, and had always been praised by those buddhas. 
They had also cultivated compassion within themselves, skillfully caused others to enter the wisdom of a buddha, obtained great wisdom, and reached the other shore. 
All of them were famous throughout countless worlds and had saved innumerable hundreds of thousands of sentient beings. 
They were Mañjuśrī, Avalo kiteśvara, Mahāsthāmaprāpta, Nityodyukta, Anikṣipta dhura, Rat na pāni, Bhaiṣajyarāja, Pradānaśūra, Ratnacandra, Can dra prabha, Pūrṇa candra, Mahāvikramin, Anantavikramin, Trai lokya vikrama, Bhadra pāla, Maitreya, Ratnākara, and Susātha vāha. There were altogether eighty thousand such bodhisattva mahāsattvas. 
At that time Śakra, king of the devas, was also there, attended by twenty thousand devaputras. 
Candra, Samantagandha, and Ratnaprabha, and the great devas of the four quarters were there, together with a retinue of ten thousand devaputras. 
The deva putras Īśvara and Maheśvara were there, attended by thirty thousand devaputras. 
Brahma, the lord of the sahā world, as well as the great Brahma Śikhin and the great Brahma Jyotiṣprabha were there, together with a retinue of twelve thousand devaputras. 
The eight nāga kings—namely, Nanda, Upananda, Sāgara, Vāsukin, Takṣaka, Anavatapta, Manasvin, and Utpalaka—were also there, each of them surrounded by several hundreds of thousands of attendants. 
There were four kings of the kiṃnaras whose names were Dharma, Su dharma, Mahādharma, and Dharmadhara, and each had several hundreds of thousands of attendants. 
The four kings of the gandharvas were there. They were Manojña, Manojñasvara, Madhura, and Madhurasvara, each of them also with several hundreds of thousands of attendants. 
There, too, were four kings of the asuras, called Baḍin, Kharaskandha, Vemacitra, and Rahu, each with several hundreds of thousands of attendants. 
Mahā tejas, Mahākāya, Mahā pūrṇa, and Maharddhiprāpta, the four kings of the garuḍas, were there together with several hundreds of thousands of attendants. 
Finally, King Ajāta śatru, Vaidehī’s son, was also there with several hundreds of thousands of his attendants. 
Each of them, after having bowed at the Buddha’s feet, withdrew and sat to one side. 
At that time the Bhagavat was respectfully surrounded by the fourfold assembly , paid homage, honored, and praised. 
He then taught the bodhisattvas the Mahayana sutra called Immeasurable Meanings , the instruction for the bodhisattvas and the treasured lore of the buddhas. 
After having taught this sutra, the Buddha sat cross-legged, entered the samādhi called the “abode of immeasurable meanings” and remained unmoving in both body and mind. 
Māndārava and great māndārava ﬂowers, mañjūṣaka and great mañjūṣaka ﬂowers then fell like rain from the sky, scattering upon the Buddha and all of his attendants; and the whole buddha world quaked in six ways. 
At that time, that whole assembly of such humans and nonhumans as monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen, the devas, nāgas, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṃnaras, mahoragas, kings, and noble emperors, having experienced something unprecedented, were ﬁlled with joy, and with their palms pressed together they gazed attentively at the Buddha. 
Then the Buddha emitted a ray of light from the tuft of white hair between his eyebrows. It illuminated all the eighteen thousand worlds in the east, down as far as the lowest hell, Avīci, and up as high as the Akaniṣṭha Heaven. 
All the sentient beings in those worlds living in the six transmigratory states became visible from this world. The buddhas in those worlds were also seen, and the Dharma they were teaching could be heard. 
The monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen and those who had practiced and achieved the path were also to be seen, while the bodhisattva mahāsattvas, of various background causes and conditions, endowed in various degrees with the willingness to understand and having various appearances, were also seen practicing the bodhisattva path. 
All of the buddhas who had achieved parinirvāṇa were seen, as well as their relic stupas made of the seven precious treasures. 
At that moment it occurred to Bodhisattva Maitreya: “The Bhagavat has now manifested the sign of great transcendent power. What could be the reason for this marvel? 
The Buddha, the Bhagavat, has now entered samādhi. 
Whom should I ask about this wonderful marvel? 
Who would be able to answer my question?” Then he thought further: 
“This Mañjuśrī, Prince of the Dharma, has closely attended and paid homage to innumerable buddhas of the past. 
“Now whom should we ask about the illumination and marvelous sign of this buddha?” Then Bodhisattva Maitreya, wanting to clear up his own confusion, and knowing the minds of the fourfold assembly of monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen and of the nāgas, yakṣas, and other beings in that gathering, asked Mañjuśrī: “What is the reason for this marvelous sign, this great ray of light that illuminates the eighteen thousand worlds in the east and renders visible the adornments of all the buddha worlds?” Thereupon Bodhisattva Maitreya, wanting to elaborate the meaning of this further, spoke to Mañjuśrī in verse: 
Why has the Leader Emitted this great ray of light far and wide From the tuft of white hair Between his eyebrows, Raining down māndārava and mañjūṣaka ﬂowers, And gladdening the people With the fragrant winds of sandalwood? 
For this reason The earth is completely adorned, And this world quakes in six ways. And the fourfold assembly Is completely enraptured, Delighted in body and mind at the experience of Such an unprecedented marvel. 
From the depths of the Avīci Hell Up to the summit of existence, The ray of light from between his eyebrows Illuminates the eighteen thousand worlds, Which shimmer like gold, And, throughout all these worlds, The births and deaths of the living beings Of the six transmigratory states of existence, And the good and bad deeds, Through which they have received Good and bad consequences, Are all to be seen from here. 
The buddhas, the Sage Lord , Who teach the subtle and supreme sutra Are also seen. 
Uttering soft sounds With their pure voices, They teach innumerable myriads Of koṭis of bodhisattvas. With their voices, deep and enticing Like the sounds of Brahma They make the people eager to hear them. 
In each world they teach the True Dharma; They illuminate the Buddha-Dharma And enlighten sentient beings By means of various explanations And innumerable illustrations. 
To those who are suffering And are cast down by old age, illness, and death They teach nirvana To extinguish their sufferings. 
To those who have merit, Have paid homage to the buddhas And seek the excellent Dharma, They teach the ideal of the pratyekabuddha. 
To those heirs of the buddhas Who have practiced in various ways And are seeking the utmost wisdom, They teach the pure path. 
O Mañjuśrī! Abiding here, I see and hear Thousands of koṭis of things in this way. There are many such things. I shall now explain them in brief. 
In these worlds I see bodhisattvas, Equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River, Seeking the path of the buddhas According to their various situations. 
Some undertake the practice of giving gifts, Joyfully giving gold, silver, coral, pearls, Jewels, conch shells, agates, diamonds, Servants, carts, and ornamented litters— They give these things joyfully, Transferring the merit To the path of the buddhas, Wishing to obtain this vehicle Which is the highest in the three worlds, And praised by all the buddhas. 
Other bodhisattvas give gifts Such as ornamented carts yoked with four horses And furnished with railings, Canopies, and decorated eaves. 
Moreover, I see bodhisattvas Who, seeking for the highest path, Give gifts such as their bodies, ﬂesh, hands, And feet, as well as their wives and children. 
Moreover, I see bodhisattvas Who are joyfully giving their heads, eyes, and bodies, While searching for the wisdom of the buddhas. 
O Mañjuśrī! I see kings making pilgrimages to the buddhas, Asking about the highest path, Abandoning their prosperous lands, Palaces, subjects and harems, Shaving their heads and beards, And wearing the robes of the Dharma. 
I see some bodhisattvas becoming monks, Dwelling apart in tranquility, Reciting the sutras with contentment. 
I also see bodhisattvas Persistent and courageous, Going into remote mountains And contemplating the buddha path. 
I see some abandoning worldly desires, Dwelling always in lonely places, Practicing profound meditations And obtaining the ﬁve transcendent powers. 
I see bodhisattvas Meditating with palms pressed together, Praising the Kings of the Dharma With thousands of myriads of verses. 
I also see bodhisattvas, Profound in wisdom and ﬁrm in resolution, Asking the buddhas questions, Listening carefully and retaining everything. 
Furthermore, I see heirs of the buddhas, Endowed with concentration and wisdom, Teaching the Dharma by innumerable illustrations For the beneﬁt of living beings, Leading and inspiring the bodhisattvas By joyously teaching the Dharma, Destroying Māra and his minions And beating the drums of the Dharma. 
I also see bodhisattvas Who are tranquil and silent in ease, And never exult Even in the homage paid by devas and nāgas. 
I see bodhisattvas Dwelling in forests, radiating light, Alleviating the suffering of beings in the hells And causing them to enter the buddha path. 
I also see heirs of the buddhas Who have never fallen asleep, And are constantly wandering in forests In search of the buddha path. 
I see some who are pure like jewels, Endowed with integrity And faultless in behavior, In search of the buddha path. 
Furthermore, I see heirs of the buddhas In search of the buddha path, Who have the power of perseverance And patiently endure Those of excessive pride Who abuse them verbally and physically. 
I see bodhisattvas Who have been searching for the buddha path For thousands of myriads of koṭis of years, And who have renounced idlers and foolish companions And approached the wise. Having singlemindedly rid themselves of inner confusion They are meditating in mountain forests. 
I also see bodhisattvas seeking For the highest path, Who are giving food and drink, And a hundred kinds of medicine To the Buddha and the sangha. 
They give superb garments and clothing Worth thousands of myriads, And priceless robes To the Buddha and the sangha. 
They give thousands of myriads of koṭis Of treasured monasteries made of sandalwood, And various kinds of excellent bedding To the Buddha and the sangha. 
They give clean garden groves Full of ﬂowers and fruits, Fountains and bathing pools To the Buddha and the sangha. 
Thus they give such various excellent things, With joy and vigor, Seeking the supreme path. 
There are also bodhisattvas Who are teaching innumerable sentient beings The Dharma of tranquility In various ways. 
Furthermore, I see bodhisattvas Who have perceived the essential character Of all dharmas to be without duality, Just like empty space. 
I also see heirs of the buddhas Who are seeking the highest path Through this subtle wisdom, Their minds free of attachment. O Mañjuśrī! 
There are bodhisattvas Who pay homage to the relics of the buddhas After their parinirvāṇas. 
I also see heirs of the buddhas Who have built stupas As numerous as the sands of the Ganges River, With which to decorate the buddha worlds. These jeweled stupas are magniﬁcent— Five thousand yojanas in height and Two thousand yojanas in both length and width. 
On each of these stupas Are one thousand banners, ﬂags, and canopies, And jeweled bells ringing harmoniously. 
And devas, nāgas, humans, and nonhumans Constantly give offerings of Perfume, ﬂowers, and music to them. 
O Mañjuśrī! The heirs of the buddhas Have decorated the stupas In order to pay homage to the relics. These worlds have been spontaneously Made as extraordinarily beautiful As the king of the heavenly trees When his ﬂowers bloom. 
Because the Buddha has emitted this ray of light, I and those with me in the assembly can see These worlds of marvelous and varied beauty. 
The wisdom and transcendent powers Of all the buddhas are extraordinary; By emitting a single ray of light He has illuminated innumerable lands. 
Seeing this, we attain That which we have not met with before. 
O Mañjuśrī, Heir of the Buddhas! 
We entreat you to rid us of our confusion! 
The fourfold assembly is joyfully Looking up at you and me. 
Why did the Bhagavat emit this ray of light? O Heir of the Buddhas, now answer! 
Why is he emitting this ray of light? 
Will the Buddha teach us the True Dharma That he obtained while he sat On the terrace of enlightenment ? 
Will he predict enlightenment to us? 
It is not for a triﬂing reason That all the buddha lands, ornamented With various jewels, And all the buddhas have been made visible. 
O Mañjuśrī! You should know that the fourfold assembly, Nāgas, and devas, Look forward to hearing What you shall reveal. 
Thereupon Mañjuśrī spoke to Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Mai treya and the other worthy beings: “O sons of a virtuous family! 
I am very sure that the Buddha, the Bhagavat, will now teach the great Dharma, rain down the great Dharma, blow the conch of the great Dharma, beat the drum of the great Dharma, and reveal the meaning of the great Dharma. 
“O sons of a virtuous family! 
I have seen buddhas in the past who have shown this marvel and have taught the great Dharma immediately after emitting a ray of light. 
Therefore, you should know that in the very same way the Buddha has now emitted this light and has shown this marvel in order to cause all sentient beings to hear and understand the Dharma which in all the worlds is difﬁcult to understand. “O sons of a virtuous family! 
In the past, more than innumerable, unthinkable, incalculable kalpas ago, there was a buddha called Candrasūryapradīpa, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. He taught the True Dharma that was good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end. It was profound in meaning, elegant in speech, and endowed with the character of the pure path of discipline and integrity. 
“To those seeking for the śrāvaka vehicle he taught the Dharma with respect to the Four Noble Truths, causing them to overcome birth, old age, illness, and death and to attain nirvana. 
He taught the Dharma with respect to dependent origination to the pratyekabuddhas; and to the bodhisattvas he taught the Dharma with respect to the six perfections , causing them to attain highest, complete enlightenment and perfect all-knowledge . “Then there was another buddha named Candrasūryapradīpa, and after him another buddha also named Candrasūryapradīpa. And so in this way twenty thousand buddhas all had the same name Candrasūryapradīpa. They also had the same family name Bharadvāja. 
“O Maitreya! You should know that these buddhas, beginning from the ﬁrst up to the last, all had the same name Candra sūrya pradīpa, endowed with the ten epithets. 
The Dharma that they taught was good in the beginning, the middle, and the end. 
“The last buddha fathered eight princes before he renounced household life. The ﬁrst was called Mati, the second Sumati, the third Anantamati, the fourth Ratimati, the ﬁfth was called Viśeṣa mati, the sixth Vimatisamudghātin, the seventh Ghoṣamati, and the eighth was called Dharmamati. 
These eight princes were endowed with dignity and power, and each of them ruled over four great continents. 
Having heard that their father had renounced household life and obtained highest, complete enlightenment, all of them abandoned their kingdoms and also renounced household life. Each caused the spirit of the Mahayana to arise within him, practiced the pure path of discipline and integrity, and became an expounder of the Dharma. They all planted roots of good merit under many thousands of myriads of buddhas. “At that time, the Buddha Candrasūryapradīpa taught the Mahayana sutra called Immeasurable Meanings, the instruction for the bodhisattvas and treasured lore of the buddhas. 
Having taught this sutra, he sat down cross-legged, undisturbed in body and mind among the great assembly and entered the samādhi called the ‘abode of immeasurable meanings.’ “Then māndārava and great māndārava ﬂowers, mañjūṣaka and great mañjūṣaka ﬂowers fell like rain from the sky, scattering over the Buddha and all of his attendants. 
And the whole buddha world quaked in six ways. 
At that time all in that assembly of humans and nonhumans—monks, nuns, laymen, laywomen, devas, nāgas, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṃnaras, mahoragas, kings, and noble emperors—having experienced such an unprecedented marvel, were ﬁlled with joy and pressing their palms together they gazed attentively at the Buddha. “Then the Buddha emitted a ray of light from the tuft of white hair between his eyebrows which completely illuminated all the eighteen thousand worlds in the east, in the same way that all of these buddha worlds are visible now. 
“O Maitreya! You should know that at that time there were twenty koṭis of bodhisattvas in the assembly who wanted to hear the Dharma. 
All of these bodhisattvas, having seen all the buddha worlds completely illuminated by this ray of light, were struck with wonder and wanted to know why it was emitted. 
“A bodhisattva named Varaprabha was there with his eight hundred disciples. 
At that time the Buddha Candrasūryapradīpa, having emerged from samādhi, remained sitting for sixty intermediate kalpas and revealed to Bodhisattva Varaprabha the Mahayana sutra called Saddharmapuṇḍarīka, the White Lotus of the Marvelous Law , which was the instruction for bodhisattvas and the treasured lore of the buddhas. 
The assembly also sat there undisturbed in body and mind listening to the Buddha’s exposition for sixty intermediate kalpas as if only a single mealtime had passed; during that time not a single person among them experienced fatigue of body or mind. 
“Having taught this sutra for sixty intermediate kalpas, the Buddha Candra sūryapradīpa made this proclamation to the assembly of Brahmas, māras, śrāmaṇas, brahmans, devas, humans, and asuras, saying: On this day during the middle watch of the night, the Tathāgata will enter nirvana without residue. “Then the Buddha Candrasūryapradīpa gave this prediction to a bodhisattva called Śrīgarbha. Addressing the monks, he said: 
After the Buddha passed into extinction, Bodhisattva Varaprabha, having preserved the Lotus Sutra, taught it to humans for the full period of eighty intermediate kalpas. 
Varaprabha led and inspired them and caused them to be ﬁrm in highest, complete enlightenment. 
“After paying homage to innumerable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of buddhas, all these princes attained the path of the buddhas. The last of these to become enlightened was named Dīpaṃkara. 
“Among the eight hundred disciples of Bodhisattva Varaprabha there was a man named Yaśaskāma who was attached to proﬁt. Even though he had repeatedly recited the sutras he never became versed in them and forgot the greater part. 
That is why he was called Yaśaskāma, ‘Fame Seeker.’ But because he had also planted various roots of good merit, he was able to meet innumerable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of buddhas whom he rendered homage to, honored, revered, and praised. 
“O Maitreya! You should know that Bodhisattva Varaprabha at that time was none other than myself, and Bodhisattva Yaśaskāma was none other than you. 
Therefore I am certain that today the Tathāgata will teach the Mahayana sutra called the Lotus Sutra, the instruction for bodhisattvas and treasured lore of the buddhas.” Thereupon Mañjuśrī, wanting to explain the meaning of this further, spoke to the great assembly in verse: 
I remember that in the past, Innumerable incalculable kalpas ago, There was a buddha, the Best of Humans, Called Candrasūryapradīpa. 
This Bhagavat taught the Dharma, Leading and inspiring innumerable sentient beings And incalculable numbers of bodhisattvas, To attain the wisdom of the buddhas. 
Before renouncing household life The Buddha fathered eight princes. Having seen the Great Sage Renounce household life, They also followed him And practiced the pure path of discipline and integrity. 
At that time the Buddha taught And extensively illuminated the Mahayana sutra Called Immeasurable Meanings To the great assembly. 
After having taught this sutra, The Buddha sat down cross-legged On the seat of Dharma and entered the samādhi Called the “abode of immeasurable meanings.” The heavenly māndārava ﬂowers Fell down like rain; The heavenly drums resounded spontaneously. 
All of the buddha worlds suddenly quaked greatly. And the Buddha emitted a ray of light From the tuft between his eyebrows And manifested various marvels. 
This ray of light illuminated The eighteen thousand buddha worlds in the east And revealed the conditions Resulting from the karma of each sentient being. 
Through this light of the Buddha All the buddha worlds appeared As if they were decorated with various jewels Such as lapis lazuli or crystal. 
All the devas, humans, nāgas, Yakṣas, gandharvas, and kiṃnaras Were each seen paying homage to the buddhas. 
All the Tathāgatas, who had spontaneously attained The path of the buddhas, Looked majestic and very beautiful With bodies like golden mountains. 
Each Bhagavat appeared like a golden image In the midst of lapis lazuli, Expounding the meaning Of the profound Dharma to the great assembly. 
There were innumerable śrāvakas In each of the buddha worlds, And they saw all the great assemblies Because of the light of the Buddha. 
There were also monks Living in mountain forests, Who, through persistence, possessed purity of conduct, Which they protected like a precious jewel. 
There were bodhisattvas, As numerous as the sands of the Ganges River, Practicing by giving , perseverance , and so on , Who also became visible through the light of the Buddha. 
There were bodhisattvas, who, Having entered deep samādhi, Were tranquil and undisturbed in body and mind, And who were seen seeking for the highest path. 
There were also bodhisattvas, Who, knowing the tranquil character of the Dharma, Were seen teaching the Dharma And seeking the path of the buddhas In each of the buddha worlds. 
At that time the fourfold assembly, Having seen the Buddha Candrasūryapradīpa Manifest these great transcendent powers, Became delighted, and asked each other What the reason for this could be. 
The Noble One, revered by devas and humans, Then emerged from samādhi and Praised Bodhisattva Varaprabha, saying: You are the Eye of the World. You are believed in by all and Possess the treasure house of the Dharma. You are the only one who can understand The Dharma that I have taught! 
This expounder of the Dharma, Varaprabha, Firmly and completely Preserved this most excellent Dharma That was taught by the Buddha. 
After having taught this Lotus Sutra And having then gladdened the assembly On that very day, The Buddha told the assembly of devas and humans: I have already taught you the meaning Of the essential character of all dharmas. Today I will enter nirvana In the middle of the night. 
Exert yourselves attentively And rid yourselves of negligence! The buddhas are extremely hard to meet And can be encountered only once In koṭis of kalpas! All the sons of the Bhagavat, On hearing that the Buddha was to enter nirvana, Became sad, thinking: Why will the Buddha enter nirvana so soon? 
The Noble Lord, the King of the Dharma, Consoled the innumerable beings saying: Do not fear after I enter nirvana! 
And then he will bring Innumerable sentient beings to the path. And that night the Buddha entered nirvana, Like a ﬁre that goes out when the wood is exhausted. His relics were distributed And innumerable stupas were built. 
There were monks and nuns, As numerous as the sands of the Ganges River, Who increased their efforts And sought for the highest path. 
This expounder of the Dharma, Varaprabha, Possessed of the treasure house of the Buddha, Extensively proclaimed the Lotus Sutra For eighty intermediate kalpas. 
All of the eight princes Led and inspired by Varaprabha, Became ﬁrmly established In the highest path, And met innumerable buddhas. 
After having paid homage to the buddhas And following them in their practice of the great path, They all in turn received their predictions, Becoming buddhas in succession. 
The last Buddha, the Highest of Devas, Was called Dīpaṃkara, And, as the leader of all the sages, Had brought innumerable sentient beings to the path. 
This expounder of the Dharma, Varaprabha, Had one disciple who was lazy And attached to fame and fortune. This disciple ceaselessly sought these things And amused himself from house to house. He abandoned recitation of the sutras, And, forgetting them, Never became versed in them. 
For this very reason he was named Yaśaskāma. 
But since he had also performed many good deeds, He was able to meet innumerable buddhas. He paid homage to all these buddhas And having practiced the great path after them, Acquired all the six perfections and Now meets the Lion of the Śākyas. 
He shall subsequently become a buddha called Maitreya Who will extensively bring Innumerable sentient beings to the path. 
After the parinirvāṇa of that Buddha Candrasūryapradīpa, The lazy one was none other than you; And the expounder of the Dharma, Varaprabha, Was no one but myself. 
When I saw the Buddha Dīpaṃkara He also revealed this marvel of light. That is why I know that this buddha Will now teach the Lotus Sutra. This sign is just like the previous marvel. 
It is the skillful means of all the buddhas. The Buddha has now emitted this ray of light In order to reveal The essential character of dharmas. 
Now it should be clear to everyone. Wait attentively with palms pressed together! Having rained the Dharma, The Buddha will satisfy those seeking the path. 
If there is anyone seeking the three vehicles Who still has any doubts, The Buddha will completely remove them, Extinguishing them with none left over. 
Skillful Means At that time the Bhagavat arose tranquilly with insight out of samādhi and addressed Śāriputra: “Profound and immeasurable is the wisdom of the buddhas. The gate to their wisdom is hard to enter and difﬁcult to understand. None of the śrāvakas and pratyeka buddhas may be capable of understanding it. 
Why is this? 
The buddhas have closely attended innumerable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of other buddhas. They have exhaustively carried out practices with courage and persistence under uncountable numbers of buddhas, their names becoming universally renowned. They have perfected this profound and unprecedented Dharma, and their intention in adapting their explanations to what is appropriate is difﬁcult to understand. 
“O Śāriputra! 
After attaining buddhahood I expounded the teaching extensively with various explanations and illustrations, and with skillful means led sentient beings to rid themselves of their attachments. 
Why is this? 
“O Śāriputra! 
The wisdom and insight of the Tathāgatas is extensive, profound, immeasurable, and unhindered. They are possessed of power, fearlessness, meditation, liberation, and samādhi that is profound and endless. They have completely attained this unprecedented Dharma. 
“O Śāriputra! 
The Tathāgatas can, through various methods, skillfully illuminate the Dharma with gentle speech and gladden the hearts of the assemblies. 
“O Śāriputra! 
To put it brieﬂy, the buddhas have attained this immeasurable, limitless, and unprecedented Dharma. Enough, O Śāriputra, I will speak no further. 
Why is this? 
Because the Dharma that the buddhas have attained is foremost, unique, and difﬁcult to understand. 
No one but the buddhas can completely know the real aspects of all dharmas—that is to say their character, nature, substance, potential, function, cause, condition, result, effect, and essential unity.” Thereupon the Bhagavat spoke these verses to explain this meaning again: The Heroes of the World are inconceivable, Neither devas, humans, nor any other sentient beings Are able to comprehend them. 
No one is able to discern the power, fearlessness, Liberation, samādhi, and Other attributes of the buddhas. 
Formerly, under innumerable buddhas, They have fully accomplished their practices And the Dharma, which is profound and excellent, Hard to perceive and difﬁcult to understand. 
Having pursued these practices For innumerable koṭis of kalpas, I attained the result on the terrace of enlightenment And understood completely. 
I and the buddhas of the ten directions Know such matters, Such as the great results and rewards, And the meaning of various aspects and characteristics. 
It is impossible to explain this Dharma; The powers of speech fail. No other sentient being is able to understand it, Except for those bodhisattvas Who, in their belief, are willing to understand. 
Even the multitude of the Buddha’s disciples, Who have formerly paid homage to all the buddhas, Who have put an end to all their corruption And are bearing their last bodies, Are not able to understand it. 
Even if this whole world Were ﬁlled with those such as Śāriputra, And they tried together to comprehend it, They still would not be able to understand completely The wisdom of the buddhas. 
Again, even if the worlds of the ten directions Were ﬁlled with such disciples As Śāriputra, And they tried together to comprehend it, They still would not be able to completely understand. 
And even if the worlds of the ten directions Were ﬁlled with pratyekabuddhas, As numerous as bamboo trees in a grove, Who had keen wisdom And were bearing their last bodies, Free from corruption, Even if they tried together singlemindedly, For innumerable kalpas, To comprehend the wisdom of the buddhas, Still they would not understand it in the least. 
Even if the worlds of the ten directions Were packed as thick as stalks of rice, Flax, bamboo, and reeds With bodhisattvas, recent aspirants to enlightenment, Who had paid homage to innumerable buddhas— Though they fully understood the meaning And could expound the Dharma, Even with this subtle wisdom, If they tried together singlemindedly to comprehend, For as many kalpas as the sands of the Ganges River, They still would not be able to know The wisdom of the buddhas. 
Even if bodhisattvas, As numerous as the sands of the Ganges River, Who had reached the stage of nonretrogression, Tried together singlemindedly to comprehend it, Still they would not be able to know. 
The Buddha, still speaking to Śāriputra, said: I have already attained the profound and subtle Dharma That is incorruptible And beyond all comprehension. Only I and the buddhas of the ten directions know this. 
O Śāriputra! You should know that the words Of the buddhas are never inconsistent. 
For what reason and on what grounds have you so earnestly praised the unique skillful means of the buddhas and the profound and subtle Dharma that is difﬁcult to understand? 
Never before have I heard such a thing from the Buddha. 
Now Bhagavat, I entreat you to explain this because the fourfold assemblies are confused. 
O Bhagavat! Why have you so earnestly praised the Dharma that is profound, subtle, and difﬁcult to understand?” Thereupon Śāriputra, wanting to further explain what he meant, spoke these verses: O Great Seer, Sun of Wisdom! 
Now, after a long time, You have taught this Dharma, saying, I have attained the inconceivable Dharma, That is to say, power, fearlessness, Samādhi, meditation, and liberation. 
No one has ever questioned the Dharma That I attained on the terrace of enlightenment. 
No one has ever questioned my intentions, So difﬁcult to conceive. 
Without being asked You explained it by yourself And praised the path you have practiced, saying, The wisdom the buddhas have attained Is extremely subtle! 
The arhats free from corruption And those seeking nirvana Have all fallen into confusion. Why has the Buddha said this? 
Those seeking to become pratyekabuddhas, Monks, nuns, devas, nāgas, Yakṣas, gandharvas, and the others Glanced at each other in confusion And looking toward the Best of Humans asked: O Buddha! We entreat you to explain why this is so! 
The Buddha has said that I am the foremost Among the śrāvakas, yet now I am confused About my own knowledge and unable to understand. Is it the ultimate Dharma? 
Is it a path to be practiced? 
The sons born from the mouths of the buddhas Stand waiting with palms pressed together, Looking at the Buddha. I entreat you to proclaim the truth, Speaking in the ﬁnest voice! 
The devas, nāgas, and others, As numerous as the sands of the Ganges River, As many as eighty thousand bodhisattvas Who are seeking buddhahood, and noble emperors Who have come from myriads of koṭis of countries, Are all standing respectfully with palms pressed together Asking how to accomplish the path. 
Then the Buddha addressed Śāriputra, saying: 
Speak no more! 
If I explained this matter, the devas and humans in all the worlds would be astounded.” Then Śāriputra again addressed the Buddha: “O Bhagavat! Please explain it! 
I entreat you to explain it, because in this assembly there are innumerable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of incalculable sentient beings, sharp in faculties and possessed of wisdom, who have previously encountered the buddhas. When they hear the teaching of the Buddha they will trust, believe, and accept it.” Thereupon Śāriputra spoke in verse to explain this again: 
In this assembly there are innumerable sentient beings Who will trust and accept it. 
Then the Buddha again tried to dissuade Śāriputra, saying: “If I explain it, the devas, humans, and asuras in all the worlds will be astounded, and arrogant monks will certainly go to their downfall.” At that time the Bhagavat again spoke in verse: 
Though the arrogant hear it, They will never accept it. 
And again Śāriputra addressed the Buddha, saying: “O Bha ga vat! 
Please explain it! Please explain it! 
In this assembly there are people like me and others, numbering into the hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of beings, who have been led and inspired by the buddhas in their former existences. 
Such people will certainly trust, believe, and accept it. 
Please illuminate and explain it! Innumerable beings in this assembly Will certainly trust and accept this Dharma, Because the Buddha in former existences Led and inspired such people. All of them will attentively listen and accept, Their palms pressed together, To the words of the Buddha. 
I entreat you to illuminate and explain it For the assembly of twelve hundred people like me, And the others seeking buddhahood. 
When they hear this Dharma They will bring forth great joy. 
Then the Bhagavat spoke to Śāriputra, saying: “You have now persistently asked me three times. How could I possibly not explain it to you? 
I will now illuminate and explain it.” When he said this, ﬁve thousand monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen in the assembly immediately got up from their seats, bowed to the Buddha, and left. 
What was the reason for this? 
Because the roots of error among this group had been deeply planted and they were arrogant, thinking they had attained what they had not attained and had realized what they had not realized. Because of such defects they did not stay. 
And the Bhagavat remained silent and did not stop them. 
Then the Buddha addressed Śāriputra: “My assembly here is free of useless twigs and leaves; only the pure essence remains. 
“O Śāriputra! 
Let the arrogant ones go! 
Listen carefully and I will explain it to you.” Then Śāriputra replied: 
“Indeed, O Bhagavat, I greatly desire to hear it.” Then the Buddha addressed Śāriputra: “Only very rarely do the Buddha Tathāgatas teach such a True Dharma as this, as rarely as the uḍumbara ﬂower blooms. 
“O Śāriputra! 
Trust and accept what the Buddha teaches! My words are never false. 
“O Śāriputra! 
The real intention of all the buddhas in adapting their explanations to what is appropriate is difﬁcult to understand. 
Why is this? 
Because I have expounded the teachings with innumerable skillful means and various kinds of explanations and illustrations. 
Yet this Dharma is beyond reason and discernment. Only the buddhas can understand it. 
Why is this? 
Because the Buddha Bhagavats appear in this world for one great purpose alone. 
O Śāriputra! 
Now I will explain why I said that the Buddha Bhagavats appear in this world for only one great purpose. 
“The Buddha Bhagavat appear in this world to cause sentient beings to aspire toward purity and the wisdom and insight of the buddhas. 
They appear in this world to manifest the wisdom and insight of the buddhas to sentient beings. 
They appear in this world to cause sentient beings to attain the wisdom and insight of a buddha’s enlightenment. 
They appear in this world in order to cause sentient beings to enter the path of the wisdom and insight of a buddha. 
“O Śāriputra! 
For this one great reason alone the buddhas have appeared in this world.” The Buddha addressed Śāriputra, saying: 
“O Śāriputra! 
A Tathāgata teaches sentient beings the Dharma only through the single buddha vehicle. There is no other, neither a second nor a third. 
“O Śāriputra! 
The true nature of all the buddhas of the ten directions is exactly like this. “O Śāriputra! 
All the buddhas of the past expounded the teachings for the sake of sentient beings, using incalculable and innumerable skillful means and various explanations and illustrations. These teachings were all for the sake of the single buddha vehicle. 
All these sentient beings, hearing the Dharma from the buddhas, ﬁnally attained omniscience. “O Śāriputra! 
All the future buddhas who will appear in the world will expound the teachings for the sake of sentient beings, using incalculable and innumerable skillful means and various explanations and illustrations. These teachings will all be for the single buddha vehicle. 
All sentient beings who hear this Dharma from these buddhas will ultimately attain omniscience. “O Śāriputra! 
All the Buddha Bhagavats of the present, in immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of buddha worlds of the ten directions, teach the Dharma to sentient beings using incalculable and innumerable skillful means with various explanations and illustrations to beneﬁt many of them and cause them to feel at peace. These Dharmas are all of the single buddha vehicle. 
All the sentient beings who hear the Dharma from these buddhas will ultimately attain omniscience. “O Śāriputra! 
These buddhas lead and inspire only bodhisattvas, because they want to teach sentient beings with the wisdom and insight of the Buddha, to enlighten sentient beings with the wisdom and insight of the Buddha, and to cause sentient beings to enter the path of the wisdom and insight of the Buddha. “O Śāriputra! 
I too am now like this. Having understood the various desires and deep-rooted inclinations of sentient beings, I teach the Dharma according to their capacities through the power of skillful means, using various explanations and illustrations. 
“O Śāriputra! 
I do this in order to cause them to attain the omniscience of the single buddha vehicle. “O Śāriputra! 
Since there is no second vehicle in the worlds of the ten directions, how could there be a third! 
“O Śāriputra! 
The buddhas appear in the troubled world of the ﬁve deﬁlements, which are the deﬁlement of the kalpa, the deﬁle ment through desire’s confusion, the deﬁlement of sentient beings, the deﬁlement of views, and the deﬁlement of lifespan. 
Therefore, O Śāriputra, in the period of the decadent kalpa, because sentient beings are ﬁlthy, greedy, jealous, and develop roots of error, all the buddhas illuminate the three with the power of skillful means in order to teach the single buddha vehicle. 
“O Śāriputra! 
If any of my disciples declare that they are arhats or pratyekabuddhas, and do not listen or comprehend that all the Buddha Tathāgatas teach only the bodhisattvas, they are not disciples of the buddhas, nor are they arhats or pratyekabuddhas. “Again, O Śāriputra! 
If there are any monks or nuns who would declare that they have attained arhatship, that they are bearing their last bodies and are destined for complete nirvana, and yet who have not sought highest, complete enlightenment, they should be considered arrogant people. 
“Why is this? 
Because there is no case in which a monk who has actually achieved arhatship does not believe in this Dharma, except after the Buddha has entered parinirvāṇa and there is no buddha present. 
“What is the reason for this? 
Because after the parinirvāṇa of the Buddha it is hard to ﬁnd people who preserve, recite, and understand the meaning of the sutras like this. 
But if they should meet other buddhas they will immediately understand this teaching. 
“O Śāriputra! You should wholeheartedly accept and preserve the words of the Buddha. 
The words of the Buddha Tathāgatas are never false. There are no other vehicles, only the single buddha vehicle.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate the meaning of this further, uttered these verses: 
They did not see their own defects, Being faulty in self-discipline, And clung to their shortcomings; These of little wisdom have already left. Through the virtuous dignity of the Buddha The dregs of the assembly have departed. 
Free of useless twigs and leaves, Only the pure essence of this assembly remains. 
O Śāriputra, listen carefully! 
All the buddhas teach the Dharma That they have attained Through the immeasurable power of skillful means, For the sake of sentient beings. 
Completely knowing their intentions, Their various ways of practice, Their wishes and capacities, And the good and bad karma Of their previous lives, The Buddha gladdens all sentient beings With the power of words and skillful means, Using examples and illustrations. 
The Buddha teaches nirvana To those with dull faculties, Who are satisﬁed with lowly aspirations And attached to birth and death, Who have not practiced the profound path In the presence of innumerable buddhas And are confused by suffering. 
Having devised this skillful means I enable them to enter the wisdom of the buddhas. But I have never said That all of you would attain The path of the buddhas. 
I have never said this Because the occasion never arose. Now is precisely the right time for me To teach deﬁnitively the Mahayana. 
I apply these nine kinds of teachings According to the capacities of sentient beings. I teach these sutras Because they are the basis for entering the Mahayana. 
I teach the Mahayana sutras To those heirs of the buddhas Who are pure in mind, mild, and receptive, Have keen faculties, And who have practiced the profound path Under immeasurable buddhas. 
I predict that such people Will attain the path of the buddhas In their future lives, Because they keep the buddhas in mind With profound thoughts And practice pure conduct. 
Hearing that they shall attain buddhahood They will be ﬁlled with great joy; Because a buddha knows their intentions He teaches the Mahayana. 
Those śrāvakas or bodhisattvas, Who have heard even a single verse Of the Dharma that I have taught, Will all become buddhas. There can be no doubt about it. 
In the buddha worlds of the ten directions There is only the Dharma of the single vehicle. Apart from the skillful means of the buddhas, There is neither a second nor a third . 
A buddha merely uses provisional words In order to lead sentient beings. All the buddhas appear in the world To teach the wisdom of the buddhas. 
Only this one thing is real, The other two are not true. In the end, A buddha does not save sentient beings Through an inferior vehicle. 
The buddhas themselves Abide in the Mahayana; The Dharma that they have attained, Is adorned with meditation, wisdom, and power; And through these they save the sentient beings. 
I would be ungenerous If I were to lead and inspire even a single person Through an inferior vehicle, Having attained the highest path, The universal Dharma of the Mahayana. This is simply not possible. 
If anyone takes refuge in the Buddha, The Tathāgata will not deceive him. A Tathāgata has neither stinginess nor jealousy And has detached himself From the evils of the phenomenal world. 
That is why the buddhas of the ten directions Are the only ones who have no fear. 
Having a body adorned with the marks of a buddha, Emitting a ray of light that illuminates the worlds And revered by immeasurable sentient beings, I teach the signs of the true aspects Of the phenomenal world. 
O Śāriputra! You should now know That originally I made a vow To make all sentient beings my equal Without any difference. 
Now I have already fulﬁlled this vow That I made in the past. I will lead and inspire all sentient beings And cause them to enter the path of the buddhas. 
If I met sentient beings And taught them till the end the path of the buddhas, Those with little understanding Would be confused and perplexed And would not accept the teaching. 
I know that these sentient beings Have never cultivated the roots of good merit. 
They are attached to the desires of the ﬁve senses, Disordered by delusion and passion, And have fallen into the three troubled states of being Because of these desires. They are wandering through The six transmigratory states, Tormented by every kind of suffering. They are continually being born as tiny embryos In one world after another. 
These people of few qualities and little merit Are afﬂicted by various sufferings. 
They enter into the jungle of sixty-two false views Such as “This exists” or “This does not exist.” They are so ﬁrmly and deeply attached to false teachings That they cannot get rid of them. They are arrogant, proud, deceitful, and dishonest. They have heard neither the names Nor the True Dharma of the buddhas For thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas. Such people are difﬁcult to save. 
That is why, O Śāriputra, I devised the method of teaching The way to extinguish all suffering through nirvana. 
Even though I taught nirvana, It is not the true extinction. Every existing thing from the very beginning Has always had the mark of quiescence. 
The heirs of the buddhas who practice this path Will thereafter become buddhas in the future. With the power of skillful means I have presented the teachings of the three vehicles. 
Yet all of the Bhagavats Teach the path of the single vehicle. This great assembly Should now rid itself of confusion. The words of the buddhas are not inconsistent. There is only the single vehicle; There is no other. 
In the past innumerable kalpas There appeared immeasurable and incalculable buddhas, Hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis in number, Who have attained parinirvāṇa. 
All the Bhagavats Taught the characteristics of all dharmas With the power of innumerable skillful means, Using various examples and illustrations. 
All these Bhagavats Taught the Dharma of the single vehicle, Led and inspired immeasurable sentient beings, And enabled them to enter the path of the buddhas. 
Understanding the deepest desires of the entire world Of the devas, humans, and other beings, The Great Sage Lord has illuminated The highest meaning With diverse skillful means. 
All those sentient beings Who encountered and heard the teaching Of the buddhas of the past, And who accumulated various merits Through acts of giving , integrity , perseverance , Diligence , meditation , and wisdom Have certainly attained the path of the buddhas. 
And after the parinirvāṇa of the buddhas, Those sentient beings with well-governed minds Have certainly attained the path of the buddhas. 
After the buddhas attained parinirvāṇa, All those who paid homage to the relics, Who made myriads of koṭis of stupas Extensively and beautifully adorned with gold, silver, Crystal, mother of pearl, agate, ruby, Lapis lazuli, and pearl; Those who made rock stupas, Stupas out of sandal, aloe, deodar, and other woods, As well as brick, tile, mud, and other materials; All those who made buddha stupas Out of piles of earth in desolate places; And even children in play Who made buddha stupas out of heaps of sand— All such people have certainly attained The path of the buddhas. 
And all those who made images of the buddhas Carved with their extraordinary marks Have certainly attained the path of the buddhas. 
All those who made buddha images Out of the seven treasures, Decorated with brass, copper, pewter, lead, Tin, iron, wood, mud, glue, lacquer, and cloth, Have certainly attained the path of the buddhas. 
All those who made or had others make buddha images Painted with the one hundred embellishing Marks of merit, Have certainly attained the path of the buddhas. 
This even includes children in play Who have drawn a buddha image With a blade of grass or a twig, Brush or ﬁngernail. Such people, having gradually accumulated merit And perfected great compassion, Have certainly attained the path of the buddhas. 
Leading and inspiring the bodhisattvas, They save countless sentient beings. 
All those who paid homage to stupas, Sculpted or painted images, Honoring them with ﬂowers, perfumes, Banners, and canopies; Those who paid homage with all kinds of sweet music— With drums, horns, conches, pipes, ﬂutes, lutes, harps, Mandolins, gongs, and cymbals; Those who joyfully praised the qualities of the buddhas With various songs or Even with a single low-pitched sound, Have certainly attained the path of the buddhas. 
Those who, even with distracted minds Have offered a single ﬂower to a painted image Will in time see innumerable buddhas. 
Or those who have done obeisance to images, Or merely pressed their palms together, Or raised a single hand, or nodded their heads, Will in due time see immeasurable buddhas. 
They will attain the highest path And extensively save innumerable sentient beings. They will enter nirvana without residue Just as a ﬁre goes out after its wood is exhausted. 
Those who, even with distracted minds, Entered a stupa compound And chanted but once, “Homage to the Buddha!” Have certainly attained the path of the buddhas. 
Anyone who heard this teaching, Either in the presence of a past buddha Or after their parinirvāṇa, Has certainly attained the path of the buddhas. 
The future Bhagavats, Tathāgatas, Immeasurable in number, Will teach the Dharma with skillful means. 
All the Tathāgatas Will save sentient beings With immeasurable skillful means, Causing them to enter the wisdom of the buddhas That is free from corruption. Of those hearing this Dharma There will be no one Who will not become a buddha. 
The original vow of the buddhas Was to cause all sentient beings to universally Attain the very same buddha path That I have practiced. 
Even though the buddhas of the future Will teach hundreds of thousands of koṭis Of innumerable paths to the Dharma, Their teachings will actually be For the sake of the single vehicle. 
All the buddhas, the Best of Humans, Know that all dharmas are ever without substance And that the buddha-seeds germinate Through dependent origination. That is why they will teach the single vehicle. 
Having realized on the terrace of enlightenment That the state of the Dharma Is permanent and unchangeable in this world, The Leaders will teach with skillful means. 
The present buddhas of the ten directions, As numerous as the sands of the Ganges River, Revered by devas and humans, Appear in the world and teach this Dharma To make sentient beings feel at peace. 
They know the utmost tranquility, And although they teach various paths With the power of skillful means, Their teachings are actually for the buddha vehicle. 
Knowing the character of sentient beings— Their deep intentions, past acts, Wishes, persistence, and strength, Their keen or dull faculties— The buddhas teach with skillful means Using various explanations, illustrations, and words, In accordance with the capacities of sentient beings. 
Now I too reveal the path of the buddhas Through various paths to the Dharma To make sentient beings feel at peace. 
Through the power of my wisdom I know the dispositions and desires of sentient beings, And explain various teachings with skillful means, Enabling them all to obtain joy. 
O Śāriputra! 
You should know that through the buddha-eye I see beings wandering in the six states of existence Who are poor, deprived of merit and wisdom, Who are entering into the bitter path of birth and death, And are suffering repeatedly and without end. They are deeply attached to the desires of the ﬁve senses, Just as yaks are attached to their tails. Obstructed by greed, they are blind and cannot see. 
They do not seek the buddha who has great power, Nor the Dharma that cuts off suffering. Deeply immersed in false views, They try to eliminate suffering through suffering. I feel great compassion For such sentient beings. 
Sitting on the terrace of enlightenment for the ﬁrst time, Looking at the bodhi tree And walking about, During those twenty-one days I was thinking thus: The wisdom I have attained Is subtle and supreme. 
But the faculties of sentient beings are dull. They are attached to pleasures and blinded by delusion. How can I save such beings? 
Then Brahma and his devaputras, Śakra, The world-protectors of the four quarters, Maheśvara and the other devas, Together with a retinue of hundreds Of thousands of myriads of attendants, Paid their respects with palms pressed together And begged me to turn the wheel of the Dharma. 
Then I thought: If I only praise the buddha vehicles, Those beings who are submerged in suffering Will not believe this Dharma. 
Because they reject and do not believe the Dharma, They will fall into the three troubled states of being. 
I would rather not teach the Dharma And instead immediately enter nirvana. 
Then I thought of the power of skillful means Practiced by past buddhas. This path that I have attained Should now also be taught as the three vehicles. When I thought this, The buddhas of the ten directions appeared And with beautiful voices praised me saying: O Śākyamuni! 
O Supreme Leader, You have attained the highest Dharma, And yet still use the power of skillful means, Following all the other buddhas. 
We too have attained the best and utmost Dharma And with discretion have explained the three vehicles For the sake of sentient beings. 
Those with little wisdom Seek inferior teachings And do not believe that they will become buddhas. That is why we use skillful means And with discretion teach of various results. 
Although we teach the three vehicles It is just for the instruction of the bodhisattvas! O Śāriputra! 
You should know That when I heard this profound And beautiful roar of the Noble Lions, I chanted with joy, “Homage to the buddhas!” And I thought: 
Since I have been born in this deﬁled world I will follow the other buddhas And expound what they have expounded. After contemplating this I set out for Vārāṇasī. 
All dharmas have the tranquil character Of the Dharma: This could not be expressed in words, So I taught the ﬁve monks Through the power of skillful means. 
This I named: “Turning the Wheel of the Dharma,” And immediately the word nirvana appeared in it And the different designations for Arhat , Dharma, and Sangha. 
From a great many kalpas ago I have always taught like this: I have praised and illuminated The teaching of nirvana, Saying that it ends the sufferings Of birth and death. 
O Śāriputra! 
You should know that I see Immeasurable thousands of myriads of koṭis Of the Buddha’s heirs, Who, having set out for the buddha path, And heard the Dharma explained with skillful means, Have respectfully come before the Buddha. 
Then I thought: The reason why the Tathāgatas appear is To explain the wisdom of the buddhas. Now is precisely the right time for this! O Śāriputra! 
You should know that Those who have dull faculties and little wisdom, And those who are attached to mere signs and Are arrogant cannot accept this teaching. 
Now I am happy and fearless. Having openly set aside skillful means, I will teach only the highest path To all the bodhisattvas. 
Having heard this teaching The bodhisattvas and twelve hundred arhats, Freeing themselves from the web of doubt, Will all become buddhas. 
Just as the buddhas in the three periods Of the past, present, and future, Teach the true nature of the Dharma, Now I too will expound the Dharma That is beyond conception. 
All the buddhas Appear in worlds far away And are difﬁcult to meet. Even if they appear in this world It is difﬁcult to hear their teaching. 
Even in immeasurable, innumerable kalpas It is difﬁcult to hear this Dharma, And those who are able to hear this Dharma Are also hard to ﬁnd. 
They are just like the uḍumbara ﬂower Which appears only once in a very long while And, beloved by all, Is considered a wonder among devas and humans. 
Those who, hearing this teaching, Happily praise the buddhas By uttering even a single word Have already paid homage to all buddhas Of the three periods. Such people are even more extraordinary Than the uḍumbara ﬂower. 
All of you, have no doubts! I, the King of the Dharma, Now proclaim to the great assembly: I lead and inspire the bodhisattvas Only with the path of the single vehicle; I am here without disciples. 
O Śāriputra and all of you! The śrāvakas and bodhisattvas should know That this True Dharma is the hidden essence Of all the buddhas. 
In the troubled worlds of the ﬁve kinds of deﬁlement, Sentient beings are only attached to various desires, And ultimately do not seek the path of the buddhas. 
In the future the impure will hear The Buddha teach the single vehicle, But they will be confused and will not accept it. They will reject the Dharma And fall into the troubled states of being. 
To those who are modest and pure, And seek the path of the buddhas, I will praise extensively The path of the single vehicle. 
O Śāriputra! 
You should know that the Dharma Of all the buddhas is like this. They teach the Dharma With myriads of koṭis of skillful means, According to the capacities of sentient beings; The inexperienced cannot understand this. 
You have come to know with certainty the skillful means Of the buddhas, the Teachers of the World, That are expounded in accordance With people’s capacities. All of you, have no further doubts! Let great joy arise in your hearts And know that you will all become buddhas! 
A Parable Thereupon Śāriputra stood up ecstatic and joyful, pressed his palms together and, gazing at the Buddha, the Bhagavat, said: “Now, hearing the words of this Dharma from the Bhagavat, my heart is full of joy for I have experienced something unprecedented. 
What is the reason for this? 
In the past when I heard this Dharma from the Buddha and saw the bodhisattvas receive their predictions, I was not included. I grieved because I thought I had been deprived of the immeasurable wisdom and insight of the Tathāgata. 
“O Bhagavat! 
While I was dwelling alone under forest trees, whether sitting or walking, I was constantly thinking this: 
‘Since we have also realized the true nature of the Dharma, why has the Tathāgata tried to save us with the teachings of the inferior vehicle?’ “The fault is ours, not the Bhagavat’s. 
Why is this? 
If we had waited for your explanation about the way to achieve highest, complete enlightenment, we certainly would have been able to save ourselves by means of the Mahayana. 
However, we did not understand that you were teaching with skillful means, according to what is appropriate to us. When we ﬁrst heard the Buddha’s teaching, we immediately accepted, contemplated, and understood it. 
Since long ago I have reproached myself incessantly day and night. But now from the Buddha we have heard the unprecedented Dharma that we have never heard before, and it has removed all our doubts. “I have obtained peace and tranquility in body and mind. 
Today I have ﬁnally realized that I am truly the heir of the Buddha, born from the mouth of the Buddha, incarnated from the Dharma, and that I have inherited a part of the Buddha-Dharma.” Then Śāriputra, wanting to elaborate this meaning, spoke again in verse: When I heard the words of this Dharma, Experiencing something unprecedented, My heart overﬂowed with joy, And I was rid of all my doubts. 
From long ago, ever since I heard The teaching of the Buddha, I have not lost the Mahayana. The words of the buddhas are extremely rare And are capable of ridding sentient beings Of their suffering. Although I had already attained Freedom from corruption, By hearing the Buddha’s voice, I have also been rid of my anxiety. 
Whether I was dwelling In mountain valleys or under forest trees, Whether I was sitting or walking, Grieving and blaming myself deeply, I thought incessantly: How have I deceived myself! 
I am also the heir of the buddhas, Having entered the same incorruptible Dharma. Nevertheless, in the future, I shall not be able to explain the highest path. 
The golden color, the thirty-two marks, The ten powers, and the liberations Are all in the same Dharma; And yet I have not attained any of these. 
Moreover, such qualities as The eighty excellent and eighteen special characteristics Are completely lost to me. 
When I was wandering alone, I saw the Buddha in the great assembly Filling the ten directions with his fame And greatly beneﬁting sentient beings. I then thought: 
I have lost all these beneﬁts Because I have been deceiving myself. 
I thought about this constantly day and night And wanted to ask the Bhagavat: Have I or have I not lost these? 
I always saw the Bhagavat Praising the bodhisattvas. That is why I pondered over such matters As these both day and night. 
Now I have heard the words of the Buddha, Explaining to sentient beings The incorruptible Dharma, Which is difﬁcult to comprehend, And making them enter The terrace of enlightenment. 
Formerly, I was attached to false views And was a teacher of brahmans. The Bhagavat, knowing my mind, Removed the false views and taught nirvana. 
I got rid of false views completely And attained the teaching of emptiness. At that time I considered myself To have attained nirvana. 
But now I have become aware That this was not the real nirvana. 
When I become a buddha I shall be endowed with the thirty-two marks, And be honored by devas, humans, yakṣas, and nāgas. Only then can it be said that I have Permanently attained nirvana without residue. 
Before the great assembly The Buddha has proclaimed That I will become a buddha. After hearing these words of the Dharma, I was immediately rid of all my doubts. 
When I ﬁrst heard this teaching of the Buddha’s, I was greatly startled and thought: I wonder if Māra, acting like the Buddha, Is confusing me! 
But the Buddha, who teaches skillfully By means of various explanations and illustrations, Has made my mind tranquil like the ocean. While listening to him I was freed from the web of my doubts. 
The Buddha has said that immeasurable buddhas Who have attained parinirvāṇa in the past, Established in the use of skillful means, Have also taught this Dharma. 
Immeasurable buddhas in the present and future Will also teach this Dharma With various skillful means. 
The present Bhagavat, From the time he was born And renounced household life Until he obtained the path And turned the wheel of the Dharma, Has also taught through skillful means. 
The Bhagavat teaches the real path, But the Wicked One does not. Therefore I know deﬁnitely That it was not Māra acting like the Buddha. 
Because I fell into a web of doubt, I thought that Māra was impersonating the Buddha. When I heard the voice of the Buddha, Profound and very subtle, Fluently explaining the pure Dharma, I became full of great joy. 
My doubts are completely and forever exhausted, And I have achieved the true wisdom. 
I will deﬁnitely become a buddha, Honored by devas and humans. I will turn the wheel of the highest Dharma And lead and inspire the bodhisattvas. 
At that time the Buddha said to Śāriputra: “I will now reveal to you before the great assembly of devas, humans, śrāmaṇas, and brahmans that in the past, in the presence of two hundred thousand koṭis of buddhas, I led and inspired you constantly for the sake of the highest path. You have followed my instructions for a long time. 
Because I led you with skillful means, you were born in my Dharma. 
“O Śāriputra! 
In the past I inspired you to seek the buddha path. Yet just now you had completely forgotten this and considered yourself to have attained nirvana. 
Now, because I want you to remember the path that you practiced according to your original vow in the past, I will teach the śrāvakas the Mahayana sutra called the Lotus Sutra, the instruction for the bodhisattvas and treasured lore of the buddhas.’ “O Śāriputra! 
In the future after immeasurable, limitless, and inconceivable kalpas, you will have paid homage to thousands of myriads of koṭis of buddhas, preserved the True Dharma, and mastered the path practiced by the bodhisattvas. You will become a buddha called Padmaprabha, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, WellDeparted, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
“Your land will be called Viraja. Its earth will be level and pure, ornamented, peaceful, and rich. The devas and humans will prosper. 
The earth will be made of lapis lazuli with a well-planned network of roads like a chessboard bordered with golden cords. 
Rows of seven-jeweled trees, which are always full of ﬂowers and fruits, will line the borders of these roads. 
The Tathāgata Padma prabha will also lead and inspire sentient beings by means of the three vehicles. 
When that buddha appears, even though his will not be a troubled world, he will teach the three vehicles because of his original vow. 
This kalpa will be called Mahāratnaprati maṇḍita, meaning ‘Adorned with Great Jewels.’ Why will it be called Mahā ratna pratimaṇḍita? 
Because in that world the bodhisattvas will be like great jewels. 
The number of these bodhisattvas will be immeasurable, limitless, inconceivable, and beyond all comparison, known only by those with the power of the Buddha’s wisdom. 
“When they want to walk they will step on jeweled ﬂowers. 
And these bodhisattvas will not be those who are just setting out. Over a long time they will have planted roots of good merit and practiced the pure path of discipline and integrity in the presence of immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of buddhas. 
They will always be praised by the buddhas and continually practice the buddha wisdom. They will be endowed with transcendent powers and know well all the teachings of the Dharma. They will be honest, without falsity, and ﬁrm in recollection. 
That world will be ﬁlled with bodhisattvas like these. “O Śāriputra! 
The lifespan of this buddha Padmaprabha will be twelve intermediate kalpas, not including the period after he becomes a prince and before he becomes a buddha; and the life span of the people in that world will be eight intermediate kalpas. 
“After these twelve intermediate kalpas have passed, the Tathāgata Padmaprabha will predict Bodhisattva Dhṛti pari pūrṇa’s attainment of highest, complete enlightenment and will address the monks, saying: 
After the parinirvāṇa of the Buddha Padma prabha the True Dharma will remain in the world for thirty-two intermediate kalpas and the Semblance Dharma will also remain in the world for thirty-two intermediate kalpas.” Then the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this again, spoke these verses: O Śāriputra! 
Having paid homage to innumerable buddhas, Perfected the bodhisattva practice, And the qualities, including the ten powers, You will attain the highest path. 
After immeasurable kalpas have passed, The kalpa will be called Prabhūtaratna, And the world will be called Viraja, Pure and without dirt. 
The earth will be made of lapis lazuli And the roads, bordered with golden cords, Will be lined with variegated trees of the seven treasures Which are always full of ﬂowers and fruits. 
The bodhisattvas in that world Will be always ﬁrm in recollection. All of them will be completely endowed With transcendent powers and the perfections And will have properly practiced the bodhisattva path In the presence of innumerable buddhas. 
When this buddha becomes a prince He will abdicate his kingship And give up his worldly fame. Bearing his last body, He will renounce household life And attain the path of the Buddha. 
This Buddha Padmaprabha will live in the world For twelve intermediate kalpas. And the lifespan of the people in this world Will be eight intermediate kalpas. 
After the parinirvāṇa of this buddha, The True Dharma will last in the world For thirty-two intermediate kalpas, During which time many sentient beings Will be saved. After the extinction of the True Dharma, The Semblance Dharma will last For thirty-two intermediate kalpas. The relics of the Buddha Will be distributed widely And devas and humans will pay them homage. 
All that the Buddha Padmaprabha does Will be exactly like this. That very Best of Humans, Who will be foremost and without comparison, Is none other than you. 
You should be delighted to hear this! 
At that time the fourfold assembly of monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen and the great assembly of devas, nāgas, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṃnaras, and mahoragas saw Śāriputra receive his prediction of highest, complete enlightenment in the presence of the Buddha. They rejoiced greatly and became immeasurably happy. All of them removed their outer garments and proffered them to the Buddha as offerings. 
Śakra, the lord of devas, and Brahma, together with innumerable devaputras also made offerings to the Buddha of their heavenly beautiful garments, heavenly māndārava ﬂowers, and great māndārava ﬂowers. 
Their heavenly garments ﬂoated and ﬂuttered in the air, while in the sky the devas played hundreds of thousands of myriads of kinds of music together at one time. They rained down various heavenly ﬂowers and said: “In the past the Buddha turned the wheel of the Dharma for the ﬁrst time in Vārā ṇasī. Now he has turned the wheel of the utmost and greatest Dharma again.” Thereupon the devaputras spoke these verses in order to explain this again: 
In the past you turned the wheel of the Dharma Of the Four Truths in Vārāṇasī; And you illuminated and explained the Dharma Of the origination and extinction of the ﬁve aggregates. 
You have now again turned the wheel Of the subtlest, utmost, and greatest Dharma. This Dharma is extremely profound; Only a few will be able to believe it. 
Since long ago we have frequently heard The teaching of the Bhagavat, Yet we have never before heard Such a profound and supreme teaching. 
When the Bhagavat taught this Dharma We were all delighted. 
And now Śāriputra, possessed of great wisdom, Has received his prediction from the Bhagavat. In the same way, we too, Shall certainly become buddhas. 
We shall become peerless, Unrivaled in all the world. The path of the Buddha, Which is difﬁcult to understand, Is taught with skillful means According to what is appropriate for sentient beings. 
May the merits of our beneﬁcial acts, Whether of the past or the present, And those acquired in meeting the Buddha, Be completely transferred to the buddha path. 
At that time Śāriputra said this to the Buddha: “O Bhagavat! 
I now have no further doubts. I have received the prediction of the highest supreme enlightenment in the presence of the Buddha. 
“When all those twelve hundred who have attained complete mental discipline were still under training in the past, the Buddha constantly led and inspired them, saying: ‘My teaching overcomes birth, old age, illness, and death and it leads to nirvana.’ Both those who were still in training and those who were not thought that they were free from false views about the self, existence and nonexistence, and declared that they had attained nirvana. 
Yet now, in the presence of the Bhagavat, they have heard what they have never heard before and have fallen into doubt. 
“Splendid, O Bhagavat! 
I entreat you to explain to the fourfold assembly the reason why, and free them from their doubts!” Then the Buddha said to Śāriputra: “Did I not previously tell you that all the Buddha Bhagavats explain the Dharma with various explanations and illustrations using skillful means, all for the sake of highest, complete enlightenment!? 
All of these teachings are for leading and inspiring the bodhisattvas. 
“Moreover, Śāriputra, I will now clarify what I mean with illustrations. Those with wisdom will be able to understand through these illustrations. “O Śāriputra! 
Suppose there were an aged and extremely afﬂuent man, either in a town, city, or country, who has immeasurable wealth, abundant estates, mansions, and servants. 
He has a spacious house, yet it only has a single entrance. Suppose many people live there, as many as one, two, or even ﬁve hundred people. 
The buildings are in poor repair, the fences and walls are crumbling, the pillar bases are rotten, and the beams and framework are dangerously tilted. “Suddenly and unexpectedly, ﬁres break out everywhere, setting the house swiftly aﬂame. 
The children of this man, ten, twenty, or thirty in number are in the house. 
“The afﬂuent man, seeing the ﬁre breaking out everywhere, becomes alarmed and terriﬁed. He thinks: I am capable of escaping through the burning entrance in safety, but my children are absorbed in play within the burning house and are not aware , do not know, are not alarmed or terriﬁed, and the ﬁre is approaching them! They are not troubled about their suffering nor do they intend to leave the house. 
Since I am still physically strong I could take the children out of the house in the folds of my garment or on top of a desk. “He further thought: There is only one entrance to this house and it is very narrow. 
The children, who are immature and still unaware, are attached to their place of play. They may fall into danger and be burned by the ﬁre. 
I should now tell them of the danger; this house is already burning! They must escape as quickly as they can to avoid being burned by the ﬁre! “After considering this he urged the children according to his thought: Children! 
“Although their father in his concern has given them the proper advice, the children are immersed in their play and do not accept it; they are neither alarmed nor afraid and have no intention of leaving . 
Moreover, they do not even know what a ﬁre is, the condition of the house, or what they may lose. 
They merely run about, back and forth, looking at their father. “Thereupon the afﬂuent man thought: This house is already engulfed in ﬂames. If my children and I do not get out, we shall perish in the ﬁre. 
I will now use skillful means to help my children escape from this disaster. “Since the father already knew that his children were attached to various rare toys and unusual things that each of them liked, he said to them: The toys you are fond of are rare and hard to obtain. If you do not take them you will certainly regret it later. 
Go play with them. 
Children! Run out of this burning house immediately and I will give you whatever you want! “The children, hearing what their father had said about the rare toys, became excited and, in their eagerness to get to them they pushed each other out of the way in a mad rush out of the burning house. 
“Then the afﬂuent man saw that his children had got out safely and were sitting unharmed in an open area at a crossroad. He was relieved, happy, and joyful. 
The children said to their father: Father, please give us the toys you promised: those carts, one yoked to a sheep, one to a deer, and one to an ox! “O Śāriputra, the afﬂuent man then gave each child the same kind of large cart. 
These carts were tall and spacious, adorned with various jewels, and encircled with railings full of hanging bells. 
On the tops of the carts were canopies also decorated with various kinds of jewels. These carts were draped with jeweled cords and hung with ﬂower garlands. They were thickly piled with fabrics, and red pillows had been placed about. 
These carts were each yoked to an ox with a spotlessly white hide. These oxen had beautiful bodies with powerful muscles, even gaits, and were as swift as the wind; and there were many attendants guarding them. 
Because the man had great and immeasurable wealth and his abundant storehouses were full. He thus thought further: Since my treasure has no limit, I should not give my children inferior carts. 
These are my children and I love them all equally. 
I have an immeasurable number of large carts such as these, decorated with the seven treasures. I should equally distribute them to each child without discrimination. 
Why is this? 
Even if I gave carts like these to everyone in the country, their number would not be exhausted. Why should I not give them to my own children? 
“At that time, the children each climbed into a great cart and had an unprecedented experience, one beyond their original expectations. “O Śāriputra! What do you think about this? 
This afﬂuent man gave to his children equally a large cart decorated with precious treasures. 
Has he deceived them or not?” Śāriputra replied: 
The afﬂuent man only tried to help his children escape from the disastrous ﬁre. He saved their lives and did not deceive them. This is by no means a deception. 
Because by saving their lives they obtained marvelous toys. Moreover, they were saved from the burning house by skillful means. 
“O Bhagavat! If this afﬂuent man had not given them even the smallest cart, it still would not have been a deception. 
Why is this? 
Because this afﬂuent man thought before: I will help my children escape with skillful means. “This is why it was not a deception. 
How much more so, since the afﬂuent man, knowing that he had immeasurable wealth and wanting to beneﬁt them equally, gave each of his children a large cart.” The Buddha said to Śāriputra: 
It is exactly as you have said. 
O Śāriputra, the Tathāgata is also just like this. 
He has attained immeasurable wisdom, insight, power, and fearlessness, as well as great transcendent powers and the power of wisdom. He has attained the perfection of skillful means and of wisdom. With his great mercy and compassion he incessantly and indefatigably seeks the welfare of all beings and beneﬁts them all. “The Tathāgata appears in the triple world, which is like a decaying old house on ﬁre, to rescue sentient beings from the ﬁre of birth, old age, illness, and death, anxiety, sorrow, suffering, distress, delusion, blindness, and the three poisons of greed, hatred, and ignorance. 
“The Tathāgatas see all sentient beings burning in the ﬁre of birth, old age, illness, and death, anxiety, sorrow, suffering, and distress. Because of the desires of the ﬁve senses and the desire for monetary proﬁt they also experience various kinds of suffering. 
Because of their attachment and pursuits they experience various kinds of suffering in the present; and in the future they will suffer in the states of existence of hell, animals, and hungry ghosts . 
If they are born in the heavens or in the human world they will experience a variety of sorrows such as suffering from poverty and destitution, separation from loved ones, or suffering from encounters with those they dislike. 
“Although sentient beings are immersed in such sorrows, they rejoice and play. They are not aware, shocked, startled, or disgusted nor do they seek release. 
Running around in the burning house of the triple world, they experience great suffering and yet they do not realize it. 
“O Śāriputra! Seeing these things the Buddha thought: Since I am the father of sentient beings I must rid them of their immeasurable suffering and distress. I will cause them to rejoice through the immeasurable and limitless pleasure of the buddha wisdom. 
The Tathāgata further thought: If I proclaim the Tathāgata’s wisdom, insight, power, and fear lessness to sentient beings with my transcendent powers and the power of my wisdom alone, without using skillful means, it will be impossible to save them. 
Why is this? 
Because these sentient beings have not escaped from birth, old age, illness, and death; anxiety, sorrow, suffering, and distress; and are being burned in the blazing house of the triple world. 
How would they be able to understand the Buddha’s wisdom? 
“O Śāriputra! 
Although that afﬂuent man had physical strength he did not use it. He only earnestly employed skillful means to save his children from the disaster of the burning house, and later he gave each of them a large cart decorated with precious treasures. 
The Tathāgata is exactly like this. “Although the Tathāgata has power and fearlessness he does not use them, but rescues sentient beings from the burning house of the triple world only through wisdom and skillful means, teaching the three vehicles to the śrāvakas, pratyekabuddhas, and the buddhas, saying: Do not take pleasure in living in this burning house of the triple world. And do not thirst after inferior objects, sounds, smells, ﬂavors, and tangibles. 
If you are attached to these objects and have desires, then you will be burned. 
Leave the triple world in haste and you will obtain the three vehicles—the vehicles for the śrāvakas, pratyekabuddhas, and buddhas. I deﬁnitely guarantee this to you. 
In the end it will come true. You should be diligent and persistent! “The Tathāgata attracts sentient beings through this skillful means, saying further: You should know that the Noble Ones praise the teachings of these three vehicles that are self-directed, unrestricted, and independent. 
Those beings, wise by nature, who accept the Dharma from the Buddha Bhagavat, who are diligent, persistent, and wish to escape from the triple world quickly, and who are seeking nirvana, are all practicing the śrāvaka vehicle. They are like those children who left the burning house seeking the cart yoked to a sheep. 
“Those beings who accept the Dharma of the Buddha Bhagavat, who are diligent and persevere in seeking the wisdom of the Self-generated One and enjoy tranquility for themselves, who profoundly know the causes of and reasons for existence, are all practicing the pratyekabuddha vehicle. They are just like those children who left the burning house seeking the cart yoked to a deer. 
“Those beings who accept the Dharma of the Buddha Bhagavat, who are diligent and persevere in seeking the wisdom of the Omniscient One, the wisdom of the Buddha, the wisdom of the Self-generated One, the wisdom acquired without a teacher, the wisdom and insight, powers, and fearlessness of the Tathāgata; who are compassionate, put immeasurable sentient beings at ease, beneﬁt devas and humans, and save all beings, are all practicing the Mahayana. Bodhisattvas are called mahāsattvas because they seek this vehicle. They are just like those children who left the burning house seeking the cart yoked to an ox. “O Śāriputra! 
That afﬂuent man saw his children leave the burning house safely and arrive at a safe place. Knowing that he had immeasurable wealth, he gave a large cart equally to each child. The Tathāgata is exactly like this. 
As the father of all sentient beings he sees that immeasurable thousands of koṭis of sentient beings escape from the dangers, sufferings, and fears of the triple world through the gates of the Buddha’s teaching and attain the pleasure of nirvana. “Then the Tathāgata thought: Because I possess the treasure house of the Dharma of all the buddhas, which contains immeasurable limitless wisdom, power, and fearlessness, and because all sentient beings are my children, I will give them equally the Mahayana. I will not allow anyone to attain nirvana merely for himself but will cause everyone to attain it through the Tathāgata’s nirvana. 
At ﬁrst that afﬂuent man attracted his children with three kinds of carts, then later gave them only the safest and best large cart, adorned with jewels. 
Moreover, that afﬂuent man was never accused of telling a lie. 
The Tathāgata is exactly like this. He tells no lies. “In the beginning the Tathāgata teaches the three vehicles in order to lead sentient beings. And later he saves them through only the Mahayana. 
Why is this? 
Because the Tathāgata possesses the treasure house of the Dharma, which contains immeasurable wisdom, power, and fearlessness. And although he is able to give the teaching of the Mahayana to all sentient beings, not all of them can accept it. “O Śāriputra! 
You should know that the buddhas, with the power of skillful means, teach the single buddha vehicle, dividing and teaching it as three.” Then the Buddha, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this again, spoke these verses: 
Suppose there were an afﬂuent man Who had a large house, And this house was very old, On the verge of collapsing. The halls were extremely dangerous, The pillar bases rotten and disintegrating, The beams and framework dangerously tilted, And the stairways were falling apart. The fences and walls were cracked, The plaster was peeling off, The thatched roof was falling down, The rafters and eaves were coming apart, The partitions were everywhere askew, And the whole place was covered with ﬁlth. 
Five hundred people lived there, And moving around helter-skelter were Kites, owls, hawks, eagles, crows, magpies, Doves, pigeons, lizards, snakes, vipers, Scorpions, centipedes, millipedes, Newts, myriapods, ferrets, badgers, mice, Rats, and other harmful creatures. 
It was ﬁlled with stench, And there were places overﬂowing with excrement. All kinds of bugs Had gathered there. 
There were foxes, wolves, and vermin Devouring, trampling, and gnawing on corpses, Scattering bones and ﬂesh about; And a pack of dogs, Forcing each other out of the way, Rushed to the spot— Frightened and exhausted from hunger, They were searching everywhere for food, Fighting among themselves, snatching at food, Biting, snarling, and barking at each other. 
Ogres of the mountains and valleys, Yakṣas, and demons were everywhere Devouring human ﬂesh. 
There were various poisonous insects, All kinds of harmful birds of prey, And beasts who were producing, rearing, And protecting their offspring. 
Yakṣas were scrabbling and ﬁghting to devour them. And after sating themselves, Evil thoughts would arise in them. The sound of their ﬁghting Was terrifying. 
The kumbhāṇḍa demons were crouching on the ground, Sometimes rising up a foot or two. Roaming about, pleasing themselves as they liked, They would catch two legs of a dog, Beat it until it could not bark And grabbing the dog’s neck with their legs, Terrify it for their own amusement. 
There were also other demons living there With large bodies, naked, dark, and gaunt. They were screaming horrifying howls, Crying out while searching for food. 
Other demons were there, Some with needlelike throats, While others had necks Like a cow’s head; Some had those of human ﬂesh-eaters or dog-devourers. Their hair was disheveled like rank weeds And they were destructive and malicious. Driven by hunger and thirst, They were crying and scurrying about. 
Yakṣas, hungry ghosts, And various malicious birds and beasts Were peering out of the windows And running frantically in all directions, Driven by hunger. 
In this house, with its immeasurable terrors, There were many such horrendous things as these. 
Now suppose this old and decaying house Belonged to a man, And this man came out from it a short distance. 
Soon after, the house suddenly Burst into ﬂames behind him. The ﬁre instantly spread in all directions. 
The frame, beams, rafters, and pillars exploded, And shaking, split and crashed, While the fences and walls collapsed. 
All the demons screamed out loudly. 
The hawks, eagles, other birds, And kumbhāṇḍa demons, panicked and terriﬁed, Could not get out. 
Malicious beasts and poisonous insects Concealed themselves in holes. 
There were also piśāca demons dwelling there Who, because of little merit, Were chased by the ﬂames. They were tearing at each other, Drinking blood and eating ﬂesh. 
A horde of vermin had already died off, And the large malicious beasts Raced to devour them, While the smoke of the stench ﬂowed And ﬁlled everywhere. 
As the centipedes, millipedes, And poisonous snakes rushed, Burning, out of their holes The kumbhāṇḍa demons devoured them One after another. 
The hungry ghosts, with their hair on ﬁre, Ravenous, thirsty, and suffering from the heat, Frantically scurried about. 
In this way, the house was extremely terrifying With poison and ﬁre, And disasters more than one. 
Then the householder, who was standing Outside the entrance of the house, Heard someone say: Just a moment ago, In the midst of their play, Your children entered this house. Being young and ignorant, They are attached to playing games. Hearing this, the afﬂuent man was startled And went into the burning house To save them from the disaster of the ﬁre. 
As he thought ﬁt, he warned the children And explained the various dangers: There are malicious demons, poisonous insects, And the ﬁre is raging everywhere. There are endless horrors, One right after another. 
There are poisonous snakes, lizards, vipers, Yakṣas, kumbhāṇḍa demons, vermin, Foxes, dogs, hawks, eagles, kites, Owls, and centipedes, all acutely suffering From hunger and thirst And all extremely terrifying. These horrors are difﬁcult to deal with, How much more so the conﬂagration! 
But the children, being ignorant, Would not listen to their father’s warning. Still attached to their games, They kept right on playing. 
Thereupon the afﬂuent man thought: My children by doing this Increase my distress! 
There is nothing to enjoy now in this house. Nevertheless, my children who are absorbed in play Will not accept my instructions And so will be hurt by the ﬁre. Then he immediately thought That he should advise his children Using various skillful means, and said: I have a variety of unusual toys Such as ﬁne carts adorned with beautiful treasures, Yoked to sheep, deer, and oxen. 
I had these carts made for you. Play with them as you like! Hearing about these carts, The children immediately started To push each other out of the way To get out of the house. Arriving at an open area, They escaped from the disaster. 
The afﬂuent man, seeing that his children Had escaped from the burning house And were standing at the crossroads, Sat down on his lion seat. 
Then he joyously said: Now I am happy! 
It is extremely difﬁcult to raise these children. Foolish and ignorant, They entered a dangerous house Full of various poisonous insects, Terrifying ogres from mountains and valleys, And a raging ﬁre that broke out in all directions. 
In spite of this, These children were attached to playing their games. 
But by causing them to escape from the disaster, I have saved them. 
Therefore, my people, I now feel at ease. Thereupon the children, Seeing their father sitting in peace, Approached him saying: Please, father, Give us the three kinds of carts Adorned with treasures That you just promised us, When you said that if we, your children, came out You would give us three kinds of carts Just as we like. Now is the right time. 
He had a number of great carts made, Adorned with various precious things Like gold, silver, lapis lazuli, Mother-of-pearl, and agate. 
They were beautifully decorated, Encircled with railings, And were covered with hanging bells Attached to golden cords. 
Over them was hung a net of pearls With golden ﬂower tassels Hanging down everywhere. They were all completely Decorated in a variety of colors. 
The bedding was made of soft silk That was covered with An extremely ﬁne carpet of spotless white Which cost thousands of koṭis. 
There were large white oxen, Healthy and powerful with beautiful bodies, Yoked to the jeweled carts, And they were guarded by many attendants. 
When they were given these ﬁne carts, The children were joyful and excited. They got on the carts And drove delightedly all about. Amusing themselves in play, They mastered them without difﬁculties. 
The Buddha said to Śāriputra: I am also like this. I am the father of the world, The best of the sages. 
All sentient beings are my children. They are deeply attached to worldly pleasures And have no wisdom. 
There is no peace in the triple world, Just like in the burning house, Which is full of various suffering And which is extremely terrifying. 
There are always the sufferings Of birth, old age, illness, and death. Such ﬁres as these burn endlessly. 
The Tathāgata, who has already left The burning house of the triple world, Lives in tranquility And dwells at ease in the forest. 
Now this triple world is my property And the sentient beings in it are my children. 
There are now many dangers here And I am the only one who can protect them. 
Although I give them advice, They do not accept it, Because they are tainted with desires And have deep attachments. 
On this occasion I teach the three vehicles Using skillful means. Realizing the sufferings of the triple world, I reveal and explain it To cause sentient beings to Escape from the mundane path. 
If these children are resolute, They are endowed with the three knowledges And six transcendent powers. Or they can become pratyekabuddhas or Bodhisattvas who have reached The stage of nonretrogression. 
O Śāriputra! I explain the single buddha vehicle To sentient beings, using this illustration. 
If you are able to accept what I say, You will all attain the buddha path. 
This vehicle is subtle, pure, and peerless. There is nothing superior to it In all the worlds. This is what the Buddha enjoys. 
All the sentient beings should praise, Honor, and revere it. 
There are immeasurable thousands of koṭis Of powers, liberations, meditations, Wisdoms, and other attributes of the Buddha. 
I cause my children to obtain such a vehicle And let them play continuously, Day and night, for kalpas. I cause the bodhisattvas as well as the śrāvakas To board this jeweled vehicle, And lead them directly To the terrace of enlightenment. 
For this reason, There is no other vehicle but The skillful means of the buddhas, Even if one seeks in all the ten directions. I tell you, O Śāriputra: All of you are my children, And I am thus your father. 
Since you were burned by the ﬁre Of various sufferings for many kalpas, I saved you all By leading you out of the triple world. 
Although I have previously told you About your parinirvāṇa, You have only extinguished birth and death And have not actually attained nirvana. 
You should now seek only The wisdom of the Buddha. 
If there are any bodhisattvas in this assembly, They should listen singlemindedly To the real teaching of all the buddhas. 
Those sentient beings Whom the Buddha Bhagavats Lead and inspire with skillful means Are all bodhisattvas. 
Because people have little knowledge And are deeply attached to pleasures, I teach them the truth of suffering . 
And those sentient beings rejoice, Having attained Such an unprecedented experience. The truth of suffering taught by the Buddha Is nothing but the truth. 
To those who do not know the origin of suffering (i.e., the Second Noble Truth), Who are deeply attached to its causes And unable to abandon them even for a while, I teach the truth about the path to its cessation Using skillful means. 
All the causes of suffering Originate from excessive craving. When this craving is extinguished, The source is removed. The cessation of suffering Is called the Third Truth. 
One practices the path leading to its cessation (i.e., the Fourth Noble Truth] In order to attain the truth of cessation. Removing the bonds of sufferings is called liberation. 
In what sense have these people attained liberation? 
They have merely removed false views And called that liberation. But actually, they have not yet completely attained it. 
The Buddha has explained that these people Have not actually attained nirvana: 
I do not intend to lead them to nirvana Because they have not yet attained the highest path. 
I am the Lord of the Dharma And have mastered the Dharma. I appear in the world To cause sentient beings to be at peace. 
O, you, Śāriputra! 
Teach this my Dharma sign To beneﬁt the world! Wherever you may go, Never propagate it recklessly. 
You should know that those who hear, Rejoice, and fully accept it Have reached the stage of nonretrogression. 
Those who accept the teaching of this sutra Have formerly seen the buddhas in the past, Honored, and paid homage to them, And also heard this teaching. 
Those who are able to accept what you teach, Will see me, you, the monks and the bodhisattvas. 
This very Lotus Sutra shall be taught Only to the profoundly wise. Those of superﬁcial awareness who hear it Will become confused and will not comprehend it. 
This sutra is beyond the comprehension Of all the śrāvakas and pratyekabuddhas. 
O, you, Śāriputra! 
Even you understood this sutra only through faith; It is no wonder that the other disciples cannot. 
They accept this sutra Because they believe the Buddha’s teaching, But it is beyond their intellectual comprehension. 
O Śāriputra! 
Never teach this sutra To those who are arrogant and lazy, Or to those who hold False views about the self. 
Never teach it to those people Of superﬁcial awareness, Who are deeply attached To the desires of the ﬁve senses, Since even if they heard it, They would not understand. 
Those people who will not accept And who disparage this sutra, Will consequently destroy the seed of the Buddha In the entire world. 
Now listen to what I teach About the results of the errors of those people Who frown upon and have doubts about this sutra. 
Listen also to what I teach Concerning the results of the errors of those people, Who, whether at the time Of the Buddha’s presence in this world Or after his parinirvāṇa, disparage this sutra, And despise, hate, and hold grudges Against the people who recite, copy, and preserve it. 
When such people die, They will go to the Avīci Hell, And after spending a kalpa there, Will be born in the same way Again and again for innumerable kalpas. 
After coming out of this hell, They will be reborn as animals. 
If born as dogs or vermin, Their bodies will be emaciated, dark-spotted, Devoid of hair, with scabies and leprosy. 
Tormented, hated, and despised by people, They will constantly suffer from hunger and thirst. With withered bones and ﬂesh, They will be in anguish while living And covered with stones after death. 
Because they destroyed The seed of the Buddha, They will suffer the consequences Of their errors. 
If they are born as camels or mules, They will always have heavy burdens to carry. They will be whipped repeatedly And think of nothing but water and grass. 
It is because they disparaged this sutra That they suffer the consequences of their errors in this way. 
If they are born as vermin and enter a village, Children will beat them because they have scabies, Leprosy, and perhaps a missing eye. At times they will be tortured even to death. 
After dying, They will be reborn as giant snakes With great bodies as long as ﬁve hundred yojanas. Deaf, dumb, legless, slithering on their bellies, Eaten at by small insects, They will suffer day and night without respite. 
They suffer the consequences of their errors in this way, Because they disparaged this sutra. 
If they are born as humans, They will have dull faculties And be runts who twitch and are crippled, Blind, deaf, and humpbacked. 
No matter what they may say People will not believe them. Their breath will always be foul. They will be snatched at by demons. 
Being poor and degraded and enslaved by others, They will be emaciated from many illnesses And will have nowhere to turn. When they approach others, They will be disdained. 
Even if they manage to get something They will immediately lose it. 
Even if they study medicine And cure themselves according to the correct method, They will suffer from other illnesses again And may even die. 
When they get sick No one will tend to them; And even if they take the proper medicine Their pain will increase. 
Every hand will be turned against them, Threatening them, pilfering and stealing from them. They will fall helplessly into this plight Because of their transgressions. 
Such erring people will never see The Buddha, the king of seers, Preaching the Dharma and leading and inspiring people. 
Such people will always be born Into difﬁcult circumstances. Crazed, unheeding, and unthinking, They will never hear the teaching. 
They will be born deaf and dumb, With defective faculties For as many immeasurable kalpas As the sands of the Ganges River. 
Though they will always ﬁnd themselves in hell, They will feel as if they were playing In a pleasure garden. Although they are in other troubled states of being, They will feel as if they were in their own home. They will live among camels, mules, boars, and dogs. 
These are the results of their error In disparaging this sutra. 
If they are born as human beings, They will be deaf, blind, mute, Impoverished, and decrepit. Such will be their adornments. 
They will have dropsy, gonorrhea, Scabies, leprosy, and tumors. Such diseases as these will be their clothing. 
Their bodies will always be foul, ﬁlthy, and impure. Their deep attachment to false views About the self will cause Their anger and passion to increase. Their sexual desires will be insatiable, With either birds or beasts as their objects. 
These are the results of their Errors in disparaging this sutra. The Buddha said to Śāriputra: If one were to explain The consequences of the errors Of those who disparage this sutra, It would take more than a kalpa. 
For that reason I am now telling you Never to expound this sutra To those who have little wisdom. 
You should teach it Only to those people of sharp faculties Who are wise, learned, and understanding, Who have good memories and erudition, And are seeking the buddha path. 
You should teach it to those who have seen Hundreds of thousands of koṭis of buddhas, Who have planted good roots, and are resolute. 
Teach it to those who strive, Always practice compassion, And give unsparingly of their bodies and lives. 
You should teach it to those who are respectful And devoid of hypocrisy, Who are living alone In mountains and valleys away from fools. 
O Śāriputra! 
You should teach it To those who have left their bad companions And made friends with virtuous people. 
Teach it to the heirs of the Buddha Who have good conduct, are as pure as jewels, And who are seeking the Mahayana sutras. 
You should teach it To those who are free of anger, Honest, ﬂexible, always sympathetic to everyone, And who honor all the buddhas. 
Teach it to the heirs of the Buddha In the great assembly, Who have pure thoughts And who teach the Dharma without doubts, Using various reasonings, Illustrations, and explanations. 
You should teach it to those monks Who, always and everywhere in search of the Dharma, Seek the Omniscient One, To whom they joyfully press their palms together, Touch their heads, and preserve Only the Mahayana sutras with pleasure, Who never preserve even a single verse Of any other sutra. 
Teach it to those who seek this sutra As intently as they seek for the relics of the Buddha, Who after obtaining it will accept it Respectfully, with bowed heads; And will not seek any other sutra And will never think about heretical scriptures. O Śāriputra! I say to you: I have described the characteristics of those Who seek the buddha path, Though a kalpa would not sufﬁce to do so in full. 
You should teach the Lotus Sutra To those who are able to accept it. Willing Acceptance At that time the noble Subhūti, Mahākātyāyana, Mahākāśyapa, and Mahāmaudgalyāyana, having heard the unprecedented teaching from the Buddha and the Bhagavat’s prediction of Śāriputra’s highest, complete enlightenment, were ﬁlled with wonder and ecstatic joy. They immediately rose from their seats, straightened their garments, leaving their right shoulders bared, and touched their right knees to the ground. With rapt attention and with palms pressed together they bowed in veneration and, gazing at the Bhagavat’s face, said to the Buddha: 
“It has been a long time since the Bhagavat taught the Dharma in the past. Now we sit with weary bodies and only contemplate emptiness, signlessness, and wishlessness. Neither the bodhisattva teaching, nor the carefree sporting with transcendent powers, nor the pure buddha worlds, nor helping sentient beings attain enlightenment produced any eager desire in us. 
“Why is this? 
Because the Bhagavat caused us to leave the triple world and to attain nirvana. 
But now we are old and feeble. We did not take even a single thought of pleasure in the Buddha’s inspiration of the bodhisattvas to highest, complete enlightenment. 
And now in the presence of the Buddha we have heard the śrāvakas receive their prediction of highest, complete enlightenment and we are very joyful to have obtained such an unprecedented experience. 
We never considered that we would suddenly be able to hear this marvelous teaching; and we are overjoyed that we have attained such great beneﬁts—an immeasurable treasure which we attained, though unsought and unawaited. 
We now wish to give an illustration to clarify what we mean: 
Suppose there were a man who, when he was still a child, left his father and ran away. Living in another region for a long time he passed the age of ten, twenty, even ﬁfty years. The older he got the more impoverished he became. He went searching everywhere for food and clothing, and while he was wandering about he started back by chance in the direction of his native country. 
From the ﬁrst the father had looked for his son but in vain; in the meantime he had stayed in the city and become extremely wealthy, and now possessed uncountable treasures. “ storehouses were all ﬁlled to overﬂowing with gold, silver, lapis lazuli, coral, amber, crystal, and other such things. 
He had many servants, subordinates, and clerks as well as innumerable elephants, horses, carriages, cows, and sheep. He proﬁted through lending and his trade with other countries was also great. 
“Then the impoverished son, after wandering through many villages, from one country and city to another, ﬁnally reached the city where his father lived. 
Although the father had constantly thought about the son from whom he had been separated for over ﬁfty years, he nevertheless had spoken to no one about it. He brooded and grieved in his heart, thinking to himself: I have become old and feeble; and although I have many treasures, and storehouses ﬁlled with gold, silver, and precious jewels, I have no son. 
When I die my treasures will be scattered and lost for lack of someone to whom to entrust them. 
“It was for this reason that he was always thinking anxiously about his son. He also thought: If I could get my son back and leave my fortune to him I would be relieved and happy, and without further worry. “O Bhagavat! 
At that time the impoverished son, who had been wandering about, taking odd jobs, by chance ﬁnally reached his father’s house. 
Standing at the side of the gate he saw his father in the distance sitting on the lion seat with his feet propped up on a jeweled stool, respectfully surrounded by many brahmans, kṣatriyas, and householders. His body was adorned with pearl necklaces worth thousands of myriads. 
He was attended on both sides by clerks and servants holding whisker fans. 
Above was a jeweled canopy with various hanging ﬂowered banners. Perfume was sprinkled on the ground, which was strewn with a variety of beautiful ﬂowers. There were rows of precious objects, and people were coming and going, buying and selling. 
“The impoverished son, seeing his father wielding such great power, became terriﬁed and regretted that he had ever come to that place. 
He thought to himself: He must be a king or of a similar rank. This is not a place where I can obtain things as a hired worker. 
It would certainly be better for me to go to a poor village, a place where I can use my ability and easily obtain clothing and food. 
If I stay here for very long I will be seized and put to forced labor. “Thinking this way, he quickly ﬂed. At that time the wealthy man, sitting on the lion seat, realized that he had seen his son and became extremely happy. 
I have been constantly thinking about my son but had no way to meet him, and now suddenly he has come. This is exactly what I wanted. 
Although I am old I still yearn for him. “The man immediately dispatched his attendants to chase his son and bring him back. 
Then the attendants quickly ran and overtook him. 
The impoverished son was frightened and cried out in fear: I did nothing wrong! Why are you seizing me? 
“The attendants grabbed him more ﬁrmly and forced him to return. 
Then the impoverished son thought: They have seized me even though I have done nothing wrong. I shall certainly be killed. 
“He was so terriﬁed that he collapsed unconscious on the ground. 
His father, seeing this from a distance, told the attendants: I don’t need him. Don’t force him to come! 
Pour cold water on his face and bring him to consciousness. Don’t say anything more to him. “What was the reason for this? 
The father knew that his son was of lowly aspiration, and that his own wealth and position would cause him problems. Although the father knew without doubt that the man was his son, he used skillful means and did not say to others, ‘This is my son.’ “The attendant then said to the son: 
You are free to go wherever you wish. “Then the impoverished son, happy because he had never felt such relief, stood up and went to a poor village to seek for food and clothing. “At that time, wanting to get his son back, the wealthy man employed skillful means and secretly dispatched two attendants of wretched and humble appearance. He said to them: 
Approach the impoverished fellow and gently tell him that there is a place for him to work where he will be paid double. 
If he asks you what kind of work there is for him to do, tell him that he will be employed to sweep dung and that both of you will work with him. 
“Then the two attendants immediately went in search of the impoverished son. When they found him they told him this. At that time he took his pay and immediately went to work sweeping dung. 
“The father, seeing his son, felt pity and wondered what to do. 
Then one day while looking through the window he saw his son in the distance appearing emaciated and wretched, soiled with dung and dirt. 
The father took off his necklaces, ﬁne garments, and ornaments and put on torn, ﬁlthy clothes. Covering himself with dirt and taking a dung sweeper in his right hand, he made himself look fearsome. 
He said to his workers: ‘Work hard and don’t be lazy!’ “Through this kind of skillful means he was able to approach his son. 
I want you to always work here. Don’t go anywhere else and I will pay you more. 
There will be no difﬁculty in getting the things you need, like utensils, rice, noodles, salt, and vinegar. I also have an old servant. If you need him I’ll give him to you. Be at ease! 
I am just like your father, so don’t worry about anything! 
Why am I doing this? 
Because I am old and you are still young. Whenever you work you are never lazy or sullen and never complain. I never see in you the bad qualities the other workers have. 
From now on you will be just like my own son. “Then the wealthy man immediately addressed him as his child. 
At that time, even though the impoverished son rejoiced at being treated this way, he nevertheless still considered himself a humble employee. 
For this reason his father let him continue to sweep dung for twenty years. 
I now have plenty of gold, silver, and precious treasures ﬁlling my storehouses. Get to know exactly how much is being taken in and out of them. 
Why do I want you to do this? 
Because you and I are one and the same. Take good care of our fortune and don’t let it be lost! “Then the impoverished son obeyed his instructions. Although he learned everything about the gold, silver, precious treasure, and the storehouses, he never wanted to take even the least amount. 
Nevertheless he still lived in the same place as before and was still not able to get rid of his feeling of inferiority. 
“After a short time had passed the father knew that his son’s mind had become composed, that his will had increased, and that he was ashamed of his former feelings. 
When the father was just on the verge of death he ordered his son to meet the king, ministers, kṣatriyas, householders, and relatives, who had already assembled there. 
This is my son, my own progeny. 
When we were in a certain city he left me and ﬂed. He wandered around for more than ﬁfty years undergoing hardships. His original name is Such-and-such, and my name is Such-and-such. 
Long ago when I was in that city I worried and searched for him. At last and unexpectedly I met up with him. 
This is my true son and I am, in truth, his father. 
All of the fortune I now possess belongs to my son. He already knows about our ﬁnances. 
“O Bhagavat! At that time the impoverished son, hearing what his father said, became extremely happy at having obtained such an unprecedented experience. Then he thought: I never even considered receiving this; nevertheless, this treasure house has come into my possession, though unsought and unawaited. 
This very wealthy man is the Tathāgata, and all of us are the heirs of the Buddha. The Tathāgata has always said that we are his children. 
Because of the triple sufferings, O Bhagavat, we experienced pain, were confused, ignorant and attached to inferior teachings in life after life. 
Today the Bhagavat has made us think about getting rid of the dung of fallacies regarding the reality of the world and that, in this respect, we diligently strove to attain the nirvana only as one seeking a salary for a single day’s labor. We had already attained it and were extremely happy and satisﬁed with it. 
Although we had attained nirvana from the Buddha as our salary for one day’s labor, we thought we had attained much and did not seek the Mahayana. 
“Furthermore, we have manifested and explained the wisdom of the Tathāgata for the bodhisattvas; but we ourselves had no aspirations regarding it. 
“Why is this? 
The Buddha, knowing that we were content with lowly aspirations, taught us according to what is appropriate through the power of skillful means. 
But we did not know that we really were the heirs of the Buddha. 
“Now we fully know that the Bhagavat is unstinting in regard to the wisdom of the buddhas. 
What is the reason for this? 
We have actually been the heirs of the Buddha from long ago, even though we only yearned for the inferior teaching. If we had yearned for the superior teaching, then the Buddha would have taught the teachings of the Mahayana to us. 
Yet, in this sutra he has taught only the single vehicle. “Now, in the past the Buddha reviled the śrāvakas—those who yearned for the inferior teaching—in the presence of the bodhisattvas, but actually the Buddha inspired them also with the Mahayana. 
That is why we say that though we originally had no desire to seek the great treasure of the King of the Dharma it has now come to us unsought and unawaited. 
We have all attained what we should attain as the heirs of the Buddha.” Thereupon Mahākāśyapa, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: Today we have heard the Buddha’s words, And we are joyful and ecstatic At having attained such an unprecedented experience. 
The Buddha has said That the śrāvakas will be able to become buddhas. The most magniﬁcent jewels Have been obtained without being sought or awaited. 
Suppose there were a young and inexperienced child Who left his father And ran away to a distant country. He wandered around for more than ﬁfty years. 
And his worried father looked for him everywhere. The father, exhausted from searching for him, Remained in a city Where he had a house built And enjoyed the desires of the ﬁve senses. 
His family built up a vast wealth of much gold, silver, Mother-of-pearl, agate, pearls, lapis lazuli, Elephants, horses, cows, sheep, ﬂoats, carriages, Peasants, servants, and other employees. 
He earned interest through loans and deposits And had buyers and sellers Throughout all the other regions. 
He was surrounded by thousands of Myriads of koṭis of people, Who held him in awe; Always loved by the king, And deeply respected by the subjects And powerful families. 
There were many people Coming and going on different business. He was thus extremely wealthy And very powerful. 
And yet as he grew older, He increasingly worried about his son. Day and night he thought: Soon I will die. 
My foolish son has abandoned me For over ﬁfty years. What should I do with the Various goods in my treasure houses? 
At that time the impoverished son Was going from town to town, From one country to another, Seeking food and clothing. 
Sometimes he obtained them, And sometimes he did not. He was emaciated from hunger, And his body was covered with scabies. 
Through his wanderings, He gradually reached the city Where his father lived, And, after having been employed At one place after another, Finally ended up at his father’s home. 
At that time the wealthy man Was sitting within the gate On a lion seat, sheltered by A huge jewel-covered canopy. 
He was surrounded by his attendants And guarded by his men. Some were counting gold, silver, and jewels; And some were settling the ﬁnances, While others were keeping the accounts. 
The impoverished son saw his father, Who was extremely wealthy and digniﬁed. He wondered if this man were a king Or someone of equal rank. 
He became intimidated And wondered why he had gone there. 
He thought to himself: If I stay here for long I will be harassed and coerced into working. Thinking this, he ran away In search of a poor village Where he could ﬁnd employment. 
At that time the wealthy man, Who was sitting on the lion seat, Saw his son in the distance. 
The impoverished son was terriﬁed, Cried out, and collapsed on the ground In confusion, thinking: Since this man has seized me I shall certainly be killed. In vain did I come here In search of food and clothing. 
The wealthy man knew that his son’s thoughts Were humble and foolish, And that he would not believe what he said, Nor believe that he was his father. 
Then using skillful means, He dispatched other men With squint eyes, of small stature And little dignity, saying to them: Tell him: We will employ you To sweep dung, at double your wages. When he heard this The impoverished son was overjoyed And returned to sweep dung and clean houses. 
The wealthy man Constantly watched his son Through the window and thought That his son was foolish And willingly did menial things. 
The wealthy man, being wise, Gradually gave him freedom of the house; And, after twenty years had passed, Let him become involved In the family business. 
He showed him the gold, Silver, pearls, and crystal, And made him learn about All aspects of the ﬁnances. 
Yet the impoverished son still lived In a thatched hut outside the gate, And considered himself poor, thinking That these things were not his own. 
The father knew that his son Was gradually becoming more noble; And, wanting to give him his fortune, He assembled the king, ministers, Kṣatriyas, householders, and relatives. 
He informed this great assembly, saying: This is my son. He left me and stayed away For ﬁfty years. 
Twenty years have already passed Since I saw my son return here. 
Long ago I lost my son in a certain city And, after wandering around in search of him, I ended up staying here. 
I entrust to him all the houses and men That I possess. 
They are all at his disposal. The son thought: Long ago I was poor and of lowly aspiration. Now at my father’s place I have obtained an immense fortune Of such things as precious jewels and houses. 
I am overjoyed at having obtained Such an unprecedented experience! 
The Buddha is also like this. He knew that we yearned for the inferior teaching, So he never taught us That we should become buddhas. Yet he did tell us that we had attained The stage of noncorruption, That we had achieved the inferior vehicle, And that we were the disciples of the śrāvaka vehicle. 
The Buddha told us to teach that Those who practiced the highest path Would be able to become buddhas. 
Accepting the Buddha’s teaching, We explained the highest path For the great bodhisattvas, Using various explanations and illustrations, And many ﬁgures of speech. 
The heirs of the Buddha Heard the teachings from us, Contemplated day and night, And practiced diligently. 
The buddhas instantly made their predictions saying: You will all be able to become buddhas in the future. We have explained the essence Of the treasured teaching of the buddhas Only for the sake of the bodhisattvas, But did not expound it for ourselves. 
Just as the impoverished son Who, after approaching his father, Learned of various things Yet did not want them, So, although we explained the treasure house Of the teaching of the buddhas, We never aspired to it. 
We understood only this And did not think there was anything else. 
Even if we heard About the pure buddha lands And leading and inspiring sentient beings, We never rejoiced in it. 
Why is this? 
Every existence is quiescent, Neither produced nor extinguished, Neither large nor small, Incorrupted and unconditioned, We felt no eagerness. 
For days and nights we neither craved for Nor were attached to the wisdom of the buddhas, Neither did we aspire to it. 
Furthermore, we ourselves thought, With regard to the Dharma itself, That this was the ultimate goal. 
After practicing the teaching Of emptiness day and night, We were able to shake off The suffering of the triple world, And, bearing our last bodies, Abided in the nirvana with residue. 
We were led and inspired by the buddhas So that our attainment of the path was not in vain; And we have already been able To pass on the beneﬁts We received from the Buddha. 
Although we have expounded The teaching of the bodhisattvas To the heirs of the Buddha To seek the buddha path, We never longed for this teaching. 
Because he knew our minds The Leader turned away from us. At ﬁrst he did not arouse our zeal With the explanation that there exists Real proﬁt in the teaching. 
Just as the wealthy man, Who, knowing that his son was of lowly aspiration, Broadened his son’s mind using The power of skillful means, And only then entrusted his entire fortune to him. 
The Buddha is also exactly like this. He has manifested marvelous things But perceiving that we were content With lowly aspirations. He brought control to our minds using The power of skillful means, And only then taught us the great wisdom. 
Thus today we have obtained An unprecedented experience. The fact that we have now spontaneously obtained What we had not longed for Is just like the impoverished son Who obtained innumerable jewels. 
O Bhagavat! We have now obtained the path and its fruit And have obtained pure sight Into the incorruptible Dharma. 
For a long while we have maintained The pure conduct of the Buddha; Today for the ﬁrst time We have obtained the results. For a long time we have practiced The pure path of discipline and integrity Based on the teaching of the Dharma King, And now we have attained The supreme fruit of noncorruption. 
We are now real śrāvakas And cause everyone to hear the words “buddha path.” We are now real arhats and shall be revered Among the devas, humans, māras, and Brahmas In all the worlds. 
The Bhagavat, the Great Benefactor, Beneﬁts us with marvelous things By his inspiration and compassion. Who can repay him for it Even in immeasurable koṭis of kalpas! 
Even if one were to serve him With one’s hands and feet, Bow one’s head in reverence, And give all kinds of offerings, One could not repay him. 
Even if one were to bear him On one’s head and shoulders Out of deep respect, for as many kalpas As there are sands in the Ganges River, One could not repay him. 
Or even if one were to honor him With delicious food, Uncountable jeweled garments, Beddings, various medicines, Famed sandalwood from Mount Oxhead, And various precious jewels; Or by building temples, Spreading jeweled clothing and other such things For as many kalpas as there are sands in the Ganges River, One could not repay him. 
The buddhas have marvelous, immeasurable, Limitless, inconceivable great transcendent powers. They are the Kings of the Dharma. 
Without depravities and unconditioned, They are patient in all matters, For the sake of the humble ones. They teach the common people, Who are attached to tangible things, According to what is appropriate to them. 
All of the buddhas having attained Complete mastery over the Dharma, Perceive the various desires and intentions Of sentient beings and explain the teachings With innumerable illustrations, According to what is appropriate to them. 
Judging from the roots of good merit That sentient beings have planted in former lives, The buddhas perceive who are mature And who are not. 
Herbs Thereupon the Bhagavat addressed Mahākāśyapa and other great disciples saying: 
“Splendid! Splendid! O Kāśyapa! You have skillfully explained the real merit of the Tathāgata. 
It is exactly as you have said. The Tathāgata has immeasurable, unlimited, and incalculable merits. Thus even in a period of immeasurable koṭis of kalpas you will never fully be able to explain all of his merits. 
“O Kāśyapa! You should know that the Tathāgata is the king of all the teaching. What he teaches is never false. 
He explains all the teaching using his wisdom and skillful means and what he teaches leads everyone to the stage of omniscience. 
“The Tathāgata perceives the goal of all teachings and knows the underlying mental disposition of all sentient beings, perceiving all with no obstructions. 
He completely understands all teachings and displays omniscience to all sentient beings. “O Kāśyapa! 
Suppose in the great manifold cosmos there are mountains, rivers, valleys, and plains where many kinds of grasses, trees, shrubs, and herbs of different names and colors grow. 
Dense clouds thoroughly cover this great manifold cosmos and rain falls at the same time everywhere, moistening the small, medium, and large roots, stems, branches, and leaves of all the grasses, trees, shrubs, and herbs. 
“The sizes of all the trees depend on whether their capacities are superior, mediocre, or inferior; and the rain falling from the same cloud makes them grow according to the nature of their various seeds. 
Flowers blossom in the same place and fruit ripens in the same place moistened by the same rain, yet there are differences among these grasses and trees. “O Kāśyapa! 
You should know that the Tathāgata is exactly like this. He appears in this world like a great overspreading cloud. His great voice resounds over the devas, humans, and asuras in the world, just as the great cloud thoroughly covers the great manifold cosmos. 
He declares to the assembly: I am the Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. I set free those who have not been freed. I enlighten those who have not been enlightened and bring calm to those who have not been calmed. 
I am the All-Knower, the All-Seer, the Knower of the Path, the One who discloses the path and explains it. All of you devas, humans, and asuras! Come and listen to my teachings. “At that time innumerable thousands of myriads of koṭis of sentient beings approach the Buddha and listen to his teaching. 
Then the Tathāgata, perceiving the faculties of sentient beings—whether they are sharp or dull, diligent or idle—explains the teachings according to their capacities in a variety of immeasurable ways, gladdening and beneﬁting them all. 
“Having heard his teaching, all of these beings are at peace in this world and are born into a good existence in the future. Through this they will receive peace of mind and be able to hear the teaching. 
Having already heard the teaching they will become free from obstructions and be able to gradually enter the path to the Dharma according to their capacities. 
“Just like the great cloud that rains upon all the grasses, trees, shrubs, and herbs, whose seeds are watered and which grow according to their capacities, the Tathāgata teaches the Dharma of one aspect and character; that is to say, the character of liberation, dispassion, and cessation which ultimately leads to omniscience. 
“Those sentient beings who hear, hold, and recite the teachings of the Tathāgata and practice it accordingly will nevertheless not perceive the merit that they have obtained. 
“Why is this? 
Only the Tathāgata knows the seed, character, disposition, and capacity of sentient beings. Only he knows what they contemplate, think, and practice; how they contemplate, think, and practice; what teachings they contemplate, think, and practice; and what teaching they obtain through what teaching. 
Only the Tathāgata exactly perceives and knows without obstructions the various states in which sentient beings reside. 
“It is just like the grasses, trees, shrubs, and herbs that do not know their own natures, whether they are superior, mediocre, or inferior. 
Yet the Tathāgata knows the teachings of one aspect and character, the character of liberation, dispassion, cessation, complete nirvana, and eternal tranquility which ultimately leads to emptiness. 
“The Buddha knows this and perceives the aspirations of sentient beings. For this reason, in order to protect them, he does not immediately teach omniscience. “O Kāśyapa! 
It is a rare thing that all of you know that the Tathāgata teaches according to your capacities and that you believe and accept it. 
“Why is this? 
Because the Dharma taught by all the Buddha Bhagavats, according to what is appropriate to sentient beings, is difﬁcult to understand and difﬁcult to know.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: The King of the Dharma, The destroyer of delusive existence, Appears in the world And keeping in mind the aspirations of sentient beings Teaches the Dharma in various ways According to the wishes of sentient beings. 
The Tathāgata is greatly distinguished, And his wisdom is profound. 
Those who are wise Will be well convinced when they hear it; Those who are not wise will have doubts And remain confused for a long time. 
That is why, O Kāśyapa, the Tathāgata teaches According to the capacities of sentient beings, And enables them to attain the correct perspective By using various illustrations. 
O Kāśyapa, you should know That it is as if a great cloud Arises in the world And covers everything. 
This beneﬁcent cloud contains moisture And bright lightning ﬂashes from it. The sound of its thunder shakes the earth afar And gladdens the people. 
It conceals the sun And cools the earth. The spreading cloud hangs so low, As if it could be touched. 
Everywhere, equal, and immeasurable The rain pours down and moistens the earth. 
Grasses, herbs, large and small trees, All kinds of crops, seedlings, sugarcane, and grapes Growing in the depths of the mountains, In rivers and in precipitous valleys, Are all watered and completely nourished by the rain. The dry earth is moistened everywhere And the herbs and trees grow up thickly. 
Out of this cloud the same rain Waters these grasses, trees, and shrubs Each according to their capacities. 
All the trees, small, medium, or large Are able to grow in accordance with their capacities. The luster and colors of the roots, stems, Branches, leaves, and ﬂowers Are all freshened by the same rain. 
Each of these, although receiving the same moisture, Reaches a greater or lesser size In accordance with their different Dispositions, characteristics, and natures. 
The Buddha is exactly like this. He appears in the world As a great cloud Which covers everything universally. 
Once appearing in this world He illuminates and explains The essence of the teachings For the sake of sentient beings. 
The Great Seer, the Bhagavat, expounds this To the assembly of all the devas and humans. I am the Tathāgata, the Best of Humans. I appear in the world to nourish sentient beings Just as the great cloud Moistens all the withered trees. 
I cause everyone to be rid of suffering And attain ease of heart, Worldly happiness, and the joy of nirvana. So, devas and humans, listen carefully! 
Come, all of you, And look at the Highest One! I am the Bhagavat. No one is equal to me. I appear in this world To bring peace of mind to sentient beings And to teach the Dharma of immortality To the great assembly. 
This Dharma has a single ﬂavor Of liberation and nirvana. 
I expound its meaning with the same subtle voice, Always making the Mahayana The subject of my illustrations. 
I see everywhere, and regard all as equal. I have no feelings of like or dislike; For me there is no this or that. Nor do I have either love or hate. 
I have no attachments and make no distinctions, And so always teach the Dharma equally to all; And teach the same thing to one person As I teach to everyone else. 
Going or coming, sitting or standing, I never tire of satisfying the world, Just like the rain that gives nourishment universally. 
I tirelessly pour down the rain of the Dharma Equally on those who are noble or humble, Superior or inferior, who keep or break the precepts, Who have good or bad conduct, right or wrong views, Sharp or dull faculties. 
According to their power to understand, All sentient beings who hear my teaching Dwell in various stages. 
Those living among humans, Devas, noble emperors, Śakra, and Brahma kings Are like the small herbs. 
Those who know the incorruptible Dharma, Who are able to attain nirvana, Have the six transcendent powers, and Have attained the three sciences. Those who live alone in mountain forests Always practicing meditation, and Who attain the enlightenment of the pratyekabuddhas Are like the medium-sized herbs. 
Those who seek the stage Of the Bhagavat, thinking that They will become buddhas, And practice persistence and meditation, Are like the large herbs. 
The heirs of the buddhas Who concentrate on the path of the Buddha, Who always cultivate compassion within themselves And know deﬁnitely without a doubt That they will become buddhas, Are like the small trees. 
Those who are comfortable with transcendent powers, Who turn the irreversible wheel And save innumerable hundreds Of thousands of koṭis of sentient beings, Are the bodhisattvas Who are like the large trees. 
The Buddha’s equal teaching Is like the rain of one ﬂavor. 
The sentient beings accept it According to their different capacities, Just as the grasses and trees Each differently absorb the rain. 
The Buddha reveals the single teaching With illustrations, using skillful means And explains it with various explanations, And yet it is just a drop in the ocean Compared to the Buddha’s wisdom. 
I pour down the rain of the Dharma, Fulﬁlling the world, And the sentient beings Practice the Dharma of one ﬂavor According to their capacities. 
Just as the shrubs, herbs, and trees Flourish in accordance with their capacities, Reaching either a greater or lesser size, The teaching of the buddhas Is always of one ﬂavor And fulﬁlls the entire world. Anyone who practices it little by little Obtains the fruit of the path. 
The śrāvakas and pratyekabuddhas Living in mountain forests, Who, in their last bodies, Hear the Dharma and attain its fruit, Are just like the ﬂourishing herbs. 
The bodhisattvas who are ﬁrm in wisdom, Who completely understand the triple world, And seek the highest vehicle, Are just like the ﬂourishing small trees. 
Those who abide in meditation, Attain transcendent powers, Listen to the teaching regarding the emptiness Of every existence with great joy, And save sentient beings By emitting innumerable rays of light, Are just like the ﬂourishing large trees. 
In this way, O Kāśyapa, The Dharma that the Buddha teaches Is just like the great cloud that enriches human ﬂowers With the rain of one ﬂavor, So that each attains its fruits. 
O Kāśyapa! You should know that I reveal the buddha path Using various explanations and illustrations And that this is my skillful means. All of the buddhas are just like this. 
I will now teach the highest truth for your sake: There are no śrāvakas who attain nirvana. 
What you practice is the bodhisattva path; And if you practice step by step, You will all become buddhas. 
Prediction At that time, after the Bhagavat had spoken these verses, he addressed the great assembly, proclaiming: “This disciple of mine, Mahākāśyapa, in the future will be able to meet three hundred myriads of koṭis of Buddha Bhagavats to whom he will pay homage, respect, veneration, and praise; and he will extensively expound the immeasurable great teachings of these buddhas. 
In his last body he will become a buddha called Raśmiprabhāsa, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, WellDeparted, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
The lifespan of this buddha will be twelve intermediate kalpas. The True Dharma will last in the world for twenty intermediate kalpas and the Semblance Dharma will also last for twenty intermediate kalpas. 
“His world will be adorned and there will be no dirt, shards, thorns, excrement, or other impurities. 
The earth will be level without irregularities, hollows, or hills. 
The earth will be made of lapis lazuli with jeweled trees in rows. Golden cords will line the borders of these roads, which will be scattered with precious ﬂowers, and everywhere will be pure. 
“In his world there will be immeasurable thousands of koṭis of bodhisattvas as well as innumerable śrāvakas. All malice will be far removed; and even though Māra and his minions will be there, they will all protect the Buddha-Dharma.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to explain the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
I tell you, O monks, That I see with the buddha-eye That Kāśyapa in the future Will become a buddha After innumerable kalpas have passed. 
In the future he will meet and pay homage To three hundred myriads of koṭis of Buddha Bhagavats And practice the pure path of discipline and integrity, Seeking for the wisdom of the buddhas. 
Having offered respect to the highest and best of humans And having completely grasped the ultimate wisdom, He will become a buddha while in his last body. 
His land will be pure. The earth will be made of lapis lazuli, And many jeweled trees will be in rows Along roads bordered with golden cords, And those who see it will be gladdened. 
The air will be always ﬁlled With a pleasant fragrance, And many beautiful ﬂowers Will be strewn about. 
Various wonderful things Will adorn this earth, Which will be level Without hills or hollows. 
There will be an incalculable number Of bodhisattvas there Who will have the power of self-control, Be versed in transcendent powers, And who will preserve the sutras of the Mahayana Taught by the buddhas. 
The multitude of śrāvakas, Bearing their last bodies, free from corruption, Heirs of the Dharma King, Will also be unreckonable; Their number will be impossible to calculate Even with the divine eye. 
The lifespan of this buddha Will be twelve intermediate kalpas. 
The True Dharma will last in the world For twenty intermediate kalpas. 
And the Semblance Dharma will also last For twenty intermediate kalpas. 
Thus will things be with The Bhagavat Raśmiprabhāsa. 
At that time Mahāmaudgalyāyana, Subhūti, and Mahākātyā yana were all charged with excitement, and with palms pressed together they attentively gazed at the Bhagavat, never turning their eyes from him. 
If, knowing the depths of our hearts, You give us your predictions, It will be like cooling our fevers By sprinkling us with the Dharma of immortality. 
It is as though someone coming From a country suffering from famine Were suddenly to ﬁnd A great king’s feast spread before him, Yet is stricken with doubt And does not venture to eat, Until, being instructed by the king, He dares at last to do so. 
We are exactly like this. We have been constantly thinking About the faults of the inferior vehicle, And so we had no knowledge of the way To obtain the highest wisdom of the Buddha. 
Although we hear the Buddha’s voice Saying that we will become buddhas, We still have doubt in our minds As if we dare not eat the meal. If we receive the Buddha’s prediction It will immediately put us at ease. 
The Bhagavat, the Great Hero, Always wants to put the world at ease; And so we entreat you to bestow Upon us your predictions, As though to starving people Waiting for permission to eat. 
Then the Bhagavat, knowing what lay in the thoughts of the great disciples, addressed the monks saying: “This Subhūti in the future will meet, respect, venerate, praise, and pay homage to three hundred myriads of koṭis of nayutas of buddhas; and he will always practice the pure path of discipline and integrity, and complete the bodhisattva path. 
In his last body he will become a buddha called Yaśasketu, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
The land will be even and the earth will be made of crystal and adorned with jeweled trees. It will be without pits, pebbles, thorns, or the ﬁlth of excrement. The earth will be covered with precious ﬂowers and will be everywhere pure. 
“The people in this world will all live in wonderful towers with jeweled terraces. 
The śrāvakas, the disciples there will be innumerable and limitless, beyond calculation and metaphor, and there will also be innumerable thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of bodhisattvas. 
“The lifespan of this buddha will be twelve intermediate kalpas. The True Dharma will last in the world for twenty intermediate kalpas and the Semblance Dharma will also last for twenty intermediate kalpas. 
This Buddha will always dwell in the air, teaching the Dharma for the multitude, and he will save incalculable bodhisattvas and śrāvakas.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to explain the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
O monks! I shall now make something known to you. You should attentively listen To what I have to say. My great disciple Subhūti Will become a buddha called Yaśasketu. 
He will pay homage to innumerable Myriads of koṭis of buddhas, And, following the Buddha’s practice, He will gradually come to complete the great path. 
He will attain the thirty-two marks In his last body, And his form will be ﬁne and beautiful Just like a jeweled mountain. 
His buddha world will be ultimately pure. Of the sentient beings who see it There will be none who do not rejoice. There the Buddha will bring Incalculable sentient beings to enlightenment. 
In the midst of his Dharma There will be many bodhisattvas With keen faculties, Who turn the irreversible wheel . This world will always Be graced with bodhisattvas. 
There will also be Incalculable numbers of śrāvakas. All of them will have perfected the three sciences, And the six transcendent powers, Will abide in the eight liberations, And have great dignity and virtue. 
The Buddha will expound the Dharma And reveal immeasurable, Unthinkable, transcendent powers. 
All the devas and humans, As numerous as the sands of the Ganges River, Will listen to the Buddha’s words With palms pressed together. 
The lifespan of this buddha Will be twelve intermediate kalpas. The True Dharma will last in the world For twenty intermediate kalpas, And the Semblance Dharma will also last For twenty intermediate kalpas. 
Thereupon the Bhagavat addressed the monks, saying: “I will now tell you that this Mahākātyāyana in the future will honor, respect, and pay homage to eight thousand koṭis of buddhas with offerings. 
After the parinirvāṇas of these buddhas, he will erect stupas, each of which will be one thousand yojanas in height and ﬁve hundred yojanas in both width and depth. These stupas will all be constructed of the seven precious treasures—gold, silver, lapis lazuli, mother-of-pearl, agate, pearls, and rubies. He will pay homage to these stupas with many ﬂowers and necklaces, fragrant ointments, scented powders, burning incense, canopies, ﬂags, and banners. 
“After this he will also pay homage to two myriads of koṭis of buddhas in exactly the same way and, having done so, he will perfect the bodhisattva path and become a buddha called Jāmbūna dā bhāsa, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
“His land will be level. The earth will be made of crystal and it will be adorned with jeweled trees. The roads will be bordered with golden cords and beautiful ﬂowers will cover the earth. It will be pure everywhere and those who see it will rejoice. 
“There will be none of the four troubled states of being, namely the hells, hungry ghosts, animals, and asuras. There will be many devas and humans, and immeasurable myriads of koṭis of śrāvakas and bodhisattvas will grace this world. 
“The lifespan of this buddha will be twelve intermediate kalpas. The True Dharma will last in the world for twenty intermediate kalpas and the Semblance Dharma will also last for twenty intermediate kalpas.” At that time the Bhagavat, wanting to explain the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
This Kātyāyana Will pay homage to the buddhas With various wonderful offerings. 
After the parinirvāṇas of those buddhas, He will erect stupas constructed Of the seven precious treasures And offer respect to their relics With ﬂowers and incense. 
In his last body He will attain the wisdom of the Buddha And will achieve complete enlightenment. 
His world will be pure And he will save incalculable Myriads of koṭis of sentient beings. He will be venerated in the ten directions. 
There is nothing that surpasses This Buddha’s ray of light, So this buddha Will be called Jāmbūnadābhāsa. 
There will be innumerable, uncountable Bodhisattvas and śrāvakas gracing this world, Who have shaken free from every state of being. 
Thereupon the Bhagavat again addressed the assembly saying: “I will now tell you that this Mahāmaudgalyāyana will respect, venerate, and pay homage to eight thousand buddhas with various offerings; and after the parinirvāṇas of these buddhas, he will erect stupas, each of which will be one thousand yojanas in height and ﬁve hundred yojanas in both depth and width. 
These stupas will be constructed with the seven precious treasures— gold, silver, lapis lazuli, mother-of-pearl, agate, pearls, and rubies. He will offer them various ﬂowers, necklaces, fragrant ointments, scented powders, burning incense, canopies, ﬂags, and banners. 
“After this he will pay homage to two hundred myriads of koṭis of buddhas in exactly the same way, and will become a buddha called Tamālapatracandanagandha, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
The land will be level. The earth will be made of crystal, adorned with jeweled trees, and strewn with ﬂowers of pearls. It will be pure everywhere and those who see it will rejoice. 
There will be many devas and humans, innumerable bodhisattvas, and śrāvakas. 
“The lifespan of this buddha will be twenty-four intermediate kalpas. The True Dharma will last in this world for forty intermediate kalpas and the Semblance Dharma will also last for forty intermediate kalpas.” Then the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on this meaning, spoke these verses: 
This disciple of mine, Mahāmaudgalyāyana, Having abandoned this body, Will meet eight thousand and then two hundred Myriads of koṭis of Buddha Bhagavats. 
For the sake of the buddha path He will pay them homage and respect them, And always practice holy conduct Of discipline and integrity In the presence of these buddhas. He will uphold the Buddha-Dharma For immeasurable kalpas. 
After the parinirvāṇas of these buddhas He will erect stupas Constructed with the seven precious treasures On which golden banners Will be long displayed. He will pay homage to These stupas of the buddhas With ﬂowers, incense, and music. 
After having mastered The bodhisattva path step by step, In a land called Mano’bhirāma, He will become a buddha Called Tamālapatracandanagandha. 
The lifespan of this buddha Will be twenty-four intermediate kalpas. He will always expound the buddha path For the sake of devas and humans. 
There will be countless śrāvakas, As numerous as the sands of the Ganges River, Who will have perfected the three sciences, And six transcendent powers, And have great dignity and virtue. 
There will be innumerable bodhisattvas, Resolute and persevering, who will never turn away From the wisdom of the buddhas. 
After the parinirvāṇa of this buddha The True Dharma will last For forty intermediate kalpas, And the Semblance Dharma Will also be like this. 
All of my disciples, Five hundred in number, Who are endowed with dignity and virtue, Will also receive my prediction. 
In the future they will all become buddhas. 
I will now explain the relationships That you and I have formed in past lives. All of you, listen carefully! 
The Apparitional City The Buddha addressed the monks, saying: “Once upon a time, immeasurable, limitless, inconceivable, incalculable kalpas ago, there was a buddha called Mahābhijñājñānābhibhū Tathāgata, an Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
His land was called Susaṃbhavā in the kalpa called Mahārūpa. 
Suppose there were a man who ground the earth of the entire great manifold cosmos into powdered ink, and he were to then pass through a thousand worlds to the east, where he let fall a single particle of ink, the size of a speck of dust. “After passing through another thousand worlds, he let fall another particle; and he continued in this way until he had completely used all the ink. 
“What do you think about this? 
Do you think that a mathematician or a mathematician’s pupil would be able to count those worlds to the last particle or not?” “O Bhagavat! 
No, they could not.” “O monks! 
Suppose that all the worlds this man passed through, whether letting fall a particle or not, were all ground into dust, and one speck of this dust were equal to one kalpa. 
The time since the parinirvāṇa of this buddha surpasses this number by immeasurable, limitless, incalculable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas; and through the power of the Tathāgata’s wisdom and insight, I can see his distant past, as if it were today.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
I recall that in the past, Immeasurable kalpas ago, There was a buddha, the most honored among two-legged beings, Called Mahābhijñājñānābhibhū. 
Suppose there was a man Who vigorously ground up in its entirety The earth of the great manifold cosmos And turned it all to powdered ink. 
After passing through one thousand worlds, He let fall one particle of ink; And in this way He continued to let fall particles Until he had used up all the ink. 
If all these worlds, Those where he let fall a particle And those where he did not, Were to be ground into specks of dust, And one speck of dust were equal to a single kalpa, Their number would be surpassed By the number of kalpas That have passed since that buddha’s parinirvāṇa, So incalculable has this number of kalpas been. 
With the Tathāgata’s unobstructed wisdom, I know of these bodhisattvas and śrāvakas And the parinirvāṇa of this buddha; It is as if I see his parinirvāṇa today. 
O monks, you should know That with the knowledge of the Buddha, Which is pure and subtle, Incorrupted and without obstructions, I perceive what happened immeasurable kalpas ago. 
The Buddha addressed the monks, saying: “The lifespan of this buddha Mahābhijñājñānābhibhū was ﬁve hundred and forty myriads of koṭis of nayutas of kalpas. 
When that buddha was seated on the terrace of enlightenment after having defeated Māra’s army, he tried to obtain highest, complete enlightenment, yet the Dharma of the buddhas did not appear to him. 
In this way, even after having sat cross-legged for one to ten intermediate kalpas, undisturbed in body and mind, the Dharma of the buddhas still did not appear to him. 
“At that time a group of thirty-three devas ﬁrst prepared for that buddha a lion seat one yojana in height under the bodhi tree, for this buddha was to attain highest, complete enlightenment on that seat. 
As soon as the Buddha sat on this seat, all the Brahmas rained down various heavenly ﬂowers for a hundred yojanas around; periodically a fragrant breeze would blow away the withered ﬂowers and they would rain down fresh ones. 
“In this way they unceasingly paid homage to the Buddha for a full ten intermediate kalpas, raining down these ﬂowers continuously until his parinirvāṇa. 
The devas of the four quarters constantly struck heavenly drums to honor the Buddha, and in the same way all the other devas made divine music for a full ten intermediate kalpas until his parinirvāṇa. “O monks! 
The Dharma of the buddhas appeared to the Buddha Mahā bhijñājñānābhibhū after ten intermediate kalpas had passed, and he attained highest, complete enlightenment. 
“This Buddha had had sixteen children before he renounced household life. The eldest child was called Jñānākara. 
Each child had various kinds of rare toys. After hearing about their father’s attain ment of highest, complete enlightenment, they all put aside their toys and set out for where the Buddha was. 
Weeping sad tears, their mothers saw them off. 
Their grandfather, the wheel-turning sage king, went with them, along with a hundred ministers and hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of people. 
“When they arrived at the terrace of enlightenment, they all wanted to approach the Tathāgata Mahābhijñājñānābhibhū, and pay homage and respect, honor, and praise him. 
They came up to him and bowed until their foreheads touched his feet, and then circled around him. Attentively, with palms pressed together, they gazed at the Bhagavat and spoke these verses: The Bhagavat of great, virtuous dignity, In order to bring sentient beings to the path, After immeasurable koṭis of kalpas And perfecting all the vows, Finally became a buddha. How wonderful! 
The Bhagavat is truly extraordinary! He sat tranquil for ten intermediate kalpas With his body and limbs immobile. 
His mind was always calm and never distracted. He has attained ultimate, eternal tranquility, And is ﬁrmly established In the incorruptible Dharma. 
Now seeing the Bhagavat, Who has serenely attained the buddha path, We receive beneﬁt and celebrate With great joy. 
Sentient beings, ever suffering, Are blind and without a teacher. They are unaware of the path that leads To the extinction of suffering, Ignorant of the way to seek liberation. 
From one blind state to the next, Those in the troubled states of being daily increase While the devas decrease. They never hear the Buddha’s name. 
Now the Buddha has attained the highest, Serene, and incorruptible Dharma. Thus we and the devas and humans, Shall obtain the greatest beneﬁt. Therefore we all bow and pay homage To the highest Lord. “At that time the sixteen princes, having praised the Buddha in verse, requested that the Bhagavat turn the wheel of the Dharma, saying: 
Illuminate and reveal this wisdom So that we may attain it. 
If we can become buddhas, So can the other sentient beings. 
The Bhagavat knows The deep-seated intentions of sentient beings And the paths they practice, As well as the power of their wisdom. 
The Buddha addressed the monks, saying: “When the Buddha Mahā bhijñājñānābhibhū attained highest, complete enlightenment, ﬁve hundred myriads of koṭis of buddha worlds in each of the ten directions quaked in six ways. The dark places between the worlds, where the rays of the sun and moon had been unable to penetrate, were brightly illuminated. 
The sentient beings there were able to see each other and said: How is it possible that sentient beings have suddenly appeared here? “Moreover, those worlds from the heavenly palaces up to the palaces of the Brahmas, also quaked in six ways. 
The great ray of light shone everywhere, ﬁlling the worlds with a radiance that surpassed the light of the devas. “At that time the palaces of Brahmas in the ﬁve hundred myriads of koṭis of worlds in the east were illuminated twice as brightly as usual. 
The great Brahmas each thought: The palaces are illuminated now as never before. 
What has caused this phenomenon? 
“At that time all of the great Brahmas approached each other to discuss this matter. 
In that assembly there was a great Brahma called Sarvasattvatrātar who spoke to the assembly of Brahmas in verse, saying: This illumination of our palaces Has never occurred before! Let us ﬁnd out The reason for this! 
This great ray of light Has illuminated the ten directions. Has a deva of great merit been born, Or has a buddha appeared in the world? “Then the great Brahmas of the hundred myriads of koṭis of worlds went toward the west with their palaces to enquire about this phenomenon, carrying heavenly ﬂowers in their robes. 
They saw the Tathāgata Mahābhijñā jñānā bhibhū on the terrace of enlightenment, sitting on the lion seat under the bodhi tree. He was respectfully surrounded by humans and such non humans as devas, nāga kings, gandharvas, kiṃnaras, and mahoragas. They also saw the sixteen princes requesting the Buddha to turn the wheel of the Dharma. 
Then the great Brahmas bowed until their foreheads touched the Buddha’s feet and then circled around him one hundred thousand times. They scattered heavenly ﬂowers on the Buddha, and the ﬂowers they scattered were piled as high as Mount Sumeru. 
They also paid homage to the Buddha’s bodhi tree, which was ten yojanas in height. 
Having reverently offered him ﬂowers, they presented their palaces to the Buddha, saying: 
Please accept the palaces we now offer you, and beneﬁt us through your compassion! “Then the great Brahmas spoke these verses wholeheartedly and in unison before the Buddha: The Bhagavat, who is truly extraordinary, Is extremely difﬁcult to meet. He is endowed with immeasurable qualities And seeks to protect all. 
The Great Teacher of Devas and Humans Feels compassion for the world And causes all sentient beings In the ten directions To be universally beneﬁted. 
All of us, who have come from Five hundreds of myriads of koṭis of worlds, Have given up the pleasure of deep meditation In order to pay homage to the Buddha. 
Please accept them through your compassion! “Thereupon, having praised the Buddha in verse, the great Brahmas each said this: O Bhagavat! We entreat you to turn the wheel of the Dharma, open the path to nirvana, and guide sentient beings to it. 
“Furthermore, O monks, the great Brahmas in the ﬁve hundred myriads of koṭis of worlds in the southeast saw their palaces illuminated with a ray of light that had never occurred before. 
Joyful and ecstatic, they were struck with wonder. They assembled to discuss this matter. 
At that time there was a great Brahma called Adhimātrakāruṇika. He spoke to the assembly of Brahmas in verse saying: What is the reason That this phenomenon has appeared? 
Even since the olden times, This illumination of all of our palaces Is without precedent. 
Has a deva of great merit been born, Or has a buddha appeared in the world? 
Since we have never seen such a phenomenon, We should seek thoroughly for its source. 
Possibly a buddha has appeared in the world To save suffering sentient beings. “Thereupon ﬁve hundred myriads of koṭis of great Brahmas went toward the northwest with their palaces, carrying heavenly ﬂowers in their robes, to enquire about this phenomenon. 
They saw the Tathāgata Mahābhijñā jñānābhibhū on the terrace of enlightenment, sitting on the lion seat under the bodhi tree. He was respectfully surrounded by humans and such nonhumans as devas, nāga kings, gandharvas, kiṃnaras, and mahoragas. They also saw the sixteen princes requesting the Buddha to turn the wheel of the Dharma. 
“Then all the Brahmas bowed until their foreheads touched the Buddha’s feet and then circled around him one hundred thousand times. They scattered heavenly ﬂowers on the Buddha, and the ﬂowers they scattered were piled up as high as Mount Sumeru. They also paid homage to the Buddha’s bodhi tree. 
Having reverently offered the Buddha ﬂowers, they presented their palaces to him, saying: Please accept the palaces we now offer you and beneﬁt us through your compassion! 
“Then the great Brahmas spoke these verses wholeheartedly and in unison before the Buddha: O Great Sage, Deva of Devas! We now bow to the one Whose voice is as beautiful as the kalaviṅka bird’s And who has compassion for sentient beings. 
The Bhagavat is truly extraordinary And can only be seen once In an extremely long time. One hundred and eighty kalpas Have passed away fruitlessly, And no buddhas have appeared during this time. 
The worlds have been ﬁlled With people in the three troubled states of being, And the devas have decreased. The Buddha has now appeared in the world To be the eyes of sentient beings. 
He will be the refuge of the world And will seek to protect all. As the father of sentient beings, He is the compassionate benefactor. 
Because of our past merits, We now have the good fortune to be able To meet the Bhagavat! “Thereupon, having praised the Buddha in verse, the great Brahmas said this: O Bhagavat! We entreat you to turn the wheel of the Dharma out of your compassion for all and save sentient beings. 
If sentient beings hear this Dharma They will attain the path and be born as devas. The beings in the troubled states of being will decrease While those who persevere in the good will increase. “Then the Tathāgata Mahābhijñājñānābhibhū silently consented. 
“Furthermore, O monks, the great Brahmas in the ﬁve hundreds of thousands of koṭis of lands in the south each saw their palaces illuminated as they had never been before. 
Joyful and ecstatic, they were struck with wonder. They immediately assembled to discuss this matter together, asking: Why have our palaces been illuminated? 
“At that time there was a great Brahma, called Sudharma. He spoke to the assembly of Brahmas in verse saying: Our palaces are illuminated With brilliant light. There must be a reason for this, And we should seek its source. 
We have not seen such a phenomenon During the past hundreds of thousands of kalpas. Has a deva of great merit been born, Or has a buddha appeared in the world? 
“Thereupon ﬁve hundred myriads of koṭis of great Brahmas went toward the north with their palaces, to enquire about this phenomenon, carrying heavenly ﬂowers in their robes. 
They saw the Tathāgata Mahābhijñā jñānābhibhū on the terrace of enlightenment, sitting on the lion seat under the bodhi tree. He was respectfully surrounded by humans and such nonhumans as devas, nāga kings, gandharvas, kiṃnaras, and mahoragas. They also saw the sixteen princes requesting the Buddha to turn the wheel of the Dharma. 
“Then all the great Brahmas bowed until their foreheads touched the Buddha’s feet and then circled around him one hundred thousand times. They scattered heavenly ﬂowers on the Buddha, and the ﬂowers they scattered piled up as high as Mount Sumeru. They also paid homage to the Buddha’s bodhi tree. 
Having revered the Buddha with ﬂowers, they offered their palaces to him, saying: Please accept the palaces we now offer you, and beneﬁt us through your compassion! 
“Then the great Brahmas spoke these verses wholeheartedly and in unison before the Buddha: O Destroyer of Afﬂictions! It is extremely difﬁcult to meet a Bhagavat. We are now meeting the Buddha for the ﬁrst time Since one hundred and thirty kalpas have passed away. 
Please satisfy sentient beings, Who are suffering from hunger and thirst, By pouring down the rain of the Dharma! O One Possessed of Immeasurable Wisdom, Whom we have never met before! Today we have encountered The one who appears as rarely As the uḍumbara ﬂower blooms. 
We have all come to request That you expound it With your profound voice! “Then the Tathāgata Mahābhijñājñānābhibhū silently consented. 
“The very same thing happened in the worlds from the southwestern to the lower regions, as well as those in other directions. “Then all the great Brahmas in the ﬁve hundred myriads of koṭis of lands in the upper region saw their palaces illuminated with a light that had never existed before. 
Joyful and ecstatic, they were struck with wonder. They immediately assembled to discuss this matter together, asking: Why have our palaces been illuminated? 
“There was a great Brahma in that assembly called Śikhin. He spoke to the assembly of Brahmas in verse, saying: Why have all our palaces Been brilliantly illuminated With this light of virtuous dignity And adorned in this unprecedented way? 
We have never seen such a wonderful phenomenon! Has a deva of great merit been born, Or has a buddha appeared in the world? 
“Thereupon ﬁve hundred myriads of koṭis of great Brahmas went into the lower regions with their palaces to enquire about this phenomenon, carrying heavenly ﬂowers in their robes. 
They saw the Tathāgata Mahābhijñā jñānābhibhū on the terrace of enlightenment sitting on the lion seat under the bodhi tree. He was respectfully surrounded by humans and such nonhumans as devas, nāga kings, gandharvas, kiṃnaras, and mahoragas. They also saw the sixteen princes requesting the Buddha to turn the wheel of the Dharma. 
“Then all the great Brahmas bowed until their foreheads touched the Buddha’s feet and then circumambulated him one hundred thousand times. They scattered heavenly ﬂowers on the Buddha, and the ﬂowers they scattered were piled up as high as Mount Sumeru. They also paid homage to the Buddha’s bodhi tree. 
Having reverently offered him ﬂowers, they presented their palaces to the Buddha, saying: 
Please accept the palaces we now offer you, and beneﬁt us through your compassion! “Then all the great Brahmas spoke these verses wholeheartedly and in unison before the Buddha: How splendid it is to meet the buddhas, The Great Sages who deliver the world, Who diligently work to get sentient beings Out of the hell of the triple world! 
The Best of Devas and Humans, Who has universal wisdom, Out of compassion for everyone Opens the gate to immortality And extensively saves all. 
Since olden times, immeasurable kalpas Have passed away in vain Without the presence of the Buddha. In the time before the Bhagavat appears, The ten directions are in constant darkness. Those in the three troubled states of being increase And the asuras also ﬂourish. The devas decrease all the more, And when they die Many of them fall into those troubled states. 
Having never heard the teaching from the Buddha, All of them always behave badly, And their physical power and wisdom decreases. 
Because of their erring deeds They lose happiness or any notion of it. Abiding in the teaching of false views They know nothing of good conduct. Deprived of the buddhas’ inspiration, They always fall into the troubled states of being. 
After a very long time, the Buddha has now Appeared as the Eye of the World. It is out of compassion for sentient beings That the Buddha appears in the world. 
We are all extremely happy, And all the other beings joyfully acclaim This unprecedented experience. 
All our palaces are beautifully adorned By this ray of light. We now offer them to the Bhagavat. Please accept them out of your compassion! 
By the universal transference of this merit, May we and all other beings Together attain the buddha path! “Thereupon the ﬁve hundred myriads of koṭis of great Brahmas, having praised the Buddha in verse, each spoke to him, saying: O Bhagavat! We strongly entreat you to turn the wheel of the Dharma, give ease to many, and enable them to attain the path. 
We strongly entreat you to accept our request; And out of your compassion And with your wonderful voice, Expound the Dharma That you have perfected Over immeasurable kalpas. “And then the Tathāgata Mahābhijñājñānābhibhū acceded to the request made by all the great Brahmas from the ten directions and the sixteen princes. He then immediately turned three times the Dharma wheel of twelve spokes that no śrāmaṇas, brahmans, devamāras, Brahmas, or any other being in the world could turn. He taught: 
When becoming ceases, then birth ceases. When birth ceases, then old age, illness, death, anxiety, sorrow, suffering, and distress cease. “When the Buddha explained this Dharma to the great assembly of the devas and humans, at that time six hundred myriads of koṭis of nayutas of people, because they were not attached to any existent thing, became free of all corruption. All of them perfected profound meditations, the three sciences, the six transcendent powers, and were endowed with the eight liberations. 
“When he taught the Dharma for the second, third, and fourth time, thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of sentient beings, equal to the sands of the Ganges River, who were not attached to any existent thing, became free of all corruption. 
Innumerable, immeasurable, incalculable śrāvakas followed in their turn. “At that time the sixteen princes who were still young renounced household life and became śrāmaṇeras. All their faculties were sharp, and their wisdom was penetrating. They had paid homage to hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of buddhas, practiced the pure path of discipline and integrity, and sought highest, complete enlightenment. 
All of these immeasurable thousands of myriads of koṭis of śrāvakas of great merit have all attained perfection. 
O Bhagavat! You should also expound the teaching of highest, complete enlightenment to us! Hearing it, we shall all practice it. O Bhagavat! 
We aspire for the wisdom and insight of the Tathāgata. The Buddha himself knows what is deep in our minds. “At that time eight myriads of koṭis of people in the assembly who served the noble emperor saw the sixteen princes renounce household life and appealed to the emperor to allow their own renunciation. The emperor immediately gave his permission. 
“Then the Buddha accepted the request of the śrāmaṇeras. After twenty thousand kalpas had passed he taught to the fourfold assembly this Mahayana sutra called the Lotus Sutra, the instruction for bodhisattvas and treasured lore of the buddhas. 
“After the Buddha taught this sutra, all the sixteen śrāmaṇeras preserved, recited, and understood it in order to achieve highest, complete enlightenment. 
When the Buddha taught this sutra, all the sixteen śrāmaṇeras, the bodhisattvas, completely accepted it. 
There were also some among the śrāvakas who believed it. 
But all the other thousands of myriads of koṭis of sentient beings became confused. 
“The Buddha continuously taught this sutra for eight thousand kalpas without stopping. 
After teaching this sutra, he immediately entered a quiet place and abided in meditation for eighty-four thousand kalpas. 
“At that time each of the sixteen śrāmaṇeras, the bodhisattvas, knowing that the Buddha had entered the quiet place and was abiding tranquilly in meditation, ascended the Dharma seat and extensively taught and explained the Lotus Sutra to the fourfold assembly for eighty-four thousand kalpas. 
Each of them saved six hundred myriads of koṭis of nayutas of sentient beings equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River. By revealing and teaching it, they gladdened these sentient beings and awoke in them the thought of highest, complete enlightenment. “Having arisen from samādhi after eighty-four thousand kalpas had passed, the Buddha Mahābhijñājñānābhibhū approached the Dharma seat and sat down with complete mindfulness. He addressed everyone in the great assembly, saying: 
They preserved the wisdom of the buddhas and revealed it to sentient beings, causing them to enter into it. 
All of you should approach and pay them homage again and again. 
Why is this? 
If there are any śrāvakas, pratyekabuddhas, and bodhisattvas who are able to believe and preserve the teaching in this sutra expounded by these sixteen bodhisattvas and not disparage it, they will all attain the wisdom of the Tathāgata, highest, complete enlightenment. 
The Buddha addressed the monks, saying: “These sixteen bodhisattvas always willingly taught this Lotus Sutra. Each bodhisattva has inspired six hundred myriads of koṭis of nayutas of sentient beings equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River. In life after life, they remained with these bodhisattvas and, hearing this teaching from them, they believed and understood. 
“O monks! I shall now tell you that these sixteen śrāmaṇeras, disciples of that buddha Mahābhijñājñānābhibhū, have now attained highest, complete enlightenment and presently teach the Dharma in the lands of the ten directions. There are immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of bodhisattvas and śrāvakas who have become their attendants. 
“Two of these śrāmaṇeras have became buddhas in the east. One is called Akṣobhya in the land called Abhirati and the other is called Merukūṭa. 
In the southeast there are two buddhas. One is called Siṃhaghoṣa and the other is called Siṃhadhvaja. 
In the south there are two buddhas called Ākāśapratiṣṭhita and Nitya pari nirvṛta. 
There are also two buddhas in the southwest. One is called Indra dhvaja and the other is called Brahmadhvaja. 
In the west there are two buddhas called Amitāyus and Sarvaloka dhātū padra vodvega pratyuttīrṇa. 
There are two buddhas in the northwest. One is called Tamāla patracandanagandhābhijña. The other is called Meru kalpa. 
In the north there are two buddhas. One is called Megha svaradīpa and the other is called Meghasvara rāja. 
In the northeast there is a buddha called Sarva loka bha ya cchambhi tatva vidhvaṃsanakara. And the sixteenth one is myself, Buddha Śākyamuni, who in this sahā world achieved highest, complete enlightenment. “O monks! 
When we were śrāmaṇeras, each of us inspired immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of sentient beings equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River. Those sentient beings who heard the teaching from me attained highest, complete enlightenment. 
There are sentient beings who still abide in the stage of a śrāvaka and whom I will inspire to attain highest, complete enlightenment. 
By means of this teaching, they will gradually enter the buddha path. 
Why is this? 
“The wisdom of the Tathāgatas is hard to believe and hard to understand. 
Those incalculable sentient beings equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River who were inspired at that time were you, O monks, and those disciples who will be śrāvakas in the future after my parinirvāṇa. 
“After my parinirvāṇa there will be disciples who will not hear this sutra and will neither know nor understand the bodhisattva practice; yet through the merit they have acquired, the thought of extinction will awake in them and they will enter parinirvāṇa. 
“I will become a buddha in another land with a different name. 
Although the idea of extinction has awoken in these disciples and they have entered parinirvāṇa, in that land they will still seek the wisdom of the buddhas and will then be able to hear this sutra. They can obtain parinirvāṇa only through the buddha vehicle. There are no other vehicles except the one taught through the skillful means of the Tathāgatas. “O monks! 
When the Tathāgata realizes that the time of his parinirvāṇa is approaching, knowing that the assembly is pure, ﬁrm in belief and understanding, has penetrated the teaching of emptiness, and has deeply entered meditation, he will then gather the assembly of bodhisattvas and śrāvakas together and teach this sutra to them. 
In this world there is no second vehicle through which one can attain parinirvāṇa; only through the single buddha vehicle can one attain it. 
“You should know, O monks, that the Tathāgata through skillful means deeply penetrates the dispositions of sentient beings. Knowing their inclination toward the inferior teachings and that they are deeply attached to the desires of the ﬁve senses, he teaches nirvana for their sake. 
If they listen, they will accept it. “Suppose in a desolate, fearful place there were a dangerous road ﬁve hundred yojanas long. 
There is a large group that wants to travel along this road to reach a place where there is great treasure. 
They have a leader who is wise and penetrating and who knows the passable and impassable parts of this dangerous road very well. Although he wants to guide these people past the danger, they become exhausted along the way. 
Addressing the leader they say: We are extremely tired and frightened. We cannot go any further. 
We are still far away from our destination, and we want to turn back. “The leader, knowing many skillful means, thinks: These people are to be pitied. How could they want to turn back and abandon the great treasure? 
“After thinking this the leader, through his skillful means, magically creates a city three hundred yojanas away along the dangerous road. He addresses the people, saying: Do not be frightened. Do not turn back! 
You may now stay in this great city and be at your leisure. 
If you enter this city, you can be comfortable and at ease. 
Once you are able to go on and reach the treasure site, then you can depart once more. “Then the exhausted people rejoice greatly and praise this unprecedented experience, saying: We are now free of this evil road and will be comfortable and at ease. “Then they proceed to the apparitional city and enter it. 
Then the leader realizes that they are rested and their fatigue has gone. 
He immediately makes the apparitional city vanish and says to the people: All of you, come along! The treasure site is near. 
I made that great apparitional city only in order to let you rest. “O monks! 
The Tathāgata is exactly like this. Now for your sake he has become a great leader who knows the long, dangerous, and evil road of birth, death, and desire’s confusion. You should leave it and be saved. 
“If sentient beings hear only about the single buddha vehicle they will then want neither to see nor approach a buddha. They will think that the buddha path is long and attainable only after enduring severe and protracted suffering. The Buddha, knowing their minds, knowing that they are weak-willed and of lowly aspiration, teaches them the two nirvanas through skillful means in order to let them rest halfway to the goal. 
If there are sentient beings who abide in either of these two stages, the Tathāgata immediately teaches: What you have accomplished is not complete. The stage you abide in is close to the wisdom of the buddhas. You should observe and consider that the nirvana you have obtained is not the true one. 
It is only through the power of the Tathāgata’s skillful means that the single buddha vehicle is explained as three. “The Buddha is just like that leader who conjured a great apparitional city to let the people rest. 
Knowing that they were rested, he addressed them, saying: “The treasure site is near. This city is not real. 
It is only my invention.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: The Buddha Mahābhijñājñānābhibhū sat On the terrace of enlightenment for ten kalpas, But still the Dharma of the buddhas Did not appear to him, And he did not attain the buddha path. 
The devas, nāga kings, asuras, and others Constantly rained down heavenly ﬂowers In order to pay homage to that buddha. 
The devas beat heavenly drums And played various kinds of music. The fragrant winds blew the withered ﬂowers away And then they rained down fresh, beautiful ones. 
After ten intermediate kalpas had passed, He then attained the buddha path; And all the devas and humans Became joyful and ecstatic. 
The sixteen princes of that buddha, Surrounded by thousands of Myriads of koṭis of attendants, Came to the place where the Buddha was. Having bowed until their foreheads touched his feet, They requested him to turn the wheel of the Dharma Saying: O Noble Lion! Fill us and everyone else with the rain of the Dharma! 
The palaces of the Brahmas in the ﬁve hundred Myriads of koṭis of lands in the east Were illuminated as never before. 
All of the Brahmas, seeing this phenomenon, Came to the place where the Buddha was. They reverently scattered ﬂowers And offered him their palaces. Requesting the Buddha To turn the wheel of the Dharma, They praised him in verse. 
The Buddha knew that the right time Had not yet arrived, And although he had been asked, He sat in silence. 
The other three directions, the four remaining quarters, And the upper and lower regions were all like this. All the Brahmas scattered ﬂowers, Offered their palaces, and requested the Buddha To turn the wheel of the Dharma, Saying: It is extremely difﬁcult to meet a Bhagavat. We entreat you to open wide the gate to immortality And turn the wheel of the highest Dharma Through your great compassion! 
You should know about such miseries! When the Buddha expounded this teaching, Six hundred myriads of koṭis of trillions of people Attained the complete extinction of all suffering, And became arhats. 
At the time of the second teaching, Thousands of myriads of people, Equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River, Unattached to any existent thing, Also attained arhatship. 
After that an incalculable number Of beings attained the path. Even if one were to count For myriads of koṭis of kalpas, One could not ﬁnish counting their number. 
Then the sixteen princes renounced Household life and became śrāmaṇeras. They all asked the Buddha to expound The teaching of the Mahayana, saying: Let us and all of our attendants Attain the buddha path! We entreat you to let us obtain The Bhagavat’s eye of wisdom, supreme in purity! 
Explaining the true teaching And the path to be practiced by the bodhisattvas, He taught this Lotus Sutra in verses Equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River. 
After the Buddha taught this sutra, He entered meditation in a quiet place And sat with complete concentration in the same spot For eighty-four thousand kalpas. 
Those śrāmaṇeras, knowing that the Buddha Had not arisen from meditation, Taught the highest wisdom of the buddhas To immeasurable koṭis of beings. 
Each sat on the Dharma seat And explained this Mahayana sutra. After the great parinirvāṇa of that buddha, They propagated the Dharma and inspired others. 
Each śrāmaṇera saved Six hundred myriads of koṭis of sentient beings, Equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River. 
Those who heard the teaching After the Buddha’s parinirvāṇa Were always born together with their teachers In various other buddha lands. 
These sixteen śrāmaṇeras Completely cultivated the buddha path And now, in the ten directions, They have attained highest, complete enlightenment. 
Then those who heard the Dharma In the presence of each of these buddhas And those who are in the śrāvaka stage Will gradually be taught the buddha path. 
I am one of the sixteen. I have also taught you in the past. Therefore through skillful means I will now also lead you to the goal Which is the wisdom of the buddhas. 
Through these former causes and conditions, I will now teach the Lotus Sutra In order to let you enter the buddha path. Do not be worried or frightened! 
Suppose there were a dangerous road In a deserted wasteland far away, Where there are many harmful beasts. There is neither water nor grass. It is a fearful place for human beings. 
Innumerable thousands of myriads of beings Wish to pass along this dangerous way. But that road is very long, Some ﬁve hundred yojanas. 
Then there is a leader, Endowed with deep wisdom and knowledge, Discerning and resolute, Who saves the people from various calamities When they meet with danger. 
The people all get tired And address the leader, saying: We are all now totally exhausted. We want to turn back from here! The leader thinks: 
He immediately thinks of skillful means And how he should now use his transcendent powers; And he makes a great apparitional city With houses adorned and surrounded With gardens, moats, and ponds. There are fortiﬁed gates and tall towers, And it is full of men and women. When the apparition is complete, He immediately consoles the people, saying: 
Do not be afraid! When you enter the city, You can each do as you please. All the people enter the city. They are very happy and feel at ease, Thinking they have been saved. 
When the leader knows they are rested, He gathers them together and addresses them, saying: You should now proceed, For this is just an apparitional city! 
Seeing that you were extremely fatigued And that you wanted to turn back After coming halfway, I made this apparitional city through skillful means. 
You should now strive To reach the treasure site together. I am exactly like this. I am the leader of all. 
Perceiving that those seeking the way Have become timid, have stopped halfway, And are unable to walk to the end of the dangerous road Of birth, death, and desire’s confusion, I use skillful means and teach nirvana So that they may rest, saying: 
You have extinguished suffering, And you have completed what must be done. Knowing that they have reached nirvana And attained arhatship, the Buddha immediately Gathers the great assembly together And teaches the True Dharma. 
All the buddhas explain and teach The three vehicles through skillful means. Although there is only the single buddha vehicle, They teach two in order to provide a place of rest. 
For your beneﬁt I now teach the truth: What you have attained is not the ultimate goal. You must call forth great efforts In order to obtain the omniscience of a buddha. 
If you attain omniscience And the qualities of the Buddha, Such things as the ten powers, And become endowed with the thirty-two marks, Then you will have attained the ultimate goal. 
The buddhas, the Leaders, teach nirvana In order to let beings rest in comfort. When they know that they have rested, They lead them to the wisdom of the buddhas. 
The Five Hundred Disciples Receive Their Predictions At that time, Pūrṇa, the son of Maitrāyaṇī, after hearing the Buddha teach the Dharma according to what is appropriate to sentient beings through the wisdom of skillful means and bestow the prediction of highest, complete enlightenment on all the great disciples, and then hearing stories about past causes and conditions and that all the buddhas have obtained perfect mastery of transcendent powers, obtained an unprecedented experience and became pure in mind and joyful. 
He immediately rose from his seat, went into the presence of the Buddha, bowed until his forehead touched the Buddha’s feet, and then stood to one side gazing unwaveringly at the Buddha and thought this: The Bhagavat is truly marvelous. His actions are rare. 
He teaches the Dharma according to the natural capacities of the beings in the world through skillful means, wisdom, and insight. He leads sentient beings away from their various attachments. 
We have no words to describe the Buddha’s qualities. Only the Buddha, the Bhagavat, is able to know our deep intentions and original vow. 
Then the Buddha addressed the monks, saying: “Do you see Pūrṇa, the son of Maitrāyaṇī? 
I always praise him as the foremost among the teachers of the Dharma. I also always praise his various qualities. He diligently maintains and propagates my teaching and is able to gladden and beneﬁt the fourfold assembly. He interprets the True Dharma of the buddhas perfectly and greatly beneﬁts those who practice the pure path of discipline and integrity together with him. 
With the exception of the Tathāgata no one else explains the doctrine more eloquently. 
“You must not think that Pūrṇa is only now able to protect and propagate my teaching. He also protected and propagated the True Dharma of the buddhas in the presence of ninety koṭis of buddhas in the past when he was always the foremost among the teachers of the Dharma. 
Moreover he was completely versed in the teaching of emptiness that the buddhas taught, and attained the fourfold unobstructed wisdom. He has always been able to teach the Dharma clearly and purely. He never had any doubts and was endowed with the transcendent powers of the bodhisattvas. “Throughout each life he always practiced the pure path of discipline and integrity. 
The people who lived in the same buddha world all thought he really was a śrāvaka, yet Pūrṇa beneﬁted immeasurable hundreds of thousands of sentient beings through this skillful means and also led and inspired immeasurable incalculable numbers of beings and caused them to attain highest, complete enlightenment. 
In order to purify the buddha land he always did what the buddhas have done and led and inspired sentient beings. “O monks! 
Pūrṇa also was able to become the foremost among the teachers of the Dharma under the past seven buddhas; and he is also the foremost of those who preach the Dharma under me. He will also be the foremost among the teachers of the Dharma under the future buddhas in this auspicious kalpa. 
He will protect and propagate the Buddha-Dharma; and also in the future he will protect and propagate the Dharma of incalculable limitless buddhas. He will lead, inspire, and beneﬁt incalculable sentient beings and cause them to attain highest, complete enlightenment. 
In order to purify the buddha lands he will always be diligent and persevering, leading and inspiring sentient beings. 
“He will gradually perfect the bodhisattva path and, after immeasurable incalculable kalpas, he will attain highest, complete enlightenment in this land. He will be called Dharmaprabhāsa, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
That Buddha’s land will consist of all the worlds in the great manifold cosmos, equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River. The earth will be made of the seven treasures and it will be level, just like the palm of one’s hand. There will be no mountains, valleys, or hollow places. This land will be ﬁlled with towers of the seven treasures. 
There will be no troubled states of being nor any women. All the sentient beings will be born here spontaneously, without any sexual desires. 
They will attain great transcendent powers, emit rays of light from their bodies, and ﬂy freely through the air. “These beings will be ﬁrm in recollection, persevering, and wise. They will all be of golden hue and adorned with the thirty-two marks. 
The sentient beings in that land will always eat two meals: one being the meal of delight in the Dharma, and the other the meal of pleasure in meditation. 
“There will be immeasurable incalculable thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of bodhisattvas who have attained great transcendent powers and the fourfold unobstructed wisdom. They will be able skillfully to lead and inspire sentient beings. 
The number of śrāvakas there will be impossible to calculate. They will all perfect the six transcendent powers, the three sciences, and the eight liberations. 
“Such will be the immeasurable merits of this buddha’s land, being perfect in adornment. 
The kalpa will be called Ratnāva bhāsa and his land will be called Suviśuddha. 
This buddha’s lifespan will last for immeasurable incalculable kalpas, and the Dharma will abide for a very long time. 
After the parinirvāṇa of that buddha, stupas of the seven treasures will be erected everywhere throughout the land.” Then the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: O monks! Listen carefully! 
The path that the heir of the buddhas Has practiced by learning skillful means Cannot be conceived. 
Because the bodhisattvas know That sentient beings long for inferior teachings And are afraid of great knowledge, They make themselves either śrāvakas Or pratyekabuddhas. They inspire those sentient beings Using innumerable skillful means, saying: 
We are śrāvakas and still very far away From attaining the buddha path. They save immeasurable sentient beings, All of whom they cause to attain perfection; And they even cause those who are lazy, Or who have lowly intentions, Gradually to become buddhas. 
These beings secretly carry out the bodhisattva practice While outwardly calling themselves śrāvakas. Having little desire, Their thoughts ﬁxed on birth and death, They in fact purify the buddha lands. 
These bodhisattvas show sentient beings That they have the three poisons And further they reveal the mark of false views. In this way my disciples save Sentient beings through skillful means. 
If I fully disclosed That they had taken on various forms, The sentient beings hearing this Would immediately become doubtful. 
This Pūrṇa has now practiced the path Under thousands of koṭis of buddhas in the past, And he has propagated and protected The teaching of these buddhas. 
Seeking the highest wisdom Under all these buddhas, He showed that he was the foremost Among the disciples, And that he was knowledgeable and wise. 
Fearless in his teaching, He was able to gladden the people. He never tired in performing The actions of a buddha. 
He has already attained the great transcendent powers And is endowed with the fourfold unobstructed wisdom. Knowing whether the faculties Of sentient beings are sharp or dull, He always teaches the pure Dharma. 
Expounding such doctrines as these, He has taught thousands of koṭis of beings And, by making them abide in the Mahayana teaching, He himself has puriﬁed his buddha land. 
In the future he will also pay homage to Incalculable innumerable buddhas, Protect and propagate the True Dharma, And also purify his buddha land. 
He will always fearlessly teach the Dharma Using his skillful means, Save incalculable sentient beings, And enable them to achieve omniscience. 
Paying homage to all the Tathāgatas And preserving the treasure house of the Dharma, He will eventually become the Buddha Called Dharmaprabhāsa. 
His land will be called Suviśuddha Which will consist of the seven treasures; His kalpa will be called Ratnāvabhāsa. 
There will be a large number of bodhisattvas there Numbering immeasurable koṭis. His buddha land will be ﬁlled With bodhisattvas who have attained Great transcendent powers, And are endowed with dignity. 
There will also be innumerable śrāvakas Who have perfected the three sciences, The eight liberations, And the fourfold unobstructed wisdom. Such beings as these will form the sangha. 
The sentient beings in his land Will have already cut themselves off from sexual desires. Everyone there will thus be pure and born spontaneously, With bodies adorned with the thirty-two marks. 
They will feast on delight in the Dharma And pleasure in meditation, Never thinking of eating anything else. 
There will be neither women Nor troubled states of existence. 
The qualities of the monk Pūrṇa Will be completely perfected And there will be many wise people In this pure land. 
I am now only brieﬂy explaining These immeasurable things. 
Thereupon there were twelve hundred arhats, who had attained complete mental discipline, who thought this: “We have joyfully attained an unprecedented experience. 
If the Bhagavat would give each of us a prediction like those he has given the other great disciples, we would be overjoyed!” The Buddha, knowing their minds, addressed Mahākāśyapa, saying: 
“I shall now bestow the prediction of highest, complete enlightenment one by one on these twelve hundred arhats who are in my presence. 
“My great disciple, the monk Ājñātakauṇḍinya who is in this assembly, will pay homage to sixty-two thousands of koṭis of buddhas. He will thereafter become the buddha called Samanta prabha, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
“The ﬁve hundred arhats beginning with Uruvilvakāśyapa, Gayākāśyapa, Nadīkāśyapa, Kālodāyin, Udāyin, Aniruddha, Revata, Kapphiṇa, Bakkula, Cunda, Svāgata, and the others will all attain highest, complete enlightenment. 
They will all have the same name, that of Samantaprabha.” Then the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: The monk Kauṇḍinya Will meet immeasurable buddhas And, after incalculable kalpas have passed, He will attain perfect enlightenment. 
He will always emit a great ray of light And will be endowed with transcendent powers. His fame will spread universally Throughout the ten directions. He will be honored by all beings And will always teach the highest path; He will therefore be called Samantaprabha. 
His land will be pure, And the bodhisattvas there Will all be of great vigor. They will all ascend marvelous towers And roam in the lands of the ten directions; They will present the most excellent offerings To all of the buddhas. 
After having shown their reverence in this way, They will be full of great joy And immediately return to their own lands. Such will be their transcendent powers. 
The lifespan of this buddha Will be sixty thousand kalpas And the True Dharma will last Twice as long as his lifespan. The Semblance Dharma Will last twice as long as this. When the Dharma disappears, The devas and humans will grieve. 
Those ﬁve hundred monks Will become buddhas each in their turn, All having the same name Samantaprabha. They will give predictions One after the other, saying: 
After my parinirvāṇa So-and-so will become a buddha. The world he inspires Will be exactly like mine today. 
The embellishments of their lands, All the transcendent powers, The assembly of bodhisattvas and śrāvakas, The True and Semblance Dharma, The lifespan and duration of the kalpa, Will be just as I explained before. 
O Kāśyapa! You now know That the ﬁve hundred arhats Whose minds are free, And the remaining śrāvakas Will also be exactly like this. You should teach those Who are not in this assembly! 
Thereupon the ﬁve hundred arhats, having obtained their predictions from the Buddha, were joyful and ecstatic. They rose from their seats, approached the Buddha, bowed until their foreheads touched his feet, repented of their faults, and reproached themselves, saying: 
We have always thought we had attained complete nirvana. We now realize that we were ignorant. 
Why is this? 
We should have attained the wisdom of the Tathāgatas. Yet we were satisﬁed with little wisdom! 
Suppose there were a man who came to the house of a close friend and went to sleep after becoming intoxicated with wine. 
The intimate friend, having to go out on ofﬁcial business, sews a priceless jewel into the inside of his friend’s garment and, giving it to him, leaves. 
But the man who was drunk and asleep is totally unaware of this. 
After getting up he leaves and roams around until he arrives in another country. 
Although he diligently seeks for food and clothing they are very difﬁcult to obtain. 
He is satisﬁed if he just obtains a very meager amount. 
Later on the intimate friend happens to meet this man. Seeing him, he says: 
How have you come to this state through lack of food and clothing? 
Once, on such-and-such a day in such-and-such a month and year, I sewed a priceless jewel into the inside of your garment, wanting to make things easier for you and to let you enjoy the desires of the ﬁve senses as much as you wished. 
It is still there, although you aren’t aware of it, and you seek your livelihood with great effort and hardship! You have been very foolish. 
Sell this jewel and use it to buy what you need. From now on you will know neither poverty nor want and can live as you wish. “The Buddha is exactly like this. When he was a bodhisattva he aroused in us the aspiration for omniscience. 
Nevertheless we forgot, we did not know or understand. 
We attained the path of the arhats and considered that we had attained nirvana. It was very hard for us to support ourselves and we were satisﬁed with little. 
But we never fully lost our wish for all-knowledge. 
Now the Bhagavat, perceiving our minds, has said this: O monks! 
What you have attained is not the complete nirvana. 
For a long time I have made you plant the various roots of good merit of a buddha and shown you the marks of nirvana through skillful means. That is why you consider yourselves to have actually attained nirvana! “O Bhagavat! 
We now know that we are actually bodhisattvas and will obtain a prediction of highest, complete enlightenment. 
For this reason we are extremely happy at having obtained such an unprecedented experience.” At that time Ājñātakauṇḍinya and the others, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: We have heard his voice Giving the prediction of utmost ease. Rejoicing in this unprecedented experience, We bow to the Buddha whose wisdom is immeasurable. 
We now repent of our faults In the presence of the Bhagavat. Although we had attained Only a small measure of nirvana, Out of the immeasurable treasures of the Buddha, We were self-satisﬁed, Just like ignorant fools! 
Suppose there were a poor man Who went to the house of a close friend Whose family was very wealthy. He was entertained with a feast And had a priceless jewel sewn To the inside of his garment. The wealthy friend made him this gift Without saying anything, and went away. The poor man had fallen asleep And did not know of this. 
Shortly afterward this man gets up, And after wandering around Arrives in another country. He manages to seek out Enough food and clothing to live But has great difﬁculty in supporting himself. Yet he is satisﬁed to obtain a little And does not desire anything better. 
He is still unaware of the priceless jewel Sewn inside his garment. 
The intimate friend who gave him the jewel Meets this poor man later And bitterly reproaches him, Showing him the jewel That had been sewn into his garment. 
The poor man, seeing this jewel, rejoices greatly And with this rich treasure he enjoys To his satisfaction the desires of the ﬁve senses. We are exactly like this. 
For a long time, the Bhagavat Has led and inspired us Through his compassion, And planted in us the highest aspiration. 
Because we were ignorant We neither noticed nor knew; We were satisﬁed with attaining Only a small measure of nirvana And did not seek for the rest. 
Now the Buddha has enlightened us, saying: This is not the real nirvana. Attaining the highest wisdom of the buddhas Is indeed the only real nirvana. 
Now, having heard the predictions from the Buddha And of the adorned lands, And the subsequent predictions, We universally rejoice in body and mind! 
The Predictions for Those Who Still Have More to Learn and for Those Who Do Not At that time Ānanda and Rāhula thought this: 
“The delight we would feel if we were to receive our predictions is constantly before our minds!” Then arising from their seats and going into the presence of the Buddha, they bowed until their foreheads touched his feet, and spoke to him in unison, saying: 
We should also be qualiﬁed to receive our predictions! Both of us take refuge only in the Tathāgata. 
Moreover we are well known by the devas, humans, and asuras throughout the entire world! Ānanda has always attended the Tathāgata, preserving the treasure house of the Dharma; and Rāhula is the son of the Buddha. 
If the Buddha would bestow upon us the prediction of highest, complete enlightenment then our vows would be fulﬁlled and our wishes also realized!” Then two thousand disciples, śrāvakas, some who still had more to learn, and some who did not, all arose from their seats and with their right shoulders bared went into the presence of the Buddha. Attentively, with palms pressed together, they gazed at the Bhagavat, all having the same wish as Ānanda and Rāhula, and stood to one side. 
Then the Buddha addressed Ānanda, saying: “In the future world you will become a buddha called Sāgara dharabuddhivikrīḍitarājābhijña, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
You will pay homage to sixty-two koṭis of buddhas, preserve the treasure house of the Dharma and ultimately attain highest, complete enlightenment. 
Further, you will inspire twenty thousands of myriads of koṭis of bodhisattvas, equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River, causing them to attain highest, complete enlightenment. 
“Your land will be called Avanāmitavaijayantā. It will be pure and the earth will be made of lapis lazuli. 
The lifespan of this buddha will be for immeasurable, incalculable thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas. Their number would be incalculable even if one were to count for immeasurable, innumerable thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas. 
The True Dharma will abide in the world twice as long as his lifespan and the Semblance Dharma will abide in the world twice as long as the True Dharma. 
“O Ānanda! 
The virtues of this buddha Sāgaradhara buddhi vikrīḍita rājābhijña will be praised by immeasurable thousands of myriads of koṭis of Buddha Tathāgatas in the ten directions, equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River.” Thereupon the Tathāgata, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: I now tell the assembly That Ānanda, the preserver of the Dharma, Will pay homage to the buddhas And ultimately attain complete enlightenment. 
His land will be pure And called Avanāmitavaijayantā He will lead and inspire bodhisattvas In numbers equal to the sands of the Ganges River. 
This buddha will be endowed With great virtue and dignity, and his fame Will ﬁll the ten directions. 
His lifespan will be immeasurable Due to his compassion for sentient beings. The True Dharma will abide Twice as long as his lifespan And the Semblance Dharma will abide Twice as long as the True Dharma. 
Countless sentient beings Within the Dharma of this buddha, Equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River, Will plant the seed of the buddha path.” At that time the eight thousand bodhisattvas in the assembly, in whom the thought of enlightenment had recently awakened, all thought this: “Since we have never heard the great bodhisattvas receive predictions like this, why should the śrāvakas now obtain it?” Then the Bhagavat, knowing what the bodhisattvas were thinking, spoke to them, saying: 
The thought of highest, complete enlightenment once awoke simultaneously in Ānanda and myself in the presence of the Buddha Dharma gaganābhyudgatarāja. 
Ānanda always wanted to hear a great deal about the Dharma, and I always made diligent efforts. For this reason I was shortly able to attain highest, complete enlightenment, whereas Ānanda preserves my teaching and in the future will uphold the treasure house of the Dharma of all the buddhas. He will lead, inspire, and perfect the bodhisattvas. 
Since this was his original vow, he has obtained this prediction!” Ānanda, while facing the Buddha in the audience, heard his own prediction and about the adornments of his land. His vow fulﬁlled, he rejoiced greatly at attaining such an unprecedented experience. 
With his unobstructed penetration he immediately remembered the treasure house of the Dharma of the past immeasurable thousands of myriads of koṭis of buddhas as if he had just heard of it today; and he also became aware of his original vow. 
Thereupon Ānanda spoke these verses: The Bhagavat is truly extraordinary. He has enabled me to recollect the Dharma Of incalculable numbers of buddhas of the past, Just as if I had ﬁrst heard of the matter today. 
I now have no further doubts. I am established in the buddha path. I have become an attendant of the Tathāgata And, as an attendant, I will preserve The Dharma of all the buddhas, using skillful means. 
Then the Buddha addressed Rāhula, saying: “In the future you will become a buddha called Saptaratnapadmavikrama, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
You will pay homage to the Buddha Tathāgatas, whose number is equal to that of the grains of dust in the ten worlds; and you will always become the eldest son of all the buddhas just as you are my eldest son now. 
“The adornments of the land, the number of disciples led and inspired, the duration of the True and Semblance Dharma of this buddha Saptaratnapadmavikrama will be just like those of the Buddha Sāgaradharabuddhi vikrīḍitarājābhijña, without the slightest difference. 
You will also become the eldest son of this buddha and after that attain highest, complete enlightenment.” At that time the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: When I was a prince, Rāhula was my eldest son. And now that I have perfected the buddha path, He accepts my teaching as the heir of the Dharma. 
In the future he will meet Immeasurable koṭis of buddhas. Becoming the eldest son of all these buddhas, He will wholeheartedly seek The buddha path. 
Only I am able to discern Rāhula’s unseen practice. But now that he has become my eldest son, He reveals it to the sentient beings. 
His thousands of myriads Of koṭis of merits are uncountable and incalculable; He will become established in the Buddha-Dharma And seek the highest path. 
Then the Bhagavat perceived that the minds of those two thousand people, some of whom had more to learn and some of whom did not, were sincere, mild, and receptive. They were all attentively gazing at the Buddha. 
The Buddha said to Ānanda: “Do you not see these two thousand people, some of whom have more to learn and some of whom do not?” Ānanda replied: “Yes, I see them.” The Buddha said: 
“O Ānanda! 
All of these people will pay homage to the Buddha Tathāgatas, whose number is equal to that of the grains of dust in ﬁfty worlds. They will respect, honor, and preserve the treasure house of the Dharma and will later all become buddhas simultaneously in the worlds of the ten directions. They will all have the same name, Ratnaketurāja, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
Their lifespans will last one kalpa. 
The adornments of their lands, the number of śrāvakas and bodhisattvas, and the duration of the True and Semblance Dharma will be the same for all.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
Now in my presence These two thousand śrāvakas Have all received their predictions. In the future they will all become buddhas. 
The buddhas they will revere Will be equal to the number of grains of dust, Just as mentioned above. Preserving this treasure house of the Dharma, They will later attain complete enlightenment. 
They will all have the same name And dwell in the lands of the ten directions. All sitting at the exact same time, On the terrace of enlightenment, They will attain the highest wisdom. All of them will be called Ratnaketurāja. 
Their lands, the number of disciples, Duration of the True and Semblance Dharma Will all be the same without any difference. 
Moreover, through their transcendent powers, They will save sentient beings Throughout the ten directions. Their fame will spread universally And they will gradually enter nirvana. 
Then the two thousand people, some of whom had more to learn and some of whom did not, having heard their predictions from the Buddha, rejoiced ecstatically and spoke in verse: O Bhagavat, the Light of Wisdom! We have just heard you give us our predictions And our minds are full of joy, Just as if we had been sprinkled With the Dharma of immortality. 
The Expounder of the Dharma Thereupon the Bhagavat by addressing Bodhisattva Bhaiṣa jyarāja (Medicine King), through him addressed eighty thousand mahā sattvas, saying: 
“O Bhaiṣajyarāja! In this assembly do you see innumerable humans and nonhumans such as devas, nāga kings, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṃnaras, mahoragas, monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen, those seeking the śrāvaka vehicle, the pratyekabuddha vehicle, and the buddha path? If, in the presence of the Buddha any beings such as these hear a single verse or line of the Lotus Sutra, and thereupon have even one thought of rejoicing in it, I will bestow upon them my prediction that they will attain highest, complete enlightenment.” The Buddha addressed Bhaiṣajyarāja, saying: 
“If, after the parinirvāṇa of the Tathāgata, any being hears even a single verse or line of the Lotus Sutra, and thereupon has even one thought of rejoicing in it, I will bestow upon them the prediction that they will attain highest, complete enlightenment. 
“If there is anyone who preserves, recites, explains, or copies even a single verse of the Lotus Sutra, or who respects this sutra as if it were a buddha, or who reverently offers it various ﬂowers, perfumes, necklaces, fragrant ointments, scented powders, burning incense, canopies, ﬂags, banners, clothing, or music, or who simply honors it with his palms pressed together, know, O Bhaiṣa jyarāja, that this person has already paid homage to tens of myriads of koṭis of buddhas of the past! 
If anyone should ask you what kind of sentient being will become a buddha in the future, you should inform them that it is those of this kind who will deﬁnitely become buddhas in the future. Why is this? 
“If there are any sons or daughters of a virtuous family who preserve, recite, explain, and copy even a single line of the Lotus Sutra, or who pay homage to this sutra with various offerings of ﬂowers, perfumes, necklaces, scented powders and ointments, burning incense, canopies, ﬂags, banners, clothing, or music, or who honor it with their palms pressed together, such people should be respected by the entire world. They should be revered in the same way as the Tathāgata is revered. 
Know that these people are great bodhisattvas who are to attain highest, complete enlightenment. Out of their compassion for sentient beings they wish to be born among them in order to expound and explain the Lotus Sutra far and wide. How much more to be honored are those who completely preserve the entire sutra and pay homage to it with various offerings! “O Bhaiṣajyarāja! 
You should know that after my parinirvāṇa these people will set aside the rewards of their pure karma and be born in the troubled world out of their compassion for sentient beings, and in order to expound this sutra far and wide. 
After my pari nirvāṇa, if there are any sons and daughters of a virtuous family who expound even a single line of the Lotus Sutra in private to even a single person, they should be acknowledged as the ambassadors of the Tathāgata. 
They have been dispatched by the Tathāgata and carry out the Tathāgata’s work. As for those who extensively teach among the common people, know that they are yet greater ambassadors. 
“O Bhaiṣajyarāja, if there are erring people during a kalpa, those with troubled thoughts who always disparage the Buddha in his presence, their fault is nonetheless slight. 
Yet if there are those who disparage the laity or ordained people who recite the Lotus Sutra even with a single evil word, their fault is extremely grave. 
Know that those who recite this Lotus Sutra adorn themselves with the adornments of a buddha. This means that they will carry the Tathāgata on their shoulders and pay him homage wherever they go. 
They should be respected, revered, honored, and praised wholeheartedly with palms pressed together, through offerings of ﬂowers, perfumes, necklaces, scented powders, ointments, burning incense, canopies, ﬂags, banners, clothing, delicious food, music, and the best offerings that people can make. They should have heavenly jewels scattered upon them and offered to them. 
Why is this? 
Because these people joyfully expound the Dharma and those who hear it even for an instant will fully attain highest, complete enlightenment.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate upon the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: Those who want to abide in the buddha path And perfect the wisdom of the Self-generated One, Should always diligently pay homage To those who preserve the Lotus Sutra. 
Those who want to quickly attain omniscience Should hold to this sutra And pay homage to those who preserve it. 
Know that anyone who preserves the Lotus Sutra Is an ambassador of the Buddha Who feels compassion for sentient beings. 
Those who preserve the Lotus Sutra Were born here in this world, Withholding themselves from the Pure Land Out of their compassion for sentient beings. 
Know that such people are born Where and when they will. They are born in this troubled world To extensively expound the highest Dharma. 
Such expounders of the Dharma should be revered With offerings of divine ﬂowers, perfumes, Heavenly jeweled clothing, and exquisite celestial jewels. 
Those who preserve this sutra In the troubled world after my parinirvāṇa, Should be paid homage with palms pressed together Just as one pays homage to the Bhagavat. 
These heirs of the buddhas should be revered With delicious food, various delicacies, And a variety of clothing, in the hope of hearing The teaching even for an instant. 
If in the future there is anyone Who preserves this sutra, I will dispatch him to the world of humans To carry out the Tathāgata’s task. 
If throughout one entire kalpa There is anyone with erring thoughts Who always disparages the Buddha With an angry countenance, the consequences of His grave errors will be incalculable. 
If there is anyone who speaks A hostile word even for an instant About those who recite and preserve this Lotus Sutra, His fault will be even greater. 
If throughout one entire kalpa There are people seeking for the buddha path Who praise the Buddha in my presence With incalculable numbers of verses And with palms pressed together, The merits they attain will be immeasurable Because of praising this buddha. 
You must pay tribute to those who preserve the sutra Throughout eighty koṭis of kalpas With the best objects, sounds, Fragrances, ﬂavors, and materials. 
If you are able to hear the teaching for even a moment, After having paid tribute in this way, You will then become delighted, thinking: I have now attained great beneﬁts. 
O Bhaiṣajyarāja! I now tell you that I have taught many sutras; Among these sutras, however, The Lotus Sutra is the utmost and best. 
Then the Buddha spoke further to Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Bhaiṣajyarāja, saying: “There are immeasurable thousands of myriads of koṭis of sutras I have taught in the past, which I teach now, and which I will teach in the future. Among them, however, this Lotus Sutra is the most difﬁcult to accept and to understand. “O Bhaiṣajyarāja! 
This sutra is the treasure house of the hidden essence of all the buddhas. It must not be distributed or heedlessly bestowed upon the people. 
Since times long past all the Buddha Bhagavats have protected it and have never openly taught it. 
Moreover, people show great hostility to this sutra, even in the presence of the Tathāgata. 
“O Bhaiṣajyarāja! You should know that after the parinirvāṇa of the Tathāgata, those who copy, preserve, recite, and revere this sutra and expound it for the sake of others will be clothed with the Tathāgata’s garments and treasured by the present buddhas of the other directions. 
Such people will have the power of great faith, the power of aspiration, as well as the power of the roots of good merit. 
You should know that these people have dwelled together with the Tathāgata, and his hand has caressed their heads. 
“O Bhaiṣajyarāja! Wherever this sutra is taught, read, recited, copied, or wherever it is to be found, one should build a seven-jeweled stupa of great height and width and richly ornamented. There is no need to put a relic inside. 
Why is this? 
Because the Tathāgata is already in it. 
This stupa should be respected, honored, praised and rendered homage with offerings of all kinds of ﬂowers, perfumes, necklaces, canopies, ﬂags, banners, music, and songs. 
If there is anyone able to see this stupa and to pay it homage and honor it, know that such a one is nearing highest, complete enlightenment. “O Bhaiṣajyarāja! 
Among the many people, either among the laity or the ordained, who practice the bodhisattva path, if they are unable to see, hear, recite, copy, preserve, and pay homage to this Lotus Sutra, know that they are people who are not yet properly practicing the bodhisattva path. 
If anyone is able to hear this sutra, such a one is skillfully practicing the bodhisattva path. 
Among sentient beings seeking the buddha path, if there are those who see or hear this Lotus Sutra and, after hearing it, are drawn to it and preserve it, know that they are those who are approaching highest, complete enlightenment. “O Bhaiṣajyarāja! 
Suppose there were a thirsty man seeking water. He drills in search of water on a high plain, yet he sees only dry earth and thus realizes that water is still far away. 
But he does not cease his efforts until he turns up moist earth and gradually reaches mud. Now he is sure that water must be near. 
“The bodhisattvas are exactly like this. If they have not yet heard, understood, or been able to practice this Lotus Sutra, they should be known as people who are still far away from highest, complete enlightenment. 
If they hear, understand, contemplate, and are able to practice it, they realize that they are certainly nearing highest, complete enlightenment. 
Why is this? 
Because the highest, complete enlightenment of all the bodhisattvas is within this sutra. This sutra opens the gate of skillful means and reveals the marks of the truth. 
The treasure house of this Lotus Sutra is deep and remote. No one is able to discover its depths. That is why the Buddha now reveals it, inspiring and perfecting the bodhisattvas. 
“O Bhaiṣajyarāja! If there are bodhisattvas who hear this Lotus Sutra and are confused and frightened, know that they are bodhisattvas in whom the thought of enlightenment has only recently awakened. 
If there are śrāvakas who hear this sutra and are confused and frightened, know that they are people who have excessive pride. 
“O Bhaiṣajyarāja! If there are any sons and daughters of a virtuous family who, after the parinirvāṇa of the Tathāgata, want to teach this Lotus Sutra to the fourfold assembly, how should they teach it? 
These sons and daughters of a virtuous family, after entering the abode of the Tathāgata, wearing the Tathāgata’s garments, and sitting on his seat, should then extensively teach this sutra to the fourfold assembly. 
The Tathāgata’s chamber is nothing but the great compassion toward all sentient beings. 
The Tathāgata’s garments are the thoughts of gentleness and perseverance, and the Tathāgata’s seat is the very emptiness of all existing things. 
After settling among them one should tirelessly and extensively expound this Lotus Sutra for the sake of the bodhisattvas and the fourfold assembly. “O Bhaiṣajyarāja! 
I will dispatch transformed beings to other worlds who will gather the people together to hear the teaching. I will also dispatch transformed monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen to hear this teaching. All these transformed beings will hear the Dharma, believe and accept it, and not reject it. 
“If an expounder of the Dharma resides in a secluded place, I will then dispatch many devas, nāgas, yakṣas, gandharvas, and asuras to hear his teaching. 
Although I will be in a different land, I will periodically let the expounders of the Dharma see me. 
If they forget a line of this sutra I will explain it again, enabling them to master it.” Thereupon, the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: If you wish to rid yourself of idleness, You should listen to this sutra. This sutra is rarely heard, And it is also difﬁcult to accept. 
Suppose there were a thirsty man Seeking for water by drilling Into the earth on a high plain. He sees only dry earth and knows That water is still far away. 
He gradually sees The moist earth turn into mud And knows with certainty That water is near. O Bhaiṣajyarāja! 
You should know that those people Who do not hear the Lotus Sutra Are very far away From the Buddha’s wisdom. If they hear this profound sutra Which brings resolution to the śrāvakas And if they hear this King of Sutras And attentively contemplate it, Know that these people Are close to the Buddha’s wisdom. 
If people want to expound this sutra, They should enter the Tathāgata’s chamber, Put on the Tathāgata’s garments, And sit on the Tathāgata’s seat. They then should face the people without fear, So that they may extensively Illuminate and explain it to the assembly. 
The Tathāgata’s chamber is great compassion, His garments are gentleness and perseverance, And his seat is the emptiness of all existent things. After settling among them, They should expound the Dharma. 
Even if, when they expound this sutra, People disparage them with evil words, Or attack them with swords, sticks, tiles, or stones, Being mindful of the Buddha, They should persevere. 
I will manifest my pure and solid form In thousands of myriads of koṭis of lands And teach the Dharma to sentient beings For immeasurable koṭis of kalpas. 
If after my parinirvāṇa There is someone who is able to teach this sutra, I will dispatch a transformed fourfold assembly Of monks, nuns, laymen and laywomen To pay homage to this expounder of the Dharma. I will lead the sentient beings And gather them together To let them hear the teaching. 
If anyone wishes to do ill to them With swords, sticks, tiles, or stones, Then I will dispatch those transformed ones In order to guard them. 
If there is any expounder of the Dharma Who recites this sutra In a secluded, tranquil place Where there is no sound of human beings, I will then manifest my body of pure light. 
If they forget a chapter or a verse, I will teach it to them, Enabling them to master it. 
If anyone perfects these qualities If he teaches the fourfold assembly Or, in a solitary place, recites this sutra, Such a person will be able to see me. 
If anyone abides in a secluded place I will dispatch devas, nāga kings, Yakṣas, and rākṣasas To be an audience to their teaching. 
Such people teach the Dharma willingly And explain it without obstruction. Because all the buddhas protect them They gladden the great community of people. 
Anyone who closely attends an expounder of the Dharma Will immediately attain the bodhisattva path. Anyone who follows this expounder’s instructions, Will be able to meet buddhas Equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River. 
The Appearance of a Jeweled Stupa At that time there appeared before the Buddha a seven-jeweled stupa, ﬁve hundred yojanas in height and two hundred and ﬁfty yojanas both in length and width, which emerged from the ground and hovered in the air. 
It was adorned with various jewels, had ﬁve thousand railings, and thousands of myriads of chambers. It was decorated with innumerable ﬂags and banners and hanging jeweled necklaces, and myriads of koṭis of jeweled bells hung from the top. 
The fragrance of tamāla leaves and sandalwood trees exuded from all sides of the stupa, covering the world. 
The banners and umbrellas were composed of the seven jewels such as gold, silver, lapis lazuli, motherof-pearl, agate, pearl, and ruby; and they rose as high as the palaces of the world-protectors of the four quarters. 
The thirty-three devas rained down heavenly māndārava ﬂowers in homage to the jeweled stupa. 
The other thousands of myriads of koṭis of humans, and such nonhumans as devas, nāgas, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṃnaras, and maho ragas also respected, honored, revered, and praised the precious stupa by offering all kinds of ﬂowers, perfumes, necklaces, ﬂags, banners, and music. Then a tremendous voice issued forth in praise from the jeweled stupa, saying: 
“Splendid, splendid! O Śākyamuni! 
Just so! 
Just so, O Śākyamuni Bhagavat! 
What you teach is true!” Thereupon the fourfold assembly saw the great jeweled stupa hovering in the air and also heard the voice that issued forth from the stupa. They all were pleased with the teaching and marveled at this unprecedented experience. They stood up from their seats, honored Śākyamuni with their palms pressed together, and withdrew to one side. 
At that time there was a bodhisattva mahāsattva called Mahā pratibhāna who, realizing that the devas, humans, and asuras of the entire world were puzzled, addressed the Buddha saying: 
Why has this jeweled stupa emerged from the earth? 
And why has this voice come forth from it?” Then the Buddha told Bodhisattva Mahāpratibhāna: “The Tathāgata is in this jeweled stupa. In the remote past, immeasurable, incalculable thousands of myriads of koṭis of worlds away in the east there was a land called Ratnaviśuddha. In that land there was a buddha called Prabhūtaratna. 
When this buddha was practicing the bodhisattva path in his previous lives he made a great vow, saying: If I become a buddha, after my parinirvāṇa if the Lotus Sutra is being taught anywhere in all the lands of the ten directions, my stupa shall appear there so that this sutra may be heard, and in order that I may bear testimony to it and praise it with the word “Splendid!” “After the Buddha had perfected the path and immediately before his parinirvāṇa, he addressed the monks among the great assembly of devas and humans, saying: After my parinirvāṇa anyone who wishes to pay me homage should build a great stupa! “If there is anyone teaching the Lotus Sutra anywhere in the worlds of the ten directions, this buddha makes a jeweled stupa emerge out of the ground in that place through his transcendent powers and the power of his vow. 
The Tathāgata Prabhūtaratna has now emerged from the earth, within his stupa, so that he may hear the Lotus Sutra and give praise with the words, ‘Splendid, splendid!’” At that time Bodhisattva Mahāpratibhāna spoke to the Buddha through the Tathāgata’s transcendent powers, saying: 
We all want to see this buddha’s form.” The Buddha answered Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Mahāprati bhāna, saying: “This Buddha Prabhūtaratna made a great vow, saying: Whenever my jeweled stupa appears in the presence of a buddha in order to hear the Lotus Sutra, if that buddha wants to show my form to the fourfold assembly he should gather into one place all his magically created forms that are teaching the Dharma in the worlds of the ten directions. After that my form will appear. 
“O Mahāpratibhāna! I shall now gather all my magically created forms who are teaching the Dharma in the worlds of the ten directions.” Mahāpratibhāna spoke to the Buddha, saying: 
We also strongly wish to see the Bhagavat’s magically created forms, to honor and pay homage to them!” Then the Buddha emitted a ray of light from the tuft of white hair between his eyebrows; and they immediately saw the buddhas in ﬁve hundred myriads of koṭis of nayutas of lands in the eastern direction equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River. In these lands the soil was of crystal and adorned with treasure trees and jeweled garments; and these lands were full of innumerable thousands of myriads of koṭis of bodhisattvas. Jeweled drapes were hung everywhere and were covered with jeweled nets. 
All the buddhas in these lands were teaching the Dharma in most harmonious voices. They also saw immeasurable thousands of myriads of koṭis of bodhisattvas, ﬁlling all the lands and teaching the Dharma to sentient beings. 
The other directions to the south, north, and west, the four intermediary directions, and the upper and lower regions were also illuminated by the ray of light emitted from the tuft of white hair between the Buddha’s eyebrows; and they were also exactly like this. 
Then all the buddhas in the ten directions each addressed the assembly of bodhisattvas, saying: “O sons of a virtuous family! 
We will now go to the place where Śākyamuni is in the sahā world and pay homage to the jeweled stupa of the Tathāgata Prabhūta ratna.” At that time the sahā world was immediately puriﬁed; the earth was of lapis lazuli, adorned with jeweled trees, its roads laid out like a chessboard and bordered with golden cords; and there were no villages, towns, cities, oceans, rivers, mountains, streams, forests, or groves. 
Very precious incense was burning, māndā rava ﬂowers were spread everywhere on the earth, and it was covered with jeweled nets and drapes from which jeweled bells hung. 
With the exception of this assembly the devas and human beings were all moved to other lands. 
Then the buddhas each took one great bodhisattva as an attendant and arrived under a jeweled tree in the sahā world. 
Each jeweled tree was ﬁve hundred yojanas in height and adorned with branches, leaves, blossoms, and fruits in their proper turn. Under all these jeweled trees were lion seats ﬁve yojanas in height that were adorned with great jewels. 
The buddhas each sat cross-legged on these seats. 
They sat one after another in this way, ﬁlling the great manifold cosmos. Yet the separate forms of Śākyamuni Buddha of even one direction had not all arrived yet. 
At that time Śākyamuni Buddha, wanting to be able to receive all of his magically created forms, transformed and puriﬁed two hundred myriads of koṭis of nayutas of lands in each of the world-systems in the eight directions. There were no hells, hungry ghosts, animals, or asuras; and all the devas and humans were moved to other lands. 
In these transformed lands the earth was made of lapis lazuli and adorned with jeweled trees. These trees were ﬁve hundred yojanas in height and were adorned with branches, leaves, blossoms, and fruits in their proper turn. Under every tree was a jeweled lion seat ﬁve yojanas in height which was adorned with various jewels. 
There were no oceans, rivers, or great mountain kings such as Mount Mucilinda, Mount Mahāmucilinda, Mount Cakravāḍa, Mount Mahācakravāḍa, or Mount Sumeru. The lands were all made into one buddha world throughout. 
The jeweled earth was level and covered everywhere with jewel-studded drapes. 
Banners and umbrellas were set up, precious incense was burning, and heavenly jeweled ﬂowers covered the ground everywhere. 
Then Śākyamuni Buddha again transformed and puriﬁed two hundred myriads of koṭis of nayutas of lands in each of the eight directions so that the buddhas could come and sit. There were no hells, hungry ghosts, animals, or asuras; and the devas and humans were moved to other lands. 
In the transformed lands the earth was of lapis lazuli and adorned with jeweled trees. The trees were ﬁve hundred yojanas in height and were adorned with branches, leaves, blossoms, and fruits in their proper turn. Under these trees were jeweled lion seats that were ﬁve yojanas in height and decorated with great jewels. 
There were no oceans, rivers, or great mountain kings such as Mount Mucilinda, Mount Mahāmucilinda, Mount Cakravāḍa, Mount Mahācakravāḍa, or Mount Sumeru. The lands were all made into one buddha world throughout. 
The jeweled earth was level and covered everywhere with jewel-studded drapes. 
Banners and umbrellas were set up, precious incense was burning, and heavenly jeweled ﬂowers covered the ground everywhere. 
Then the magically created forms of Śākyamuni Buddha, which had been teaching the Dharma in the hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of lands in the east, equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River, gathered here. 
In this way all the buddhas in the ten directions gradually came until all were assembled, sitting in the eight directions. 
At that time these Buddha Tathāgatas ﬁlled four hundred myriads of koṭis of nayutas of lands in each direction. 
Then sitting on the lion seats under the jeweled trees, the buddhas each dispatched their attendants with hands full of jeweled ﬂowers to inquire after the Buddha Śākyamuni, saying: “O son of a virtuous family! 
You should approach the Buddha Śākyamuni on Mount Gṛdhrakūṭa and give him a greeting, saying: Are you without illness and pain and are you full of vigor and at ease; and are the assemblies of bodhisattvas and śrāvakas all at ease or not? 
“Then, having paid homage to the Buddha by scattering him with these jeweled ﬂowers, say this to him: The Buddha So-and-so wishes you to open this jeweled stupa. 
All the other buddhas dispatched their messengers like this.” Then the Buddha Śākyamuni saw that his magically created forms had already gathered and were each sitting on a lion seat. And he heard that all the buddhas also wanted him to open the treasured stupa. 
Immediately rising, he hovered in the air and the entire fourfold assembly rose and gazed attentively at the Buddha with their palms pressed together. 
Thereupon Śākyamuni Buddha opened the entrance to the seven-jeweled stupa with his right ﬁnger. There was a tremendous sound as if the bar and lock to the gateway of a large city were being pushed aside. 
Then immediately the entire gathering saw the Tathāgata Prabhūtaratna in the jeweled stupa sitting on a lion seat as if he were in meditation, his body whole and undecomposed. 
The Buddha Śākyamuni is teaching the Lotus Sutra and I have come in order to hear it.” At that time the fourfold assembly saw the Buddha who had entered parinirvāṇa immeasurable thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas ago speaking those words. They praised this unprecedented experience and scattered heavenly jeweled ﬂowers upon the buddhas Prabhūtaratna and Śākyamuni. 
Then from within the stupa the Buddha Prabhūtaratna offered half of his seat to the Buddha Śākyamuni, saying: 
“O Śākyamuni Buddha, please take a seat here!” The Buddha Śākyamuni immediately entered the stupa and sat crosslegged on half of the seat. 
Thereupon the great assembly saw the two Tathāgatas sitting cross-legged on the lion seat in the seven-jeweled stupa and they each thought thus: “The buddhas are seated far away. 
O Tathāgata, we entreat you to use your transcendent powers so that we may be in the air together with you.” The Buddha Śākyamuni immediately moved the entire fourfold assembly into the air through his transcendent powers and addressed them with a great voice, saying: “Who in the sahā world is able to extensively teach the Lotus Sutra? It is now the right time! 
The Tathāgata will enter parinirvāṇa before long and the Buddha wants to transmit this Lotus Sutra to you. 
Thereupon the Buddha, wanting to further elaborate upon the meaning of this, spoke these verses: Although the Great Sage, the Bhagavat, Entered parinirvāṇa long ago, He has been abiding in a jeweled stupa; And he has now come for the sake of the Dharma. 
Why is it that people Do not strive for the Dharma? 
Although this buddha entered parinirvāṇa Incalculable kalpas ago, Because it is difﬁcult to encounter, He listens to the Dharma Wherever it is taught. 
The original vow of this buddha was: After my parinirvāṇa I will always listen to the Dharma Wherever it may be. 
My magically created forms, Incalculable as the sands of the Ganges River, Have come to hear the Dharma And see the Tathāgata Prabhūtaratna, Who has entered nirvana. 
Each buddha-form, having abandoned his beautiful land, Disciples, devas, humans, nāgas, And ritual tributes, has come here So that the Dharma may abide forever. 
In order to seat all these buddhas, I transferred immeasurable beings And puriﬁed the lands Through my transcendent powers; And each of these buddhas Settled under a jeweled tree— As lotus blossoms Adorn a limpid, cool pond. 
Under every jeweled tree was a lion seat On which the buddhas sat radiating light— As a great bonﬁre Blazes in the dark of the night. 
They emitted a subtle fragrance from their bodies Which ﬁlled the lands of the ten directions. Sentient beings who smelled this fragrance Were overcome with unsurpassed joy, Like branches of a small tree Being blown by a great wind. 
Through this skillful means I enable the Dharma to abide forever. 
I tell the great assembly That after my nirvana Whoever can preserve and recite this sutra Should now individually make a declaration In the presence of the buddhas. 
Although the Buddha Prabhūtaratna Entered parinirvāṇa long ago, Through his great vow He has roared the lion’s roar. 
The Tathāgata Prabhūtaratna, I myself, and all the magically created forms Who have gathered here Should know this intention. 
O heirs of the buddhas! Whoever is able to preserve the Dharma Should make a great vow So that it may abide forever. 
Whoever is able to preserve The teaching of this sutra Will thus honor me And Prabhūtaratna. 
This Buddha Prabhūtaratna Always roams the ten directions In a jeweled stupa In order to hear this sutra. 
He also honors All the transformed buddhas Who have come here and who adorn All the worlds with light. 
Whoever teaches this sutra will see me, The Tathāgata Prabhūtaratna, And the transformed buddhas. 
O sons of a virtuous family! 
Each of you must carefully consider this. This is indeed a difﬁcult matter. Make a great vow accordingly! 
It is not really difﬁcult To teach all of the other sutras, The number of which is Equal to the sands of the Ganges River. 
It is not difﬁcult To take Mount Sumeru And throw it to another quarter, Over innumerable buddha worlds. 
It is also not difﬁcult To shake free the manifold cosmos With one toe and throw it Far into another distant world. 
It is not difﬁcult to stand On the highest summit of the world And teach the other innumerable sutras For the sake of sentient beings. 
However, it will indeed be difﬁcult To teach this sutra in the troubled world After the Buddha’s nirvana. 
It is not difﬁcult for anyone To grasp empty space And wander around with it. 
But it will certainly be difﬁcult to copy And preserve this sutra And cause others to copy it After my nirvana. 
It is not really difﬁcult To put the great earth on a toenail And ascend with it To the world of Brahmas. 
However, it will indeed be difﬁcult To recite this sutra, Even for a moment, In the troubled world After the Buddha’s nirvana. 
It is not really difﬁcult To enter into the conﬂagration At the time of the close of a kalpa Carrying hay on your back And yet not be burned. 
It certainly will be difﬁcult To preserve this sutra And teach it to even a single person After my nirvana. 
It is indeed not really difﬁcult for anyone to preserve The eighty-four thousand treasure houses of the Dharma, And the twelvefold scriptures, And teach them so that the listeners Can attain the six transcendent powers. 
It will indeed be difﬁcult for anyone To hear and accept this sutra And to ask about its meaning After my nirvana. 
It is not really difﬁcult for people to do Such beneﬁcial things as teaching the Dharma And making thousands of myriads of koṭis of Immeasurable, incalculable sentient beings, Numbering as many as the sands of the Ganges River, Attain arhatship and perfect The six transcendent powers. 
It will certainly be difﬁcult To preserve such a sutra as this After my nirvana. 
I have extensively taught many sutras In incalculable lands From the beginning until now, For the sake of the buddha path; And yet among them This sutra is the best. 
If anyone preserves it, He preserves the form of the Buddha. 
O sons of a virtuous family! 
Those who preserve and recite this Sutra After my nirvana Must now individually make a declaration In the presence of the buddhas. 
It is hard to preserve this sutra. If anyone preserves it Even for a single moment, I shall truly rejoice. All of the other buddhas Will do so also. 
Such people as these Are praised by the buddhas. 
They are courageous. They are persevering. They are known as those Who follow the rules of good conduct And carry out ascetic practices. Subsequently they quickly attain The highest buddha path. 
Those in the future Who recite and preserve this sutra, Are the true heirs of the Buddha And abide in the stage of purity. 
Those who can understand its meaning After the Buddha’s nirvana Will become the Eyes of the World For devas and humans. 
Those who teach it, even for a moment, In the fearful world Will be revered By all the devas and humans. 
Devadatta The Buddha then addressed the assembly of bodhisattvas, and also the devas, humans, and the fourfold assembly, saying: “In the past, immeasurable kalpas ago, I tirelessly sought the Lotus Sutra. 
Throughout many kalpas I always became a king and made a vow to seek highest enlightenment. My mind became irreversible. 
Wanting to fulﬁll the six perfections I diligently carried out practices: unstintingly giving elephants, horses, the seven precious treasures, countries and cities, wives and children, male and female servants, my head, eyes, marrow and brains, the ﬂesh of my body, hands, and feet, without stinginess, not even hesitating to give my own life. 
If you faithfully obey me I will expound it to you. “Having heard the sage, the king became joyful and ecstatic and, accompanying the sage, he did everything he was asked. He gathered fruits, drew water, collected ﬁrewood, and provided meals. He even provided his own body as a bed for the sage. 
Yet he never tired in either body or mind and in this way served the sage for one thousand years. 
For the sake of the Dharma he served him diligently, making certain the sage never lacked for anything.” At that time the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: I remember that in the past, many kalpas ago, Although I became king of the world, In order to seek the great Dharma I was never attached to the desires of the ﬁve senses. 
Striking a bell I declared this To the four directions: If anyone possesses the great Dharma And explains it to me, I will become his servant. 
At that time there was a sage called Asita Who came to the great king and said: I possess a subtle and true Dharma That is rare in the world. 
If you are able to practice it, I will explain it to you! On hearing what the sage said The king became overjoyed. He immediately accompanied the sage And performed whatever he was asked. He gathered ﬁrewood and various fruits And respectfully offered them whenever requested. 
For the sake of sentient beings He diligently sought everywhere the great Dharma. He never sought it for his own sake Nor for the desires of the ﬁve senses. 
For this reason, although a great king, He diligently sought and attained this Dharma, Ultimately becoming a buddha. That is why I now tell you this. 
The Buddha addressed the monks, saying: “The king at that time was I myself, and the sage was he who is now Devadatta. 
Through the virtuous friendship of Devadatta I was able to become endowed with the six perfections, benevolence, compassion, sympathetic joy, generosity, the thirty-two marks, the eighty excellent characteristics, reddish-gold skin, the ten powers, the four kinds of fearlessness, the four methods of gaining trust, the eighteen excellent qualities, the transcendent powers, and the power of the path. It is all due to the good and virtuous friendship of Devadatta that I attained complete enlightenment and extensively saved innumerable sentient beings.” The Buddha addressed the fourfold assembly, saying: 
“After immeasurable kalpas have passed, Devadatta will then become a buddha called Devarāja, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
His world will be called Deva so pānā. 
At that time the Buddha Devarāja will abide in the world for twenty intermediate kalpas and extensively teach the True Dharma to sentient beings. Sentient beings equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River will attain arhatship. The thought of a pratyekabuddha has awakened in incalculable numbers of sentient beings. The thought of the highest path will awaken in sentient beings equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River, and they will become convinced of the nonarising of all dharmas and reside in the stage of nonretrogression. 
“Then, after the parinirvāṇa of the Buddha Devarāja, the True Dharma will abide in the world for twenty intermediate kalpas. 
A seven-jeweled stupa, sixty yojanas in height and forty yojanas in both length and width, will be built for all his relics; and all the devas and humans will honor and revere this beautiful seven-jeweled stupa with various ﬂowers, scented powders, burning incense, fragrant ointments, clothing, necklaces, banners, ﬂags, jeweled canopies, music, and songs. 
Incalculable sentient beings will attain arhatship. Innumerable sentient beings will be enlightened as pratyekabuddhas; and the thought of enlightenment will awaken in an inconceivable number of sentient beings, and they will reach the stage of nonretrogression.” The Buddha addressed the monks, saying: 
“If, in the future, there are sons and daughters of a virtuous family who, upon hearing the Devadatta chapter of the Lotus Sutra, accept it with pure minds and without doubt, they shall not fall into the realms of hell or to the states of hungry ghosts or of animals, but will be born in the presence of the buddhas in the ten directions. Wherever they may be, they will always hear this sutra. 
If they are born among humans or devas, they will enjoy a supreme and delightful contentment; and if in the presence of a buddha, they will be born spontaneously in a lotus ﬂower.” At that time, in the lower region there was a bodhisattva called Prajñā kūṭa who was accompanying the Bhagavat Prabhūtaratna. 
The Buddha Śākyamuni addressed Prajñākūṭa, saying: “O son of a virtuous family! 
Wait for a moment! 
There is a bodhisattva called Mañjuśrī. Let us meet him together and discuss the True Dharma. 
After that you can return to your original land.” At that time Mañjuśrī, sitting on a thousand-petaled lotus ﬂower as large as a carriage wheel, together with attendant bodhisattvas also seated on jeweled lotus ﬂowers, emerged spontaneously out of the ocean from the palace of the nāga king Sāgara and ﬂoated in midair. Arriving at Mount Gṛdhrakūṭa they descended from the lotus ﬂowers and went into the presence of the buddhas, where they bowed until their foreheads touched the feet of both Bhagavats. 
Having honored them, Mañjuśrī approached Prajñā kūṭa. They greeted each other and withdrew to sit at one side. 
Then Bodhisattva Prajñā kūṭa asked Mañjuśrī, saying: “Your Eminence! How many sentient beings did you lead and inspire at the palace of the nāga king?” Mañjuśrī answered: 
“The number is immeasurable and incalculable. It is not possible to express it in words nor is it possible to calculate it with one’s mind. 
Wait a moment and you will have proof!” Before he had ﬁnished speaking, innumerable bodhisattvas emerged from the ocean, seated on jeweled lotus ﬂowers. Arriving at Mount Gṛdhrakūṭa they ﬂoated in midair. 
All of these were bodhisattvas who had been led and inspired by Mañjuśrī. Those who had perfected the bodhisattva practices discussed the six perfections together. 
Those who were originally śrāvakas explained the śrāvaka practices in the air; and now they all practice to understand the meaning of emptiness of the Mahayana. Mañjuśrī said to Prajñākūṭa: 
“Thus did I lead and inspire people in the ocean!” Thereupon Bodhisattva Prajñākūṭa spoke these verses in praise: O One of great wisdom, virtue, and courage! This assembly and I have now all witnessed that You have led and inspired Incalculable numbers of sentient beings. 
You have expounded the essential character of dharmas And revealed the teaching of the single vehicle. You have extensively led many sentient beings, Causing them to quickly attain enlightenment. 
Mañjuśrī said: “In the ocean I always expounded only the Lotus Sutra.” Then Prajñākūṭa questioned Mañjuśrī, saying: 
“This sutra is profound and subtle. It is a jewel among sutras and rare in the world. 
If sentient beings diligently strive to practice this sutra, will they immediately become buddhas or not?” Mañjuśrī answered: “Yes, they will. 
There is the daughter of the nāga king Sāgara who is only eight years old. She is wise; her faculties are sharp; and she also well knows all the faculties and deeds of sentient beings. She has attained the power of recollection. She preserves all the profound secret treasures taught by the buddhas, enters deep meditation, and is well capable of discerning all dharmas. 
She instantly produced the thought of enlightenment and attained the stage of nonretrogression. 
She has a harmonious mind and has attained enlightenment.” The Bodhisattva Prajñākūṭa said: “I see the Tathāgata Śākyamuni who has been incessantly carrying out difﬁcult and severe practices for immeasurable kalpas, accumulating merit and virtue while seeking the bodhisattva path. 
Looking into the great manifold cosmos, there is not a single place even the size of a mustard seed where this bodhisattva has not abandoned his life for the sake of sentient beings. He attained the path to enlightenment only after this. 
It is hard to believe that this girl will instantly attain complete enlightenment.” Before he had ﬁnished speaking the daughter of the nāga king suddenly appeared in their presence. Bowing until her forehead touched their feet, she withdrew to one side and spoke these verses in praise: The Buddha is deeply versed In the characteristics of good and evil, And he completely illuminates the ten directions. His subtle and pure Dharma body Is endowed with the thirty-two marks; With the eighty good characteristics Is his Dharma body adorned. 
He is adored by devas and humans, And honored by nāgas. There is no sentient being Who does not pay him homage. 
Moreover, that I will attain enlightenment Upon hearing him Can only be known by a buddha. I will reveal the teaching of the Mahayana And save suffering sentient beings. 
At that time Śāriputra spoke to the daughter of the nāga king, saying: “You say that you will soon attain the highest path. This is difﬁcult to believe. 
Why is this? 
The female body is polluted; it is not a ﬁt vessel for the Dharma. How can you attain highest enlightenment? 
“The buddha path is long. One can only attain it after diligently carrying out severe practices, and completely practicing the perfections over immeasurable kalpas. 
Moreover, the female body has ﬁve obstructions. The ﬁrst is the inability to become a great Brahma. The second is the inability to become Śakra. The third is the inability to become Māra, and the fourth is the inability to become a universal monarch . 
How can you with your female body quickly become a buddha?” Then the daughter of the nāga king presented to the Buddha a jewel worth the great manifold cosmos, and the Buddha accepted it. 
The daughter of the nāga king spoke to Bodhisattva Prajñā kūṭa and the noble Śāri putra, saying: “I offered a jewel and the Bhagavat accepted it. Was that done quickly or not?” They answered, saying: “It was done extremely quickly!” The daughter said: 
“Through your transcendent powers watch me become a buddha even more quickly than that!” Then the assembly there all saw the daughter of the nāga king instantly transform into a man, perfect the bodhisattva practices, go to the vimalā world in the south, sit on a jeweled lotus ﬂower, and attain highest, complete enlightenment, become endowed with the thirty-two marks and eighty excellent characteristics, and expound the True Dharma universally for the sake of all sentient beings in the ten directions. 
Then the bodhisattvas, śrāvakas, eight kinds of devas, nāgas, and so on, humans and nonhumans of the sahā world, all saw in the distance that the daughter of the nāga king had become a buddha and was universally teaching the Dharma for the sake of the humans and devas in that assembly. They rejoiced greatly and honored her from afar. 
On hearing the Dharma, incalculable numbers of sentient beings became enlightened and attained the stage of nonretrogression. 
Incalculable numbers of sentient beings received their predictions to the path and the vimalā world quaked in six ways. 
In the sahā world three thousand sentient beings attained the stage of nonretrogression, and three thousand sentient beings, in whom the thought of enlightenment had awakened, received their predictions. 
The Bodhisattva Prajñākūṭa, Śāriputra, and the entire assembly accepted and believed in silence. 
Perseverance At that time Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Bhaiṣajyarāja and Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Mahāpratibhāna made this declaration in the presence of the Buddha, together with two thousand bodhisattvas: “O Bhagavat! 
We entreat you not to be concerned since, after the Buddha’s parinirvāṇa we will preserve, recite, and teach this Sutra! 
In the troubled world to come, sentient beings will have hardly any roots of good merit but will have excessive pride and will be greedy to receive offerings. They will increase their roots of bad merit and thus will be far away from liberation. It will be difﬁcult to lead and inspire them. 
Therefore, we will produce the power of great patience and recite, preserve, teach, and copy this sutra as well as pay it homage in various ways, even willingly giving up our bodies and lives.” Then in the assembly, ﬁve hundred arhats who had received their predictions addressed the Buddha, saying: 
“O Bhagavat! We also declare that in other lands we will extensively teach this sutra.” Moreover, eight thousand of those who had received their predictions, including those who had more to learn and those who did not, rose from their seats and with their palms pressed together, faced the Buddha and made this declaration: 
We also will extensively teach this sutra in other lands. 
Why is this? 
Because in the sahā world there are many erring people, with excessive pride and superﬁcial virtue, those who are quick to anger, deceitful, and untrue.” Thereupon the Buddha’s aunt, the nun Mahāprajāpatī Gautamī, with six thousand nuns, some of whom had more to learn and some who did not, rose from their seats and with their palms pressed together gazed attentively at the Buddha, never turning their eyes away. 
Then the Bhagavat spoke to Mahāprajā patī Gautamī, saying: “Why are you anxiously staring at the Tathāgata? Are you thinking that I have not given you your prediction of highest, complete enlightenment? 
O Mahāprajāpatī Gautamī! I have previously said that all of the śrāvakas would receive their predictions. Now if you wish to know your prediction, I will tell you that in the future you will become a great expounder of the Dharma, taught by sixty-eight thousand koṭis of buddhas. These six thousand nuns, some of whom have more to learn and some who do not, will all become expounders of the Dharma together. 
In this way you will gradually be able to complete the bodhisattva path and become a buddha called Sarvarūpa saṃdarśana, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
This Buddha Sarvarūpasaṃdarśana will give predictions of highest, complete enlightenment one by one to bodhisattvas totaling six thousand in number.” Then the nun Yaśodharā, the mother of Rāhula, thought this: 
“While giving the predictions, the only name the Bhagavat did not mention was mine.” The Buddha addressed Yaśodharā, saying: “In the future you will cultivate the bodhisattva practice of the teachings of hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of buddhas. You will become a great expounder of the Dharma, and gradually complete the buddha path. 
In a land called Bhadrā you will become a buddha called Raśmiśatasahasraparipūrṇadhvaja, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
This buddha’s lifespan will be for immeasurable, incalculable kalpas.” At that time the nun Mahāprajāpatī Gautamī and the nun Yaśo dharā together with their attendants all rejoiced greatly at having attained such an unprecedented experience. In the presence of the Buddha they immediately spoke in verse, saying: 
Having spoken this verse all the nuns addressed the Buddha, saying: “O Bhagavat! 
We also will extensively expound this sutra in other lands.” Then the Bhagavat saw eighty myriads of koṭis of nayutas of bodhisattva mahāsattvas, all of whom were at the stage of nonretrogression. 
They had turned the irreversible wheel of the Dharma and attained the power of recollection. Arising from their seats they went before the Buddha with their palms pressed together and with this wholehearted thought: “If the Bhagavat commands us to preserve and teach this sutra, then we will extensively expound this Dharma exactly as the Buddha has taught.” They also thought: 
“The Buddha now keeps silent and does not command us. 
What should we do?” Then all of the bodhisattvas, respecting the Buddha’s intention and also wanting to fulﬁll their original vow, uttered a lion’s roar in the presence of the Buddha and declared: 
“O Bhagavat! After the Tathāgata’s parinirvāṇa we will roam throughout the worlds of the ten directions enabling sentient beings to copy, preserve, and recite this Sutra, and to explain its meaning, practice it according to the Dharma, and remember it correctly. This will all be due to the Buddha’s majestic power. “O Bhagavat! 
We entreat you to protect us from afar while we are in other quarters.” Immediately after that, all of the bodhisattvas spoke these verses in unison: We entreat you not to be concerned Because we will extensively teach In the fearful, troubled world, After the Buddha’s parinirvāṇa. 
We will be patient With those who are ignorant, Those who disparage others with evil words, Or who attack us with sticks and swords. 
Monks in this troubled world Will have false wisdom And be deceitful. They will think they have attained What they have not, and their minds Will be full of conceit. 
Then there will be those who dwell In tranquil forests wearing rags, With the thought that they alone practice the true path, And who look down on those who lead worldly lives. 
There will be those who teach the Dharma To laypeople only out of greed for offerings, Yet they will be respected in the world As if they were arhats endowed with The six transcendent powers. 
The minds of such people are in error; They are always thinking about worldly matters; And they enjoy pointing out our faults, Playing the role of the forest dwellers, Thus they will say such things as: All of these monks here Teach heretical doctrines Because they are greedy for proﬁt! 
They have fabricated this sutra To deceive the people of the world, And they explain this sutra Out of desire for fame! They always want to slander us In the great assembly; They slander us to the kings, Ministers, brahmans, householders, And to other monks, saying that we are evil. They say: These are people of false views Who teach heretical doctrines. 
Since we revere the Buddha, We will be patient with their wickedness. 
They will mockingly address us, saying: All you buddhas! We will be patient with These scornful words. 
In the troubled world of the Age of There are many fearful things. People possessed by evil spirits Will scorn and slander us. 
But we shall wear the armor of patience Because we trust and revere the Buddha; And we will persevere under these difﬁculties In order to teach this sutra. 
We will not be attached to our bodies or lives We only desire the highest path. In the future we will preserve What the Buddha has entrusted us with. 
The Bhagavat himself must know That the erring monks in the troubled world Will not understand the Dharma Taught by the Buddha through skillful means, According to what is appropriate to sentient beings. They will utter evil words with angry countenances, And they will repeatedly expel us, And keep us away from the monasteries and stupas. 
There will be many evils such as this. We will all endure in these matters Because we remember the Buddha’s decree. 
If there are any people seeking this Dharma In villages or cities, we will all go there And teach the Dharma entrusted to us by the Buddha. 
Because we are the Bhagavat’s ambassadors, Wherever we go we have nothing to fear. We will skillfully teach the Dharma. We entreat you, O Buddha, to be at ease. 
In the presence of the Bhagavat, And all of the buddhas who have come From the ten directions, We make this declaration. O Buddha! You know our intentions! 
Ease in Practice Thereupon the Prince of the Dharma, Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Mañ juśrī addressed the Buddha, saying: 
“O Bhagavat! These bodhisattvas are very rare. In respectful obedience to the Buddha they have made this great vow: ‘In the troubled world to come, we will preserve, recite, and teach this Lotus Sutra!’ “O Bhagavat! 
How can these bodhisattva mahāsattvas teach this sutra in the troubled world to come?” The Buddha addressed Mañjuśrī, saying: 
“If the bodhisattva mahā sattvas want to teach this sutra in the troubled world to come, they should abide in the four kinds of practices. 
The ﬁrst is to establish the sphere of their bodhisattva practice and the sphere of their relationships and thereupon expound this sutra for the sake of sentient beings. 
“O Mañjuśrī! What is the sphere of the practice of the bodhisattva mahāsattva? 
If a bodhisattva mahāsattva abides in the stage of perseverance, is gentle, tranquil, nonviolent, and unafraid; and furthermore if he remains unmoved with regard to existent things and perceives them in their true aspect, and neither acts nor discriminates, this is called the sphere of the practice of the bodhisattva mahāsattva. 
“What is the sphere of the relationships of the bodhisattva mahāsattva? 
The bodhisattva mahāsattva should not consort with kings, princes, ministers, and chief ofﬁcials. He should not consort with heretics, brahmans, Jains, and others, or with worldly writers, critics of poetry, materialists, or extreme materialists. 
Nor should he become acquainted with pranksters, boxers, wrestlers, clowns, and various jugglers, nor with outcastes and people who raise boars, sheep, chickens, and dogs, nor with hunters, ﬁshermen, and those with evil conduct. 
“Nor should a bodhisattva consort with monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen who seek the śrāvaka vehicle. 
The bodhisattva should avoid their company in chambers, on roads, or while in lecture halls, and not remain with them. 
If they come, teach them the Dharma according to their capacities, but expect nothing! 
“Moreover, O Mañjuśrī! The bodhisattva mahāsattva should expound the teaching without any thought of desire for, or wish to see, a woman’s body. 
“If a bodhisattva enters someone else’s home he should not talk to young girls, maidens, and widows. 
He should not enter someone else’s home alone; and if for any reason he should enter it alone a bodhisattva should do nothing but singlemindedly contemplate the Buddha. 
“If he should teach the Dharma to women he should not show his teeth when smiling nor reveal his chest. 
How much less for other things! “A bodhisattva should take no pleasure in keeping young disciples, śrāmaṇeras, or young boys. Nor should he take pleasure in having the same teacher as them. 
He should always take pleasure in meditation and, in a quiet place, practice to control his mind. 
This is what is known as the ﬁrst sphere of relationships. 
“Furthermore, the bodhisattva mahāsattvas perceive the emptiness of all dharmas in their true aspect. All things are unerring, unmoving, nonreturning, irreversible, and like empty space which lacks substance. They are beyond all language. They are not produced, nor do they emerge, nor do they arise. 
They do not have any name or mark, and in reality they have no substance. They are immeasurable, limitless, without obstacles or obstructions. They exist only through dependent origination, arising through error. 
This is what is known as the second sphere of relationships of a bodhisattva mahāsattva.” At that time the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate upon the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: If, in the troubled world to come, A bodhisattva with a fearless mind Wants to teach this sutra, He should enter the sphere Of the bodhisattva practice And the sphere of relationships. 
He should always stay away from kings, Princes, ministers, chief ofﬁcials, Dangerous pranksters, outcastes, Heretics, and brahmans. 
He should not consort With excessively proud scholars, Who are attached to scriptures of the inferior vehicle Contained in the three baskets ; Nor with monks who violate the precepts, With those who call themselves arhats, Nor with nuns who like to joke and laugh. He should not become acquainted with laywomen Who are attached to the desires of the ﬁve senses, And seek nirvana in their present lives. 
If these people come to the bodhisattva With good intentions In order to hear about the buddha path, The bodhisattva should then fearlessly Teach them the Dharma Without any expectations. 
A bodhisattva should not Become intimately acquainted With widows, maidens, Or impotent men. 
Nor should he consort With slaughterers, butchers, hunters, Or ﬁshermen who kill for proﬁt. He should not consort With people such as those Who make a living From selling meat Or from pandering prostitutes. 
He should never become acquainted With dangerous wrestlers, Or the varieties of jugglers or courtesans. 
He should not teach the Dharma To a woman alone in a quiet place. When he teaches the Dharma He should not joke or laugh. 
If he enters a village to beg for food He should be accompanied by a monk. If there is no monk he should Singlemindedly contemplate the Buddha. 
Within these two spheres He can teach at ease. 
He should not practice The superior, mediocre, or inferior teachings, The conditioned and the unconditioned, Or the teaching of the real and the unreal. Nor should he discriminate Between men and women. 
He should not acquire, comprehend, Or perceive any phenomenon. This is what is known As the sphere of the Bodhisattva practice. 
All dharmas are empty and without substance, Impermanent, without origination or cessation. This is known as the sphere Of the relationships of the wise. 
Through the error of discrimination One sees all existent things As existing or nonexisting, Real or unreal, Produced or unproduced. 
Being in a quiet place, the bodhisattva Carries out practices to control his mind And remains as ﬁrm and unmoved As Mount Sumeru. 
He should regard all dharmas As being without substance, Like empty space Which has no ﬁrmness. 
All dharmas are neither produced Nor do they emerge; They are immovable, nonreturning, And always remain in their single character. 
This is known as the sphere of relationships. Any monk after my parinirvāṇa Who enters the sphere of practice And the sphere of relationships Will not be disheartened When he teaches this sutra. 
A bodhisattva, at proper times, Should enter a quiet chamber And contemplate all dharmas With correct thoughts, According to the meaning. 
Arising from meditation he should reveal And expound this sutra To kings, princes, ministers, and brahmans. Then his mind will be at ease and unafraid. 
O Mañjuśrī! This is the bodhisattva Who ﬁrmly abides in the Dharma from the beginning And in the world to come will be able To teach the Lotus Sutra. 
“Furthermore, O Mañjuśrī, after the Tathāgata’s parinirvāṇa, anyone who wants to teach this sutra in the Age of the Decadent Dharma should abide in ease of practice. 
When he expounds or recites this sutra he should not take pleasure in talking about the faults of people or of the sutra. 
Nor should he slander other expounders of the Dharma or talk of the good and bad, strong and weak points of others. 
“As for the śrāvakas, a bodhisattva should not name them and point out their faults, nor name them and praise their virtues. 
Moreover, he should not feel any hatred; because if he skillfully practices ease of mind in this way, those who listen to him will not oppose his intentions. If he is asked difﬁcult questions, he should not answer using the teaching of the inferior vehicle. He should take his explanation only from the Mahayana, which will enable them to attain omniscience.” At that time the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
The bodhisattva should always willingly Teach the Dharma at ease, Establishing his seat in a pure place. 
He should anoint his body with oil To cleanse himself of dirt, And put on new, clean clothing. Both his outer garments and undergarments being pure, Sitting comfortably on the Dharma seat, He should teach according to the questions. 
If there are any monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen, Or kings, princes, subjects, ofﬁcials, and commoners, Using subtle ideas he should teach them With a composed countenance. 
If they have difﬁcult questions He should answer in accordance with the meaning, Expounding and illuminating it With various explanations and illustrations. 
Through these skillful means He should awaken the thought of Enlightenment in them all, Gradually beneﬁting them, And causing them to enter the buddha path. 
Ridding them of idle minds And lazy thoughts, As well as anxieties, He should compassionately Teach the Dharma. 
He should continuously expound The teaching of the highest path Both day and night, using various explanations And incalculable illustrations. Revealing this to sentient beings He will cause them all to rejoice. 
He should not expect to receive any clothing, Bedding, food and drink, or medicine. 
He should only singlemindedly think Of teaching the Dharma, Gain mastery of the buddha path, And enable sentient beings also to attain it. 
It is exactly this kind of offering That brings great beneﬁt and ease. 
After my parinirvāṇa if there is any monk Who is able to explain the Lotus Sutra, His mind will be free from the obstructions of Jealousy, anger, and anxiety. 
He will also be without sorrows And no one will slander him. He will not be afraid of being Attacked with swords and sticks; And he will not be expelled from the sangha, Because he abides in perseverance. 
The wise skillfully compose Their minds in this way And can abide in ease, As I have described above. 
One would not be able to fully Describe the qualities of such a person Through calculations and illustrations, Though they lasted for Thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas. 
“Furthermore, O Mañjuśrī, in the future when the Dharma becomes extinct, any bodhisattva mahāsattva who preserves and recites this sutra will not feel jealous or be deceitful, nor will he insult those who study the buddha path by pointing out their good qualities or their deﬁciencies. 
“If there are any monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen who are seeking the śrāvaka vehicle, the pratyekabuddha vehicle, or the bodhisattva path, a bodhisattva will not worry them, causing them to have doubts by saying: You are very far away from the path and will never be able to attain omniscience. 
Why is this? 
Because you are negligent and idle in the path. 
In him the thought of great compassion for all sentient beings should awaken, together with the thought that all Tathāgatas are compassionate fathers and that all bodhisattvas are great teachers. He should always deeply respect and pay homage to all of the great bodhisattvas in the ten directions. 
He should teach the Dharma equally to all sentient beings in accordance with the Dharma, explaining neither too much nor too little. Nor should he teach too much even to those who are deeply enthusiastic about hearing the Dharma. 
“O Mañjuśrī! In the future world, when the Dharma is to be extinguished, this bodhisattva mahāsattva, having perfected the third sphere of ease in practice, will not be perplexed when he teaches this Dharma. He will become acquainted with good fellow students who will recite this sutra together. He will also acquire a great following who come to hear his teaching, preserve it after hearing it, recite it after preserving it, teach it after reciting it, copy it after teaching it, and enable others to copy, respect, honor, praise, and pay homage to the Sutra.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
If anyone wants to teach this sutra, He should get rid of jealousy, anger, Pride, ﬂattery, deceitfulness, and falsity. He should always practice honest conduct. 
He should not slander others Or make up fallacies about the Dharma. Nor should he cause others to be doubtful by saying: You will not become a buddha. 
This heir of the Buddha who teaches the Dharma Should always be gentle, patient, And compassionate to all. He should never have lazy thoughts. 
He should respect the great bodhisattvas In the ten directions who practice the path Out of their compassion for sentient beings, And think that they are his great teachers. 
He should think that all the Buddha Bhagavats are the most excellent fathers. Destroying arrogance, he should teach The Dharma without obstructions. 
The third sphere of the teaching Of ease in practice is like this. The wise should preserve it. Those who practice wholeheartedly and at ease Will be honored by innumerable sentient beings. 
“Furthermore, O Mañjuśrī, in the future world when the Dharma is to be extinguished, any bodhisattva mahāsattva who preserves this Lotus Sutra will awaken the thought of great kindness toward lay Buddhists and renunciants and also awaken the thought of great compassion toward non-bodhi sattvas. He should think: 
They do not ask, believe, or understand. Those people do not even ask questions about this sutra, believe it, or understand it. When I attain highest, complete enlightenment, wherever I am, I will lead them and enable them to abide in this teaching through my transcendent powers and power of wisdom. “O Mañjuśrī! 
After the Tathāgata’s parinirvāṇa, this bodhisattva mahāsattva, who has perfected the fourth sphere of the teaching of ease in practice, will be faultless when he teaches this Dharma. He will always be paid homage to, respected, honored, and praised by monks, nuns, laymen, laywomen, kings, princes, ministers, commoners, brahmans, and householders. 
The devas in the sky will always accompany him in order to hear the Dharma. 
If he is in a village, city, secluded spot, or forest and the people want to come and ask difﬁcult questions, the devas will protect him both day and night, always for the sake of the Dharma, and he will cause all of those who listen to him to rejoice. 
Why is this? 
Because this sutra is preserved through the transcendent powers of all the buddhas of the past, present, and future. 
Even the title of this Lotus Sutra cannot be heard in incalculable lands. 
“O Mañjuśrī! Suppose a very powerful noble emperor wanted to subdue other countries with his might, but the lesser kings would not obey his command. In such a case the noble emperor gathers an army together to overcome them. 
He recognizes the soldiers who have committed brave deeds in war and, greatly rejoicing, he bestows boons according to their merit, such as estates, villages, cities, garments, ornaments, various treasures, gold, silver, lapis lazuli, mother-of-pearl, agate, coral, amber, elephants, horses, chariots, servants, and subjects, but he never gives them the precious jewel in his topknot. 
Why is this? 
Because only the noble emperor has this precious jewel in his topknot. If the emperor gives it away his attendants would certainly be very surprised and mistrustful. 
The Tathāgata is exactly like this. He has attained the land of the Dharma through his powers of concentration and wisdom. Thus he has become the king of the triple world. Since the māra kings will not obey him, the wise and noble generals of the Tathāgata come to do battle with them. 
The Tathāgata rejoices at the meritorious ones and teaches various sutras to the fourfold assembly, gladdening them. He bestows upon them the property of all the teachings about concentrations, liberations, faculties without corruption, and powers. He also bestows upon them the city of nirvana. Saying that they have attained nirvana, he leads their minds onward and gladdens them all. 
“O Mañjuśrī! It is just as if the noble emperor ﬁnally gives the jewel that has been long concealed in his topknot. Although he perceived the great merit of those soldiers and was deeply pleased, he did not rashly give them the marvelous jewel. 
The Tathāgata is also exactly like this. Since he is the great King of the Dharma in the triple world he inspires all the sentient beings through the Dharma. 
When he sees the wise and noble soldiers who have done battle with the māra of the ﬁve aggregates, the māra of desires, and the māra of death, who have great merit in battle, and have extinguished the three poisons, left the triple world, and broken out of Māra’s net, he then rejoices greatly. 
He now teaches the Lotus Sutra, which is treated with hostility by the entire world and is difﬁcult to believe in, and which he has never taught before, and enables sentient beings to attain omniscience. 
“O Mañjuśrī! This Lotus Sutra is the ultimate teaching of all the Tathāgatas, the most profound among all the teachings, and conferred at the very end. It was in the same way that the very powerful and noble emperor gave the jewel after having preserved it for a long time. “O Mañjuśrī! 
This Lotus Sutra is the secret treasure house of all the Buddha Tathāgatas, and the foremost among all the sutras. The Buddha has preserved it for a long time and he has not taught it indiscriminately. 
Now, for the ﬁrst time he teaches it.” At that time the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: Always practice patience And be compassionate toward all, Since only then can one expound A sutra praised by the Buddha! 
In the future those who preserve this sutra Should be compassionate and kind toward Lay Buddhists, renunciants, and non-bodhisattvas, Saying: Those who have not heard this sutra Or who do not believe in it Have consequently lost a great opportunity. 
When I attain the buddha path I will expound this teaching Through various skillful means And enable them to abide in it. 
Suppose there was a powerful, noble emperor Who bestows upon those soldiers meritorious in battle Various gifts of elephants, horses, chariots, conveyances, Ornaments, estates, villages, cities, garments, Various treasures, servants, and wealth. He gives these gifts with joy. 
If there is anyone who has been brave And has performed difﬁcult deeds, The noble emperor gives The precious jewel in his topknot. 
The Tathāgata is exactly like this. He is the emperor of all the teachings. Out of his great compassion, And through his treasury of wisdom And great power of patience, He inspires the world according to the Dharma. 
Seeing all the sentient beings suffering, Seeking liberation And doing battle with the māras, He explains various teachings for the beings And teaches various sutras With his great skillful means. 
Knowing that the sentient beings have Finally attained the power to understand, He teaches this Lotus Sutra only at the very end, Just like the noble emperor Who gave the jewel in his topknot. 
This sutra is the utmost, Superior to all the sutras. I have constantly preserved it And have not revealed it indiscriminately. Now is the right time to teach it to you. 
After my parinirvāṇa Those seeking the buddha path, Who want to attain ease and expound this sutra, Should become familiar with these four spheres Of the teaching concerning ease in practice. 
Those who recite this sutra will always Be free from anxiety and illness, And will have a noble countenance. They will not be born into poverty, Lowliness or ugliness. 
Sentient beings will want to meet them Just as they long to meet a wise seer, And all of the devaputras will serve them. 
Sticks and swords cannot hurt them, And poison cannot harm them. If people slander them Those slanderers’ mouths will be sealed up. 
They will travel fearlessly Like a lion king, and The light of their wisdom Will illuminate just like the sun. 
If they dream they see only subtle things. 
They see the Tathāgatas seated on lion seats, Teaching the Dharma to the assembly Of monks surrounding them. 
They see nāgas and asuras, As numerous as the sands of the Ganges River, Honoring the Tathāgatas With their palms pressed together. Revealing themselves, They teach the Dharma to these beings. 
They also see the buddhas, with golden bodies, Emitting immeasurable rays of light Which illuminate universally, And expounding various teachings With beautiful voices like Brahma’s. 
To the fourfold assembly The Buddha teaches the highest Dharma. Revealing themselves among them, They praise the Buddha With palms pressed together. Hearing the Dharma they rejoice And pay homage to the Buddha. They attain the power of recollection And achieve the wisdom of nonretrogression. 
The Buddha, knowing their minds, And that they have deeply entered the buddha path, Gives them a prediction of the highest, Complete enlightenment, saying: O son of a virtuous family! 
In the future you will attain immeasurable Wisdom and the great path of the Buddha. 
Your land will be pure and vast, Beyond all comparison. The fourfold assembly will also be there Listening to the Dharma with their palms Pressed together. 
They who recite this sutra also see themselves In mountain forests, practicing excellent teachings, Experiencing the real aspect, Deeply entering into concentration, And looking at the buddhas in the ten directions, All of whom have golden bodies Adorned with a hundred auspicious marks. 
They will also dream about becoming The king of a realm who abandons his palace And retinue, and the highly pleasing Desires of the ﬁve senses, Approaches the terrace of enlightenment, Sits on the lion seat under the bodhi tree, Attains the wisdom of all the buddhas After seeking the path for seven days, And who, arising, turns the wheel of the Dharma After having attained the highest path. 
They will teach the Dharma to the fourfold assembly For thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas. Explaining the true and incorruptible Dharma, They will save innumerable sentient beings. 
Later they will enter nirvana Just as smoke dies away When the ﬂame of a candle is extinguished. 
If anyone in the troubled world to come Teaches this highest Dharma They will attain great beneﬁts Like the merits mentioned above. 
Bodhisattvas Emerging from the Earth At that time the bodhisattva mahāsattvas, who had arrived from other lands and whose number exceeded that of the sands of eight Ganges Rivers, stood up in the great assembly, bowed with their palms pressed together, and then spoke to the Buddha, saying: 
If you give us permission to diligently strive to preserve, recite, copy and pay homage to this Sutra after the parinirvāṇa of the Buddha in this sahā world, then we will extensively teach it in this land.” Then the Buddha addressed the assembly of bodhisattva mahā sattvas, saying: “Enough, O sons of a virtuous family! 
There is no need for you to preserve this sutra. 
Why is this? 
In my sahā world there are bodhisattva mahāsattvas, equal to the sands of sixty thousand Ganges Rivers in number; and each of these bodhisattvas, in turn, has a retinue equal to the sands of sixty thousand Ganges Rivers. After my parinirvāṇa they can preserve, recite, and extensively teach this sutra.” When the Buddha said this all the lands of the great manifold cosmos in the sahā world quaked and the earth split. 
From out of this crevice there simultaneously appeared incalculable thousands of myriads of koṭis of bodhisattva mahāsattvas. 
All of these bodhisattvas had golden bodies endowed with the thirty-two marks and radiating immeasurable rays of light. They had all previously been living in the space under the earth of the sahā world. 
Having heard the sound of Śākyamuni’s teaching, all of these bodhisattvas emerged from below. 
Each of those bodhisattvas presided over a great assembly and each led a retinue equal to the sands of sixty thousand Ganges Rivers in number. 
How much more numerous were the bodhisattvas who emerged leading retinues equal in number to the sands of ﬁfty thousand, forty thousand, thirty thousand, twenty thousand, or ten thousand Ganges Rivers! 
How many more retinues were there numbering thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas! 
How many more retinues were there numbering myriads of koṭis! 
How many more were those numbering ten million, one million, or even ten thousand! 
How many more were those numbering one thousand, one hundred, or even ten! 
Having emerged from the earth, each of these bodhisattvas approached the Tathāgatas Prabhūtaratna and Śākyamuni, still seated in the beautiful seven-jeweled stupa in the air. 
Going up to them, they bowed until their foreheads touched the feet of both Bhagavats. Then, having bowed to the other buddhas, each sitting on a lion seat under the jeweled trees, they circumambulated them to the right three times, honoring them with their palms pressed together. Having praised them with various bodhisattva eulogies, they withdrew to one side and joyfully gazed at the two Bhagavats. 
All these bodhisattva mahāsattvas, having emerged from the earth, praised the buddhas with various bodhisattva eulogies. While they did, ﬁfty intermediate kalpas passed. 
During this time the Buddha Śākyamuni sat in silence; and the fourfold assemblies were also silent while the ﬁfty intermediate kalpas passed. 
Because of the Buddha’s transcendent powers, the great assemblies believed that the time that had passed was only half a day. 
Then, through the transcendent powers of the Buddha, the fourfold assemblies also saw the bodhisattvas ﬁlling the air throughout immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of lands. 
There were four leaders among those bodhisattvas gathered there. They were called Viśiṣṭacāritra, Anantacāritra, Viśuddha cāritra, and Supratiṣṭhita cāritra. 
These four bodhisattvas were the foremost leaders in the assembly. At the head of the great assembly, they each pressed their palms together, gazed at Śākyamuni Buddha, and inquired of him, saying: 
Are you without illness or pain? Are you at ease in practice or not? 
Do those who should be saved accept your teaching easily or not? 
Do they not make you weary, O Bhagavat?” Thereupon the four great bodhisattvas spoke these verses: O Bhagavat! Are you at ease? Are you without illness or pain? 
Do the sentient beings accept Your guidance easily or not? 
Do they not tire the Bhagavat? 
At that time the Bhagavat spoke to the great assembly of bodhisattvas, saying: “It is exactly like this, O sons of a virtuous family! It is exactly so! 
The Tathāgata is at ease and without illness or pain. 
It is easy to save sentient beings, and I am not fatigued. 
Why is this? 
Because sentient beings have continually received my guidance throughout many lives, and they have also planted roots of good merit by revering and honoring the buddhas of the past. 
“When these sentient beings ﬁrst saw me and heard my teaching, all, except for those who had previously practiced and studied the inferior vehicle, immediately believed and accepted it and entered the Tathāgata’s wisdom. 
Now I enable even such people as these to listen to this sutra and enter the Buddha’s wisdom.” Then the great bodhisattvas spoke these verses: 
O Bhagavat, Great Hero! All the sentient beings Can easily be brought to the path. 
They can ask about The profound wisdom of the buddhas. Hearing about it, they trust and accept it. We rejoice about this. 
At that time the Bhagavat praised the foremost of the great bodhisattvas, saying: “Splendid, splendid, O sons of virtuous family! 
Thoughts of joy regarding the Tathāgata have awakened in you.” Then Bodhisattva Maitreya and the assembly of bodhisattvas equal in number to the sands of eight thousand Ganges Rivers thought this: Looking far into the past, we have never seen or heard of such an assembly of great bodhisattva mahāsattvas, who have now emerged from the earth and are standing before the Bhagavat with their palms pressed together in reverence, asking the Tathāgata questions. 
Then Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Maitreya, knowing the minds of the bodhisattvas whose number was equal to the sands of eight thousand Ganges Rivers, and wanting to clear up their confusion, faced the Buddha with the palms of his hands pressed together and addressed him in verse, saying: We have never seen such a great assembly Of incalculable thousands of myriads of koṭis Of bodhisattvas before. We entreat you, O Best of Humans, To explain it to us! Where have they come from? 
They look magniﬁcent And have great transcendent powers. Their wisdom is beyond our comprehension. They are ﬁrm in their resolve, Have the power of great perseverance, And an appearance that sentient beings Desire to see. Where have they come from? 
Each of these bodhisattvas is leading A retinue whose number is incalculable, Like the sands of the Ganges River. 
Some great bodhisattvas are leading retinues Equal in number to the sands Of sixty thousand Ganges Rivers. Great are the assemblies, Singlemindedly seeking the buddha path. 
These great leaders, equal in number To the sands of sixty thousand Ganges Rivers, Have come all together to pay homage to the Buddha And preserve this sutra. 
There are disciples who number Thousands of myriads of nayutas, Myriads of koṭis, or even half a koṭi. Their numbers also exceed that mentioned above. There are also disciples in retinues Of one million, ten thousand, One thousand, one hundred, ﬁfty, ten, Even three, two, or one in number. 
If anyone counted the number of such a great assembly With bamboo counting-sticks, he would not ﬁnish Even after exhausting kalpas greater in number Than the sands of the Ganges River. 
Who has taught the Dharma To this assembly of bodhisattvas, Endowed with great dignity and perseverance? Who has inspired and perfected them? 
Under whom did the thought of enlightenment First awaken in them? 
Which Buddha-Dharma do they praise? 
Whose sutra have they preserved and practiced? 
And which buddha path have they followed? 
Such bodhisattvas as these, Endowed with transcendent powers And the power of great wisdom, Have all emerged out of the earth, Which quaked in the four directions And split asunder. 
O Bhagavat! We have never seen Such a thing before. We entreat you to tell us the name Of the land from where they have come. 
We have been constantly traveling In various regions, Nevertheless we have never seen Such a thing before. We do not know even a single person In this assembly. All of a sudden They have emerged from the earth. We entreat you to explain the reason why. 
All of the immeasurable hundreds of thousands Of koṭis of bodhisattvas in this great assembly Now wish to know about this matter. 
There must be underlying causes for this, To explain all of these bodhisattvas. O Bhagavat, He of Immeasurable Qualities! We entreat you to clear up The confusion of the assembly! 
Thereupon the buddhas who were the magically created forms of Śākyamuni Buddha arrived from other incalculable thousands of myriads of koṭis of lands and sat cross-legged on lion seats under the jeweled trees in the eight directions. 
Each attendant of these buddhas had seen the great assembly of bodhisattvas as they emerged from out of the earth and ﬂoated in midair in the four directions of the great manifold cosmos. 
Each of them addressed his Buddha, saying: “O Bhagavat! 
Where has this great assembly of immeasurable, limitless, incalculable bodhisattvas come from?” Then the buddhas answered their attendants, saying: “O sons of a virtuous family! 
Wait a moment! There is a bodhisattva mahā sattva called Maitreya, who has received a prediction from the Buddha Śākyamuni that he will become a buddha after Śākyamuni in the future. Since he has already asked about this, the Buddha will now answer him. You shall be able to hear the reason yourselves.” Then the Buddha Śākyamuni addressed Bodhisattva Maitreya, saying: 
“Splendid, splendid, O Ajita! 
You have asked the Buddha an important question. 
You should all singlemindedly don the armor of perseverance and be of ﬁrm will. The Tathāgata now wants to reveal the wisdom of the buddhas, the inherent transcendent powers of the buddhas, the lionlike digniﬁed power of the buddhas, the majestic and mighty power of the buddhas.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: You should be persistent And wholeheartedly attentive, For I want to explain it to you. 
You should now awaken the power of faith, And with perseverance abide in the good. Now you will all be able to hear What you have never heard before. 
I will now put you at ease. Have no doubts or fear! The Buddha never speaks false words. His wisdom is immeasurable. 
The foremost Dharma that he has attained Is profound and difﬁcult to explain. I will now expound this difﬁcult teaching, So you should listen wholeheartedly. 
Then the Bhagavat, after speaking these verses, addressed Bodhisattva Maitreya, saying: “I will now proclaim it to all of you in this assembly. 
O Ajita! 
All of you have never seen these immeasurable, innumerable, incalculable great bodhisattva mahāsattvas who have emerged from out of the earth. Having attained highest, complete enlightenment in this sahā world, I led, inspired, and instructed these bodhisattvas, restrained their thoughts, and caused the thought of the path to awaken in them. 
When these bodhisattvas lived in the space under the earth of this sahā world, they recited various sutras, became well versed in them, and contemplated, analyzed, and correctly remembered them. 
“O Ajita! 
All these sons of a virtuous family did not wish to be among the multitude where there is always much discussion. 
They always wanted to be in quiet places. They diligently strove without resting or relying upon devas or humans. 
They always desired the profound wisdom without obstructions; they always wanted the Dharma of the buddhas. 
They strove wholeheartedly in seeking the highest wisdom.” At that time the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
You should know That all of these great bodhisattvas Have practiced the wisdom of the Buddha For innumerable kalpas. They have all been inspired by me, And the thought of the great path Has awakened in them. 
They are my heirs. Abiding in this world, They always cultivated ascetic practices, Wishing to be in quiet places. Rejecting the clamor of the multitude, They did not want to have much discussion. 
All my heirs such as these Constantly practiced my teaching With vigor, day and night. In order to seek the buddha path They lived in the space Under the earth of this sahā world. 
They were ﬁrm in recollection, And they always diligently sought wisdom. Explaining various subtle teachings Their minds were free from fear. 
Sitting under the bodhi tree In the city of Gayā, I attained highest, complete enlightenment, And turned the wheel of the highest Dharma. 
I then led and inspired them So that the thought of the path Awakened in them for the ﬁrst time. All of them are now at the stage of nonretrogression, And will certainly become buddhas with no residue. 
I now teach the truth. You should wholeheartedly believe that From long, long ago I have been Leading and inspiring all these bodhisattvas. 
Then Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Maitreya and the innumerable other bodhisattvas became doubtful and confused concerning this unprecedented experience. They thought this: How is it possible in such a short time for the Bhagavat to have inspired such an immeasurable, limitless, incalculable number of great bodhisattvas, enabling them to abide in highest, complete enlightenment? 
Immediately they addressed the Buddha, saying: 
“O Bhagavat! When the Tathāgata was a prince he left the palace of the Śākyas, sat on the terrace of enlightenment which is not far from the city of Gayā, and attained highest, complete enlightenment. 
Since then more than forty years have passed. 
How is it possible, O Bhagavat, for you to have done such great buddha acts in such a short period of time? Is it through the might of the Buddha and through the Buddha’s qualities that you have inspired such an assembly of incalculable great bodhisattvas to achieve highest, complete enlightenment? 
“O Bhagavat! Even if someone counted the number of the great bodhisattvas for thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas they would not be able to ﬁnish. There would be no end. 
From long ago these bodhisattvas have been planting roots of good merit in the presence of immeasurable, limitless buddhas. They have perfected the bodhisattva path and have always practiced the pure path of discipline and integrity. 
It is, O Bhagavat, difﬁcult to believe such things in this world. 
“Suppose a handsome man with dark hair, twenty-ﬁve years of age, were to point to a hundred-year-old man and say: He is my son. “And the one-hundred-year-old man points to the young fellow and says: He is my father and he raised me! 
It has not, in fact, been so long since the Buddha attained the path. Yet for the sake of the buddha path this great assembly of bodhisattvas has been diligently striving for innumerable thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas. They have skillfully entered, abided in, and emerged from immeasurable thousands of myriads of koṭis of samādhis. They have attained great transcendent powers and practiced the pure path of discipline and integrity for a long time. 
“Today the Bhagavat has correctly said that after he attained the path of the Buddha he caused the thought of enlightenment to awaken in the bodhisattvas for the ﬁrst time. He then led, inspired, and instructed them to approach highest, complete enlightenment. O Bhagavat! Although it has not been so long since you attained buddhahood yet you have really done these great meritorious acts. 
“We believe the Buddha’s words, spoken according to our capacities, and that what he says is never false. We are all well versed in the Buddha’s knowledge. 
However, if the bodhisattvas in whom the thought of enlightenment has recently awakened hear this after the Buddha’s parinirvāṇa, they will not accept it; and this will bring about conditions for erring deeds that destroy the Dharma. 
Moreover, in the future, when the sons of a virtuous family hear this, they will also be free from doubt.” Thereupon Bodhisattva Maitreya, wanting to elaborate upon the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
Long ago the Buddha left The household of the Śākya clan, And approached Gayā Where he sat under the bodhi tree; It has not been so long since that time. 
The number of the Buddha’s heirs Is incalculable; From long ago they have practiced the buddha path And attained transcendent powers and The power of wisdom. They have thoroughly studied The bodhisattva path, And are as undeﬁled by worldly affairs, As the lotus blossom in the water. 
They have emerged from out of the earth, And all stood respectfully before the Bhagavats. 
It is difﬁcult to comprehend this matter, How can we possibly believe it! 
The Buddha attained the path Only a short time ago, Yet he has accomplished so much. We entreat you to remove our doubts And give a detailed explanation According to the truth. 
Suppose there were a young man Just twenty-ﬁve years of age Who pointed to a one-hundred-year-old man, Who was wrinkled and had white hair, saying: This is my offspring. 
The also says: This is my father. 
The father is young, and the son is old. No one in the world would believe it. 
The Bhagavat’s teaching is exactly like this. 
He attained the path only a very short time ago, Yet these bodhisattvas are ﬁrm in resolution And without weak will; They have been practicing the bodhisattva path For immeasurable kalpas. They are skilled at difﬁcult discussions, And their minds are free from fear. They are resolute and persevering. They are handsome and digniﬁed, Praised by the buddhas in the ten directions. 
They are good at detailed explanations. They did not want to be among the multitudes For they always liked being in meditation, And so they lived in the space under the earth In order to seek the buddha path. 
Since we heard about this from the Buddha We have no doubts about it; But still we entreat you, O Buddha, to expound it And make it clear for the future. 
Anyone in whom doubts awaken And who does not believe in this sutra Will certainly fall into the troubled states of being. 
That is why we now entreat you to explain How in such a short time You have led and inspired These innumerable bodhisattvas So that the thought of enlightenment Has awakened in them And they abide in the stage of nonretrogression. 
The Lifespan of the Tathāgata Thereupon the Buddha addressed the bodhisattvas and the entire great assembly, saying: “O sons of a virtuous family! 
You should believe the true words of the Tathāgata.” He addressed the great assembly again, saying: 
“You should believe the Tathāgata’s true words.” He repeated this to them, saying: 
“You should believe the Tathāgata’s true words.” Then the great assembly of bodhisattvas, headed by Maitreya, addressed the Buddha with their palms pressed together, saying: “O Bhagavat! We entreat you to explain it. 
We will accept the Buddha’s words.” After they had spoken in this way three times, they again said: “We entreat you to explain it. 
We will accept the Buddha’s words.” Then the Bhagavat, realizing that the bodhisattvas continued to entreat him after those three times, addressed them, saying: “Listen carefully to the Tathāgata’s secret and transcendent powers. 
The devas, humans, and asuras in all the worlds all think that the present Buddha, Śākyamuni, left the palace of the Śākyas, sat on the terrace of enlightenment not far from the city of Gayā, and attained highest, complete enlightenment. 
However, O sons of a virtuous family, immeasurable, limitless, hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of kalpas have passed since I actually attained buddhahood. 
“Suppose there were a man who ground ﬁve hundreds of thousands myriads of koṭis of nayutas of incalculable great manifold cosmos into particles. While passing through ﬁve hundred thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of incalculable lands to the east, he dropped just a single particle; and in this way he continued to drop the particles as he went toward the east, until they were all gone. 
“O sons of a virtuous family! 
What do you think about this? 
Can one imagine all of these worlds, calculate, and know their number or not?” Bodhisattva Maitreya and the others together addressed the Buddha, saying: 
These worlds are immeasurable, limitless, incalculable, and beyond our powers of conception. 
Even all the śrāvakas and pratyekabuddhas, with their knowledge free from corruption, are not able to comprehend them, or know their number. 
O Bhagavat! 
Such worlds as these are incalculable and limitless.” Then the Buddha addressed the assembly of the great bodhisattvas, saying: “O sons of a virtuous family! 
I will now explain it clearly to you. 
Suppose all these worlds, whether or not a particle was left in them, were reduced to particles, and each particle represented a kalpa. The period of time since I became a buddha would exceed this by hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of incalculable kalpas. 
Since then I have constantly been residing in the sahā world, teaching the Dharma and inspiring sentient beings. I have also been leading and beneﬁting sentient beings in incalculable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of other worlds. “O sons of a virtuous family! 
During this interim I explained about the Buddha Dīpaṃkara and others. Furthermore, I also said that they had entered parinirvāṇa. I have explained such things through skillful means. “O sons of a virtuous family! 
If any sentient being comes to me, I perceive the dullness or sharpness of his faith and other faculties with my buddha-eye. According to the way I should bring them to the path, I, myself, proclaim different names and lifespans in various places. In each case I have also clearly stated that I would enter parinirvāṇa. Through various skillful means I have explained subtle teachings and have made the sentient beings rejoice. 
To those beings whom the Tathāgata perceives as taking pleasure in the inferior teachings, who have few qualities and grave deﬁlements, he teaches that the Buddha attained highest, complete enlightenment after he re nounced household life in his young age. However, it has been a very long time indeed since I attained buddhahood. I give such an explanation only to lead and inspire the sentient beings to enter the buddha path through skillful means. “O sons of a virtuous family! 
The sutras that the Tathāgata has expounded are all to save the sentient beings. Whether the Tathāgata teaches about himself or others, whether he reveals his form or that of others, whether he shows his acts or those of others, everything he says is true, never false. 
“Why is this? 
Because the Tathāgata perceives all the marks of the triple world as they really are: that there is no birth and death, coming or going; that there is also no existence or extinction in the world, truth or falsehood, sameness or difference. The Tathāgata does not view the triple world as sentient beings in the triple world see it. The Tathāgata perceives such things clearly and without mistakes. 
“Since sentient beings have various natures, desires, behaviors, thoughts, and distinctions, the Tathāgata, wanting to cause them to plant roots of good merit, has explained various teachings through a variety of examples, explanations, and illustrations. 
He has not desisted from doing buddha acts even for a single moment and in this way it has been an extremely long time since I attained buddhahood. My lifespan is immeasurable and incalculable. 
The lifespan that I ﬁrst attained through practicing the bodhisattva path has not yet expired. It is twice as great as the number previously mentioned. 
Although I do not actually enter parinirvāṇa I proclaim that I do. It is through this skillful means that the Tathāgata leads and inspires sentient beings. 
“Why is this? 
Because if the Buddha abides a long time in this world, those who have few qualities do not plant roots of good merit, acquire poor and superﬁcial characters, are attached to the desires of the ﬁve senses, and enter into the web of illusions and false views. 
If they see the Tathāgata always existing without extinction, they then become proud, self-willed, and negligent. The thought that the Buddha is difﬁcult to meet and that he is to be respected cannot awaken in them. 
That is why the Tathāgata teaches through skillful means, saying: O monks! You should know that the appearance of the buddhas in the world is very difﬁcult to encounter. 
Because some of those with little merit may not see the Buddha during the passage of immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas. “For this reason I say: O monks! 
It is difﬁcult to meet the Tathāgata. “Hearing such words, the thought that it is very difﬁcult to meet the Tathāgata will certainly awaken in these sentient beings. Longing and yearning for the Buddha, they will plant roots of good merit. 
For this reason, although the Tathāgata does not really pass into extinction, he nevertheless says he does. 
“Furthermore, O sons of a virtuous family, the teaching of all the Buddha Tathāgatas is exactly like this. It is entirely true, never false, all for the sake of saving sentient beings. 
“Suppose there were an excellent doctor. He is wise, knowledgeable, his prescriptions are effective, and he has skillfully cured a variety of diseases. 
This man has many sons, say ten, twenty, or even one hundred in number. For some reason, he has to go far off to another country and, while he is away, his children, whom he has left behind, drink some poison. 
The poison starts to take effect and they roll on the ground in agony. 
“At this moment their father returns home. Some of the children who have taken the poison are delirious, while others are not. Seeing their father in the distance they all rejoice greatly and kneeling respectfully address him, saying: It is good that you have returned safely. 
We entreat you to cure and save us, and restore us to life. “Seeing his children suffering in this way, the father searches for beneﬁcial herbs possessed of good color, aroma, and ﬂavor, according to the medical manual. Blending them together after grinding and sifting, he gives the mixture to the children and says: This is an extremely beneﬁcial medicine with good color, aroma, and ﬂavor. 
The remaining children, those who are delirious, seeing their father coming to them, rejoice and ask him to seek a cure for their illness. Although he offers them the medicine, they will not take it. 
Why is this? 
The poison has so deeply penetrated them that they have become delirious. They do not think that the medicine with good color and aroma is good. 
“The father thinks: These children are to be pitied. The poison has completely warped their minds. 
Although they rejoiced upon seeing me and sought a cure they will not take this beneﬁcial medicine. 
I will now cause them to take this medicine through skillful means. “Then he says to them: 
“Having left these instructions he goes to another country and sends a messenger back home to tell them: ‘Your father has already died.’ Upon hearing that their father is dead, the children become very distressed and think: If our father had lived he would have taken pity on us and protected us. But now, abandoning us, he has died in a distant country. 
The father, hearing that all his children have completely recovered, immediately returns and makes his appearance.” The Buddha then asked the bodhisattvas: “O sons of a virtuous family! 
Do you think there is anyone who would say that this good doctor is guilty of lying?” The bodhisattvas replied: 
“No, we do not, O Bhagavat!” The Buddha said: “I am just like this. Since I became a buddha, immeasurable, limitless, hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of incalculable kalpas have passed. Though for the sake of sentient beings, I use skillful means and say that I will enter parinirvāṇa, there is no one who could rightly say that I am guilty of falsehood.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
Since I attained buddhahood, Immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads Of koṭis of incalculable kalpas have passed. I have been constantly teaching the Dharma, Through these immeasurable kalpas, Leading and inspiring Innumerable koṭis of sentient beings And enabling them to enter the buddha path. 
Using skillful means I have manifested the state of nirvana To bring sentient beings to this path; Yet I have not actually entered nirvana, But continually abide here expounding the Dharma. 
Although I am always among these erring beings, With my transcendent powers, I prevent them from seeing me. 
The sentient beings, Seeing me enter perfect extinction Earnestly revere my relics And, ﬁlled with longing, Yearn for me. 
When the sentient beings become Sincere, mild, and receptive, And, wanting wholeheartedly to meet the Buddha, Are willing to give unsparingly Of their bodies and lives, Then I, together with the sangha, Will appear on Mount Gṛdhrakūṭa. 
Although I am always here without extinction, Through the power of skillful means I manifest extinction and nonextinction. 
Not knowing this, you only think That I have entered parinirvāṇa. 
I see all sentient beings Submerged in the ocean of suffering. That is why, by not manifesting my form, I cause them to yearn for me. Then, after awakening this longing, I appear and expound the Dharma; Such are my transcendent powers. 
For innumerable kalpas I have constantly resided On Mount Gṛdhrakūṭa and elsewhere. 
When sentient beings see themselves Amidst a conﬂagration At the end of a kalpa, It is in fact my tranquil land, Always full of devas and humans. 
All the gardens and palaces Are adorned with various gems. The jeweled trees abound with ﬂowers and fruits, And the sentient beings are joyful among them. 
The devas beat heavenly drums Making constant and varied music. They rain down māndārava ﬂowers Upon the Buddha and the great assembly. 
Although my Pure Land never decays, The sentient beings see it as ravaged by ﬁre And torn with anxiety and distress; They believe it is ﬁlled with these things. 
Because of their misdeeds These erring sentient beings do not hear The name of the Three Treasures For incalculable kalpas. 
But all who cultivate merit, And are receptive and honest, Will see me residing here, Expounding the Dharma. 
For the sake of these sentient beings I teach that the lifespan Of the Buddha is immeasurable. To those who, after a long time, Finally see the Buddha, I teach that it is difﬁcult to meet him. 
Such is the power of my wisdom. The light of my wisdom illuminates immeasurably And my lifespan is of innumerable kalpas. This has been achieved through long practice. 
You wise ones, do not give in to doubt! Banish all doubt forever! The Buddha’s words are true, never false. 
It is like the physician Who proclaimed his own death, Although it was untrue. He did this to cure his delirious sons, Through excellent skillful means; So no one could say he really spoke falsehood. 
I, also, being the father of the world, Cure those who suffer. To the deluded and unenlightened I say that I have entered nirvana, Although, in fact, I am really here. 
For if they were to see me, They would become lazy and arrogant. Attached to the desires of the ﬁve senses, They would fall into the troubled states of being. 
Always aware of which sentient beings Practice the path and which do not, I teach the Dharma in various ways, According to their ability to be saved. 
By what means can I cause sentient beings to be able to Enter the highest path And quickly attain the Dharma? 
Description of Merits Thereupon, when the great assembly heard the Buddha explain that his lifespan was of such a great number of kalpas, an immeasurable, limitless, incalculable number of sentient beings were greatly beneﬁted. 
Then the Bhagavat addressed Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Mai treya, saying: “O Ajita! 
When I explained the great length of this Tathāgata’s life span, sentient beings, equal to the sands of the six hundred and eighty myriads of koṭis of nayutas of Ganges Rivers in number, gained understanding of the truth of the non origination of all dharmas. 
Furthermore, a thousand times this number of bodhisattva mahāsattvas attained the power of recollecting what they hear; and bodhisattva mahāsattvas equal to the number of particles in one world attained unhindered eloquence. 
Moreover, there were bodhisattva mahāsattvas equal to the particles in one world who attained the power of tenacious memory which revolves hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of immeasurable times. 
There were also bodhisattva mahāsattvas equal to the number of particles in the great manifold cosmos who turned the irreversible wheel of the Dharma, and bodhisattva mahāsattvas equal to the number of particles in two medium-sized manifold cosmos who turned the puriﬁed wheel of the Dharma. 
“Furthermore, there were bodhisattva mahāsattvas equal to the number of particles in one small-sized cosmos who will be able to attain highest, complete enlightenment after eight births; bodhisattva mahāsattvas equal to the number of particles in the four fourfold continents who will attain highest, complete enlightenment after four births; bodhisattva mahāsattvas equal to the number of particles in the threefold four continents who will attain highest, complete enlightenment after three births; bodhisattva mahā sattvas equal to the number of particles in the twofold four continents who will attain highest, complete enlightenment after two births; and bodhisattva mahāsattvas equal to the number of particles in the four continents who will attain highest, complete enlightenment after one birth. 
Moreover there were sentient beings equal to the number of particles in the eightfold great manifold cosmos, in all of whom the thought of highest, complete enlightenment had awakened.” When the Buddha explained that these bodhisattva mahā sattvas had attained deep insight into the Dharma, māndārava and great māndārava ﬂowers rained down from the sky, scattering over the buddhas who were seated on lion seats under immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of jeweled trees; and they scattered over Śākyamuni Buddha and the Tathāgata Pra bhū taratna, who had attained parinirvāṇa long ago, both of whom were sitting on the lion seat in a seven-jeweled stupa; they also scattered over all of the great bodhisattvas and the fourfold assembly. 
Finely powdered sandalwood and aloeswood incense also rained down, and heavenly drums resounded in the sky with a deep and beautiful sound. 
One thousand kinds of heavenly garments, draped with strings of pearl, jewels, and wish-fulﬁlling gems , rained down, ﬁlling the nine directions. 
Priceless incense burned in various jeweled incense holders, and its fragrance spread spontaneously throughout the great assembly as an offering. 
Above each buddha there were bodhisattvas holding banners and umbrellas that extended upward to the Brahma world. 
These bodhisattvas praised the buddhas by singing immeasurable verses with beautiful voices. 
Then Bodhisattva Maitreya rose from his seat, leaving his right shoulder bared, faced the Buddha with the palms of his hands pressed together, and spoke these verses: The Buddha has taught this marvelous Dharma That we have never heard before. The Bhagavat has great powers And his lifespan is immeasurable. 
Innumerable heirs of the Buddha Attained the beneﬁt of the Dharma After hearing the Bhagavat’s explanation, And became completely ﬁlled with joy. 
Some attained unhindered eloquence, And others the power of tenacious memory Which revolves many koṭis of times. 
There were also bodhisattvas, Equal to the number of particles In the great cosmos, Who each turned the irreversible wheel Of the Dharma. 
There were also bodhisattvas, Equal to the number of particles In a medium cosmos, Who each turned the puriﬁed Wheel of the Dharma. 
There were also bodhisattvas, Equal to the number of particles In a small cosmos, Who after eight births Will complete the buddha path. 
There were also bodhisattvas, Equal to four times, three times, And two times the number of particles In the four continents, Who after four, three, and two births Will attain buddhahood. 
There were also bodhisattvas, Equal to the number of particles In the four continents, Who will obtain omniscience After one birth; And sentient beings, having heard about The great length of the Buddha’s lifespan, Attained immeasurable results That were pure and without corruption. 
There were also sentient beings, Equal to the number of particles In the eight worlds, In whom, having heard about the lifespan of the Buddha, The thought of highest enlightenment awakened. 
The Bhagavat has taught the Dharma That is immeasurable and inconceivable, And from which come beneﬁts As limitless as space. 
Heavenly māndārava And great māndārava ﬂowers rained down; And Śakras and Brahmas Came from innumerable buddha lands, Equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River. 
Sandalwood and aloeswood powder, Scattered like birds in the sky Flying in all directions, And rained down over the buddhas. 
Heavenly drums resounded spontaneously And beautifully in the air; And thousands of myriads of koṭis Of heavenly garments ﬂoated whirling down. 
Precious incense was burned In various jeweled incense holders, Its fragrance naturally penetrating everywhere, In homage to the Bhagavats. 
The great assembly of these bodhisattvas Held myriads of koṭis of tall and beautiful Seven-jeweled banners and umbrellas, Which extended gradually to the Brahma world. 
They hung jeweled ﬂags and excellent banners In the presence of each of these buddhas, And chanted thousands of myriads of verses In praise of the Tathāgatas. 
Such things had never been Experienced before. Hearing of the Buddha’s Immeasurable lifespan, all rejoiced; And, the Buddha’s name being heard Throughout the ten directions, Sentient beings were greatly beneﬁted. 
Everyone became endowed With the roots of good merit, And the thought of highest, complete enlightenment Awakened in them. 
At that time the Buddha addressed Bodhisattva Mahā sattva Maitreya, saying: “O Ajita! 
Those sentient beings who hear about the great length of the Buddha’s lifespan, and can awaken even a single thought of willing acceptance, will all obtain immeasurable merit. 
If there are sons and daughters of a good family who, for the sake of highest, complete enlightenment, practice the ﬁve perfections of giving , good conduct , perseverance , effort , and meditation , with the exception of the perfection of wisdom , for eighty myriads of koṭis of nayutas of kalpas, their merit is not even a hundredth, a thousandth, a hundred thousandth of a myriad of a koṭi of the former person’s merit. It is so small that it cannot be conceived of through calculation or illustration. 
If there are sons and daughters of a virtuous family who possess such merit as the former, they will never revert from highest, complete enlightenment.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: Those who seek the Buddha’s wisdom Will practice the ﬁve perfections For eighty myriads of koṭis Of nayutas of kalpas. 
Throughout these kalpas they will pay homage to The buddhas, pratyekabuddhas, śrāvakas, And all the bodhisattvas by offering Rare delicacies, excellent garments, and bedding, Or by building monasteries out of sandalwood Which are adorned with gardens. 
Through offering such a variety of precious things Throughout all of these kalpas, They will transfer the merits to the buddha path. 
Those who further maintain good conduct, Which is pure and without corruption, Will seek what the buddhas Have praised as the highest path. 
Those who further practice perseverance And abide in the stage of self-control, Will be of constant mind, Even if subjected to ill-treatment. 
They will continue to endure Even if they are scorned and persecuted By those who think, through their excessive pride, That they have attained the truth. 
Those who make diligent efforts And are ﬁrm in their intentions For immeasurable koṭis of kalpas Will be intent and never lazy; And those who abide in tranquil places For immeasurable kalpas Will always discipline their minds, avoiding sleep, While either sitting or wandering. 
For these reasons they will Abide in various meditations, Their minds ﬁrm and unwavering, For eighty myriads of koṭis of kalpas. 
Maintaining the merit of this concentration They seek the highest path saying: I will attain omniscience. 
Practicing thus for hundreds of thousands Of myriads of koṭis of kalpas, Their merits will be as mentioned above. 
If those sons and daughters of a virtuous family, Upon hearing me explain about my lifespan In this way, are able to awaken Even a single thought of willing acceptance, Their merit exceeds that of the former. 
Such will also be the merit Of those who have no doubts whatsoever And believe deeply even for a single moment. 
Those bodhisattvas who practice the path For a period of immeasurable kalpas, And who believe my explanation of my lifespan When they hear it, are the ones Who fully accept this sutra, Saying: Let us in the future devote a long life To saving sentient beings! 
Just as the present Bhagavat, King among the Śākyas, who roars the lion’s roar On the terrace of enlightenment, Is fearless in teaching the Dharma, Let us in the future be respected by all And teach of the lifespan While seated upon the terrace of enlightenment. 
Those who have profound thoughts, are pure, Honest and learned, have good recollection, And understand the Buddha’s words in accordance With what is appropriate, Will have no doubts regarding this. 
“Furthermore, O Ajita, those who hear of the great length of the Buddha’s lifespan and understand the intent of these words will obtain limitless merit that will give rise to the highest wisdom of the Tathāgata. 
How much more merit will they gain who extensively hear this sutra, move others to listen to it, preserve it, move others to preserve it, copy it, or move others to copy it; and pay homage to the sutra by offering ﬂowers, incense, necklaces, ﬂags, banners, canopies, lamps of scented oil, and ghee! The merit of these people will be immeasurable and limitless. They will be able to achieve omniscience. “O Ajita! 
Those sons and daughters of a virtuous family, who, hearing me teach the great length of the Buddha’s lifespan, wholeheartedly accept it, will see the Buddha, who always dwells on Mount Gṛdhrakūṭa together with the great bodhisattvas and śrāvakas, teaching the Dharma to the assembly. 
Moreover, they will see the land of this sahā world, which is made of lapis lazuli, level and even. The network of roads is laid out like a chessboard, paved with Jambūnāda gold and bordered with jeweled trees. All its foundations, towers, and balconies will be made of treasures and the multitude of these bodhisattvas will be dwelling in them. 
Those who can see such things should know that to be able to do so is a sign of their full and willing acceptance. “Furthermore, after the Tathāgata’s parinirvāṇa, those who hear this sutra do not disparage it and rejoice in their hearts, should know that this is a sign of their full and willing acceptance. How much more do those who recite and preserve this sutra show a sign of full and willing acceptance! Such are the people who hold the Tathāgata in respect. 
These sons and daughters of a virtuous family do not have to build stupas and monasteries for me, make chambers for the monks, or pay homage to the sangha with the four kinds of offerings. 
Why is this? 
Because these sons and daughters of a virtuous family recite and preserve this sutra, which means they have already built stupas, made chambers for the monks, and paid homage to the sangha. 
They have already erected seven-jeweled stupas for the Buddha’s relics, which are tall and wide, gradually narrowing to a pinnacle that reaches to the Brahma world. They have hung various banners, canopies, and variegated jeweled bells; offered ﬂowers, incense, necklaces, scented powder, and ointment; burned incense; played drums, music, ﬂutes, pipes, harps, and various dances; and adorned the stupas and relics of the Buddha by praising with verses and songs in beautiful voices. In this way they have already paid homage for immeasurable thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas. “O Ajita! 
After my parinirvāṇa, those who hear this sutra and who can preserve it, copy it and move others to copy it, have already built chambers for monks, as well as thirty-two red sandalwood monasteries of the height of eight tāla trees, wide and ﬁne, housing hundreds of thousands of monks. The monasteries they have built have gardens, ponds, paths for wandering, meditation caves, garments, food and drink, bedding, medicine, and are replete with all other necessities. 
Such hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of monks’ chambers and towers will be incalculable. With these they pay homage to me and to the assembly of monks. 
“I have explained that, for this reason, after the Tathāgata’s parinirvāṇa those who preserve and recite this sutra, and explain it to others, who copy it or move others to copy it and who pay it homage to it no longer have to build stupas, monasteries, or erect chambers for the monks, or revere the sangha. How much less do those who preserve this sutra and practice the perfections of giving , good conduct , perseverance , effort , meditation , and wisdom need to do so! Their merit is the highest, immeasurable and limitless. 
It is immeasurable and limitless in the same way that space is immeasurable and limitless in the ten directions—east, west, south, north, the four intermediate directions, and the zenith and nadir—and they will thus quickly obtain omniscience. 
“Those who recite and preserve this sutra, who explain it for others, who copy it or move others to copy it, build monuments and make chambers for monks, revere and praise the sangha of śrāvakas, and praise the merits of the bodhisattvas in hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of ways; those who explain this Lotus Sutra for the sake of others in accordance with its meaning through various illustrations, who preserve pure conduct and dwell together with gentle people, who are patient and have no anger, are ﬁrm in their intentions and always hold meditation in high regard, who attain profound samādhi and make vigorous efforts, persevere in all good practices, whose wisdom is keen and who answer difﬁcult questions skillfully; O Ajita! 
Those sons and daughters of a virtuous family, who preserve and recite this sutra after my parinirvāṇa will attain good qualities like those mentioned above. You should know that such people have already set out for the terrace of enlightenment, are near to highest, complete enlightenment, and are seated under the bodhi tree. “O Ajita! 
Wherever these sons and daughters of a virtuous family sit, stand, or walk, there a monument should be built; and all of the devas and humans should pay homage to these monuments as they would do to those of the Buddha.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
If after my parinirvāṇa there are people Who preserve this sutra, They will have immeasurable merits As described above. 
They have built stupas for the relics, Adorned with the seven treasures, With a pole on the top which is very tall and thick, Gradually tapering upward, Until it reaches the Brahma world. These stupas have been adorned With thousands of myriads of koṭis of jeweled bells That ring with beautiful sounds as the wind blows. 
For immeasurable kalpas such people Have revered these stupas By offering ﬂowers, incense, necklaces, Heavenly garments, and various kinds of music, While burning scented ointments and butter-oil lamps Which illuminate them on all sides. 
In the troubled world of the Decadent Dharma, Those who preserve this sutra Will have already ﬁnished paying homage In the way just described. 
If they can preserve this sutra It will be as if they had paid homage In the presence of the Buddha; And had built monasteries for monks Out of sandalwood from Mount Oxhead, And thirty-two buildings as tall As eight tāla trees; and offered delicious food, Excellent garments, bedding, hundreds of Thousands of dwellings, gardens, ponds, Paths for wandering, and meditation caves All of ﬁne quality. 
Those who have the thought of willing acceptance, Who preserve, recite, copy, Or move others to copy this sutra, And who pay it homage By scattering ﬂowers, incense, and scented powders on it, And by constantly lighting lamps of Fragrant oil made from sumanas ﬂowers, Campaka wood, and atimukta grass; Those who pay it homage in this way Will attain immeasurable merit. 
Their merit will be as limitless As empty space. 
How much more is the merit Of those who preserve this sutra, Who carry out the practice of giving , Good conduct , perseverance , and meditation , Who never get angry or slander others, Who honor monuments And are humble before monks, And who are free from pride, Always contemplate wisdom, Never get angry at difﬁcult questions, And teach in accordance With the questioner’s capacity! If there is anyone Who can carry out these practices, Their merit will be immeasurable. 
If one were to see such an expounder of the Dharma Who has perfected merits like these, One should scatter heavenly ﬂowers over him And provide him with heavenly garments, Bow until one’s forehead touches his feet, And think of him as if he were a buddha. 
Furthermore, one should think That before long the expounder of the Dharma Will approach the terrace of enlightenment, Attain the unconditioned state of noncorruption, And extensively beneﬁt devas and humans. Wherever he dwells, walks, or sits, Or recites even a single verse, A stupa should be built, Made beautiful with adornments, And paid homage in various ways. 
Wherever the heirs of the Buddha may reside, There the Buddha himself will take pleasure in its use And will always be dwelling, Walking, and sitting within. 
The Merits of Joyful Acceptance Thereupon Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha, saying: 
If sons and daughters of a virtuous family rejoice in hearing this sutra, how much merit do they acquire?” And he spoke in verse, saying: 
After the Bhagavat’s parinirvāṇa, If there is anyone who hears this sutra And rejoices in it, How much merit do they acquire? 
Then the Buddha addressed Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Maitreya, saying: “O Ajita! 
After the Tathāgata’s parinirvāṇa, suppose those monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen and other wise ones, whether old or young, having rejoiced in hearing this sutra, take leave of the Dharma assembly and go to other places—either dwelling in monasteries or tranquil places, cities, towns, villages, or forests—and teach what they have heard to their parents, relatives, good friends, and acquaintances according to the various capacities of these people. 
Having heard the teaching, they will rejoice and go on to teach it to others. 
These people having heard it will also joyfully teach it to others in turn, and so it continues in this way until it reaches the ﬁftieth person. 
I will now explain about the merit which this ﬁftieth son or daughter of a virtuous family acquires from joyful acceptance. You should listen attentively! 
“Suppose that in the four hundreds of myriads of koṭis of incalculable worlds, there are sentient beings in the six transmigratory states and of the four modes of birth—born from an egg, born from the womb, from moisture, or born spontaneously—either with or without form, either with or without consciousness, either unconscious or not unconscious, having no legs, two, four, or many legs; and that, among the number of such beings, there is a person who seeks to acquire merit and gives pleasurable things to these beings, according to their desire. He gives each of those sentient beings gold, silver, lapis lazuli, mother-of-pearl, agate, coral, amber, and other treasures such as would ﬁll this continent of Jambudvīpa, as well as elephant carts, horse carts, and palaces and towers made out of the seven treasures. Having performed such acts of giving for a full eighty years, this great donor thinks: I have already given these sentient beings such pleasurable things as they wished. 
They are over eighty years old, with white hair and wrinkles, and they will die before long. I should now instruct them by means of the Buddha-Dharma. “He immediately gathers these sentient beings together, inspires them by proclaiming the Dharma, and gladdens them by revealing its beneﬁts. In an instant they all successively attain the ﬁrst stage of the śrāvakas called stream-winner , the second stage called once-returner the third stage called non-returner , and ﬁnally the stage of the arhat, free from corruption, entering profound meditations, gaining complete mastery of all, and attaining the eight liberations. 
Has this great donor acquired abundant merit or not?” Maitreya addressed the Buddha, saying: 
The donor’s merit is extremely great, immeasurable and limitless. 
Even if this donor had only given all those pleasurable things to sentient beings, the merit would have been immeasurable. 
How much greater is this donor’s merit after having caused them to attain arhatship!” The Buddha addressed Maitreya, saying: “I will now clarify this for you. This person has given all these pleasurable things to the sentient beings in the six states of existence in four hundreds of myriads of koṭis of incalculable worlds, and enabled them to attain arhatship. The merit he has attained cannot be compared with that of even the ﬁftieth person who, after hearing even a single verse of the Lotus Sutra, received it with joy. 
“O Ajita! In this way the merit attained by even the ﬁftieth person who rejoiced in hearing this Lotus Sutra is immeasurable, limitless, and incalculable. How much more so is the merit of the ﬁrst person who heard it in the assembly and rejoiced in it! His merit is even greater, it is immeasurable, limitless, and incalculable, and is not to be apprehended through metaphor. 
“Furthermore, O Ajita, if anyone approaches the monasteries in order to listen to this sutra and hears it for even a single moment, whether seated or standing, through this merit they will be reborn into a place where they will gain beautiful and excellent elephant carts, horse carts, palanquins made out of rare treasures, and will ride on a heavenly vehicle. 
Moreover, if anyone sits in a place where the Dharma is taught, and if another comes along and they invite that person to sit down and listen, or if they offer that person part of their own seat, through this merit they will be reborn in the place where Śakra dwells, in the place where Brahmas dwell, or in a place where a noble emperor dwells. “O Ajita! If anyone addresses others, saying: 
They will have no disagreeable features. Their noses will never be ﬂat or thin, crooked or twisted. They will never be dark-complected, with a narrow or long face that is hollow-cheeked or twisted. They will have no mark that is displeasing to others. 
The merit of that person who moved others to listen to the Dharma is like this. How much more is the merit of those who singlemindedly listen, teach, and recite the sutra, explain it for others in the great assembly, and practice as they explain to others!” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
If anyone hears this sutra In the Dharma assembly, And joyfully teaches others Even a single verse, And if in this way it is taught from one person To another until it reaches the ﬁftieth one, The merit that this last person will attain Shall be as I will now explain: 
Suppose there were a great donor Who gave things to an immeasurable number Of people as they wished For a full eighty years. 
He will see that they are old and feeble, With white hair and wrinkled faces, With gaps between their teeth and withered bodies, And that they will die before long. He will think that he should now Teach them and enable them To attain the fruits Of the buddha path. 
He will teach nirvana, the True Dharma, Through skillful means, saying: The world is impermanent Like splashes of water, bubbles, a mirage! The feeling of repulsion for it Should quickly awaken in you! 
All of them, hearing this teaching, Attain arhatship and perfect The six transcendent powers, the three sciences, And the eight liberations. 
The merit of the ﬁftieth person Who joyfully hears a single verse Is so much greater than this great donor’s That it is beyond illustration. 
The merit of those who successively hear The Lotus Sutra in this way is immeasurable. How much more is the merit of the ﬁrst person Who heard it with joy amid the Dharma assembly! 
If there is a person who moves another To listen to the Lotus Sutra, saying: This sutra is profound and difﬁcult to encounter Even in thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas. And if this person’s urging is accepted And the other one goes to hear it And listens for a single moment, The merit that the former person will acquire Shall be as I will now explain: 
Life after life they will have No diseases of the mouth. Their teeth will have no gaps, Nor be yellow or black. Their lips will be neither fat, thick, Or thin; nor will they ever have A disagreeable countenance; And their tongues will never be Dry, black, or short. Their noses will be high, long, and straight. 
I will now explain the merit Of the one who approaches the monastery Wanting to hear the Lotus Sutra, And who joyfully listens to it Even for a single moment: 
Later they will be born among devas and humans And will acquire beautiful elephant and horse carts, And palanquins made out of rare treasures, And will ride on a heavenly vehicle. 
If one is where the Dharma is taught And invites another to sit there And listen to the sutra, Through the merit which is thus acquired, One will attain the seats of Śakra, Brahma, or the noble emperors. 
How much more is the merit of a person Who singlemindedly listens to this sutra, Explains its meaning, and practices In accordance with its teaching! Their merit will thus be limitless. 
The Beneﬁts Obtained by an Expounder of the Dharma Thereupon the Buddha addressed Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Satata sa mitā bhiyukta, saying: “If sons or daughters of a virtuous family preserve this Lotus Sutra, recite, explain, and copy it, they will attain eight hundred qualities of the eye, twelve hundred qualities of the ear, eight hundred qualities of the nose, twelve hundred qualities of the tongue, eight hundred qualities of the body, and twelve hundred qualities of the mind. These qualities will adorn the six sense faculties, purifying them all. 
Through the natural bodily eyes given them by their parents, which are thus puriﬁed, those sons and daughters of a virtuous family will see the mountains, forests, rivers, and oceans both within and beyond the great manifold cosmos, all the way from the lowest hell up as far as the highest summit of the universe. 
They will also see all the sentient beings there, perceive and know the causes and consequences of their deeds and of their states of birth.” Then the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate upon the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: Listen to the qualities Of those in the great assembly Who can fearlessly teach This Lotus Sutra! 
Such people will attain The eight hundred qualities Of the excellent eye. Adorned with these qualities Their eyes are extremely pure. 
With the eyes given by their parents They see both all the manifold cosmos, Within and beyond Mount Meru, Sumeru, up to Mount Cakravāḍa, And many other mountains, Forests, oceans, rivers, and streams, Down to the lowest hell And up to the summit of the universe. 
There they see all the sentient beings; Although they have not yet Attained the divine eyes, Their power of sight will be like this. 
“Furthermore, O Satatasamitābhiyukta, if sons or daughters of a virtuous family preserve, recite, explain, or copy this sutra, they will attain the twelve hundred qualities of the ear. 
Through their pure ears they will hear both within and beyond the great manifold cosmos, down as far as the lowest hell and up as high as the summit of the universe; they will hear all kinds of voices and sounds, such as the sound of elephants, the neighing of horses, the sound of cows and carts, cries, weeping, the sound of conches and drums, gongs and bells, laughter, talking, male and female voices, the voices of boys and girls, righteous and unrighteous voices, the sounds of suffering and happiness, the voices of common and holy people, pleasant and unpleasant sounds; the voices of devas, nāgas, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṃnaras, mahoragas, the sounds of ﬁre, water, wind, beings in the hells, animals, hungry ghosts, monks, nuns, śrāvakas, pratyekabuddhas, bodhisattvas, and buddhas. “In short, although they do not have the divine faculty of hearing, they will always hear and know everything both within and beyond the great manifold cosmos, through the puriﬁed, natural bodily ears given by their parents. They distinguish all these various sounds and yet their faculty of hearing remains unharmed.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
The ear, given by the parents, Is pure and spotless; With this natural ear They hear the sounds of the manifold cosmos. 
They hear the sounds of elephants, Horses, carts and cows; The sounds of gongs, bells, conches, Drums, and vīṇās; The sounds of harps, bamboo pipes, and ﬂutes; Pure and pleasing songs. And even though they hear these, They are not attached to them. They hear innumerable kinds of human voices, And yet they are able to discriminate them. 
Furthermore, they hear divine sounds, Subtle melodies, male and female voices, The sounds of boys and girls. 
They also hear the cries of the kalaviṅka And jīvakajīvaka birds in the mountains, Around the rivers, or in deep valleys. 
They hear as well various sounds of pain And suffering from the hells, And sounds of hungry ghosts, Who, suffering from hunger and thirst, Are in search of food and drink. When the asuras living along the ocean Speak to each other and utter great cries, Such expounders of the Dharma, living here, Hear all of these various voices from afar, And yet their faculty of hearing is unharmed. 
Those expounders of the Dharma Hear all birds and animals In the ten directions calling to each other. 
The expounders of the Dharma dwelling here Also hear the voices in the Ābhāsvara And Śubhakṛtsna Heavens above the Brahma world, All the way up to the summit of the universe. 
The expounders of the Dharma dwelling here Hear all of the monks and nuns Either reciting the sutra Or explaining it to others. 
They also hear such voices As those of the bodhisattvas reciting the sutra, Teaching it to others, compiling the collections, And explaining their meaning to others. 
Those who preserve this Lotus Sutra Will all hear the buddhas, the great seers, Teaching the subtle Dharma to the great assembly And leading and inspiring sentient beings. 
They will hear all the sounds Both within and beyond the manifold cosmos, Down to the lowest hell And up to the summit of the universe; And yet their faculty of hearing Remains unharmed. Because their faculty of hearing is keen, They are able to discriminate these sounds. 
Although those who preserve this Lotus Sutra Have not yet attained the divine faculty of hearing, They can simply use the ears given by their parents. 
Their qualities are exactly like this. “Furthermore, O Satatasamitābhiyukta, if sons or daughters of a good family preserve this sutra, recite, explain, or copy it, they will perfect the eight hundred qualities of the nose. 
With this pure faculty of the nose they will smell all kinds of fragrances both within and beyond the great manifold cosmos, such as the fragrance of sumanas, jāti, mallikā, campaka, pāṭala ﬂowers, and red, blue, and white lotus ﬂowers, the scent of blossoming and fruit-bearing trees like sandalwood, aloeswood, and tagara wood, the aroma of the leaves of the tamāla tree, thousands of myriads of sorts of fragrances of blended incense, either powdered, shaped into balls, or made into scented ointments. Those who preserve this sutra will be able to distinguish all of these fragrances while remaining in a single place. 
They will be able to distinguish the scents of sentient beings such as elephants, horses, cows, sheep, men and women, boys and girls, grasses, trees, and shrubs or any kind of odor, either nearby or at a distance. They will also be able to unerringly distinguish all kinds of scents. 
“Those who preserve this sutra, although they dwell here, can smell all kinds of divine fragrances in heaven, such as the fragrance of pāracitraka and kovidāra trees; māndārava, great māndā rava, mañjūṣaka, and great mañjūṣaka ﬂowers, or the fragrance of sandalwood and aloeswood powder and various kinds of powdered and blended incense. Among these divine fragrances, there is not one whose scent they cannot distinguish. “They can smell the fragrance of the bodies of all the devas. 
They can also smell from afar the fragrance that is emitted when Śakra, the king of devas, is dwelling in his excellent palace, when he is enjoying the desires of the ﬁve senses, or the fragrance that is emitted when he is in the Sudharmā Hall teaching the Dharma to the thirty-three devas, or the fragrance that is emitted when he plays in the garden, or the fragrance of the bodies of all the other male and female devas. 
“In this way their faculty of smell reaches up to the Brahma world and to the highest summit of the universe, wherein they can smell the bodies of the devas and the incense the devas burn. 
They can also smell from afar the fragrance of the śrāvakas, pratyekabuddhas, bodhisattvas, and buddhas and know where they are. 
“Although they can smell all these fragrances, their faculty of smell will not be harmed or misled; and if they want to discriminate and explain these different fragrances to others, they remember them without error.” At that time the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
They can smell and discriminate All kinds of good and bad odors In this world, such as sumanas And jāti ﬂowers, tamāla leaves, Sandalwood, aloeswood, and tagara trees, And various fruits and ﬂowers. And they also know the fragrance Of sentient beings, men and women. The Dharma teachers, although dwelling afar, Know where these fragrances come from. 
They smell the scents of the noble emperors Of great dignity, the lesser rulers And their children, subjects and attendants, And know where they are. 
They can smell the fragrance of the rare jewels That they wear, their underground treasuries, And the noble emperor’s bejeweled queens, And also know where they are. 
They can also smell the ornaments, garments, And necklaces with which people adorn themselves And the fragrances they anoint themselves with, And know who wears them. 
Those who preserve this Lotus Sutra can smell The fragrance of the devas and tell Whether they are walking, sitting, Playing, or transforming themselves. 
Although they dwell here, Those who preserve this sutra, Know the location of the fragrances Of various ﬂowers, fruits, and oils in detail. 
They can smell the scent of sentient beings, Either deep in dangerous mountains, Or where the sandalwood ﬂowers are in bloom, And know where they are. 
Those who preserve this sutra Can smell the scents of sentient beings, Either on Mount Cakravāḍa, In the ocean or underground, And know exactly where they are. 
They can also smell the scents of the male And female asuras and their attendants; And they can discriminate them, When they are ﬁghting or when at play. 
They can also smell the odors of lions, Elephants, tigers, wolves, buffaloes, And water buffaloes dwelling in dangerous Precipitous places in the wilderness, And know where they are. 
They can smell and discriminate exactly The scent of a pregnant woman And determine whether the embryo Will be male or female, Without sex organs, or nonhuman. 
Through this power of smell They know in the ﬁrst instance If the woman is pregnant, And whether or not It will be carried to full term; And if she will give birth easily, And to a happy child. 
Through this power of the faculty of smell They know what men and women are thinking, Their desires, delusions, and anger, Or whether they cultivate goodness. 
They can also smell gold, silver, And various rare treasures hidden underground, As well as the contents of copper vessels, And completely distinguish them. 
They can smell various necklaces And know whether they are valuable or not, Even when their prices are undetermined, Where they come from and where they are now. 
They can smell and know all about Divine ﬂowers such as māndārava And mañjūṣaka ﬂowers and pārijāta trees. 
They can also smell and discriminate The difference between superior, Mediocre, and inferior fragrances Of heavenly palaces adorned With various jeweled ﬂowers. 
They can also smell and know exactly About those who take pleasure In the heavenly gardens, excellent palaces, Towers and Dharma halls. 
Moreover, they can smell and know exactly Whether the devas are listening to the Dharma, Are enjoying the desires of the ﬁve senses, Or whether they are coming, going, Walking, sitting, or lying. 
They can also smell and know every detail of The garments worn by the heavenly maidens, Giving off the fragrance of beautiful ﬂowers, And where those maidens ramble in their play. 
In this way their power of smell reaches All the way up to the Brahma world. They can smell and know exactly The devas entering meditation and Emerging from meditation. 
They can also smell All the way from the Ābhāsvara And Śubhakṛtsna Heavens Up to the highest summit of the universe, And know exactly Who has been born there for the ﬁrst time And who has emerged. 
Those who preserve this sutra can Smell the monks and know exactly where they are, If they are constantly persevering toward the Dharma, If they are either sitting or walking, Reciting this sutra; Or if they are diligently Meditating under forest trees. 
They can also smell and know exactly If a bodhisattva is ﬁrm in intention, Meditating or reciting the sutra, Or teaching the Dharma to others. 
They can also smell and know exactly If the Bhagavat is being honored by all, And if he is teaching the Dharma Out of his compassion for sentient beings. 
Moreover, they can smell and know exactly If the sentient beings in the presence Of the Buddha are joyfully listening To the sutra, and are practicing According to the Dharma. 
Those who preserve this sutra Will attain a faculty of smell such as this, Even before the bodhisattva’s faculty of smell That is attained from the incorruptible Dharma. 
“Furthermore, O Satatasamitābhiyukta, if sons and daughters of a virtuous family preserve, recite, explain, or copy this sutra, they will attain the twelve hundred qualities of the tongue. 
All that they taste, whether of good or bad ﬂavor, savory or bland, bitter or astringent, will, through their pure faculty of tongue, come to taste just like the heavenly nectar of immortality, and they will ﬁnd nothing unpleasant. 
“If they expound the teaching to the great multitude with their tongues, their voices will be profound and touch the heart. All those in this multitude will be gladdened and pleased. 
“Furthermore, Śakra, Brahma and other devaputras and heavenly maidens, hearing a sequence of their teaching expounded with such profound voices, will all come to hear it. 
Dragons, the daughters of nāgas, yakṣas, the daughters of yakṣas, gandharvas, the daughters of gandharvas, asuras, the daughters of asuras, garuḍas, the daughters of garuḍas, kiṃnaras, the daughters of kiṃnaras, mahoragas, and the daughters of mahoragas will all approach, respect, and honor them in order to listen to their teaching. 
The monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen, kings and princes, ministers and their attendants, and the lesser noble emperors and great noble emperors adorned with the seven treasures and their thousand princes and their attendants of the inner and outer households will enter the palace and listen to the teaching. “Since these bodhisattvas expound the teaching skillfully, the brahmans, householders, and the people of their land will attend and honor such bodhisattvas until the end of their lives. 
All the śrāvakas, pratyekabuddhas, bodhisattvas, and buddhas will always wish to see them. 
“Wherever this person may be, he will teach the Dharma in the presence of the buddhas there. He will thus be able to preserve the Buddha-Dharma entirely as well as utter the profound word of the Dharma.” Whereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
Such people, through their pure faculty of taste, Will never taste bad ﬂavors. 
With their profound, subtle voice They will teach the Dharma to the great assembly. With various explanations and illustrations Their teaching will touch the hearts of sentient beings. All those who hear them will be gladdened And honor them with the best offerings. 
All the devas, nāgas, yakṣas, and asuras Will come together and listen with respect To the Dharma. If these expounders of the Dharma want Their subtle voice to penetrate Throughout the manifold cosmos, It will reach wherever they wish. 
The great and lesser noble emperors, And their thousand princes and attendants, Will always come and listen to the Dharma With their palms pressed together And with respectful thoughts. 
All the devas, nāgas, yakṣas, Rākṣasas, and piśācas With joyful minds will also always Rejoice to come and honor them. 
All the devas, Such as Brahma, Māra, Īśvara, Maheśvara, Will always come to them. 
All the buddhas and their disciples, Hearing the sound of his teaching, Will always remember and protect him, And at times appear in his presence. 
“Furthermore, O Satatasamitābhiyukta, those sons and daughters of a virtuous family who preserve, recite, explain, and copy this sutra will attain eight hundred qualities of the body. 
Their bodies will be as pure as clear lapis lazuli and sentient beings will gladly look upon them. Because of this purity of body, everything will appear therein: 
the sentient beings in the great manifold cosmos, when they are born or die, whether they are superior or inferior, whether they are fair or ugly, whether they are in the good or bad states of being. 
The mountain kings, such as Mount Cakra vāḍa, Mount Mahācakravāḍa, Mount Meru, or Mount Mahāmeru, as well as all the sentient beings who dwell there, will all appear in their body. 
All those who dwell down as far as the lowest hell and up as high as the summit of the universe will appear in their body. 
Wherever those śrāvakas, pratyekabuddhas, bodhisattvas, or buddhas are, the buddhas teach the Dharma; and will appear with their physical images in their body.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: Their bodies are extremely pure Like clear lapis lazuli. All those sentient beings Who preserve the Lotus Sutra Will gladly look upon them. 
Just as all physical images Reﬂect in a clear mirror, The bodhisattvas will see in their own bodies Everything in this world. They alone see it, While no one else does. 
All those sentient beings, devas, humans, Asuras, hell-dwellers, hungry ghosts, Or animals in the manifold cosmos Will also appear in this body With their physical images. 
All the heavenly palaces Which reach as high as the top of the universe, Mount Cakravāḍa, Mount Meru, Mount Mahāmeru And the oceans will appear in their bodies. 
Those buddhas, śrāvakas, or bodhisattvas, Heirs of the buddhas, Who are either alone Or who teach the Dharma to the assembly, Will all appear in their body. 
Even though they have not yet attained The Dharma body, Which is subtle and without corruption, Everything in this world Will appear in their pure physical bodies. 
“Furthermore, O Satatasamitābhiyukta, a son or a daughter of a virtuous family who preserves, recites, explains, or copies this sutra, after the parinirvāṇa of the Tathāgata will attain twelve hundred qualities of the mind. 
Through their pure faculty of mind, on hearing but a single verse or a single line, they will become versed in the immeasurable and limitless meaning. “If, after having understood this meaning, they teach a single line or a single verse for the period of one month, four months, or one year, all the teachings they expound will be entirely characterized by the mark of truth, in accordance with its meaning. 
“If they teach the works on worldly affairs, treatises on political science or enterprise, all these will be in harmony with the True Dharma. 
They will completely know the minds of those sentient beings who pass through the six transmigratory states in the great manifold cosmos—their workings, shifts, and fallacies—even though they have not yet attained the uncorrupted wisdom. 
Their faculty of mind will be pure just like this. 
“Whatever this person contemplates, judges, or expounds will be nothing but the True Buddha-Dharma, which has also been taught in the sutras by previous buddhas.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
As the result of preserving the Lotus Sutra, They will instantly know What all the sentient beings, Inside and outside this world, Such as devas, nāgas, humans, yakṣas, rākṣasas, And those who dwell in the six transmigratory states, Think in their various ways. 
They will hear and completely preserve the Dharma Which the innumerable buddhas in the ten directions, Who are possessed of the marks of a hundred merits, Teach for the sake of sentient beings. 
They contemplate the immeasurable meaning And they teach the Dharma in immeasurable ways; They will neither forget nor be confused From the beginning to the end Because they preserve the Lotus Sutra. 
They will completely know All aspects of all dharmas, And discern the meaning According to the sequence. They will be versed in names and words And expound in accordance with this knowledge. 
What they teach is the Dharma That has all been taught By the buddhas of the past. Because they expound this Dharma, They will have no fear among the people. 
Those who preserve the Lotus Sutra possess The pure faculty of mind just like this. Even though they have not yet attained The stage of noncorruption, They will previously have had The characteristics described above. 
These people preserve this sutra And dwell in the marvelous stage; All the sentient beings will rejoice And revere them. 
They will illuminate and explain the teaching With thousands of myriads of koṭis of skillful words Because they preserve the Lotus Sutra. 
Bodhisattva Sadāparibhūta Thereupon the Buddha addressed Bodhisattva Mahā sattva Mahāsthāmaprāpta: 
“You should know that, as I have previously explained, those who revile, disparage, or slander monks, nuns, lay men, and laywomen who preserve the Lotus Sutra will sow a bitter harvest; as I have just taught, the merit attained by preserving the Lotus Sutra will result in the pure faculties of the eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind. 
“O Mahāsthāmaprāpta, in the past, immeasurable, limitless, inconceivable and incalculable kalpas ago, there was a buddha called Bhīṣmagarjita svararāja, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
His land was called Mahāsaṃbhavā and the kalpa was named Vinirbhoga. 
The Buddha Bhīṣmagarjitasvararāja expounded the Dharma for the devas, humans, and asuras in his world. “To those who sought the śrāvaka vehicle he expounded the Dharma in accordance with the Four Noble Truths, ferried them from birth, old age, illness, and death, and ultimately led them to nirvana. 
To those who sought the pratyekabuddha vehicle, he expounded the Dharma in accordance with the twelve-linked chain of dependent origination. 
To the bodhisattvas he expounded the Dharma in accordance with the six perfections, with reference to highest, complete enlightenment, and led them to the Buddha’s wisdom. 
“O Mahāsthāmaprāpta, the lifespan of the Buddha Bhīṣma gar jita svararāja was as kalpas equal to forty myriads of koṭis of nayutas of sands of the Ganges River. 
The True Dharma abided for kalpas equal to the number of particles in Jambudvīpa. 
The Semblance Dharma abided for kalpas equal to the number of particles in the four continents. 
After having beneﬁted the sentient beings, the Buddha entered parinirvāṇa. 
After the extinction of the True and Semblance Dharmas, there appeared in this land another buddha who was also called Bhīṣmagarjitasvararāja, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
In this way there appeared two myriads of koṭis of buddhas one after another, all of whom had the same name. “After the parinirvāṇa of the ﬁrst Tathāgata Bhīṣmagar jita svararāja, there were excessively proud and overbearing monks in the Age of the Semblance Dharma, after the True Dharma had been extinguished. 
At that time there was also a monk, a bodhisattva, called Sadāparibhūta . 
“O Mahāsthāmaprāpta, why was he called Sadāparibhūta? 
Because whenever he saw any monk, nun, layman, or laywoman, he would praise and pay homage to them, saying: I deeply respect you. I dare not belittle you. 
Why is this? 
Because all of you practice the bodhisattva path, and will become buddhas. “Furthermore, this monk did not concentrate himself on reciting the sutras but only paid homage such that, even when he saw the fourfold assembly from afar, he would go up to them, praise, and pay homage to them, saying: I dare not belittle you, because you will all become buddhas. “In the fourfold assembly there were some whose minds were impure and who became angry, and reviled and disparaged him, saying: 
He says that he himself does not belittle us and predicts that we shall all become buddhas. 
We do not need such an idle prediction. “In this way he wandered about for many years and was always reviled. But he never got angry and always said, ‘You will become a buddha.’ “Whenever he spoke these words, people would assail him with sticks or stones; he ﬂed from them yet still proclaimed loudly at a distance: I dare not belittle you. 
When this monk was about to die, he heard in the air twenty thousands of myriads of koṭis of verses of the Lotus Sutra expounded previously by the Buddha Bhīṣmagarjitasvararāja and, completely preserving them, he attained the purity of the eye, and the purity of the ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind that were described before. 
After having attained these pure faculties, his lifespan increased two hundreds of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of years and he taught this Lotus Sutra to the people far and wide. 
“Then those excessively proud monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen in the fourfold assembly who had despised him and called him Sadāparibhūta saw that he had attained great transcendent powers, the power of joy in eloquence, and the power of great virtuous meditation. Hearing his teaching, all of them believed and followed him. 
“Furthermore, this bodhisattva inspired a thousand myriads of koṭis of sentient beings and caused them to abide in highest, complete enlightenment. 
After his death, he met two thousand koṭis of buddhas, all of whom were called Candrasūryapradīpa. 
In accordance with his teaching he expounded this Lotus Sutra, and for this reason met another two thousand koṭis of buddhas, all of whom were called Meghasvararāja. He preserved and recited this sutra in accordance with the teaching of these buddhas and expounded it for the sake of the fourfold assembly. Thus he attained purity of the natural eye and purity of the ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind, and taught the Dharma to the fourfold assembly without fear. 
“O Mahāsthāmaprāpta, this Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Sadāparibhūta respected, honored, praised, and paid homage to all these buddhas. Having planted roots of good merit, he again met thousands of myriads of koṭis of buddhas; and he expounded this sutra over again in accordance with the teaching of those buddhas. Having perfected his merits he attained buddhahood. 
“O Mahāsthāmaprāpta, what do you think about this? 
Was Bodhisattva Sadāparibhūta of that time someone unknown to you? 
He was none other than I myself. 
If I had not preserved and recited this sutra and taught it to others in my previous lives, I would not have swiftly attained highest, complete enlightenment. 
Because I preserved and recited this sutra and taught it to others in the presence of previous buddhas, I swiftly attained highest, complete enlightenment. 
“O Mahāsthāmaprāpta, then the fourfold assembly of monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen who became angry and disparaged me, did not, as a consequence, meet a buddha for two hundred koṭis of kalpas, nor did they hear the Dharma or see the Sangha. They suffered greatly in the Avīci Hell for a thousand kalpas. 
After having been freed from the consequences of their errors they ﬁnally met Bodhisattva Sadāparibhūta, who led and inspired them to highest, complete enlightenment. “O Mahāsthāmaprāpta, what do you think about this? 
Were those in the fourfold assembly of that time who disparaged this bodhisattva persons unknown to you? 
They are the ﬁve hundred bodhisattvas in this assembly, beginning with Bhadrapāla, the ﬁve hundred nuns beginning with Siṃhacandrā, and the ﬁve hundred laymen beginning with Sugatacetanā, all of whom will never turn back on the path to highest, complete enlightenment. 
“O Mahāsthāmaprāpta, know that this Lotus Sutra will greatly beneﬁt the bodhisattva mahāsattvas and lead them to highest, complete enlightenment. 
For this reason, after the Tathāgata’s parinirvāṇa the bodhisattva mahāsattvas should always preserve, recite, explain, and copy this sutra.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: In the past there was a buddha Called Bhīṣmagarjitasvararāja. He had immeasurable transcendent powers, Led and guided all sentient beings, And was paid homage by devas, humans, and nāgas. 
After the parinirvāṇa of this buddha, When the True Dharma faced extinction, There was a bodhisattva called Sadāparibhūta. 
At that time the fourfold assembly Was becoming attached To its own interpretation of the Dharma. 
Bodhisattva Sadāparibhūta Would approach them and say: I do not belittle you; Practice the path And you will all become buddhas. After hearing this, All the people insulted and disparaged him; But Bodhisattva Sadāparibhūta Patiently bore this. 
As he neared the time of his death, When he had expiated his past errors, He was able to hear this sutra, And his six sense faculties became pure. 
Through his transcendent powers He prolonged his life And explained this sutra far and wide, Acting, once again, for the beneﬁt of others. 
Those who were attached To their own interpretations of the Dharma Were led and inspired by this bodhisattva And were enabled to abide Within the buddha path. 
Because he explained this sutra, He attained immeasurable happiness. Gradually accumulating his merits, He quickly attained the buddha path. 
Because the fourfold assembly, Which was then attached to Particular aspects of the Dharma, Heard Bodhisattva Sadāparibhūta say: You will all become buddhas, They have since met innumerable buddhas. 
Those people are none other Than the ﬁve hundred bodhisattvas And laymen and laywomen of pure belief Who are now gathered before me In this assembly to hear the Dharma. 
In my previous lives I taught them And led them to hear and accept this sutra, Which is the ultimate Dharma. 
I revealed it and taught it to others, And caused them to abide in nirvana. Throughout many lifetimes they preserved and kept A sutra such as this. 
Only after myriads of koṭis of koṭis Of kalpas have passed, A time inconceivable, Can they hear this Lotus Sutra. 
Only after myriads of koṭis of koṭis Of kalpas have passed, A time inconceivable, Do the Buddha Bhagavats Expound this sutra. 
For this reason, all you practitioners Who hear this sutra After the nirvana of the Buddha Should feel no doubt about it. 
You must wholeheartedly Expound this sutra far and wide. You will then meet the buddhas lifetime after lifetime And quickly attain the buddha path. 
The Transcendent Powers of the Tathāgata Thereupon the bodhisattva mahāsattvas equal to the number of particles in the great manifold cosmos, who had emerged from the earth, all in the presence of the Buddha gazed singlemindedly at his face with their palms pressed together, and spoke to the Buddha, saying: 
“O Bhagavat, after the parinirvāṇa of the Buddha, we will teach this sutra extensively in the lands of the Bhagavat’s separate forms, at the time of his extinction. 
Why is this? 
Because we also wish to attain this true, pure, great Dharma, and to preserve, recite, explain, copy, and make offerings to it.” Then the Bhagavat manifested his great transcendent powers in the presence of Mañjuśrī and other immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of bodhisattva mahāsattvas who had long lived in this sahā world, such humans and nonhumans as monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen, devas, nāgas, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṃnaras, and mahoragas. 
All the buddhas sitting on the lion seats under the jeweled trees also put out their wide and long tongues and emitted immeasurable rays of light in the same way. 
Śākyamuni Buddha and the other buddhas under the jeweled trees manifested transcendent powers while fully hundreds of thousands of years passed. After this they drew back their tongues, coughed, and snapped their ﬁngers together in unison. 
Those two sounds penetrated throughout the various buddha worlds of the ten directions and the earth quaked in six ways. 
Through the transcendent powers of the Buddha, all the sentient beings in these worlds—humans and such nonhumans as devas, nāgas, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṃnaras, and mahoragas—saw all the buddhas sitting on the lion seats under the immeasurable, limitless hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of jeweled trees in this sahā world. 
They saw Śākyamuni Buddha sitting on the lion seat in the jeweled stupa, together with Tathāgata Prabhūtaratna. 
They also saw immeasurable, limitless hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of bodhisattva mahāsattvas and the fourfold assembly respectfully surrounding Śākyamuni Buddha. 
After seeing this, they all rejoiced greatly at having attained this unprecedented experience. 
At the same time all the devas spoke loudly while in the air, saying: “Beyond these immeasurable, limitless hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of incalculable worlds, there is a land called Sahā. In it is a buddha called Śākyamuni. For the sake of the bodhisattva mahāsattvas he now teaches the Mahayana sutra called the Lotus Sutra, the instruction for bodhisattvas and treasured lore of the buddhas. 
You should also honor and pay homage to Śākyamuni Buddha.” Hearing this voice in the air, all those sentient beings pressed their palms together, faced the sahā world and said: “We take refuge in Śākyamuni Buddha. 
We take refuge in Śākyamuni Buddha.” All of them scattered various kinds of ﬂowers, incense, necklaces, banners, canopies, ornaments, jewels, and other beautiful things over the sahā world from afar. 
All that had been scattered formed together from the ten directions like a cloud and was transformed into a jeweled screen that covered all the buddhas. 
Then the worlds of the ten directions became pellucid, without obstruction, as if they were one buddha land. 
Thereupon the Buddha addressed the great assembly of bodhisattvas, beginning with Viśiṣṭacāritra: “The transcendent powers of the buddhas are as immeasurable, limitless, and inconceivable as this. Yet if I were to use these transcendent powers to teach the beneﬁts of this sutra so that it would be entrusted to you for immeasurable, limitless, hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of incalculable kalpas, I would not be able to reach the end of these qualities. 
To sum up, in this sutra I have clearly revealed and taught all the teachings of the Tathāgata, all the transcendent powers of the Tathāgata, all the treasure houses of the hidden essence of the Tathāgata, and all the profound aspects of the Tathāgata. 
For this reason, after the pari nirvāṇa of the Tathāgata, you should wholeheartedly preserve, recite, explain, and copy it, and practice according to the teaching. 
Those who accept, recite, explain, and copy it, and practice according to the teaching, in whichever land they may be, in a place where the sutra abides—either in a garden, a forest, under a tree, in a monk’s chamber, in a layman’s house, in a palace, on a mountain, in a valley, or in the wilderness—in all of these places they should erect and pay homage to a monument. 
Why is this? 
Because you should know that these places are the terraces of enlightenment where all the buddhas have attained highest, complete enlightenment, where all the buddhas have turned the wheel of the Dharma, and where all the buddhas entered parinirvāṇa.” Thereupon the Bhagavat, wanting to elaborate on the meaning of this further, spoke these verses: 
The buddhas, world-inspirers, Abiding in their great transcendent powers, Manifest this immeasurable power In order to gladden sentient beings. Their tongues reach up to the Brahma world And they emit innumerable rays of light From their bodies. They manifest this marvel For those who seek for the buddha path. 
The coughing and snapping sounds Of the buddhas are universally heard In the lands of the ten directions. The earth quakes in six ways. 
Because this sutra can be preserved After the nirvana of the Buddha, All the buddhas rejoice and manifest Their immeasurable transcendent powers. 
Even if, for immeasurable kalpas, They praise those who preserve this sutra, In order to entrust it, They will not reach the limit of their merit. 
The qualities of those people are Limitless and endless, Just like the boundless sky In the ten directions. 
Those who preserve this sutra Have already seen me, The Buddha Prabhūtaratna, And the various magically created forms; And today they see all the bodhisattvas I have led and inspired up until now. 
Those who preserve this sutra Will gladden me, my magically created forms, As well as the Buddha Prabhūtaratna Who has entered nirvana. 
They will also see, gladden, and pay homage to The past and future buddhas, and those who are present In the ten directions. 
Those who preserve this sutra Will before long attain the Dharma, The hidden essence, Which was attained by the buddhas Seated upon the terrace of enlightenment. 
Those who preserve this sutra Will explain the meaning of the Dharma, The names and phrases, joyfully and with undying vigor, Like the wind in the sky That has no obstruction whatsoever. 
After the parinirvāṇa of the Tathāgata, They will know the causes and conditions And the sequences of the sutras Taught by the Buddha, And will explain the truth In accordance with its meaning. 
As the light of the sun and moon Eliminates the darkness, These people practicing in the world Will extinguish the blindness of sentient beings, Teaching innumerable bodhisattvas To dwell ultimately in the single vehicle. 
For this reason, The wise, hearing of the beneﬁts of these merits, Should preserve this sutra After my nirvana. Those people will be resolute and will Unwaveringly follow the buddha path. 
Entrustment Thereupon, having arisen from the Dharma seat and manifested his great transcendent powers, Śākyamuni Buddha caressed the heads of the innumerable bodhisattva mahāsattvas with his right hand, and addressed them, saying: “For immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of incalculable kalpas, I practiced this Dharma of highest, complete enlightenment, which is hard to attain. I now entrust it to you. 
You should wholeheartedly spread this teaching and so extensively beneﬁt others.” Having caressed the heads of the bodhisattva mahāsattvas three times in this way, he further addressed them, saying: “For immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of incalculable kalpas, I practiced this Dharma of highest, complete enlightenment, which is hard to attain. I now entrust it to you. 
You should preserve and recite it. You should spread this teaching extensively. You should let all the sentient beings hear and know it. 
Why is this? 
Because with his great compassion, unstinting and unafraid, the Tathāgata gives the wisdom of the Buddha, the wisdom of the Tathāgata, and the knowledge of the self-arising one to the sentient beings. The Tathāgata is nothing but the great donor to all the sentient beings. 
You should accordingly practice the teaching of the Tathāgata. 
Never allow the thought of avarice to awaken in you! If there are sons and daughters of a virtuous family who believe in the wisdom of the Tathāgata in the future, you should expound this Lotus Sutra; and let them hear and know it so that they may attain the wisdom of the Buddha. 
If there are sentient beings who do not accept it, you should reveal, teach, beneﬁt, and gladden them with the other profound teachings of the Tathāgata. 
If you do this, you will repay your indebtedness to the Buddha.” Having heard the Buddha teach this, all the bodhisattva mahā sattvas were ﬁlled with joy, inclined their bodies, bowed their heads with increased respect, and, with their palms pressed together, faced the buddhas and uttered these words: 
O Bhagavat, we entreat you to feel no anxiety.” All the bodhisattva mahāsattvas uttered these words three times in this way, saying: “We will do as the Bhagavat directs us. 
O Bhagavat, we entreat you to feel no anxiety.” At that time, in order to cause all the buddhas who were his magically created forms and who had come from the ten directions to return to their own lands, Śākyamuni Buddha said this: “All the buddhas should be at ease. 
The Buddha Prabhūtaratna will be restored as before.” When he said this, all the innumerable buddhas in their magically created forms from the ten directions sitting on the lion seats under the jeweled trees, the Buddha Prabhūtaratna, the great assembly of the limitless and incalculable bodhisattvas beginning with Viśiṣṭacāritra, the fourfold assemblies of the śrāvakas beginning with Śāriputra, and the devas, humans, and asuras in all the worlds, having heard what the Buddha had taught, rejoiced greatly. 
Ancient Accounts of Bodhisattva Bhaiṣajyarāja Thereupon Bodhisattva Nakṣatrarājasaṃkusumitābhijña addressed the Buddha, saying: 
“O Bhagavat, why does Bodhisattva Bhaiṣa jyarāja wander in this sahā world? 
O Bhagavat, this Bodhisattva Bhaiṣajyarāja has performed hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of difﬁcult and arduous practices. 
Splendid, O Bhagavat! 
I entreat you to explain it even a little, so that all the devas, nāgas, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṃ naras, maho ragas, humans, and nonhumans, and also the assemblies of the bodhisattvas who have come from the other lands and these śrāvakas, will rejoice on hearing it.” Then the Buddha spoke to Bodhisattva Nakṣatrarājasaṃkusu mitābhijña, saying: 
“In the remote past, beyond kalpas as immeasurable as the sands of the Ganges River, there was a buddha called Candrasūryavimalaprabhāsaśrī, an Arhat, Completely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, WellDeparted, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
With this buddha were eighty koṭis of great bodhisattva mahā sattvas and an assembly of great śrāvakas, as many as the sands of seventy-two Ganges Rivers. The lifespan of this buddha was forty-two thousand kalpas, and the lifespans of the bodhisattvas were also equal to this. 
In his land there were no women, no hell-dwellers, no hungry ghosts, no animals, no asuras, and no calamities. 
It was adorned with jeweled trees, and was covered with jeweled canopies with various hanging, ﬂowered banners. This world was ﬁlled with jeweled vases and incense burners. There were platforms made of the seven treasures. For each tree there was a platform, and each tree stood away from the platform a distance of no more than a bow-shot. 
All the bodhisattvas and śrāvakas sat under these jeweled trees. 
On the top of every jeweled platform were hundreds of koṭis of devas who played divine music and sang in praise and homage to the Buddha. 
Then the Buddha expounded the Lotus Sutra for Bodhisattva Sarva rūpasaṃdarśana and numerous other bodhisattvas and śrāvakas. Bodhisattva Sarvarūpasaṃdarśana devoted himself entirely to severe practices. Following the teachings of the Buddha Candrasūryavimalaprabhāsaśrī, he strove and wandered up and down in the singleminded search for enlightenment for a full twelve thousand years; and he attained the samādhi called sar va rūpasaṃ darśana. After having attained this samādhi, he rejoiced a great deal and thought thus: 
I have attained the samādhi called sarvarūpasaṃdarśana entirely because of the power I attained through hearing the Lotus Sutra. I will now pay homage to the Buddha Candra sūryavimalaprabhāsaśrī and the Lotus Sutra. “Immediately after he had entered this samādhi, māndārava and great māndārava ﬂowers and ﬁnely powdered solid and black sandalwood fell from the sky, ﬁlling the air like clouds and raining down upon the earth. It also rained the perfume of sandalwood from the inner seacoast of Mount Sumeru. 
Having paid homage to the Buddha, he emerged from samādhi and thought this: I have paid homage to the Buddha using my transcendent power. This is, however, by no means equal to the tribute of offering my body. “For a full one thousand two hundred years, he inhaled the fragrance of sandalwood, olibanum, frankincense, clove, aloeswood, and glue trees and drank the fragrant oil of campaka ﬂowers. 
At the same time all the buddhas in these worlds praised him, saying: 
Splendid, splendid, O son of a virtuous family! This is the true perseverance. 
It stands no comparison, even if one were to pay tribute with ﬂowers, perfumes, necklaces, burning incense, scented powders, ointments, divine silk banners, canopies, perfumes of sandalwood from the inner seacoast of Mount Sumeru, and various other things like this. 
It stands no comparison, even if one were to offer one’s kingdom or wife and children. 
O son of a virtuous family, this is the supreme offering. This is the highest and best of all offerings, because you offer the Dharma to the Tathāgatas. “Having spoken these words, all became silent. 
His body was alight for one thousand two hundred years. After this period passed, his body burned out. Because he had paid tribute to the Dharma like this, Bodhisattva Sarva rūpasaṃdarśana was reborn after his death in the land of the Buddha Candra sūryavimalaprabhāsaśrī. He was born spontaneously, sitting cross-legged in the house of King Vimaladatta. 
“Then he immediately spoke these verses for the sake of his father, saying: O Great King! You should now know That I, in an instant, attained The samādhi called sarvarūpasaṃdarśana In the place where I wandered; And, practicing with enthusiasm and perseverance, I set aside this, my beloved body. 
I have paid homage to the Bhagavat In order to attain the utmost wisdom. “After having spoken these verses, he addressed his father, saying: The Buddha Candrasūryavimalaprabhāsaśrī is now in this world. 
Having previously paid homage to the Buddha, I attained the dhāraṇī of understanding the speech of all sentient beings and heard eight hundred thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of verses and tens of billions of verses, hundreds of billions of verses and thousands of billions of verses of the Lotus Sutra. 
O Great King, I will now once again pay homage to this buddha. “Having spoken this, he sat on the seven-jeweled platform and ascended into the air as high as seven tāla trees. Having come before the Buddha, he bowed until his forehead touched the Buddha’s feet. He praised the Buddha in verse with his ten ﬁngers pressed together, saying: 
O Bhagavat! The Bhagavat is yet in this world! “Then the Buddha Candrasūryavimalaprabhāsaśrī said to Bodhisattva Sarvarūpasaṃdarśana: O son of a virtuous family! 
I ask you now to prepare my bed. I will enter parinirvāṇa tonight. “The Buddha said again to Bodhisattva Sarvarūpasaṃdarśana: O son of a virtuous family! 
I entrust you with the Buddha-Dharma, and all the bodhisattvas and great śrāvakas as well as the Dharma for highest, complete enlightenment. I will also entrust you with the sevenjeweled world, all the jeweled trees, jeweled platforms, and the devas who are my servants in the great manifold cosmos. 
At that very time the great manifold cosmos quaked in six ways. It rained jeweled ﬂowers from the heavens and all the devas and humans experienced an unprecedented marvel.” The Buddha addressed Bodhisattva Nakṣatrarājasaṃkusumitābhijña, saying: “What do you think about this? 
Is Bodhisattva Sarvarūpasaṃdarśana someone unknown to you? 
He is none other than this Bodhisattva Bhaiṣa jyarāja. 
He undertook the practice of giving by abandoning his body immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of times in this way. O Nakṣa tra rāja saṃkusumitābhijña! 
If there is anyone who sets forth and wishes to attain highest, complete enlightenment, he should pay homage to the stupas of the Buddha by burning either a ﬁnger or a toe. He is superior to those who pay homage by giving their countries and cities, their wives and children, or the mountains, forests, rivers, ponds, and many other rare treasures. “If there is anyone who pays homage to all the buddhas, great bodhisattvas, pratyekabuddhas, and arhats by ﬁlling the great manifold cosmos with the seven precious treasures, the merit of this person will not be equal to the surpassing merit of one who receives and holds to even a single verse consisting of four lines of the Lotus Sutra. “O Nakṣatrarājasaṃkusumitābhijña! 
Just as the ocean is the greatest of streams and rivers and of all waters, this Lotus Sutra is the most profound of the sutras taught by the Tathāgatas. 
Just as Mount Sumeru is the greatest of mountains—greater than Earth Mountain, Black Mountain, Mount Cakravāḍa, Mount Mahācakra vāḍa, and the ten jeweled mountains—this Lotus Sutra is the greatest of the sutras. 
Just as the moon is the greatest among all the stars, this Lotus Sutra is the most illuminating of the thousands of koṭis of sutras. 
Just as the sun destroys darkness, in the same way this sutra destroys the darkness of erring thought. 
Just as the noble emperor is the best of all the kings, this sutra is the noblest of all the sutras. 
Just as Śakra is the king of the thirtythree devas, this sutra is the King of Sutras. 
Just as Great Brahma is the father of all the sentient beings, in the same way this sutra is the father of all the wise, the noble, those who have more to learn and those who do not, and those in whom the thought of enlightenment has awakened. 
Just as those who have entered the stream of the teaching , those who are to return to this world once again , those who are never to return , arhats, and pratyekabuddhas are the best of all the common people, in the same way this is the best of all the sutras taught by all the Tathāgatas, bodhisattvas, or śrāvakas. 
“Those who hold to this sutra are the best of all sentient beings. 
The bodhisattvas are the best of all śrāvakas and pratye kabuddhas. 
In the same way, this sutra is the best of all sutras. 
Just as the Buddha is the King of the Dharma, this sutra is the King of Sutras. “O Nakṣatrarājasaṃkusumitābhijña! 
This sutra saves all sentient beings. This sutra makes all sentient beings free from suffering. 
This sutra greatly beneﬁts all sentient beings and brings their aspirations to fulﬁllment, just as a clear, cool pond satisﬁes the thirsty, as a ﬁre satisﬁes those suffering from cold, as clothes for the naked, as a caravan leader for merchants, as a mother for her children, as a boat for the traveler, as a physician for the sick, as a lamp for the gloom, as a treasure for the poor, as a king for the people, as the sea for traders, and a torch for those in darkness. 
In the same way, this Lotus Sutra frees sentient beings from every suffering, all the pains and bonds of illness and of birth and death. 
If there is anyone who hears this Lotus Sutra, copies it, or moves others to copy it, their merit will be limitless even if it is measured through the Buddha’s wisdom. 
If there is anyone who copies it and pays it tribute with ﬂowers, perfumes, necklaces, burning incense, scented powders, fragrant ointments, banners, canopies, clothes, various kinds of ghee lamps, oil lamps, fragrant oil lamps, lamps of oil made from campaka, sumanas, pāṭala, vārṣika, and navamā likā trees, that person’s merit will also be immeasurable. “O Nakṣatrarājasaṃkusumitābhijña! 
If there is anyone who hears this chapter ‘Ancient Accounts of Bodhisattva Bhaiṣajyarāja,’ they will attain immeasurable and limitless merit. 
If there is any woman who hears and holds to this chapter ‘Ancient Accounts of Bodhisattva Bhaiṣajyarāja,’ she will never be reborn with a female body. 
If there is any woman ﬁve hundred years after the pari nirvāṇa of the Tathāgata who hears this sutra and practices according to the teaching, she will immediately reach the dwelling of the Buddha Amitāyus in the Sukhāvatī world, surrounded by great bodhisattvas, and will be born on a jeweled seat in a lotus ﬂower. Never again troubled by the of greed, anger, or ignorance, by arrogance or jealousy, he will attain the bodhisattva’s transcendent powers and the acceptance of the nonorigination of all dharmas. 
After attaining this acceptance, his faculty of sight will be pure; and with this pure eye faculty, he will see all the Buddha Tathāgatas, equal in number to the sands of seventy-two million koṭis of nayutas of Ganges Rivers. 
At that time all the buddhas will praise him from afar, saying: Splendid! Splendid! 
Son of a virtuous family! 
You have preserved, recited, and contemplated this sutra from the teachings of the Buddha Śākyamuni and taught it to others. The merit you have obtained is immeasurable and limitless. Even ﬁre cannot burn it. Even water cannot wash it away. 
You have already destroyed the māras. You have already conquered the armies of birth and death. You have defeated all enemies. 
O son of a virtuous family! 
Hundreds of thousands of buddhas together protect you with their transcendent powers. There is no one equal to you among the devas and humans of the entire world. With the exception of the Tathāgata, the wisdom and meditation of all śrāvakas, pratyekabuddhas, and bodhisattvas can never equal yours. 
Such is the power of the merit and wisdom that this bodhisattva has perfected. 
If there is anyone who hears this chapter ‘Ancient Accounts of Bodhisattva Bhaiṣajyarāja,’ rejoices in it, and praises it well, in his present life he will always exhale the fragrance of blue lotus ﬂowers from his mouth and will always emit the fragrance of the sandalwood on Mount Oxhead from his pores. The beneﬁts of the qualities he has obtained are just as mentioned above. For this reason, O Nakṣatrarāja saṃkusumitābhijña, I will entrust you with this chapter ‘Ancient Accounts of Bodhisattva Bhaiṣajyarāja.’ During the period of ﬁve hundred years after my parinirvāṇa you must spread it far and wide in Jambudvīpa and not allow it to be destroyed. You must not give Māra and his men, or the devas, nāgas, yakṣas, and kum bhāṇḍa demons any chance of destroying it. 
You should protect this sutra with your transcendent power. 
Why is this? 
Because this sutra is good medicine for the ills of the people of Jambudvīpa. 
If there is any sick person who hears this sutra, his illness will disappear, and he will neither die nor grow old. 
O Nakṣatrarāja saṃkusumitābhijña! If you see anyone who holds to this sutra, you should scatter blue lotus ﬂowers full of scented powder on him. 
After scattering them, you should think like this: This man will before long destroy the army of Māra, sitting on the grass-covered terrace of enlightenment. He will blow the conch of the Dharma, beat the drum of the great Dharma, and ferry all sentient beings across the ocean of old age, illness, and death. 
“Therefore, if those seeking the buddha path see those who hold to this sutra, the thought of respect should awaken in them.” When this chapter, “Ancient Accounts of Bodhisattva Bhaiṣa jyarāja,” was being taught, eighty-four thousand bodhisattvas attained the dhāraṇī of understanding the speech of all sentient beings. 
The Tathāgata Prabhūtaratna in the jeweled stupa praised Bodhisattva Nakṣatrarājasaṃkusumitābhijña, saying: 
You have attained marvelous merit, for you have questioned the Buddha Śākya muni about these things and beneﬁted all of the immeasurable numbers of sentient beings.” Bodhisattva Gadgadasvara Thereupon, the Buddha Śākyamuni emitted a ray of light from his topknot , the mark of a great person, and also from the tuft of white hair between his eyebrows , thus illuminating all the buddha worlds in the east equal to the sands of one hundred and eight myriads of koṭis of nayutas of Ganges Rivers. 
In that world was the buddha named Kamala dala vimalanakṣatrarājasaṃkusumitābhijña, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Com pletely Enlightened, Perfect in Knowledge and Conduct, Well-Departed, Knower of the World, Unsurpassed, Tamer of Humans, Teacher of Devas and Humans, Buddha, Bhagavat. 
At that time, in the buddha world of Vairocanaraśmiprati maṇḍitā there was a bodhisattva whose name was Gadgadasvara . Having planted many roots of good merit over a long period, he paid homage to and closely attended immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of buddhas, and accomplished complete and profound wisdom. He attained the samādhis called dhvajā grakeyūra, saddharmapuṇḍarīka, vimala datta, nakṣa tra rā ja vikrīḍita, anilambha, jñānamudrā, sarva rutakauśalya, sarva puṇyasamuccaya, prasādavatī, ṛddhi vikrīḍita, jñānolkā, vyū harāja, vimalaprabhāsa, vimalagarbha, apkṛtsna, and sūryāvarta. He thus attained great samādhis equal in number to the sands of hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of Ganges Rivers. 
As the light of the Buddha Śākyamuni illuminated his body, he addressed the Buddha Kamaladalavimalanakṣatrarājasaṃkusu mi tā bhijña, saying: “O Bhagavat! 
I shall go to the sahā world, approach the Buddha Śākyamuni in homage and reverence, and see Bodhisattva Mañjuśrī, the Prince of the Dharma, as well as Bodhisattva Bhaiṣajyarāja, Bodhisattva Pradānaśūra, Bodhisattva Nakṣatra rāja saṃ ku su mitābhijña, Bodhisattva Viśiṣṭacāritra, Bodhisattva Vyūharāja, and Bodhisattva Bhaiṣa jya samud gata.” Then the Buddha Kamaladalavimalanakṣatrarājasaṃkusu mitā bhijña addressed Bodhisattva Gadgadasvara, saying: 
O son of a virtuous family! 
The land of that sahā world is uneven and irregular and is ﬁlled with mud, stones, mountains, and ﬁlth. The Buddha is short of body, as are the bodhisattvas. 
By contrast, your body is forty-two thousand yojanas tall, and my body is six million eight hundred thousand yojanas tall. Your body is perfect in its bearing and illuminated most beautifully with hundreds of millions of merits. Yet, when you go there you must not despise that country nor think the Buddha, bodhisattvas, or the world itself inferior.” The Bodhisattva Gadgadasvara addressed the Buddha, saying: 
I am now going to the sahā world through the power of the Tathāgata, the carefree play of the transcendent powers of the Tathāgata, and the adornment of the qualities and wisdom of the Tathāgata.” At that time Bodhisattva Gadgadasvara, without rising from his seat or moving his body, entered samādhi. 
On seeing these lotus ﬂowers, Bodhisattva Mañjuśrī, the Prince of the Dharma, addressed the Buddha, saying: 
Why has this marvel appeared? 
There are a great many millions of lotus ﬂowers, whose stems are made of Jambūnāda gold, leaves of silver, pistils of diamond, and calyces of ruby.” The Buddha Śākyamuni answered Mañjuśrī, saying: 
“The Bodhisattva Gadgadasvara wishes to come to this sahā world from the buddha world called Kamala dala vimala nakṣatra rāja saṃ kusu mitā bhijña, together with eighty-four thousand bodhisattvas as his retinue. He approaches me in homage and reverence, wishing to make offerings and to hear the Lotus Sutra.” Mañjuśrī asked the Buddha, saying: 
What roots of good merit has he planted, and what merits has he practiced to attain his great transcendent powers? 
What kind of samādhi has he practiced? 
I entreat you to tell us the name of this samādhi. We wish to practice it with diligence. By practicing this samādhi we wish to see the shape, appearance, size, and manner of this bodhisattva. 
I entreat you, O Bhagavat, to use your transcendent powers and let us see the appearance of that bodhisattva.” Then, the Buddha Śākyamuni spoke to Mañjuśrī, saying: 
“The Tathāgata Prabhūtaratna, who long ago entered parinirvāṇa, will manifest the signs for you.” At that time the Buddha Prabhūtaratna addressed that bodhisattva, saying: 
Mañjuśrī, the Prince of the Dharma, wishes to see you.” Thereupon Bodhisattva Gadgadasvara disappeared from his world and arrived together with eighty-four thousand bodhisattvas. 
In the worlds through which he passed, the land quaked in six ways, seven-jeweled lotus ﬂowers rained everywhere, and hundreds of thousands of heavenly musical instruments sounded spontaneously without being played. 
The eyes of this bodhisattva were as large as blue lotus leaves. Even if hundreds of thousands of myriads of moons were gathered together they would not exceed the beauty of his countenance. His body was pure gold in color, adorned with immeasurable hundreds of thousands of merits, radiant with virtuous dignity, and brilliantly illuminated like the adamantine body of the god Nārāyaṇa. 
Having entered the seven-jeweled platform and ascended into the air, he ﬂew above the earth at a height of seven tāla trees. Surrounded by respectful bodhisattvas, he arrived at Mount Gṛdhrakūṭa in this sahā world and descended from the seven-jeweled terrace. 
He came before the Buddha Śākyamuni with a necklace worth hundreds of thousands in his hand and bowed until his forehead reached the Buddha’s feet. He presented the necklace to the Buddha, saying: “O Bhagavat! The Buddha Kamaladalavimalanakṣatrarāja saṃ kusu mitā bhijña in quires of the Bhagavat: 
Are your worldly affairs bearable? 
Is it easy to save sentient beings? 
Are they not ﬁlled with greed, anger, foolishness, avarice, and pride? 
Are they mindful of their parents? Do they respect śrāmaṇas? Do they not have false views or erring thoughts? Do they control the desires of their ﬁve senses? 
O Bhagavat! Do the sentient beings conquer māras? 
Has the Tathāgata Prabhūtaratna sitting in the seven-jeweled stupa long after his parinirvāṇa come here to hear the Dharma? Furthermore, he inquired of the Tathāgata Prabhūtaratna, saying: 
O Bhagavat! 
I now wish to see the body of the Buddha Prabhūtaratna. 
I entreat you, O Bhagavat, to manifest and show it to me.” At that time the Buddha Śākyamuni said to the Buddha Pra bhū ta ratna: “This Bodhisattva Gadgadasvara wants to see you.” Then, the Buddha Prabhūtaratna addressed Gadgadasvara, saying: 
You have paid homage to the Buddha Śākya muni and heard the Lotus Sutra, and have come here in order to see Mañjuśrī and others.” Thereupon Bodhisattva Padmaśrī addressed the Buddha, saying: 
What roots of good merit has this Bodhisattva Gadgadasvara planted, and what merits has he practiced to attain these transcendent powers?” The Buddha answered Bodhisattva Padmaśrī, saying: 
As a result of his deeds he was born in the world of the Buddha Kamala dalavimalanakṣatrarājasaṃkusumitābhijña and has attained his transcendent powers. 
What do you think about this? 
Is Bodhisattva Gadgada svara, who paid homage to the Buddha Meghadundubhisvararāja with music and jeweled vessels, someone unknown? 
Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Gad ga dasvara here present is one and the same. 
O Padmaśrī! Having closely and respectfully attended innumerable buddhas and planted roots of good merit over a long time, this Bodhisattva Gadgada svara met hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of buddhas equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River. 
“In this way he has expounded this sutra and saved those in the states of being of hell-dwellers, hungry ghosts, animals, and those in difﬁcult circumstances. Sometimes he has transformed himself into a female in royal harems and taught this sutra. 
O Padmaśrī! This Bodhisattva Gadgadasvara saves all sentient beings in the sahā world. This Bodhisattva Gadgadasvara has transformed himself into various forms and taught this sutra for the sake of all sentient beings. Nevertheless, his transcendent power has never decreased, nor his power of transformation or his wisdom. 
This bodhisattva illuminates the sahā world with his great wisdom and causes every sentient being to attain what should be known. 
He does exactly the same in all the worlds of the ten directions, which are equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River. 
If he is able to save them in the form of a śrāvaka, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a śrāvaka. 
If he is able to save them in the form of a pratyekabuddha, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a pratyekabuddha. 
If he is able to save them in the form of a bodhisattva, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a bodhisattva. 
If he is able to save them in the form of a buddha, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a buddha. 
Thus he transforms himself in various ways according to the capacities of those who are to be saved. If he is able to save them by means of parinirvāṇa, he manifests parinirvāṇa to them. 
Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Gadgadasvara has achieved his transcendent powers and the power of wisdom in just such a manner.” Thereupon, Bodhisattva Padmaśrī addressed the Buddha, saying: 
Deep are the roots of good merit that this Bodhi sattva Gadgada svara has planted! 
In what samādhi did this bodhisattva dwell, such that he was able to appear in various places in this way, and bring sentient beings to the path?” The Buddha answered Bodhisattva Padmaśrī, saying: 
Dwelling in this samādhi, Bodhisattva Gadgadasvara has beneﬁted innumerable sentient beings in this way.” When this chapter “Bodhisattva Gadgadasvara,” was being taught, those eighty-four thousand people who had come with Bodhi sattva Gadgadasvara attained the samādhi called sarva rūpa saṃdarśana. 
Innumerable bodhisattvas in this sahā world also attained this samādhi and dhāraṇī. 
Then Bodhisattva Mahā sattva Gadgadasvara paid homage to the Buddha Śākyamuni and the stupa of the Buddha Prabhūtaratna and returned to his own world. Those worlds through which he traveled quaked in six ways and it rained jeweled lotus ﬂowers. Hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of variegated music was heard. 
Having returned to his own world, he approached the Buddha Kamaladalavimala nakṣatra rāja saṃkusumitābhijña, surrounded by eighty-four thousand bodhisattvas, and said to him: 
“O Bhagavat! I have been to the sahā world and beneﬁted the sentient beings. Having seen the Buddha Śākyamuni and the stupa of the Buddha Prabhūtaratna, I paid homage to them and made them offerings. 
Having seen Bodhisattva Mañjuśrī, the Prince of the Dharma, Bodhisattva Bhaiṣajyarāja, Bodhisattva Vīryabalavegaprāpta, and Bodhisattva Pradānaśūra, I caused these eighty-four thousand bodhisattvas to attain the samādhi called sarvarū pasaṃ darśana.” When this chapter, “The Coming and Going of Bodhisattva Gadgada svara,” was taught, forty-two thousand sons of the devas attained the acceptance of the nonorigination of all dharmas; and Bodhisattva Padmaśrī attained the saddharmapuṇḍarīka samādhi. 
The Gateway to Every Direction [Manifested by Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara] Thereupon arising from his seat with his right shoulder bared, Bodhisattva Akṣayamati faced the Buddha with his palms pressed together, and spoke thus to him: 
For what reason is Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara called Ava lo kiteśvara?” The Buddha answered Bodhisattva Akṣayamati, saying: 
“O son of a virtuous family! If innumerable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of sentient beings who experience suffering hear of Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara and wholeheartedly chant his name, Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara will immediately perceive their voices and free them from their suffering. 
Even if those who hold to the name of Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara were to enter a great ﬁre, because of this bodhisattva’s transcendent power, the ﬁre would not be able to burn them. 
If they were adrift on the great waters, by chanting his name they would reach the shallows. 
There are hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of sentient beings who enter the great ocean to seek such treasures as gold, silver, lapis lazuli, mother-of-pearl, agate, coral, amber, and pearl. Even if a cyclone were to blow the ship of one of these toward the land of rākṣasa demons, they would all become free from the danger of those rākṣasa demons if there were even a single person among them who chanted the name of Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara. 
For this reason he is called Avalokiteśvara. 
“If anyone who is about to be beaten chants the name of Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara, the sticks and swords will immediately be broken into pieces and he will be delivered. 
If the yakṣas and rākṣasas ﬁlling the great manifold cosmos come with the intent to afﬂict the people but hear them chanting, those demons’ evil eyes will be unable to see them, so how could they possibly hurt them? 
“If anyone, whether guilty or innocent, is bound with fetters or chains, such bonds will be broken into pieces; and those who have been bound will become free by chanting the name of Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara. 
When a caravan leader travels on a dangerous road together with his fellow merchants, carrying precious treasures in a great manifold cosmos ﬁlled with evil robbers, if there be a single person who says: O sons of a virtuous family! 
Do not fear! You should wholeheartedly chant the name of Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara. 
If you chant his name, you will be free from these evil robbers. “Now, if those merchants chant loudly in unison, saying: Homage to Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara! “Then, by chanting his name, the caravan will immediately gain deliverance. 
O Akṣayamati! The transcendent power of Bodhisattva Mahāsattva Avalo kiteśvara is as great and mighty as this. 
“If there are any sentient beings who are greatly subject to sensual desires, if they contemplate Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara with respect, they will become free from these desires. 
If there are any sentient beings who often become angry, if they contemplate Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara with respect, they will become free from anger. 
If there are any sentient beings who are greatly confused, if they contemplate Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara with respect, they will become free from their confusion. 
O Akṣayamati! Thus Bodhisattva Avalo kiteśvara greatly beneﬁts sentient beings through his transcendent power. For this reason sentient beings should always turn their thoughts to him. 
“If any woman wanting to have a baby boy pays homage and makes offerings to Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara, she will bear a baby boy endowed with good merit and wisdom. 
If she wants to have a baby girl, she will bear a beautiful and handsome baby girl who has planted roots of good merit and will have the love of sentient beings. 
O Akṣayamati! Such are the transcendent powers of Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara that if any sentient being reverently respects him, the merit they achieve will never be in vain. For this reason sentient beings should hold to the name of Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara. O Akṣayamati! 
What do you think of someone who holds to the names of the bodhisattvas equal in number to the sands of sixty-two koṭis of Ganges Rivers and pays homage to them with drink and food, clothes, bedding, and medicine. 
Is the merit of this son or daughter of a virtuous family great or not?” Akṣayamati answered, saying: 
“O Bhagavat! It is great.” The Buddha said: “If there is anyone who holds to the name of Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara and anyone who pays homage to him and makes offerings even for a moment, the merit of these two people will be equal and the same; it will never be extinguished after hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas. 
Those who hold to the name of Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara will attain such beneﬁts of immeasurable and limitless merit.” The Bodhisattva Akṣayamati addressed the Buddha, saying: 
“O Bhagavat! How does Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara wander through this sahā world? 
How does he teach the Dharma for the sake of sentient beings? 
What of his power of skillful means?” The Buddha said to Bodhisattva Akṣayamati: 
“O son of a virtuous family! If there is any land where sentient beings are to be saved by the form of a buddha, Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a buddha. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of a pratyekabuddha, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a pratyekabuddha. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of a śrāvaka, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a śrāvaka. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of Brahma, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of Brahma. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of Śakra, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of Śakra. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of Īśvara, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of Īśvara. 
To those who are to be saved in the form of Maheśvara, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of Maheśvara. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of the great commander of the devas, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of the great commander of the devas. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of Vaiśravaṇa, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of Vaiśravaṇa. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of a minor king, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a minor king. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of a wealthy man, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a wealthy man. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of a householder, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a householder. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of a state ofﬁcial, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a state ofﬁcial. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of a brahman, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a brahman. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of a monk, nun, layman, or laywoman, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a monk, nun, layman, or laywoman. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of a wife of either a wealthy man, a householder, a state ofﬁcial, or a brahman, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of such a wife. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of a boy or a girl, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of a boy or a girl. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of a human or of a nonhuman such as a deva, nāga, yakṣa, gandharva, asura, garuḍa, kiṃnara, or mahoraga, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into any of these forms. 
To those who are to be saved by the form of Vajrapāṇi, he teaches the Dharma by changing himself into the form of Vajrapāṇi. 
“O Akṣayamati! This Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara displays such qualities, wanders through many lands in various forms, and saves sentient beings. 
For this reason you should wholeheartedly pay homage to Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara. 
This Bodhisattva Avalo kiteśvara bestows fearlessness in times of fearful calamity. For this reason everybody in this sahā world calls him Abhayaṃ dada . 
The Bodhisattva Akṣayamati addressed the Buddha, saying: “O Bhagavat! 
I shall now pay homage to Bodhisattva Avalo kiteśvara.” He then took from his neck a many-jeweled necklace worth hundreds of thousands of gold coins, gave it to him, and said: 
“I entreat you to accept this rare-jeweled necklace for the Dharma.” At that time Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara did not dare to receive it. 
Akṣayamati addressed Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara, saying: 
“I entreat you to accept this necklace out of pity for us.” Then the Buddha said to Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara: “You should accept this necklace out of pity for such humans and nonhumans as this Bodhisattva Akṣayamati, the fourfold assembly, devas, nāgas, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kiṃnaras, and mahoragas.” The Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara accepted the necklace out of pity for the fourfold assembly, devas, nāgas, humans, non humans, and the rest. 
With such inherent transcendent powers Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara wanders throughout the sahā world.” Thereupon, Bodhisattva Akṣayamati asked a question in verse, saying: O Bhagavat, endowed with excellent marks! I now wish to ask you about him once again: For what reason is the heir of the Buddha Named Avalokiteśvara? 
The Bhagavat, endowed with excellent marks, answered Akṣaya mati in verse: Listen to the practices of Avalokiteśvara, Which have their application to all! His vow is deep like the ocean And his kalpa is of inconceivable length. After having attended Many thousands of koṭis of buddhas, He made a great, pure vow. 
I will now explain it to you in brief: If you hear his name and see his body, And contemplate him in thought, Your life will not be in vain; And you will extinguish all suffering. 
If anyone wants to hurt you And pushes you into a great ﬁrepit, If you contemplate the power of Avalokiteśvara, The ﬁrepit will change into a pond. 
If you drift upon the great ocean and meet danger From dragons, ﬁsh, and demons, If you contemplate the power of Avalokiteśvara, You will not be swallowed by the waves. 
If you are on the peak of Sumeru And are pushed by somebody, If you contemplate the power of Avalokiteśvara, You will stay suspended in the air like the sun. 
If any evil one chases you And pushes you from Mount Diamond, If you contemplate the power of Avalokiteśvara, Not even a single hair will be hurt. 
If evil robbers surround you Each with a sword and the intent to harm, If you contemplate the power of Avalokiteśvara, The thought of mercy will awaken in them. 
If you suffer under the punishment of a king And your life is to be ended by execution, If you contemplate the power of Avalokiteśvara, The sword will be immediately broken into pieces. 
If you are imprisoned with a neck chain, Your hands and feet fettered, If you contemplate the power of Avalokiteśvara, They will disappear and you will be released. 
If anyone wants to hurt your body With a curse or poison, If you contemplate the power of Avalokiteśvara, These ills will return and afﬂict their authors. 
If you meet evil rākṣasas, Poisonous dragons, or demons, If you contemplate the power of Avalokiteśvara, They will not dare to hurt you. 
If you are surrounded by evil animals Whose teeth and claws are fearfully sharp, If you contemplate the power of Avalokiteśvara, They will run away swiftly And to an immeasurable distance. 
If there are lizards, snakes, vipers, or scorpions, Whose breath is poisonous like a ﬂaming smoke, If you contemplate the power of Avalokiteśvara, They will turn away swiftly at the sound of your voice. 
If thunder resounds, lightning ﬂashes, Hail falls, and a great rain pours out of the clouds, If you contemplate the power of Avalokiteśvara, They will disappear immediately. 
If sentient beings are in great adversity, And immeasurable pain afﬂicts them, The wonderful power of the wisdom of Avalokiteśvara Can relieve the suffering of the world. 
Endowed with transcendent powers And having fully mastered wisdom and skillful means, In all the worlds of the ten directions, There is no place where he will not manifest himself. 
The suffering of those in the troubled states of being: Hell-dwellers, hungry ghosts, and animals; And the suffering of birth, old age, illness, and death Will gradually be extinguished. 
He who perceives the world with truth, purity, And vast knowledge, And with benevolence and compassion, Should be ever longed for and looked up to. 
He is a spotless pure ray of light, A sun of wisdom that destroys the darkness, A ﬂame that withstands the winds of calamity. He brilliantly illuminates the entire world. 
His will, the essence of which is compassion, Shakes like thunder; And the mind of mercy Is like a beautiful overspreading cloud, Which pours the Dharma rain of immortality And extinguishes the ﬂame of desires. 
In a dispute before judges, Or fearful in the midst of battle, If you contemplate the power of Avalokiteśvara, All enemies will ﬂee away. 
He has a wondrous voice, The voice of one who perceives the world, A voice like Brahma’s, a voice like the rolling tide, A voice unsurpassed in this world; For this reason you should always contemplate him. You should have no doubt, even for a moment. 
The pure seer Avalokiteśvara will be a refuge When suffering distress or the misery of death. He is endowed with every quality, Sees the sentient beings with his benevolent eyes, And his ocean of merit is immeasurable; For this reason you should pay him homage. 
At that time Bodhisattva Dharaṇiṃdhara arose from his seat, went before the Buddha and said to him: “O Bhagavat! 
If there are any sentient beings who hear of this chapter, ‘Bodhisattva Avalo kiteś 
vara,’ and these effortless deeds, the manifestation of the gateway to all directions, and the transcendent powers, know that their merit will not be little!” When the Buddha taught the chapter, “The Gateway to Every Direction,” the thought of incomparable highest, complete enlightenment awoke in eighty-four thousand sentient beings in the assembly. 
Dhāraṇī Thereupon, rising from his seat with his right shoulder bared, Bodhisattva Bhaiṣajyarāja faced the Buddha with his palms pressed together, and spoke to him, saying: 
If there is any son or daughter of a virtuous family who preserves the Lotus Sutra and recites it, is versed in it, and copies it, how much merit will he or she attain?” Then the Buddha addressed Bhaiṣajyarāja, saying: 
“If there is any son or daughter of a virtuous family who pays homage to buddhas numbering as many as the sands of eight hundred myriads of koṭis of nayutas of Ganges Rivers, what do you think? 
Will the merit he or she attains be great or not?” He answered: 
“It will be great, O Bhagavat!” The Buddha said: “If any son or daughter of a virtuous family preserves a verse of four lines of this sutra, recites it, understands the meaning, or practices what it teaches, his or her merit will be very great.” Thereupon, Bodhisattva Bhaiṣajyarāja addressed the Buddha, saying: 
I will now give the dhāraṇīs to the expounders of the Dharma and protect them.” He then recited a dhāraṇī: 
Anye manye mane mamane citte carite same samitā viśānte mukte mukta tame same avisame samasame jaye kṣaye akṣaye akṣiṇe śānte samite dhāraṇi ālokabhāṣe pratyavekṣaṇi ni dhiru abhyantaranirviṣte abhyantara pāriśuddhi mutkule araḍe paraḍe sukāṇkṣi asamasame buddha vilokite dharmaparikśite saṃgha-nirghoṣanirghoṇi bhayā bhaya viśodhani mantre mantrākṣayate rute rutakauśalye akṣaye ak ṣa ya vanatāye vakkule valoḍa amanyanatāye. 
This mantra-dhāraṇī was spoken by buddhas equal in number to the sands of sixty-two koṭis of Ganges Rivers. Anyone who attacks or slanders an expounder of the Dharma also attacks or slanders these buddhas.” Thereupon, the Buddha Śākyamuni praised Bodhisattva Bhaiṣajyarāja, saying: 
O Bhaiṣajyarāja! 
Out of compassion you have taught this dhāraṇī in order to protect the expounders of the Dharma. 
It will greatly beneﬁt all sentient beings.” Then Bodhisattva Pradānaśūra addressed the Buddha, saying: 
“O Bhagavat! I also will teach a dhāraṇī in order to protect anyone who recites and preserves the Lotus Sutra. 
If ex pounders of the Dharma attain this dhāraṇī, no yakṣa, rākṣasa, pūtana, kṛtya, kumbhāṇḍa, or hungry ghost will ever have a chance to strike at their weaknesses even if they try to do so.” In the presence of the Buddha he taught a dhāraṇī, saying: 
This mantra-dhāraṇī has been spoken by buddhas equal in number to the sands of the Ganges River and everyone has rejoiced in it. Anyone who attacks or slanders an expounder of the Dharma also attacks or slanders these buddhas.” Thereupon, the devarāja Vaiśravaṇa, a world-protector, addressed the Buddha, saying: 
I will also teach a dhāraṇī out of pity for sentient beings and in order to protect ex pounders of the Dharma.” He then recited a dhāraṇī, saying: 
Aṭṭe naṭṭe vanaṭṭe anaḍe nāḍi kunaḍi. 
With this mantra-dhāraṇī I protect the ex pounders of the Dharma; I will also protect those who hold to this sutra. 
All heavy cares shall be banished for a hundred yojanas around.” At that time the devarāja Dhṛtarāṣṭra was present in the assembly, respectfully surrounded by thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of gandharvas. He came before the Buddha together with them and addressed the Buddha with his palms pressed together, saying: 
With a mantra-dhāraṇī I will also protect those who hold to the Lotus Sutra.” He then recited the dhāraṇī, saying: 
This mantra-dhāraṇī was spoken by forty-two koṭis of buddhas. Anyone who attacks or slanders an expounder of the Dharma also attacks or slanders these buddhas. 
We also want to protect those who recite and preserve the Lotus Sutra and rid them of their heavy cares. Those who try to strike at the expounders of the Dharma through their weaknesses shall never be able to do so.” They then recited a dhāraṇī in the presence of the Buddha, saying: 
Iti me iti me iti me iti me iti me nime nime nime nime nime ruhe ruhe ruhe ruhe stuhe stuhe stuhe stuhe stuhe. 
No yakṣa, no rākṣasa, no hungry ghost, no pūtana, no kṛtya, no vetāla, no skanda, no omāraka, no apa s mā raka, no yakṣakṛtya, no manuṣyakṛtya, no fever; no fever for one day, for two days, for three days, for four days or even up to seven days or at any time; no one in the form of a man, no one in the form of a woman, no one in the form of a boy, no one in the form of a maiden, no one who may appear even in a dream, in any of these forms shall cause them distress.” They then spoke to the Buddha in verse, saying: 
If anyone does not accept my dhāraṇī, And troubles one who expounds the Dharma, His head will be split into seven pieces Just like a branch of the arjaka tree. 
Consider the transgression of parricide, Of pressing sesame mixed with impurities, Of cheating people with scales; Consider the transgression committed by Devadatta Who divided the sangha. 
Those who slander this expounder of the Dharma Shall suffer consequences such as these. 
After having spoken these verses the rākṣasīs addressed the Buddha, saying: 
We also want to protect those who preserve, recite, and practice this sutra, and cause them to live at ease, rid them of their weighty cares, and drive out various poisons.” The Buddha said to the rākṣasīs: 
Your merit is immeasurable. How much more merit is there in protecting those who perfectly preserve and revere the sutra in various ways; such as by offering ﬂowers, perfumes, necklaces, fragrant ointments, scented powders, burning incense, banners, canopies, and music, or by lighting ghee lamps, oil lamps, fragrant oil lamps, lamps of oil made from sumanas, campaka, vārṣika, and utpala ﬂowers! How much more merit is there in offering such things in hundreds to thousands of ways! 
You and your retinues should protect the expounders of the Dharma in this way.” When this chapter, “Dhāraṇī,” was taught, sixty-eight thousand people attained the acceptance of the nonorigination of all dharmas. 
Ancient Accounts of King Śubhavyūha Thereupon, the Buddha addressed the great assembly, saying: “Once upon a time, immeasurable, limitless, inconceivable, and incalculable kalpas ago, there was a buddha named Jaladhara gar jita ghoṣa susvarana kṣatrarā ja saṃ ku su mitābhijña, a Tathāgata, Arhat, Completely Enlightened. His land was called Vairo cana raśmi pratimaṇḍitā and the kalpa was named Priyadarśana. 
There was a king practicing the teaching of the Buddha. He was called Śubha vyūha, and his consort was named Vimaladatta. They had two sons. One was named Vimalagarbha, and the other Vimala netra. 
These two sons were endowed with great transcendent power, merit, and wisdom, and practiced the bodhisattva path for a long time. They were versed in the perfections of giving , good conduct , perseverance , effort , meditation , wisdom , and skillful means and compassion, benevolence, joy, and generosity; as well as the thirty-seven helpful ways to attain the Dharma. 
Furthermore, they were also versed in the bodhisattva samā dhis of vimala, nakṣatrarājā ditya, vimala nirbhāsa, vimala rūpa, vimala bhāsa, alaṃkāra śubha, and mahātejogarbha. “Then the Buddha, wanting to guide King Śubhavyūha, and out of compassion for sentient beings, taught this Lotus Sutra. 
At that time Prince Vimalagarbha and Prince Vimalanetra approached their mother and addressed her with their palms and ten ﬁngers pressed together, saying: We entreat you, O mother, to go before the Buddha Jaladhara garjita ghoṣasusvaranakṣatrarājasaṃkusumitābhijña. We shall also go before him together with you, attend him, make offerings to him, and pay him homage. 
Why is this? 
They walked, stood, sat, and slept in the air, causing water to ﬂow from their upper bodies and blowing ﬁre out of their lower bodies, causing water to ﬂow from their lower bodies, and blowing ﬁre out of their upper bodies; enlarging their bodies so that they ﬁlled the air, making them small and then enlarging them again; disappearing in midair and instantly reappearing on the earth; entering the earth as if it were water and walking on the water as though on the earth. 
By showing various marvels like these, they puriﬁed their father’s mind and caused him to believe them. 
When their father saw the transcendent powers of his sons, he rejoiced a great deal at his unprecedented experience and addressed his sons with his palms pressed together, saying: Who is your teacher? Whose pupils are you? 
“The two sons said: O great king! 
The Buddha Jaladharagarjitaghoṣa susvarana kṣatrarāja saṃ kusumitābhijña is now sitting on the seat of the Dharma under the seven-jeweled bodhi tree and teaching the Lotus Sutra extensively to the assembly of all the devas and humans in this world. He is our teacher. We are his pupils. “The father said to his sons: 
We have done the Buddha’s work for the sake of our father. We entreat you, O mother, to allow us to renounce household life and practice the bodhisattva path under the guidance of that buddha. “At that time the two sons addressed the mother in verse, wanting to elaborate on this meaning further, saying: We entreat you, O mother, to allow us To renounce household life And to become śrāmaṇas! 
It is more difﬁcult to meet a buddha Than to see uḍumbara ﬂowers. It is also difﬁcult to escape from adversity. We entreat you to allow us To renounce household life. “Their mother addressed them immediately, saying: 
What is the reason for this? 
It is because it is difﬁcult to meet a buddha. “Then the two sons addressed their parents, saying: Splendid! O father and mother! 
We entreat you now to approach and meet the Buddha Jaladharagar jita ghoṣa su svara na kṣatrarāja saṃ kusu mitā bhijña and pay homage to him. 
Why is this? 
Because it is difﬁcult to meet a buddha, just as it is to see uḍumbara ﬂowers or for a oneeyed turtle to ﬁnd the hole in a ﬂoating piece of wood. 
Because of our profound merits accumulated in the past, we were born to meet the Buddha-Dharma. For this reason our father and mother should allow us to renounce household life. 
Why is this? 
Because it is difﬁcult to meet buddhas and it is also difﬁcult to obtain an opportunity for meeting them. “At that time eighty-four thousand women in the palace of King Śubha vyūha all became capable of preserving this Lotus Sutra. 
Bodhisattva Vimala netra had already been versed in the saddharmapuṇḍarīka samādhi for a long time and Bodhisattva Vimalagarbha had also been versed in the sarvasattva pāpa jahana samādhi for immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of kalpas, for he wanted all sentient beings to be separated from evil states of being. 
The consort of that king attained the sarva buddha saṃgīti samādhi and the secret treasure house of the buddhas was revealed to her. In this way the two sons inspired their father through the power of their skillful means and caused him to have faith and pleasure in the Buddha-Dharma. 
“Then King Śubhavyūha together with his subjects and retinue, Queen Vimaladatta together with her servants and retinue, and the two princes together with forty-two thousand people came before the Buddha at the same time. 
Having approached the Buddha, they bowed until their foreheads touched his feet, then circled around him three times and sat to one side. “At that time the Buddha expounded and taught the Buddha-Dharma for the king’s sake, greatly beneﬁting and rejoicing him. 
Then King Śubhavyūha and his queen took off their pearl necklaces worth hundreds of thousands and scattered them over the Buddha. In the air they transformed into a four-pillared jeweled platform. On the platform was a great jeweled bed, spread with hundreds of thousands of myriads of heavenly clothes. The Buddha sat crosslegged upon it, emitting great rays of light. 
Then King Śubhavyūha thought: The Buddha’s form is marvelous, most superior in dignity, and given perfection by the most delicate countenance. “Thereupon the Buddha Jaladharagar jita ghoṣa susvarana kṣatrarāja saṃ kusu mitābhijña addressed the fourfold assembly, saying: Do you see King Śubhavyūha standing with his palms pressed together in my presence? 
This king has become a monk in my Dharma. He will diligently practice the Dharma that aids those on the buddha path, and will become a buddha. He will be called Śālendrarāja. His land will be called Vistīrṇavatī and the kalpa Abhyudgatarāja. 
Such will be his merits. “That king immediately gave his kingdom to his younger brother. He renounced household life and practiced the Buddha-Dharma together with his queen, two sons, and their retinue. For a period of eighty-four thousand years after their renunciation the king continued to make diligent efforts and practiced the Lotus Sutra. 
After this he attained the sarvaguṇālaṃkāravyūha samā dhi. He ascended instantly into the air to a height of seven tāla trees and addressed the Buddha, saying: 
O Bhagavat! My two sons have done the Buddha’s work. Through their miracles they have reformed my erring mind so that I dwell in the Buddha-Dharma. 
These two sons are my good friends; they enabled me to see the Bhagavat. It was because they wanted to nurture the roots of good merit accumulated in my past and beneﬁt me that they were born in my house. “Then the Buddha Jaladharagar jita ghoṣa susvarana kṣatra rāja saṃkusu mitābhijña addressed King Śubhavyūha, saying: 
Exactly! Exactly! It is exactly as you have said. 
If the sons and daughters of a virtuous family make good friends throughout many lives, after having planted roots of good merit, those good friends will perform the Buddha’s work, illuminating, teaching, beneﬁting, and gladdening them, and will cause them to enter highest, complete enlightenment. 
O great king! 
You should know that a good friend is indeed the great spur that brings inspiration to others, causing them to meet a buddha and the thought of highest, complete enlightenment to awaken in them. 
O great king! 
Do you see these two sons? 
These two sons have already paid homage to buddhas equal in number to the sands of sixty-ﬁve hundred thousands of myriads of koṭis of nayutas of Ganges Rivers, closely attended the buddhas with respect, accepted the Lotus Sutra in their presence, and, in their compassion, caused sentient beings with false views to dwell in right views. “Immediately after that, King Śubhavyūha descended from the air and addressed the Buddha, saying: O Bhagavat! The Tathāgata is extraordinary. 
Because he is endowed with merits and wisdom, his topknot is brilliantly illuminated, his deep blue eyes are long and wide, the tuft of hair between his eyebrows is white like the bright moon, his white teeth are even and always shining, and his scarlet lips are like the bimba fruit in their beauty. “At that time King Śubhavyūha praised immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of qualities of the Buddha like these and, again, wholeheartedly addressed the Buddha with his palms pressed together, in the presence of the Tathāgata, saying: O Bhagavat! 
This is unprecedented. 
The Tathāgata’s Dharma is endowed and perfected with inconceivable subtle qualities. His teaching, integrity, and deeds are serene and comfortable. From today on we shall never act selﬁshly and the wrongful thoughts of false views, pride and anger shall never awaken in us. “Having spoken these words he bowed to the Buddha and went away.” The Buddha addressed the great assembly, saying: 
Is King Śubhavyūha someone unknown? 
He is none other than this Bodhisattva Padmaśrī. 
His Queen Vimala datta is none other than this Vairocanaraśmipratimaṇḍitādhvaja rāja now in the presence of the Buddha. 
Because she had compassion for King Śubhavyūha and his retinue, she was born here. 
These two sons are none other than Bodhisattva Bhaiṣajyarāja and Bodhisattva Bhaiṣajyasamudgata. 
These bodhisattvas Bhaiṣa jyarāja and Bhaiṣajyasamudgata perfected great qualities such as these and, having planted many roots of good merit under the guidance of innumerable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of buddhas, perfected inconceivable good merit. 
If anyone holds the names of these two bodhisattvas in memory, the devas and humans in this entire world will certainly pay homage to those bodhisattvas.” When the Buddha taught this chapter, “Ancient Accounts of King Śubha vyūha,” eighty-four thousand people removed themselves from impurity, rid themselves of deﬁlement, and attained pure Dharma-eyes with which to see the teachings. 
Encouragement of Bodhisattva Samantabhadra Thereupon Bodhisattva Samantabhadra, through his effortless transcendent power, dignity, and fame, arrived from the east together with innumerable, limitless, and incalculable numbers of great bodhisattvas. 
All the lands quaked universally wherever he passed. Jeweled lotus ﬂowers rained down and immeasurable hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of kinds of music were heard. 
I entreat you, O Bhagavat, to teach us how the sons and daughters of a virtuous family may attain the Lotus Sutra after the parinirvāṇa of the Tathāgata.” The Buddha said to Bodhisattva Samantabhadra: 
“After the parinirvāṇa of the Tathāgata the sons and daughters of a virtuous family will attain the Lotus Sutra if they achieve the four necessary accomplishments: the ﬁrst is to be protected by the buddhas; the second is to plant roots of good merit; the third is to enter a group of those who are rightly resolute; and the fourth is to awaken the thought of saving all sentient beings. 
Those sons and daughters of a virtuous family will deﬁnitely attain this sutra after the parinirvāṇa of the Tathāgata if they perfect these four accomplishments.” Then Bodhisattva Samantabhadra addressed the Buddha, saying: 
If there are those who preserve this sutra in the troubled world of ﬁve hundred years after, I will protect them and rid them of their heavy cares, cause them to attain happiness, and allow no one to strike at them through their weaknesses. I will not give Māra any chance to afﬂict them, nor the sons of Māra, daughters of Māra, minions of Māra, those possessed by Māra, yakṣas, rākṣasas, kumbhāṇḍas, piśācas, kṛtyas, pūtanas, or vetālas. 
If they recite this sutra, whether walking or standing, I will then come before them on a white elephant king with six tusks, together with the assembly of great bodhisattvas, manifest myself, pay homage and protect them, and console their minds for the sake of revering the Lotus Sutra. 
If they sit contemplating upon this sutra, I will then manifest myself before them on a white elephant king. If they forget a single line or a verse in the Lotus Sutra, I will teach and recite it with them and cause them to become proﬁcient in it. 
At that time those who accept and recite the Lotus Sutra will be able to see me and, greatly rejoicing, will thus make further efforts. As a result of seeing me they will attain the samādhi and dhāraṇīs named āvartā dhāraṇī, koṭīśatasahasrāvartā dhāraṇī, and sarva ruta kauśalyāvartā dhāraṇī. They will attain dhāraṇīs like these. O Bhagavat! 
In the troubled world of ﬁve hundred years after those monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen who seek, preserve, recite, copy, and wish to practice this Lotus Sutra should persevere singlemindedly for twenty-one days. 
After a full twenty-one days I will appear on a white elephant with six tusks, accompanied by innumerable bodhisattvas who themselves will also be surrounded by their retinues, and manifest myself before sentient beings in whatever form they wish to see. Then I will expound and teach the Dharma to them and gladden them. I will also give them a dhāraṇīspell. When they attain this dhāraṇī, nonhumans will have no power to destroy them and women no power to trouble them. 
I entreat you, O Bhagavat, to allow me to teach this dhāraṇī.” Thus he taught the spell in the presence of the Buddha, saying: 
Adaṇḍe daṇḍapati daṇḍāvartani daṇḍakuśale daṇḍa sudhāri sudhāri sudhārapati buddhapaśyane sarvadhāraṇī āvartani sarvabhāṣyā vartane su-āvartane saṃghaparīkṣani saṃ gha nirghātani asaṃge saṃgāpa-gate tṛ-adhvasaṃgatulya prāpte sarvasaṃgasamatikrānte sarvadharma suparīkṣite sarva sattvarutakauśalyānugate siṃhavikrīḍite. 
If there is any bodhisattva who hears this dhāraṇī, he should know it is because of the transcendent power of Samantabhadra. If there is anyone who accepts the Lotus Sutra practiced in Jambudvīpa, he should think: ‘This is nothing but Samantabhadra’s virtuous power.’ If there is anyone who preserves, recites, correctly remembers, understands this meaning, and practices in accordance with the teaching, know that they are practicing the practice of Samantabhadra. They plant deep roots of good merit in the presence of innumerable and limitless buddhas. 
If they copy this sutra, after their death they will be born in the Trāyastriṃśa Heaven. At that time eighty-four thousand heavenly maidens will welcome them, performing various kinds of music. They will wear seven-jeweled coronets and be happy among their female servants. 
How much more for those who preserve, recite, remember correctly, understand the meaning, and practice in accordance with the teaching! If there is anyone who preserves, recites, and understands this meaning, at the end of their life a thousand buddhas will offer their hands, so that they will neither be afraid nor fall into the troubled states of being. 
They will thus arrive in the Tuṣita Heaven of Bodhisattva Maitreya, who is endowed with the thirtytwo marks and surrounded by an assembly of great bodhisattvas and a retinue of hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of heavenly maidens. There they will be born and such will be their merit and beneﬁts. 
For this reason the wise should wholeheartedly copy, move others to copy, preserve, recite, and remember it correctly and practice in accordance with the teaching. O Bhagavat! 
Through my transcendent powers I will now protect, extensively distribute and keep this sutra from extermination in Jambudvīpa after the pari nirvāṇa of the Tathāgata.” Thereupon the Buddha Śākyamuni praised him, saying: 
You will protect this sutra and bring beneﬁt and happiness to sentient beings in many places. 
You have already accomplished inconceivable merits and profound compassion. Long, long ago the thought of highest, complete enlightenment awakened in you, and you made this vow of transcendent power: ‘I will protect this sutra. 
Through my transcendent powers I will protect the one who holds to the name of Bodhisattva Samanta bhadra.’ O Samantabhadra! 
If there is anyone who preserves, recites, correctly remembers, practices, and copies this Lotus Sutra, they should know that they will meet the Buddha Śākya muni and hear this sutra from the mouth of the Buddha. By this they should know that they are paying homage to the Buddha Śākyamuni. 
They should know that they will be praised by the Śākyamuni Buddha with the word ‘Splendid!’ They should know that the hand of the Buddha Śākyamuni will caress their heads. 
They should know that they will be clad in the robe of the Buddha Śākyamuni. Such people are not attached to worldly pleasures. 
They are not pleased to consort with heretics, wicked people, butchers, those who keep boars, sheep, chickens, or dogs, hunters, or those who make a living by pandering. They will be honest in mind, and will have correct recollection and the power of merit. They will not be troubled by the three kinds of poison. Nor will they be confused by jealousy, selﬁshness, false pride, or arrogance. 
O Samantabhadra! If you meet anyone who preserves and recites the Lotus Sutra ﬁve hundred years after the parinirvāṇa of the Tathāgata, you should think like this: This man will before long approach the terrace of enlightenment, destroy the hosts of Māra, attain highest, complete enlightenment, turn the wheel of the Dharma, beat the drum of the Dharma, blow the conch of the Dharma, pour down the rain of the Dharma, and will sit on the lion seat of the Dharma in the great assembly of devas and humans. 
“O Samantabhadra! Those who preserve and recite this sutra in the future world will not be greedy for clothes, bedding, food and drink, and the necessities of life. Their aspirations will not be unrewarded, and their happy reward will be attained in this world. 
If there is anyone who despises them, saying: ‘You are mad. This practice of yours is in vain and will attain nothing at the end,’ they will have no eyes lifetime after lifetime as a retribution for this wrongdoing. 
If there is anyone who pays them homage and praises them, he will attain tangible rewards in this world. 
If anyone sees those who preserve this sutra and speaks maliciously about their faults, whether true or not, such a person will suffer from leprosy in this life. 
If anyone scorns them, that person’s teeth will be either loose or missing; their lips will be ugly, their nose will be ﬂat, their limbs will be crooked; they will squint; their body will stink and be dirty, suffering from evil tumors, oozing pus; their belly will swell with water; and they will have tuberculosis and other evil and serious illnesses. 
For this reason, O Samantabhadra, if you see anyone who holds to this sutra, you should stand up and show your respect even from afar, just as you would pay homage to the Buddha.” When this chapter, “Encouragement of Bodhisattva Samantabhadra,” was being taught, innumerable and limitless bodhisattvas equal in number to the sands of Ganges Rivers attained hundreds of thousands of myriads of koṭis of dhāraṇīs named āvartā, and bodhisattvas equal to the number of atoms in the manifold cosmos mastered the path of Samantabhadra. 
When the Buddha had taught this sutra, the entire great assembly of bodhisattvas including Samantabhadra, the śrāvakas including Śāriputra, devas, nāgas, humans, and nonhumans rejoiced greatly, accepted the Buddha’s words, bowed to him and departed. 

	
1. Never are any existing things found to originate From themselves, from something else, from both, or from no cause. 2. There are four conditioning causes: A cause  , objects of sensations , “immediately preceding condition,”  and of course the predominant influence——there is no fifth.
3. Certainly there is no self-existence  of existing things in conditioning causes, etc;
And if no self-existence exists, neither does “other-existence” .
4. The efficient cause  does not exist possessing a conditioning cause,
Nor does the efficient cause exist without possessing a conditioning cause.
Conditioning causes are not without efficient causes,
Nor are there  which possess efficient causes.
5. Certainly those things are called “conditioning causes” whereby something originates after having come upon them;
As long as something has not originated, why are they not so long  “non-conditioning-causes”?
6. There can be a conditioning cause neither of a non-real thing  nor of a real thing .
Of what non-real thing is there a conditioning cause? And if it is  real, what use is a cause?
7. If an element  occurs which is neither real nor non-real  nor both realand-nonreal , How can there be a cause which is effective in this situation? 8. Just that which is without an object of sensation is accepted as a real element;
Then if there is an element having no object of sensation, how is it possible to have an object of sensation?
9. When no elements have originated,  disappearance is not possible.
Therefore it is not proper to speak of an ”immediately preceding condition”; for if something has already ceased, what cause is there for it.
10. Since existing things which have no self-existence are not real,
It is not possible at all that: “This thing ‘becomes’ upon the existence of that other one.”
11. The product does not reside in the conditioning causes, individually or collectively,
So how can that which does not reside in the conditioning cause result from conditioning causes?
12. Then the “non-real” would result from those conditioning-causes.
Why then would a product not proceed also from non-causes?
13. On the one hand, the product  conditioning causes; on the other hand, the causes do not consist of themselves.
How can a product  from  not consisting of themselves be consisting of those causes?
14. Therefore, that product does not consist in those causes;  it is agreed that a product does not consist of non-causes.
How  a conditioning cause or non-cause when a product is not produced?
1.  That which is already gone to  is not that which is “being gone to” ; more so, “that which is not yet gone to”  is certainly not that “being gone to.”
Also, the “present going to”  without “that which is already gone to” and “that which is not yet gone to” is not “being gone to”. 2.
Where there is activity  there is a “process of going” , and that activity  is in the “present going to” .
Then “process of going”  is inherent in the “present going to”   the activity  is not in “that which is already gone to”  nor in “that which is not yet gone to.”
3. How will the “act of going”  of “present going to”  be produced,
Since both kinds of the “act of going”   simply are not produced  in the “present going to” ?
4. Having the “act of going”  of “present going to”  has necessarily resulted in a lack of “the present going to”  of the “process of going” ,
For the “present going to”  is the “being gone to” .
5.  the “act of going”  of “present going to”  results in two  “acts of going” :
One by which there is “present going to” , the other which is the “act of going” .
6. Two “goers”  would fallaciously follow as a consequence of two “acts of going,”
Since certainly the “act of going”  is not produced without a “goer”.
7. If there is no going   without a “goer” ,
How will the “goer”  come into being when there is no “going”  ?
8. The “goer” does not go ; consequently a “non-goer” certainly does not go .
What third  goes  other than the “goer” and “non-goer”?
9. It is said: “The ‘goer’ goes”  How is that possible,
When without the “act of going”  no “goer” is produced?
10. Those who hold the view that the “goer” “goes”  must  conclude
That there is a “goer” without the “act of going”  since the “act of going”  is obtained  by a “goer.”
11. If the “goer” “goes” , then two acts of going   follow;
that by which the “going on”  is designated, and  the real “goer”  who “goes”.
12. The “state of going to”  is not begun in “that which is already gone to” , nor in “that which is not yet gone to” ;
Nor is the “state of going to” begun in “present going to” . Where then is it begun?
13. “Present going to”  does not exist previous to the beginning of the “act of going,”  nor does “that which is already gone to”  exist where the “act of going”  should begin.
How can the “act of going”   in “that which is not yet gone to” ?
14. It is mentally fabricated what is “that which is already gone to” , “present going to”  and “that which is not yet gone to” ;
Therefore, the beginning of the “act of going”  is not seen in any way.
15. A “goer” does not remain unmoved ; then certainly the “non-goer” does not remain unmoved.
What third  other than “goer” and “non-goer” can thus remain unmoved?
16. It is said that a “goer” continues to be . But how can that be possible,
Since a “goer” lacking the “act of going”  is simply not produced?
17.  does not continue to be  as a result of “present going to”  or “that which is already gone to”  or “that which is not yet gone to,”
For then the act of going   origination while the “process of going”  would be the same as cessation.
18. Thus it does not obtain that the "goer" is simply "what is going" .
Likewise it does not obtain that: "Then the 'goer' is something other that what is in the 'process of going' ."
19. And if the “act of going”  and the “goer” are identical,
The fallacy logically follows that the “person acting”  and the action  are identical.
20. Alternatively, if the “goer” is different from the “process of going” ,
The “act of going”  would exist without the “goer” and the “goer” would exist without the “act of going.”
21. Neither the identity nor the essential difference is established  regarding the two .
If these two  are not established, in what way is  to be understood?
22. The “goer” is defined by that which is in the “process of going” ; he does not go to that  which is determined by the “process of going”  because there is no prior “process of going”.
Indeed someone goes somewhere. 23. The “goer” does not go to that  other than that “process of going” by which he is defined as “goer”,
Because when one goes   two “processes of going”  cannot be produced.
24. A real “goer” does not motivate three kinds of “acts of going”: ;
Nor does a non-real  motivate three kinds of motion.
25. Also, a real-non-real  does not motivate three kinds of motion.
Therefore, the “process of going” ,the “goer”  and “a destination to be gone to”  do not exist .
1. Vision, hearing, smelling, tasting, touching and thought
Are the six sense faculties. The area of their concern is that which is seen  and so forth.
2. Certainly vision does not in any way see its own self.
Now if it does not see its own self, how can it possibly see something else?
3. An understanding of vision is not attained through the example of fire .
4. When no vision occurs, nothing whatsoever is being seen. How, then, is it possible to say: Vision sees?
5. Therefore, vision does not see, and “no-vision” does not see. Nevertheless, it is explained that also the “seer” is to be known only by his vision.
6. There is no “seer” with vision or without vision;
Therefore, if there is no “seer,” how can there be vision and the object seen? 7. As the birth of a son is said to occur presupposing the mother and the father, Knowledge is said to occur presupposing the eye being dependent on the visible forms.
8. Since the “object seen” and the vision do not exist , there is no four-fold : knowledge, etc. . Also, then, how will the acquisition   and its consequences  be produced?
9.  hearing, smelling, tasting, touching and thought are explained as vision.
Indeed one should not apprehend the “hearer,” “what is heard,” etc. .
1. Visible form  is not perceived without the basic cause of visible form ;
Likewise the basic cause of visible form does not appear without the visible form. 2. If the visible form existed apart from its basic cause, it would logically follow that visible form is without cause;
But there is nothing anywhere  without cause.
3. On the other hand, if there would be a basic cause apart from visible form, The basic cause would be without any product; but there is no basic cause without a product.
4. Just as when there is visible form no basic cause of form obtains,
So when there is no visible form no basic cause of form obtains.
5. Furthermore, it does not obtain that no visible form exists without a basic cause,
One should not construe any constructs concerning the form.
6. Just as it does not obtain that the product is the same as the cause,
So it does not obtain that product is not the same as the cause.
7. Also, sensation, thought, mental conception, conditioned elements  and
All “things”  are to be dealt with in the same way as visible form.
8. Whoever argues against “emptiness” in order to refute an argument,
For him everything, including the point of contention  is known to be unrefuted.
9. Whoever argues by means of “emptiness” in order to explain an understanding,
For him, everything including the point to be proved  is known to be misunderstood.
1. Space does not exist at all before the defining characteristic of space .
If it would exist before the defining characteristic, then one must falsely conclude that there would be something without a defining characteristic.
2. In no case has anything existed without a defining characteristic.
If an entity without a defining characteristic does not exist, to what does the defining characteristic apply?
3. There is no functioning of a defining characteristic in a case where there is  a defining characteristic or where there is not a defining characteristic.
And it can function in nothing except where there is a defining characteristic or where there is not a defining characteristic.
4. When there is no related function  , it is not possible to have “that to which a defining characteristic applies.”
And if “that to which a defining characteristic applies” is not possible, then a defining characteristic cannot come into existence.
5. Therefore, “that to which a defining characteristic applies” does not exist ; and certainly a defining characteristic itself does not exist .
Now, something does not exist without “that to which a defining characteristic applies” and the defining characteristic.
6. If the existing thing   does not exist, how then would the non-existing thing   come into existence?
And who holds: the existing-and-non-existing  thing which does not have the properties of an existing-and-non-existing thing ?
7. Therefore space is neither an existing thing nor a non-existing thing, neither something to which a defining characteristic applies  nor a defining characteristic.
Also, the other five irreducible elements can be considered in the same way as space.
8. But those unenlightened people who either affirm reality or non-reality
Do not perceive the blessed cessation-of-appearance of existing things.
6: An Analysis of Desire  and One Who Desires
1. If the “one who desires” would exist before desire itself, then desire may be regarded.
When desire becomes related to “one who desires,” then desire comes into existence.
2. If there is no one who desires, how then will desire come into being?
whether desire exists or does not exist likewise holds true for the one who desires.
3. Further, it is not possible for both desire and the one who desires to be produced concomitantly.
Indeed, desire and the one who desires come into being independent of each other.
4. Concomitance does not exist in that which is only one thing,  certainly something which is only one thing cannot be concomitant.
But yet, how will concomitance come into being if there are separate  things?
5. If concomitance applied to that which is only one thing, then that one “with concomitance” would be that one “without .”
If concomitance applied to separate things, then that one “with concomitance” would be that one “without .”
6. And if concomitance applied to separate things, what is the proof for the separation of both desire and the one who desires,
that which is non-separate is concomitant.
7. Or, if the separateness of desire and the one who desires really were proved,
Why do you imagine the concomitance of them both?
8. You postulate concomitance by saying: neither is proved separate from .
you postulate separateness even more to prove concomitance.
9. Because separateness is not proved, concomitance is not proved.
What kind of separateness must exist for you to establish concomitance?
10. Thus there is no proof that the desire is concomitant with or not concomitant with one who desires.
From  desire  every fundamental element  there is no proof of concomitance or non-concomitance.
1. If origination  is a composite product, then the three characteristics  are appropriate.
But if origination is a non-composite , then how  characteristics of a composite product?
2. When the three are separate, origination of either of the other two characteristics does not suffice to function as a characteristic. If united in a composite product, how could they all be at one place at one time?
3. If origination, duration, and dissolution are other  characteristics of composite products,
It is an infinite regress. If this is not so, they are not composite products.
4. The “originating origination”   is only the origination of the basic origination  ;
Also the origination of the basic   produces the “originating origination.”
5. But if, according to you, the originating origination  produces basic origination,
How, according to you, will this   produce that   if  is not produced by basic origination ?
6. If, according to you, that which has originated through basic   produces basic ,
How does the basic , which is yet unproduced by that  , cause that   to be originated?
7. According to you, this, while originating, would certainly cause that to originate—
If this, not being produced, would be able to cause origination.
8. As a light is the illuminator of both itself and that which is other than itself,
So origination would originate both itself and that which is other than itself.
9. There is no darkness in the light and there where the light is placed.
What could the light illumine? Indeed illumination is the getting rid of darkness.
10. How is darkness destroyed by the light being originated,
When the light, being originated, does not come in contact with darkness?
11. But then, if darkness is destroyed by a light having no contact with ,
placed here will destroy the darkness of the entire world.
12. If the light illuminated both itself and that which is other than itself, Then, without a doubt, darkness will cover both itself and that which is other than itself.
13. If it has not yet originated, how does origination produce itself?
And if it has already originated, when it is being produced, what is produced after that which is already produced?
14. In no way does anything originate by what is being originated , by what is already originated , or by what is not yet originated —
Just as it has been said in  “presently going to ,” “that which is already gone to ” and “that which is not yet gone to .”
15. When, in that-which-is-originated , there is nothing which activates that which is being originated ,
How can one say: That which is being originated   presupposing that which is produced?
16. Whatever comes into existence presupposing something else is without self-existence .
an allayment of “being originated,” so  of that which is originated .
17. If some particular thing which is not yet originated  is indeed known to exist,
That thing will be originated. What originates if it does not exist?
18. And if the origination originates that which is being originated ,
What origination, in turn, would originate that origination?
19. If another origination originates that , there will be an infinite regress of originations.
But if non-origination is that which is origination, then everything  would originate.
20. It is not possible that what has originated either exists or does not exist,
Nor that what has not originated either exists or does not exist; this has been demonstrated earlier.
21. The origination of something being destroyed is not possible;
And whatever is not being destroyed, that entity is not possible.
22. Neither an “entity that has endured ”  nor an “entity that has not endured ” endures;
Not even something enduring  endures. And what endures if it is not originated?
23. Duration is not possible of a thing that is being destroyed.
But whatever is not being destroyed, that thing  is  not possible.
24. Because every entity always  the law of old age and death,
What entities are there which endure without old age and death?
25. The enduring quality of a different duration is as impossible as of that same duration,
So the origination of origination is neither itself nor that which is other than itself.
26. “That which has ceased ”  does not cease; and “that which has not ceased ” does not cease;
Nor even “that which is ceasing .” For, what can cease  produced?
27. Therefore cessation of an enduring entity is not possible.
Moreover, cessation of a non-enduring entity is not possible.
28. Indeed, a state  does not cease because of this state;
And a different state  does not cease because of a different state.
29. So, if the production of all dharmas is not possible,
Then neither is the cessation of all  dharmas possible.
30. Therefore cessation of a real existing entity is not possible;
And certainly both an existing entity and a non-existing entity cannot be possible in the same case.
31. Even more, cessation of a non-real existing entity is not possible.
Just as there is no second decapitation!
32. There is no cessation by means of itself; nor cessation by something other than itself;
Just as there is no origination of origination by itself nor by another.
33. Because the existence of production, duration, and cessation is not proved, there is no composite product ;
And if a composite product is not proved, how can a non-composite product  be proved?
34. As a magic trick, a dream or a fairy castle.
Just so should we consider origination, duration, and cessation.
1. A real producer does not produce a real product.
Even more so, a non-real producer does not seek a non-real product.
2. There is no producing action of a real thing;  there would be a product without someone producing. Also, there is no producing by a real thing;  there would be someone producing without something produced.
3. If a non-existent producer would produce a non-real product,
The product would be without a causal source and the producer would be without a causal source.
4. If there is no causal source, there is nothing to be produced nor cause-in-general .
Then neither do the producing action, the person producing, nor the instrument of production  exist.
5. If the producing action, etc. do not exist, then neither can the true reality  nor false reality  exist.
If neither the true reality nor the false reality exists, then also the product  born from that does not exist.
6. If there is no real product, then there also exists no path to heaven nor to ultimate release.
Thus it logically follows that all producing actions are without purpose.
7. And a real-nonreal producer does not produce in a real-nonreal manner.
For, indeed, how can “real” and “non-real,” which are mutually contradictory, occur in one place?
8. A real producer  does not produce what is non-real, and a non-real producer does not produce what is real. indeed, all the mistakes must logically follow.
9. The producer, who is neither real nor non-real, does not produce a product which is either real or non-real, Because of the reasons which have been advanced earlier. 10. The non-real producer does not produce a product which is not real, nor both real-and-non-real,
Because of the reasons which have been advanced earlier.
11. And a real-non-real producer does not produce a product which is neither real nor non-real. This is evident from the reasons which have been advanced earlier.
12. The producer proceeds being dependent on the product, and the product proceeds being dependent on the producer.
The cause for realization  is seen in nothing else.
13. In the same way one should understand the “acquiring”  on the basis of the “giving up,” etc. of the producer and the product. By means of  the product and the producer all other things should be dissolved.
1. Certain people say: Prior to seeing hearing, and other  together with sensation and other
Is that to which they belong.
2.  How will there be seeing, etc. of someone  who does not exist?
Therefore, there exists a definite  entity before that .
3. But that definite entity is previous to sight, hearing, etc., and sensation, etc — How can that  be known?
4. And if that  is determined without sight ,
Then, undoubtedly, those  will exist without that .
5. Someone becomes manifest by something ; something is manifest by someone.
How would someone exist without something? How would something exist without someone?
6. Someone does not exist previous to  sight and all the other  together.
he is manifested by any one of  sight, etc., at any one time.
7. But if nothing exists previous to sight and all the other  together,
How could that  exist individually before sight, etc.?
8.  if that  were the “seer,” that  were the “hearer,” that  were the one who senses,
Then one  would exist previous to each. Therefore, this  is not logically justified.
9. On the other hand, if the “seer” were someone else, or the “hearer” were someone else, or the one who senses were someone else,
Then there would be a “hearers when there was already a “seer,” and that would mean a multiplicity of “selves” .
10. In those elements  from which seeing, hearing, etc., and sensation, etc., arise–
Even in those elements that  does not exist.
11. When he to whom seeing, hearing, etc., and feeling, etc. belong does not exist,
Then certainly they do not exist.
12. For him who does not exist previous to, at the same time, or after seeing, etc.
The conception “He exists,” “He does not exist,” is dissipated.
1. If fire is identical to its kindling, then it is both producer and product.
And if fire is different from kindling, then surely  exists without kindling .
2. A  which is perpetually burning would exist without a cause, which is kindling, Since another beginning would be pointless; in this case  is without its object . 3.  is without a cause, namely kindling, if it were independent of anything else;
In which case another beginning would be pointless, and there is perpetual burning.
4. If it is maintained: Kindling is that which is being kindled,
By what is kindling kindled, since kindling is only that ? It is inherent existence that would make extinguishing / liberation impossible
5. , when different and not obtained , will not obtain; not burning, it will not burn later;
Without extinction, it will not be extinguished; if there is no extinction, then it will remain with its own characteristics.
6. If fire is different from kindling it could obtain the kindling
As a woman obtains a husband, and a man  a wife.
7. Though fire is different from kindling, it could indeed obtain the kindling,
On the condition that both fire and kindling can be reciprocally differentiated .
8. If the fire is dependent on the kindling, and if the kindling is dependent on the fire
Which is attained first, dependent on which they are fire and kindling?
9. If fire is dependent on kindling, so is the proof of the proved fire.
Thus, being kindling it will exist without fire.
10. When a thing  is proved by being dependent on something else, then it proves the other by being dependent .
If that which is required for dependence must be proved, then what is dependent on what?
11. If that thing is proved by being dependent, how can that which has not been proved be dependent?
So, that which is proved is dependent; but the dependence is not possible.
12. Fire does not exist in relation to kindling; and fire does not exist unrelated to kindling.
Kindling does not exist in relation to fire; and kindling does not exist unrelated to fire.
13. Fire does not come from something else; and fire does not exist in kindling. The remaining  in regard to kindling is described by  “that which is being gone to,” “that which is gone to” and ”that which is not yet gone to.”
14. Fire is not identical to kindling, but fire is not in anything other than kindling.
Fire does not have kindling as its property; also, the kindling is not in fire and vice versa.
15. By  fire and kindling the syllogism of the individual self  and “the acquiring”
Is fully and completely explained, as well as “the jar” and “the cloth” and other .
16. Those who specify the nature of the individual self and of existing things  as radically different—
Those people I do not regard as ones who know the sense of the teaching.
1. The great ascetic  said: “The extreme limit  of the past cannot be discerned.”
“Existence-in-flux”  is without bounds; indeed, there is no beginning nor ending of that .
2. How could there be a middle portion of that which has no “before” and “after”;
It follows that “past,” “future,” and “simultaneous events” do not obtain.
Birth and death are not separate / different, not simultaneous / the same. 3. If birth  the former, and growing old and dying  coming into being later,
Then birth exists without growing old and dying, and  is born without death.
4. If birth were later, and growing old and dying were earlier,
How would there be an uncaused growing old and dying of something unborn?
5. And a birth which is simultaneous with growing old and dying is likewise impossible;
For, that which is being born would die, and both would be without cause.
6. Since the past, future, and simultaneous activity do not originate,
To what purpose  explain in detail  birth, growing old and dying?
7. That which is produced and its cause, as well as the characteristic and that which is characterized,
The sensation and the one who senses, and whatever other things there are —
8. Not only is the former limit of existence-in-flux  not to be found,
But the former limit of all those things is not to be found.
1. Some say:
Sorrow  is produced by oneself , or by another , or by both  , or from no cause at all ; But  that  as what is produced is not possible.
2. If it were produced by itself , it would not exist dependent on something else.
Certainly those “groups of universal elements”  exist presupposing these “groups.”
3. If these were different from those, or if those were different from these,
Sorrow  would be produced by something other than itself , because those would be made by these others.
4. If sorrow  is made through one’s own personality  , then one’s own personality would be without sorrow ;
Who is that “own personality” by which sorrow  is self-produced ?
5. If sorrow  were produced by a different personality  ,
How would he, to whom is given that sorrow  by another after he had produced it, be without sorrow ?
6. If sorrow  is produced by a different personality, who is that different personality
Who, while being without sorrow , yet makes and transmits that  to the other?
7. It is not established that sorrow  is self-produced ,  how is  produced by another ?
Certainly the sorrow , which would be produced by another , in his case would be self-produced .
8. Sorrow  is not self-produced , for that which is produced is certainly not produced by that .
If the “other”  is not produced by the individual self , how would sorrow  be that produced by another?
9. Sorrow  could be made by both   if it could be produced by either one.
not produced by another, and not self-produced  —how can sorrow  exist without a caused
10. Not only are the four  interpretations not possible in respect to sorrow ,
none of the four  interpretations is possible even in respect to external things .
1. A thing of which the basic elements are deception is vain, as the glorious one said.
All conditioned elements  are things that have basic elements  which are deception; therefore, they are vain.
2. “If that which has deceptive basic elements is vain, what is there which deceives?”
This was spoken by the glorious one to illuminate “emptiness.”
3. There is non-self-existence of things  a thing, by observation,  something else.
A thing without self-existence does not exist—due to the emptiness of existing things.
4. If self-existence does not exist, whose “other-existence” would there be?
. 
If self-existence does exist, whose “other-existence” would there be?
5. Just as there is no other-existence of a thing, so also  of something else is not possible—
Since a youth is not aging , and since “who has already aged” is not aging .
6. If there would be an other-existence of a thing, milk would exist as curds.
surely “being curds” will be something other than milk.
7. If something would be non-empty, something would  be empty
But nothing is non-empty, so how will it become empty?
8. Emptiness is proclaimed by the victorious one as the refutation of all viewpoints;
But those who hold “emptiness” as a viewpoint— have called those “incurable” .
1. That which is seen, sight, and the “seer”: these three Do not combine together either in pairs or altogether.
2. Desire, the one who desires, and the object of desire have to be regarded in the same way,
the impurities which remain and the three kinds of “base of sense”  which remain.
3.  There is unification  of one different thing with another different thing;  since the differentness
Of what is seen, etc. does not exist, those  do not enter into unification.
4. Not only does the differentness of that which is seen, etc. not exist,
Also the differentness of something coming from another does not obtain.
5. A thing is different insofar as it presupposes a second different thing. One thing is not different from another thing without the other thing.
6. If one different thing is different from a second different thing, it exists without a second different thing;
But without a second different thing, one different thing does not exist as a different thing.
7. Differentness does not exist in a different thing, nor in what is not different.
When differentness does not exist, then there is neither what is different nor “this” .
8. Unification is not possible by  one thing with that one thing, nor by  one thing with a different thing;
Thus, the becoming unified, the state of being united, and the one who unites are not possible.
1. The production of a self-existent thing by a conditioning cause is not possible,
being produced through dependence on a cause, a self-existent thing would be “something which is produced” .
2. How, indeed, will a self-existent thing become “something which is produced”?
Certainly, a self-existent thing  is “not-produced” and is independent of anything else.
3. If there is an absence of a self-existent thing, how will an other-existent thing  come into being?
Certainly the self-existence of an other-existent thing is called ”other-existence.”
4. Further, how can a thing  without either self-existence or other-existence?
If either self-existence or other existence exist, then an existing thing, indeed, would be proved.
5. If there is no proof of an existent thing, then a non-existent thing cannot be proved.
Since people call the other-existence of an existent thing a “non-existent thing.”
6. Those who perceive self-existence and other-existence, and an existent thing and a non-existent thing,
Do not perceive the true nature of the Buddha’s teaching.
7. In “The Instruction of Katyayana” both “it is” and “it is not” are opposed
By the Glorious One, who has ascertained the meaning of “existent” and non-existent.”
8. If there would be an existent thing by its own nature, there could not be “non-existence’ of that .
Certainly an existent thing different from its own nature would never obtain.
9.  If there is no basic self-nature , of what will there be “otherness”?
If there is basic self-nature, of what will there be “otherness”?
10. “It is” is a notion of eternity. “It is not” is a nihilistic view.
Therefore, one who is wise does not have recourse to “being” or “non-being.”
11. That which exists by its own nature is eternal since “it does not not-exist.”
If it is maintained: “That which existed before does not exist now,” there annihilation would logically follow.
1. When conditioned elements  continue to change , they do not continue to change as eternal things .
Likewise they do not continue to change as non-eternal things . The arguments here is the same as for a living being.
2. If the personality would change when it is sought five ways in the “groups” , “bases of sense perception” , and the “irreducible elements” , Then it does not exist. Who  will change ?
3. Moving from “acquisition”  to “acquisition” would be “that which is without existence” .
Who is he who is without existence and without acquisition? To what will he change ?
4. The final cessation  of the conditioned elements certainly is not possible at all.
Nor is the final cessation of even a living being possible at all.
5. The conditioned elements, whose nature  is arising and destruction, neither are bound nor released.
Likewise a living being neither is bound nor released.
6. If the acquisition  were the “binding,” that one  the acquisition is not bound;
Nor is that one not having the acquisition bound. Then in what condition is he bound?
7. Certainly if the “binding” would exist before “that which is bound,” then it must bind;
But that does not exist. The remaining  is stated in  “the present going to,” “that which has already gone to” and “that which has not yet gone to.”
8. Therefore, “that which is bound” is not released and “that which is not bound” is likewise not released.
If “that which is bound” were released, “being bound” and “release” would exist simultaneously.
9. “I will be released without any acquisition.” “Nirvana will be mine.”
Those who understand thus hold too much to “a holding on” .
10. Where there is a super-imposing of nirvana , nor a removal of existence-in-flux,
What is the existence-in-flux there?
What nirvana is imagined?
1. The state of mind which is self-disciplined, being favorably disposed toward others,
And friendship: that is the dharma; that is the seed for the fruit now and after death.
2. The most perceptive seer  has said that there is action  as volition and as a result of having willed.
The variety of acts of that  has been explained in many ways.
3. Thus, that action which is called “volition”: that is considered  as mental;
But that action which is a result of having willed: that is considered  as physical or verbal.
4. Sound , gesture  and that which does not rest which is considered as unknown ,
Also the other unknown which is considered to be at rest ;
5. That which is pure as a result of enjoyment , that which is impure as a result of enjoyment ,
And volition : these seven basic elements  are considered  as the modes of action.
6. If an action  by enduring to the time of its fulfillment, that  would be eternal.
If  were stopped—being stopped, what will it produce?
7. There is fruit  when a process, a sprout, etc., starts from a seed; But without a seed that  does not proceed.
8. Inasmuch as the process is dependent on a seed and the fruit is produced from the process,
The fruit, presupposing the seed, neither comes to an end nor is eternal.
9. There is a product  when a mental process starts from a thoughts;
But without a thought that  does not proceed.
10. Inasmuch as the process is dependent on a thought and the product  is produced from the process,
The product, presupposing the thought, neither comes to an end nor is eternal.
11. The ten pure “paths of action” are means for realizing the dharma.
And the five qualities of desired objects  are fruits  of the dharma both now and after death.
12. There would be many great mistakes if that explanation .
Therefore, that explanation is not possible.
13. In rebuttal I will explain the interpretation which can be made to fit ,
That which is followed by the Buddha, the self-sufficient enlightened ones  and the disciples .
14. As “that which is imperishable” is like a credit , so an action  is like a debt.
of four kinds in its elements  ; in its essential nature it cannot be analyzed.
15.  is not destroyed qua destruction; rather it is destroyed according to spiritual discipline.
Therefore, the fruit of actions originates by the imperishable force.
16. If  were that which is destroyed by  destruction or by transference of action,
Fallacies  the destruction of action would logically result. 17. At the moment of transition that
Of all identical and different actions belonging to the same element  originates.
18. That  is the dharma, having arisen by one action after another in visible existence;
And it remains  even in the development of all bifurcating action.
19. That  is destroyed by death and by avoiding the product  .
There the difference is characterized as impure and pure.
20. “Emptiness,” “no annihilation,” existence-in-flux, “non-eternity,”
And the imperishable reality of action: such was the teaching taught by the Buddha. 
21. Why does the action not originate? Because it is without self-existence. Since it does not originate, it does not perish.
22. If an action did exist as a self-existent thing, without a doubt, it would be eternal.
An action would be an unproduced thing; certainly, there is no eternal thing which is produced.
23. If the action were not produced, then there could be the fear attaining something from “something not produced”;
Then the opposite to a saintly discipline would follow as a fallacy.
24. Then, undoubtedly, all daily affairs would be precluded.
And even the distinction between saints and sinners is not possible.
25. Then an act whose development had taken place would develop again,
If an act, because it persists, exists through its own nature. 26. An action is that whose “self”  is desire, and the desires do not really exist.
If these desires do not really exist, how would the action really exist?
27. Action and desire are declared to be the conditioning cause of the body.
If action and desire are empty, what need one say about “body”? 28.
The man shrouded in ignorance, and chained by craving
Is one who seeks enjoyment. He is not different from the one who acts, nor identical to it.
29. Since action is not “originated presupposing the conditions” nor fails to arise from presupposing the conditions,
There is no one acting.
30. If there is no action, how could there be one who acts and the product of action?
And if there is no product, how can there be an enjoyer of the product?
31. Just as a teacher, by his magical power, formed a magical form,
And this magical form formed again another magical form—
32. Just so the “one who forms” is himself being formed magically; and the act performed by him
Is like a magical form being magically formed by another magical form.
33. Desires, actions, bodies, producers, and products
Are like a fairy castle, resembling a mirage, a dream.
1. If the individual self  were  the “groups” , then it would partake of origination and destruction.
If  were different from the “groups,” then it would be without the characteristics of the “groups.”
2. If the individual self does not exist, how then will there be something which is “my own”?
There is lack of possessiveness and no ego on account of the cessation of self and that which is “my own.”
3. He who is without possessiveness and who has no ego — He, also, does not exist.
Whoever sees “he who is without possessiveness” or “he who has no ego”  does not see.
4. When “I” and “mine” have stopped, then also there is not an outside nor an inner self.
The “acquiring”   is stopped; on account of that destruction, there is destruction of verse existence.
5. On account of the destruction of the pains  of action there is release for pains of action exist for him who constructs them.
These pains result from phenomenal extension ; but this phenomenal extension comes to a stop by emptiness. 6. There is the teaching of "individual self" , and the teaching of "non-individual self" ;
But neither "individual self" nor "non-individual self" whatever has been taught by the Buddhas.
7. When the domain of thought has been dissipated, “that which can be stated” is dissipated.
Those things which are unoriginated and not terminated, like nirvana, constitute the Truth .
8. Everything is “actual”  or “not-actual,” or both “acts actual-and-not-actual,”
Or “neither-actual-nor-not-actual”: This is the teaching of the Buddha.
9. “Not caused by something else,” “peaceful,” “not elaborated by discursive thought,”
“Indeterminate,” “undifferentiated”: such are the characteristics of true reality .
10. Whatever exists, being dependent , is certainly not identical to that ,
Nor is a thing different from that; therefore, it is neither destroyed nor eternal. 11. The immortal essence of the teaching of the Buddhas, the lords of the world, is
Without singleness or multiplicity; it is not destroyed nor is it eternal.
12. If fully-developed Buddhas do not arise  and the disciples  disappear,
Then, independently, the knowledge of the self-produced enlightened ones  is produced.
1. If “the present” and “future” exist presupposing “the past,”
“The present” and “future” will exist in “the past.”
2. If “the present” and “future” did not exist there ,
How could “the present” and “future” exist presupposing that “past?
3. Without presupposing “the past” the two things  cannot be proved to exist. Therefore neither present nor future time exist.
4. In this way the remaining two  can be inverted.
Thus one would regard “highest,” “lowest” and “middle,” etc., as oneness and difference.
5. A non-stationary “time” cannot be “grasped”; and a stationary “time” which can be grasped does not exist.
How, then, can one perceive time if it is not “grasped”?
6. Since time is dependent on a thing , how can time  without a thing?
There is not any thing which exists; how, then, will time become ?
1. If a product  is produced through the aggregate of causes and conditions,
And exists in an aggregate, how will it be produced in the aggregate?
2. If a product is produced in the aggregate of causes and conditions,
And does not exist in the aggregate, how will it be produced in the aggregate?
3. If the product is in the aggregate of causes and conditions,
Would it not be “grasped”  in the aggregate? But it is not “grasped” in the aggregate.
4. If the product is not in the aggregate of causes and conditions,
Then the causes and conditions would be the same as non-causes and non-conditions.
5. If a cause, having given the cause for a product, is stopped,
Then that which is “given” and that which is stopped would be two identities of the cause.
6. If a cause without having given the cause for a product is stopped
Then, the cause being stopped, the product would be produced as something derived from a non-cause .
7. If the product would become visible concomitantly with the aggregate ,
Then it would logically follow that the producer and that which is produced  in the same moment.
8. If the product would become visible before the aggregate,
Then the product, without being related to causes and conditions, would be something derived from a non-cause.
9. If, when the cause of the product is stopped, there would be a continuation of the cause,
It would logically follow that there would be another production of the previous producing cause.
10. How can that which is stopped, i.e., something which has disappeared, produce the arising of a product?
How could a cause which is enclosed by its product, even though it persists, originate ?
11. Or if that  were not enclosed by the product, which product would it produce?
For the cause does not produce the product, having seen or not having seen .
12. There is no concomitance of a past product with a past cause, a future  or present .
13. Certainly there is no concomitance of the present product with future cause, past  or present .
14. Certainly there is no concomitance of a future product with a present cause, future  or past .
15. If there is no concomitance whatever, how would the cause produce the product?
Or if a concomitance exists, how would the cause produce the product?
16. If the cause is empty of a product, how would it produce the product?
If the cause is not empty of a product, how would it produce the product?
17. A non-empty product would not be originated,  a non-empty  would not be destroyed.
Then that is non-empty which will not originate or not disappear.
18. How would that be produced which is empty?
How would that be destroyed which is empty? It logically follows, then, that which is empty is not originated and not destroyed.
19. Certainly a oneness of cause and product is not possible at all.
Nor is a difference of cause and product possible at all.
20. If there were a oneness of the cause and product, then there would be an identity of the originator and what is originated. If there were a difference of product and cause, then a cause would be the same as that which is not a cause.
21. Can a cause produce a product which is essentially existing in itself ?
Can a cause produce a product which is not essentially existing in itself ? 22. It is not possible to have “what is by its nature a cause”  of “that which is not producing.”
If “what is by its nature a cause” is not possible, whose product will exist?
23. How will that  produce a product when
That which is the aggregate of causes and conditions does not produce itself by itself? 24. The product is not produced by the aggregate; nor is the product not produced by the aggregate.
Without the product, how is there an aggregate of conditions?
1. There is no disappearance either with origination or without it.
There is no origination either with disappearance or without it.
2. How, indeed, will disappearance exist at all without origination?
death without birth? There is no disappearance without  origination.
3. How can disappearance exist concomitantly with origination?
Since, surely, death does not exist at the same moment as birth.
4. How, indeed, will origination exist at all without disappearance?
For, impermanence does not fail to be found in existent things ever. 5. How can origination exist concomitantly with disappearance? Since, surely, death does not exist at the same moment as birth.
6. When two things cannot be proved either separately or together,
No proof exists of those two things. How can these two things be proved?
7. There is no origination of that which is destructible, nor of that which is not-destructible.
There is no disappearance of that which is destructible nor of that which is non-destructible.
8. Origination and disappearance cannot exist without an existent thing.
Without origination and disappearance an existent thing does not exist.
9. Origination and disappearance does not obtain for that which is empty.
Origination and disappearance does not obtain for that which is non-empty.
10. It does not obtain that origination and disappearance are the same thing.
It does not obtain that origination and disappearance are different.
11.  Origination, as well as disappearance, is seen. it would exist for you.
origination and disappearance are seen due to a delusion.
12. An existent thing does not originate from  thing; and an existent thing does not originate from a non-existent thing.
Also, a non-existent thing does not originate from another non-existent thing; and a non-existent thing does not originate from an existent thing.
13. An existent thing does not originate either by itself or by something different.
Or by itself and something different . How, then, can it be produced?
14. For someone assuming an existent thing, either an eternalistic or nihilistic point of view would logically follow,
For that existent thing would be either eternal or liable to cessation. 15.
For someone assuming an existent thing, there is not  eternalism or nihilism,
Since this is existence: namely, the continuity of the originating and stopping of causes and product.
16. If this is existence: namely, the continuity of originating and stopping of causes and product,
It would logically follow that the cause is destroyed because the destroyed thing does not originate again.
17. If there is self-existence of something which is intrinsically existing, then non-existence does not obtain.
At the time of nirvana there is destruction of the cycle of existence  as a result of the cessation.
18. If the last  is destroyed, the first  existence does not obtain.
If the last  is not destroyed, the first  existence does not obtain.
19. If the first  were produced while the final part were being destroyed,
There would be one thing being destroyed and being produced .
20. If the one “being destroyed” and the one “being produced” cannot exist together,
Can someone be produced in those “groups of universal elements”  in which he is  “dying”?
21. Thus, the chain of existences is not possible in any of the tree times ; And if it does not exist in the three times, how can the chain of existences exist?
1. That one  is not the “groups of universal elements” , nor something other than the “groups”; the “groups” are not in him, nor is he in them;
The “fully completed” does not possess the “groups.”
What, then, is the “fully completed”?
2. If the Buddha exists dependent on the “groups,” then he is not “that which exists by itself”
And how can he exist as something else   if he is not “that which exists by itself” ?
3. That which exists presupposing another existent thing is properly called a “non-individual self” .
How will that which is a non-individual self become the “fully completed”?
4. And if there is no self-existence , how would it have an “other-existence” ?
What would that “fully completed”  be without either a self-existence or other-existence?
5. If some kind of “fully completed”  would exist without dependence on the “groups,”
It is dependent now; therefore it exists dependent .
6. There is no kind of “fully completed”  which is not dependent on the “groups.”
And whatever is not non-dependent—how will it become dependent?
7. There is nothing whatever that is dependent on  and there is no thing whatever on which something does not depend.
There would not exist in any way a “fully completed”  without being dependent on .
8. That  which does not exist by its actual reality  or by some other reality  according to the five-fold examination—
How is the “fully completed”  perceived by being dependent?
9. So when there is dependence, self-existence does not exist;
And if there is no self-existence whatever, how is an other-existence possible?
10. Thus “dependence” and “that which is dependent” are completely empty .
How is that empty “fully completed one” known through that which is empty?
11. One may not say that there is “emptiness”   nor that there is non-emptiness. ” Nor that both  , nor that neither exists ; the purpose for saying  is for the purpose of conveying knowledge.
12. How, then, will “eternity,” “non-eternity,” and  the Tetralemma apply to bliss ?
How, then, will “the end,” “without end,” and  the Tetralemma apply to bliss?
13. That image of nirvana  the Buddha  either “is” or “is not”—
By him who  the notion is crudely grasped.
14. Concerning that which is empty by its own nature , the thoughts do not arise that:
The Buddha “exists” or “does not exist” after death.
15. Those who describe in detail the Buddha, who is unchanging and beyond all detailed description—
Those, completely defeated by description, do not perceive the “fully completed” .
16. The self-existence of the “fully completed”  is the self-existence of the world.
The “fully completed”  is without self-existence  the world is without self-existence.
1. It is said that desire , hate, and delusion are derived from mental fabrication ,
Because they come into existence presupposing errors as to what is salutary and unsalutary.
2. Those things which come into existence presupposing errors as to what is salutary and unsalutary
Do not exist by their own nature ; therefore the impurities  do not exist in reality.
3. The existence or non-existence of the individual self  is not proved at all.
Without that , how can the existence or non-existence of the impurities be proved?
4. For impurities exist of somebody, and that person is not proved at all.
Is it not so that without someone the impurities do not exist of anybody?
5. In reference to the view of having a body of one’s own, the impurities do not exist in what is made impure according to the five-fold manner.
In reference to the view of having a body of one’s own, that which is made impure does not exist in the impurities according to the five-fold manner. 6. The errors as to what is salutary and non-salutary do not exist as self-existent entities
Depending on which errors as to what is salutary and non-salutary are then impurities?
7. Form, sound, taste, touch, smell, and the dharmas: this six-fold Substance  of desire, hate, and delusion is imagined.
8. Form, sound, taste, touch, smell, and the dharmas are
Merely the form of a fairy castle, like a mirage, a dream.
9. How will “that which is salutary” or “that which is non-salutary” come into existence
In a formation of a magical man, or in things like a reflection?
10. We submit that there is no non-salutary thing unrelated to a salutary thing.
depending on which, there is a salutary thing; therefore, a salutary thing does not obtain.
11. We submit that there is no salutary thing unrelated to a non-salutary thing,
depending on which, there is a non-salutary thing; therefore a non-salutary thing does not obtain.
12. If “what is salutary” does not exist, how will there be desire ?
And if “what is non-salutary” does not exist, how will there be hatred ?
13. Even if the notion “What is permanent is in something impermanent” is in error,
How can this notion be in error since “what is impermanent” does not exist in emptiness?
14. Even if the notion “what is permanent is in something impermanent” is in error,
Is not then the notion concerning emptiness, i.e., that it is impermanent, in error?
15. That by which a notion is formed, the notion, those who have notions, and that which is grasped :
All have ceased; therefore, the notion does not exist.
16. If a notion is not existing either as false or true,
Whose is the error? Whose is the non-error?
17. Nor do errors of someone who has erred come into existence.
Nor do errors of someone who has not erred come into existence.
18. And errors of someone who is at present in error do not come into existence.
Now you examine of whom do errors really come into existence!
19. How in all the world will errors which have not originated come into existence?
And if errors are not originated, how can there be someone involved in error? 20. Since no being is produced by itself, nor by something different, Nor by itself and something different at the same time, how can there be someone involved in error?
21. If the individual self, “what is pure,” “what is eternal,” and happiness really exist,
Then the individual self, “what is pure,” “what is eternal,” and happiness are not errors.
22. But if individual self, “what is pure,” “what is eternal,” and happiness do not exist,
Then non-individual self, “what is impure,” “what is impermanent” and sorrow  do not exist.
23. From the cessation of error ignorance ceases;
When ignorance has ceased, conditioning forces  and everything else cease.
24. If any kind of self-existent impurities belong to somebody,
How in all the world would they be eliminated? Who can eliminate that which is self-existent?
25. If any kind of self-existent impurities do not belong to somebody,
How in all the world would they be eliminated? Who can eliminate that which is non-self-existent?
1. If everything is empty, there is no origination nor destruction.
Then you must incorrectly conclude that there is non-existence of the four holy truths.
2. If there is non-existence of the four holy truths, the saving knowledge, the elimination ,
The “becoming”  , and the “realization”  are impossible.
3. If there is non-existence, then also the four holy “fruits” do not exist.
In the non-existence of fruit there is no “residing in fruit” nor obtaining.
4. When the community  does not exist, then those eight “kinds of persons”  do not exist.
Because there is non-existence of the four holy truths, the real dharma does not exist.
5. And if there are no dharma and community, how will the Buddha exist?
By speaking thus,  certainly you deny the three jewels .
6. You deny the real existence of a product, of right and wrong,
And all the practical behavior of the world as being empty.
7. We reply that you do not comprehend the point of emptiness;
You eliminate both “emptiness” itself and its purpose from it.
8. The teaching by the Buddhas of the dharma has recourse to two truths:
The world-ensconced truth  and the truth which is the highest sense .
9. Those who do not know the distribution  of the two kinds of truth
Do not know the profound “point”   in the teaching of the Buddha.
10. The highest sense   is not taught apart from practical behavior ,
And without having understood the highest sense  one cannot understand nirvana .
11. Emptiness, having been dimly perceived, utterly destroys the slow-witted.
It is like a snake wrongly grasped or  knowledge incorrectly applied.
12. Therefore the mind of the ascetic  was diverted from teaching the dharma,
Having thought about the incomprehensibility of the dharma by the stupid.
13. Time and again you have made a condemnation of emptiness,
But that refutation does not apply to our emptiness.
14. When emptiness “works”, then everything in existence “works”.
If emptiness “does not work”, then all existence “does not work”.
15. You, while projecting your own faults on us,
Are like a person who, having mounted his horse, forgot the horse!
16. If you recognize real existence on account of the self-existence of things,
You perceive that there are uncaused and unconditioned things.
17. You deny “what is to be produced,” cause, the producer, the instrument of production, and the producing action,
And the origination, destruction, and “fruit.”
18. The “originating dependently” we call “emptiness”;
This apprehension, i.e., taking into account , is the understanding of the middle way.
19. Since there is no dharma whatever originating independently,
No dharma whatever exists which is not empty.
20. If all existence is not empty, there is neither origination nor destruction.
You must wrongly conclude then that the four holy truths do not exist.
21. Having originated without being conditioned, how will sorrow  come into existence?
It is said that sorrow  is not eternal; therefore, certainly it does not exist by its own nature .
22. How can that which is existing by its own nature originate again?
For him who denies emptiness there is no production.
23. There is no destruction of sorrow  if it exists by its own nature.
By trying to establish “self-existence” you deny destruction.
24. If the path  is self-existent, then there is no way of bringing it into existence ;
If that path is brought into existence, then “self-existence,” which you claim does not exist.
25. When sorrow , origination, and destruction do not exist,
What kind of path will obtain the destruction of sorrow ?
26. If there is no complete knowledge as to self-existence, how  any knowledge of it?
Indeed, is it not true that self-existence is that which endures?
27. As in the case of complete knowledge, neither destruction, realization, “bringing into existence,”
Nor are the four holy fruits possible for you.
28. If you accept “self-existence,” and a “fruit” is not known by its self-existence,
How can it be known at all?
29. In the non-existence of “fruit,” there is no “residing in fruit” nor obtaining ;
When the community  does not exist, then those eight “kinds of persons” do not exist.
30. Because there is non-existence of the four holy truths, the real dharma does not exist.
And if there is no dharma and community, how will the Buddha exist?
31. For you, either the one who is enlightened  comes into being independent of enlightenment,
Or enlightenment comes into being independent of the one who is enlightened.
32. For you, some one who is a non-buddha by his own nature  but strives for enlightenment Will not attain the enlightenment though the “way of life of becoming fully enlightened.”
33. Neither the dharma nor non-dharma will be done anywhere.
What is produced which is non-empty? Certainly self-existence is not produced.
34. Certainly, for you, there is a product without  of dharma or non-dharma.
Since, for you, the product caused by dharma or non-dharma does not exist.
35. If, for you, the product is caused by dharma or non-dharma, be non-empty?
How can that product, being originated by dharma or non-dharma empty?
36. You deny all mundane and customary activities
When you deny emptiness  dependent co-origination . 37. If you deny emptiness, there would be action which is unactivated.
There would be nothing whatever acted upon, and a producing action would be something not begun.
38. According to  “self-existence” the world is free from different conditions;
Then it will exist as unproduced, undestroyed and immutable.
39. If non-emptiness does not exist, then something is attained which is not attained;
There is cessation of sorrow  and actions, and all evil is destroyed.
40. He who perceives dependent co-origination
Also understands sorrow , origination, and destruction as well as the path .
1. If all existence is empty, there is no origination nor destruction.
Then whose nirvana through elimination  and destruction  would be postulated?
2. If all existence is non-empty, there is no origination nor destruction.
Then whose nirvana through elimination  and destruction  would be postulated?
3. Nirvana has been said to be neither eliminated nor attained, neither annihilated nor eternal, Neither disappeared nor originated.
4. Nirvana is certainly not an existing thing, for then it would be characterized by old age and death. In consequence it would involve the error that an existing thing would not become old and be without death.
5. And if nirvana is an existing thing, nirvana would be a constructed product , Since never ever has an existing thing been found to be a non-constructed-product .
6. But if nirvana is an existing thing, how could  exist without dependence ?
Certainly nirvana does not exist as something without dependence.
7. If nirvana is not an existing thing, will nirvana become a non-existing thing? Wherever there is no existing thing, neither is there a non-existing thing.
8. But if nirvana is a non-existing thing, how could  exist without dependence ? Certainly nirvana is not a non-existing thing which exists without dependence.
9. That state which is the rushing in and out  when dependent or conditioned—
This , when not dependent or not conditioned, is seen to be nirvana.
10. The teacher  has taught that a “becoming” and a “non-becoming”  are destroyed;
Therefore it obtains that: Nirvana is neither an existent thing nor a non-existent thing.
11. If nirvana were both an existent and a non-existent thing,
Final release  would be  an existent and a non-existent thing; but that is not possible.
12. If nirvana were both an existent and a non-existent thing, There would be no nirvana without conditions, for these both  conditions.
13. How can nirvana exist as both an existent thing and a non-existent thing,
For nirvana is a non-composite-product , while both an existent thing and a non-existent thing are composite products .
14. How can nirvana exist as both an existent and a non-existent thing?
There is no existence of both at one and the same place, as in the case of both darkness and light.
15. The assertion: “Nirvana is neither an existent thing nor a non-existent thing”
Is proved if : “It is an existent thing and a non-existent thing” were proved.
16. If nirvana is neither an existent thing nor a non-existent thing,
Who can really arrive at : “neither an existent thing nor a non-existent thing”?
17. It is not expressed if the Glorious One  exists  after his death,
Or does not exist , or both  or neither .
18. Also, it is not expressed if the Glorious One exists  while remaining ,
Or does not exist , or both  or neither .
19. There is nothing whatever which differentiates the existence-in-flux  from nirvana;
And there is nothing whatever which differentiates nirvana from existence-in-flux.
20. The extreme limit  of nirvana is also the extreme limit of existence-in-flux;
There is not the slightest bit of difference between these two.
21. The views  whether that which is beyond death is limited by a beginning or an end or some other alternative
Depend on a nirvana limited by a beginning  and an end ,
22. Since all dharmas are empty, what is finite? What is infinite?
What is both finite and infinite? What is neither finite nor infinite?
23. Is there anything which is this or something else, which is permanent or impermanent,
Which is both permanent and impermanent, or which is neither?
24. The cessation of accepting everything  is a salutary  cessation of phenomenal development ;
No dharma anywhere has been taught by the Buddha of anything.
1. “What is hidden by ignorance ”  has caused the three kinds of conditioned things   to be made for rebirth — By those actions it  goes forward.
2. Consciousness , presupposing that which is conditioned , enters on its course. When consciousness is begun, the “name-and-form’  is instilled. 3. When the “name-and-form” is instilled, the six domains of sense perceptions   are produced.
Having arrived at the six domains of sense perceptions, the process of perception begins to function. 4. Consciousness begins to function presupposing the eye, the visual forms, and ability of mental association—
Presupposing “name-and-form.”
5. That which is the coincidence   of visual form, consciousness, and the eye:
That is sensual perception; and from perception, sensation  begins to function.
6. “Craving ”   is conditioned by sensation.
Certainly  craves for the sake of sensation.
The one who craves acquires the four-fold acquisition
. 7. When the acquisition exists, the acquirer begins to function  . If he were someone without acquisition, that being would be released, and would not exist.
8. That being is the five “groups of universal elements” . Because of a being, birth  begins to function.
Growing old, dying, sorrow  , etc., grief and regrets,
9. Despair and agitation: all this results from birth;
That “produced being” is a single mass of sorrows .
10. Thus the ignorant people construct the conditioned things ;  the source for existence-in-flux. The one who constructs is ignorant; the wise person is not  because he perceives true reality. 11. When ignorance ceases, the constructed phenomena do not come into existence. A person’s cessation of ignorance proceeds on the basis of “becoming”  through knowledge.
12. Through cessation of every  none functions;
That single mass of sorrow  is thus completely destroyed.
1. Those  relating to the limits of the past reality are: “The world is eternal,” etc., 
2. The assertion: “I will not become something different in a future time,”
“I will become ,” and the alternative, etc., are relating to an end .
3.  “I existed in a past time ” does not obtain,
Since this  is not  that one who  in a former birth.
4. Were he , that individual self  which he acquires  would be different.
Moreover, what kind of individual self is there without acquisition ?
5. If it were held that: “There is no individual self without the acquisition,”
Then the individual self would be  the acquisition or it is not an individual self .
6. The individual self is not the acquisition, since that  appears and disappears.
Now really, how will “he who acquires” become “that which is acquired?
7. Moreover, it does not obtain that the individual self is different from the acquisition.
If the individual self were different, it would be perceived without the acquisition; but  it is not so perceived.
8. Thus that  is not different from nor identical to the acquisition. The individual self is not without acquisition; but there is no certainty that “It does not exist.”
9.  “I have not existed in a past time ” does not obtain,
For that one  is not different  from that one who was in a former birth. 10. If that  were different, he would exist in exclusion of that  one.
Therefore either that  persists, or he would be born eternal!
11. 2
12. There is no existing thing which is “that which has not existed prior.” Therefore, the error logically follows that
Either the individual self is “what is produced” or it originates without a cause.
13. Thus the view concerning the past which  “I have existed ,” or “I have not existed ,”
Both   or neither : this does not obtain at all.
14.  “I will become something in a future time ,”
Or “I will not become  ,” etc.  ,  like those  of the past.
15. If “This is a man, this is a god” , then eternity  exists,
For god is unproduced, and certainly something eternal would not be born.
16. If man is different from god, there would exist something non-eternal .
If man is different from god, then a continuity does not obtain.
17. If one part were divine and another part human,
Then there would be something non-eternal  that which is eternal ; but that is not possible. 18. If something both non-eternal and eternal were proved,
Then, no doubt, something “neither eternal nor non-eternal ” is proved.
19. If someone, having come from somewhere, in some way goes somewhere again,
Then there would be existence-in-flux with no beginning; but this is not the case.
20. If someone who is eternal does not exist, who will exist being non-eternal,
Or who being both eternal and non-eternal, or devoid of these two ?
21. If the world would come to an end, how would an other-world come into existence?
If the world would not come to an end, how would an other-world come into being?
22. Since the continuity of the “groups of universal elements”   functions like flames of lamps, “both having an end and not having an end” is not possible.
23. If the former  would disappear, those  “groups” which are dependent on those  “groups” would not arise;
Therefore, the world would come to an end .
24. If the former  would not disappear, these  “groups” which are dependent on those  “groups” would not arise;
Therefore, the world would be eternal .
25. If one part were finite and the other were infinite,
The world would be both finite and infinite ; but this is not possible.
26. Therefore, how can it be that one part of “one who acquires”  will be destroyed,
And one part not destroyed?  This is not possible.
27. How, indeed, can it be that one part of the acquisition   will be destroyed,
And one part not destroyed?  That, certainly does not obtain.
28. If the  “both finite and infinite” were proved,
Then no doubt, “neither finite nor infinite”  could be proved.
29. Because of the emptiness of all existing things,
How will the views about “eternity,” etc., come into existence, about what, of whom, and of what kind?
	30. To him, possessing compassion, who taught the real dharma

Summary of the Great Vehicle by Hui-k’ai In a far-reaching manner, the excellent path is rich in insight, and in an impartial fashion its great compassion is conducive and inexhaustible. 
Yet it is easy to embark on a wrong path, and bewildering illusions are di‡cult to allay. 
If one begins by discoursing on transcendence, then doubts cannot be eradicated. This is why established the teaching and constructed the methods in accord with the character and disposition of sentient beings. 
Before Yao and Shun, there were only a few simple guidelines, but after Chou of Chi there were many prolix rules and regulations. Although again and again regulated the ceremonies, proposed their instructions, and led the people by means of conventional teachings, the wondrous meaning of the true and the apparent remained hidden and unnoticed. Thus the progression [of the Buddha-Dharma] lay concealed west of the Pamir Mountains, and the teaching was hidden beyond the vast Sea. 
From the time when the House of Han received the mandate, has slowly and gradually spread eastward until in the Chin dynasty it began to grow popular. When the Liang ruled the land, it prospered and became eminent. After about half a thousand years and seven generations it has come down to the present. Kumåraj∆va led forth to the pure source and spent his entire life in spreading its fragrance. 
Thenceforth, being excessively fervent and enthusiastic, none failed to run astray in their own directions. Their grasp of the teachings of the ancients and the practices of the patriarchs followed their own dispositions, and the opaqueness of their interpretations exceeded all limit. 
In my heart I, Hui-k’ai, felt inadequate to assume the satchel , was embarrassed to gather my resources diligently, and [feared I might] lay out a mistaken direction for students and disciples. In sincerity I received instruction and, over a period of several years, visited innumerable places in order to study. Famous teachers were my dear friends, and I readily took their counsel. Yet in my investigations and inquiries I focused on the rustic and shallow without any hope of success. 
I hid this , my thinking exhausted itself in the literal meaning of texts, and my notions were led astray from the broad meaning. I began the mornings with a sigh and frequently became dispirited. My entire attempt was to question the way according to current practice, yet I failed to see the path. 
There was a Tripi†aka master from the country of Ujjayan∆. He was a brahman. His surname was Bhårata and his personal name was Kulanåtha, which, translated, means “Savior of his Family.” His discernment was profound and extensive. 
His visage was superior and his intelligence conspicuous. His eloquence was disciplined and far-reaching. His spiritual practice excelled the crowd, and his enunciation of virtue bypassed the common. When young he had visited all countries and studied under a succession of masters. 
He had initially studied non-Buddhist texts and fully understood the profundities of these books. He retained the four Vedas in his heart and the six kinds of Vedic commentaries in his innermost mind. He had also studied exhaustively the Three Collections of Buddhist texts. He thoroughly practiced the ﬁve classes of insight into the four truths and meditation. 
For this reason, the Dharma Master avoided the entire area, with the result that the great doctrine remained hidden and did not spread. 
Before he reached Chin-chiang, he turned back and went to Wu-ling. he was not engaged in translating many scrolls, but when afterward he went to Min-yüeh, he preached frequently. 
The Dharma Master was magnanimous to all, his only lament being that there were few who understood his words. This is why Po-ya cut the strings of his lute and why Pien-ho wept jade . was skillful in the di‡cult interpretation of subtle passages. , the rarity of his wonderful jewel was exceptional. 
After a long period of traveling about, the Dharma Master desired to return to his native land. Retracing his steps along the highway, he came to Fan-yü. 
Ou-yang Wei, of sage visage and lofty spirit, who held the post of elder statesman (i.e., he held the ceremonial rank equal to the following three o‡ces, without any speciﬁc duties), was magistrate of Hung-chou and prefect of Yang-shang and had become governor of Tung-ho. He was well versed in the classics and trained in military tactics. He supported the Way and aided the times, bringing peace to the homeless people in Pai-yüeh. He established the true doctrine in Wu-ling. 
He respected the noble conduct of the Dharma Master and honored his excellent discipline. Requesting that he become the Vinaya master, with full and due respect he observed the proprieties of a disciple. 
I, , had formerly received instruction and was in some slight degree puriﬁed, but the heavy dross lay hidden in my heart and for a short time I had withdrawn . Now I repeatedly honored and cherished [Dharma Master Paramårtha] and danced for joy. 
Once again I desired to feed on peace and true virtue. I inquired into the Way and expressed my doubts. 
Although I had been diligent, attentive, and earnest and was not slow-witted or recalcitrant, I had been irresolute and, losing the course, had not committed my heart. 
The eldest son Ou-yang Ho, who was magistrate of Heng-chou and prefect of Yang-shang, was noble and moderate in his actions, digniﬁed, upright, and well read in literature and history. In a profound and far-reaching manner he attended to the essentials of governing. He was a reﬁned man of inner depth. His purity and brightness shone forth. 
He revered eminence and relished the path. He had genuine faith and loved the wonder . Observing all the proper ceremonies, he personally made a request of my master. 
The Dharma Master was pleased to receive his request and agreed to engage in translation and interpretation [of the Buddha’s teachings]. 
Dharma Master Hui-chih, abbot of Chih-chih Temple, was unsullied in his observance of discipline and totally engaged in spiritual practice. his mind was set upon quiet seclusion, when ran counter to the path, he always rose to the occasion, inexhaustible in reforming and untiring in turning a›airs around. Chung-ch’ing, the commandant of the Southern Army, was docile and intelligent in his progression in virtue. His resolution was simple and far-reaching. 
With the sun shining each morning, the next year passed in harmony, and in the third month, when spring had arrived at Chih-chih Temple, Dharma Master began his translation and interpretation . 
He already understood its grammar and had learned the dialect. All its words had to be elucidated and no meaning left imprecise or unclear. My teacher would sit on his mat until dawn without sleep. 
I, , was his attentive scribe who copied down just what he said, word for word, phrase for phrase, chapter for chapter. Only after he had ﬁnished his examination [of the text] and translated its meaning did we issue the text. 
We present it to the monks so that they may patiently study it together. 
The basic text is in three scrolls, the Commentary in twelve scrolls, and the Interpretation in eight scrolls, which amount to twenty-three scrolls. 
This treatise is an outline of the Great Vehicle. The deep and wondrous meaning of the true doctrine arises cloudlike , and its pure expressions overﬂow like the sea. 
It is both profound and far-reaching. Because of it the two vehicles fade into oblivion. 
Broad and formidable are its contents, which constitute the course of study on the ten stages. 
About one thousand one hundred years after the departure of the Tathågata, Bodhisattva Maitreya reached his appointed time, descended from his spirit abode, came down, and drew near. Forgetful of self, he deigned to respond to Dharma Master Asaçga and to interpret extensively the meaning of the Great Vehicle. The name Asaçga means “Nonattachment.” The Dharma Master attained the unitary way and embodied its practice. He delved into the ﬁnal limits of its mystery and made its spiritual reality manifest. 
The Dharma Master’s younger brother Vasubandhu, which, translated, means “Heavenly Friend,” was born into the inferior way (i.e., the Hinayana) but in virtue he was endowed with the seed lineage [of the Great Vehicle]. His character was lofty and his spirit quick to discern. Having been prodded by his elder brother, he meditated on the broad meaning of the Great Vehicle. 
Recognizing that the style of all Master Asaçga’s treatises was profound and their meaning di‡cult to understand, he was concerned lest later students become confused. Therefore he composed his Commentary in order to interpret the basic text, in which he subsumed the lesser vehicles and refuted heterodox teachings with the point of his brush. 
By laboring over and carefully reading , the way of the illustrious gentlemen will not be lost. 
1 The Chapter Titles of the Excellent Teaching on Support on the scriptures of the Great Vehicle. 2 Standing before the Worldhonored One, Bodhisattva Mahåyånasupravi√†a, desiring to manifest the excellent qualities of the Great Vehicle, spoke in accord with the teaching of that Great Vehicle and said: “All World-honored Buddhas have ten excellent teachings, which are unequaled and unsurpassed by any other teachings.” 3 port for the knowable, 2) the excellent teaching on the knowable, excellent teaching on the cause and result of this entrance, 5) the excellent teaching on di›erences in the cultivation of the cause and result of this entrance, 6) the excellent teaching on the moral training that depends on these di›erences in cultivation, 7) the excellent teaching on the thought training that relies on this moral training, 8) the excellent teaching on the wisdom training that relies on this thought training, 9) the excellent teaching on abandonment as the result of this training, and 10) the excellent teaching on the di›erentiations of wisdom. 
The teaching enunciated by the Tathågata surpasses other teachings. 
An interpretation of the scriptures such as this demonstrates that the truths of the Great Vehicle are the very words of the Buddha. 
demonstrate that the Great Vehicle is superior to other teachings? 
Because this summary interpretation treats ten themes that are found only in the Great Vehicle and not in the lesser vehicle. 
What are these ten? 
They are 1) the container consciousness explained as the support for the knowable, 2) the three patterns of other-dependence , imagination , and reality explained as the characteristic patterns of the knowable, 3) the doctrine of conscious construction-only explained as the entrance into the knowable, 4) the six perfections explained as the causes and results of this entrance, 5) the ten bodhisattva stages explained as the di›erences in the cultivation of these causes and results of this entrance, 6) the discipline maintained and kept by bodhisattvas explained as the moral training within these di›erences, 7) the concentrations such as those of the heroic march and the space storehouse explained as thought training, 8) nonimaginative wisdom explained as wisdom training, 9) non-abiding cessation explained as the resultant abandonment, and 10) the three Buddha bodies of essence , reward , and transformation explained as resultant nonimaginative wisdom. 
4 Because these ten themes are found only in the Great Vehicle and di›er from those of the lesser vehicle, we a‡rm that it is foremost. 
Because the World-honored Buddha has enunciated these ten themes for bodhisattvas, the ten excellent teachings of all Worldhonored Buddhas who rely on the Great Vehicle are a‡rmed to be superior to other teachings. 
entation in the enunciation of these ten excellent teachings is the very word of the Tathågata? How can one deny that the lesser vehicle is indeed also a great vehicle? 
Because these ten themes never appear in the lesser vehicle or in any of its interpretative commentaries but do appear in the Great Vehicle and are commented upon therein. 
Furthermore these ten themes are able to elicit the highest wisdom. They are valid, consistent, and logically cogent, so that sentient beings may attain a wisdom of universal understanding. 
We present verses: The support of the knowable, its characteristic patterns, Its entrance, its causes and results, And the di›erences in cultivation, The three trainings, and abandonment as result, Together with wisdom are the sum of the Great Vehicle. 
These ten themes are found nowhere else. Gaining insight into them is the cause of wisdom. Therefore the Great Vehicle is the Buddha’s word, Because he taught excellence in these ten themes. 
They are so presented because in their initial practices bodhisattvas must ﬁrst examine the causes of all things just as they are, and in virtue of such an examination they must engender an intelligent understanding of the twelvefold dependent co-arising. 
Then they must understand and analyze the basic character of what is dependently co-arisen, through the understanding of which they can separate themselves from the two extreme mistakes of imputing being where nothing exists or subtracting being where it does exist. 
In this manner their correct meditation will penetrate to all the characteristics of objects just as they really are. Next they must become liberated from all obstacles. 
Having penetrated to the true characteristics of the knowable, by reliance on the puriﬁcation of their inner aspirations they must bring the ﬁrst six perfections, which they have already been cultivating, to completion and cause them to be puriﬁed without further defect. 
Then all the perfections comprised in that inner puriﬁcation must be cultivated for three eons in the di›erent conditions of the ten stages. 
Then the three bodhisattva trainings must be brought to fulﬁllment, after which the results of these trainings will be cessation and the supreme, highest awakening . 
This is the sequence wherein they must attain these ten understandings through successive cultivations. 
The Great Vehicle attains its full plenitude in such a sequence. 
Where has the Worldhonored One spoken of this consciousness? Where did he call it the container? 
In the basic verses that summarize the Abhidharma, he said: From beginningless time this realm Is the support for all things. Only if it exists do all the destinies exist And is there an access to cessation. 
These two scriptural verses express the basic structure and the name of this consciousness. 
Because the results of the deﬁled mental states of all sentient beings lie concealed and stored up in it as results, and because this consciousness lies concealed and stored up in all those mental states as their cause. 
Furthermore it is called the container consciousness inasmuch as all sentient beings, clinging to an image of their selfhood, are themselves contained within [the conﬁnes of ] this consciousness. 
Because it appropriates and upholds all the physical sense organs of sentient beings and because it is the support for taking up all the experiences of rebirth. 
Why is this so? 
Because all the physical sense organs, having been appropriated by this consciousness, do not pass away until the end of life. 
When it continues into new rebirths, it is able to engender and make its own their formation, for this is how the physical bodies in the six destinies are appropriated. It is thus that the bodies in the six destinies are made one’s own. 
Thinking is here of two kinds: 
1) If this deﬁled state of mind did not exist, then solitary ignorance would be impossible; 2) there would be no analogy with the ﬁve sense consciousnesses, for just as these ﬁve sense consciousnesses must have their own common, simultaneous support, that is, the ﬁve sense organs, [so deﬁled ideas and images must have their support in the deﬁled mind]; 3) the root meaning of the term “thinking” would be meaningless ; 4) there would be no di›erence between nonconceptual concentration and the concentration that destroys thought, for the deﬁled mind is present in nonconceptual concentration but not in mind-destroying concentration. 
If this were not their di›erence, they would be identical; 5) among unconscious gods , there would be no belief in self, self-pride, and so on, since they would be perfected in the absence of outﬂows, defects, and deﬁle ments; and 6) at all times the engendering of self-clinging occurs, in all good, evil, and morally neutral mental states. 
However, we avoid this error by allowing that the two minds arise simultaneously. 
But if one grants that illusions are activated solely in association with the six sense consciousnesses, one falls into this error. 
The absence of solitary ignorance; the analogy with the ﬁve sense consciousnesses; The identity between the two concentrations; the meaningless status for the root mind; The absence of self-clinging in states of no thinking during that period of concentration, which would issue in the absence of outﬂows; The nonarising of self-clinging in all good, evil, and neutral states. 
If there were no deﬁled mind, the ﬁrst two would not exist and the latter three would be contradicted. 
Solitary ignorance is the illusory obstacle that causes the realization of insight into true meaning not to arise, and it occurs in all states. 
Mind, although deﬁled, is comprised among morally undeﬁned states, and it is always yoked to the four delusions. 
Being clouded and yet morally undeﬁned, it is similar to the delusions in the worlds of form and formlessness, for the passions of these two worlds occlude quietude . Such thought arises in each and every state without ceasing. 
Because it belongs among the subtle objects of understanding. 
Word-hearers are not expected to attain the preeminent wisdom of omniscience and thus, even though there is no mention of it among them, nevertheless their perfect wisdom leads them to fulﬁll their basic commitment. Thus it was not taught to them. 
But because all bodhisattvas are expected to attain the preeminent wisdom of omniscience, the Buddha taught it to them. 
Apart from this wisdom, it is impossible to attain supreme awakening. 
7 the word-hearers’ vehicle, but in di›erent terms. 
It is because a Tathågata appears in the world that such a singular, wondrous, inconceivable doctrine as that about the fundamental consciousness is manifested in the world. 
In this Scripture on the Four Kinds of Good Qualities of the Tathågata’s Appearance in the World [from the Book of Gradual Sayings, we see that] this consciousness is already taught in the word-hearers’ vehicle, although in di›erent terms. 
Moreover in a scripture of the Mahåsåµghika school this consciousness is presented under the alternate term of “the foundational consciousness,” for it is like the roots of a tree. 
The Mah∆Ωåsaka school also teaches this consciousness under an alternate name when it explains “the aggregate that perdures throughout transmigration.” What does this mean? 
That although the continuity of material form and mind is at times severed, the seeds within the mind are not terminated. 
able is already presented as a royal road in the lesser vehicle in the terms of appropriation, container, mind, the foundational conscious ness, and the aggregate that perdures throughout transmigration. 
Inasmuch as it has already been admitted that thought and sense consciousness refer to di›erent things, so one must understand mind also to refer to something di›erent. 
Yet other masters interpret the term “possessions” in the World-honored One’s statement that “people in the world delight in their possessions” to refer to the ﬁve appropriated aggregates . 
Yet others think that it refers to the sensations of enjoyment that accompany desire. 
When they draw their opinions from the scriptures and meditations, they do so in the context of the teachings and practices of the lesser vehicle and their proposals do not accord with true reason. 
If they were not confused about the container consciousness, they would agree that our interpretation that these terms in the lesser vehicle refer to this consciousness is preferable. 
Why is it preferable? 
[The term “possessions” does not refer to the appropriated aggregates because 1) Those who hold the opinion that possessions refer to the ﬁve appropriated aggregates should consider that for those born into one of the evil destinies ﬁlled with total pain, these appropriated aggregates are most detestable. 
It is not reasonable that those people would delight in such totally undelightful aggregates. 
Rather they constantly wish that those aggregates be severed and done away with. 
2) It does not refer to the sensation of enjoyment that accompanies desire, since this sensation does not exist for those above the fourth meditation. 
If one had already experienced that sensation, then, when he seeks the higher realms, he will engender revulsion in its regard. Therefore it cannot be reasonably held that such persons delight in that sensation. 
3) It cannot refer to belief in selfhood, because those within the true doctrine who believe in non-self negate such an attachment and engender no delight in it. 
Although those born above the fourth meditation never again delight in the pleasurable sensation associated with desire, yet they are still pursued by and not separated from their love of self in their container consciousnesses. 
Likewise, those within the true doctrine, although committed to the doctrine of non-self and opposed to belief in selfhood, yet also have self-love for their container consciousnesses. 
Its deﬁning characteristic is that, relying on the permeations of all deﬁled states, it is the basic repository of seeds whereby the arising of those states is maintained. 
Its characteristic as cause means that this consciousness with all these seeds is the cause for the constant generation of those deﬁled states. 
Its characteristic as result means that this consciousness arises as the result of the beginningless permeations of these various deﬁled states. 
meation meant to signify? 
It is meant to signify the state, arising and passing away in tandem with those , that is the generative cause for subsequent changes. 
It is like a sesame seed imbued with the fragrance of a ﬂower. As the sesame and the ﬂower’s scent repeatedly arise and pass away in tandem, the sesame becomes the generative cause for that fragrance. 
If a person engages in acts of lust, he becomes permeated with lust. As his mind repeatedly arises and passes away in tandem with lust, the lust becomes the generative cause for the evolutions of his mind. 
As his repeated acts of reﬂective listening arise and pass away in tandem with his thinking, that learning becomes the generative cause for his mind’s understanding. 
Because this permeation becomes habitual, we say that such and such persons are learned in doctrine. 
This same reasoning also applies in regard to the container consciousness. 
But, although when joined they are not di›erent from it, yet they are not identical with it either. 
The container consciousness arises in such a manner that when permeations are engendered, it has full capability to engender as di›erent. 
states are simultaneously causes of one another? It is like the light and the wick of a lamp, for the arising of the light and the burning of the wick are simultaneous causes one of the other. 
It is also like a bundle of reeds that remain standing because simultaneously lean on one another. 
Know then that the foundational consciousness and its permeations are reciprocal causes in a similar fashion, for this consciousness is the cause for deﬁled states and deﬁled states are the causes for this consciousness. 
Why is this so? 
Because no other cause can be found apart from these two. 
variegated, be the e›ective, generative cause for all things, which are di›erentiated and are variegated? 
It is like a garment woven with many threads; it does not have many colors but after it is put into the dyeing vat sundry patterns appear on its surface. 
In like fashion, at the moment when the container consciousness is permeated by a cluster of varied mental states, its one nature is not variegated. 
But when it is put into the dyeing vat of karmic results it takes on an incalculable variety of patterns. 
sciousness is the most subtle and most profound interpretation of dependent co-arising in the Great Vehicle. 
8 In summary, there are two levels of dependent co-arising: that which distinguishes essences and that which distinguishes the pleasurable and the unpleasurable. 
Dependent co-arising that distinguishes essences means that the arising of all things is supported upon the container consciousness, for it distinguishes the essences of the causes of all the varied things. 
That which distinguishes the pleasant and the unpleasant is the twelvefold dependent co-arising, for it distinguishes the various di›erent causes for the pleasant and the unpleasant in good or evil destinies. 
Those who are confused about the second dependent co-arising imagine a self as the subject of action and experience. 
They are like the blind men who had never before encountered an elephant. 
When someone showed them one and had them feel it, some touched its trunk, some its tusk, some its ear, some its foot, some its tail, and some its ﬂank. 
When asked what an elephant was, some of the blind men responded that it was like a plow handle, others that it was like a wooden pestle, a fan, a mortar, a broom, or a mountain rock. 
Whether they claim that the cause of transmigration is an original essence, past actions, the creative action of a god, the self with its eight inherent qualities, or that there is no cause, or whether they imagine a self as the subject of action and experience, because they do not understand the basic pattern of the container consciousness and its cause-result relationships, they are like those blind men who, not recognizing the shape of the elephant, o›ered such strange explanations. 
is maturing consciousness endowed with all its seeds. This consciousness is found in all persons in the three worlds and all the six destinies and four kinds of birth without exception. 
meator—if unable to be otherwise permeated—this is the basic character of permeation. 
[These characteristics apply only to the container consciousness because] they are not associated with the six sense consciousnesses, because three [aspects of the six sense consciousnesses, i.e., support, object, and attention,] are di›erent and opposed , because two moments are not simultaneous, and because one would then overextend the analogy . 
It is in virtue of inner seeds that The outer come to fruition. 
They are the active consciousnesses that are present in all births and destinies. 
Know that they are also called the experiential consciousnesses, as taught in a verse from the Analysis of the Middle and the Extremes : The ﬁrst is termed causal consciousness And the second experiential consciousness, Wherein the mental states of sense experience, Discrimination of names, and activity take place. 
other, as a verse from the Mahayana Abhidharma states: All mental states are stored within consciousness And consciousness within all mental states. These two are causes of each other, As they are always results of each other. 
active consciousnesses] and consciousness are direct causes of each other, then in the second dependent co-arising, what kind of causality is exercised in regard to all these mental states? 
It is that of the dominant condition . 
How many kinds of causality engender the six sense consciousnesses? 
There are three kinds of causality: dominant condition, object as cause, and immediately antecedent causality. 
But how can one be certain that it is the container consciousness that is so described by the Tathågata through these various names and in these structural patterns—that they do not also describe the active consciousnesses? 
If the container consciousness were to be established apart from these names and patterns, then neither deﬁled nor puriﬁed states would be possible, for the deﬁled states of passion, action, and birth, as well as states of both worldly puriﬁcation and worldtranscendent puriﬁcation, would not be possible. 
Because it is impossible that the seminal permeations activated by the basic passions and the secondary passions come to term in the six sense consciousnesses. 
Why is this so? 
Let us consider the case where a visual consciousness arises and passes away in tandem with major or minor delusory passions of desire, and so on. It is this visual consciousness that becomes seeded by the permeations of delusory passions, not any other consciousness. 
Furthermore, permeation does not occur in visual consciousness, even if it were to arise simultaneously with desire, and so on. 
Because the seed does not dwell in the desire, since desire is supported by consciousness and because the continuity of desire is not stable. 
Furthermore, desire in the other consciousnesses is not permeation, because their supports are speciﬁc to each and because the other consciousnesses do not arise and pass away in tandem with each other. 
[Visual consciousness does not permeate itself because two visual consciousnesses] of the same variety cannot permeate because they do not arise simultaneously in tandem with each other. 
Therefore, visual consciousness is not permeated by the major or minor delusory passions of desire, and so on. It is not permeated by another consciousness of the same kind. 
This evaluation of visual consciousness also applies to the other sense consciousnesses. 
unconcsious gods and is reborn into this lower world, then his consciousness from the instant of that rebirth is deﬁled by the major and minor delusory passions. But his consciousness would at the time of rebirth lack seeds, for he would have already eliminated the permeations of delusory passions and their supporting [sense consciousnesses that support deﬁlement]. 
then other worldly consciousnesses are eliminated. 
If there were no container consciousness, then this countering consciousness would arise in tandem with the seeds of the major and minor delusory passions, which is patently impossible. 
Because its nature is liberative and because a mind without deﬁled outﬂows cannot arise and pass away simultaneously with delusory passions. 
Also, when after one emerges from insight into truth, [i.e., after the path of meditation that engenders the prior countering consciousness has passed into the path of vision,] and worldly consciousness arises, then all the permeations of delusory passions would long since have been eliminated and a mental consciousness that had deﬁled outﬂows would arise without seeds . 
Therefore, the deﬁlement of passion is impossible apart from the container consciousness. 
The member [of the twelvefold dependent co-arising] “conditioned on karmic formations, consciousness arises” would be impossible, and it is unreasonable to say that “conditioned by appropriation, being arises” [if the appropriating container consciousness does not exist]. 
Because there would be no link to a rebirth. 
When a person dies in a realm of nonconcentration [i.e., in the world of desire ], he comes to experience rebirth in virtue of a deﬁled thinking consciousness engendered in the entire intermediary state. 
When this deﬁled consciousness is eliminated in the intermediate state, then a consciousness formed in the embryo in the mother’s womb experiences rebirth. 
But if it is this thinking consciousness that becomes the support for the embryo, then within the mother’s womb this thinking consciousness would engender another separate thinking consciousness, which cannot happen, since it is impossible for two kinds of thinking consciousness to arise simultaneously in the mother’s womb. 
Also, thinking consciousness cannot be the that formed in the embryo because thinking consciousness ﬁnds its support in deﬁlement , because it would always have an object , and because that object would be unknown . 
If one holds that another supported consciousness is the seminal consciousness, then thinking consciousness, because it is supported and caused by another, is a supported consciousness. 
Therefore it is demonstrated that the consciousness that is formed in the embryo is not thinking consciousness but only the maturative and seminal . 
be impossible for him to appropriate the material sense organs apart from the maturing consciousness. 
This is because the other sense consciousnesses all have their speciﬁc supports [in the sense organs] and because they are not stable. 
It is impossible to have sense organs without an appropriating consciousness. 
and the naming of perceptible things is like the mutual reliance of reeds standing in bundles and is impossible apart from the consciousness. 
could be no mental sustenance for sentient beings who have already been born, because, apart from the maturing consciousness, not any of the consciousnesses of seeing, etc., have ever been seen to be able to sustain sentient beings born into the triple world. 
land of concentration, it is in virtue of this scattered, deﬁled thinking consciousness that he experiences rebirth there. But apart from this maturing consciousness, it is impossible for that deﬁled, scattered mind to be the seed in that land of concentration. 
formlessness engenders a deﬁled but morally good mind, then apart from the seminal, maturing consciousness it would be without seed and without support, thereby rendering impossible a mind both deﬁled and morally good. 
outﬂows then all other worldly states of mind are eliminated. [If then there were no maturing consciousness] then one would become extinct in that destiny. 
nor nonconceptualization engenders a mind of no outﬂows and a mind of nonbeing then he would immediately eliminate both these states, because that mind without outﬂows is a world-transcendent mind, and neither the destiny of neither conceptualization nor nonconceptualization nor the destiny of nonbeing nor the entry into cessation is its support. 
Therefore apart from the seminal, maturing consciousness the deﬁlement of birth is impossible. 
If a sentient being has not yet become freed from the world of desire with its cravings, if he has not yet attained a mind of the world of form , then he ﬁrst engenders a good mind in the world of desire and strives to be freed from that world of desire with its cravings. 
But the thought of applying oneself to meditation is not permeated , because the thought of engaging in practice in the world of desire does not arise and pass away in tandem with any mind from the world of form. Therefore the good thoughts in the world of form are not the seeds for good thoughts of the world of desire. 
Past states of mind in the world of form have been eliminated by other states of mind through an unlimited number of other rebirths and thus they cannot act as the seed for subsequent states of concentration, because they do not exist. 
Therefore it is demonstrated that the repeated inﬂuences of the seminal, maturing consciousness act as direct cause in regard to subsequent states of concentration in the world of form, while the good thought of engaging in practice acts as their dominant condition. 
This explanation holds for all realms that are freed from desire. 
Thus apart from the seminal, maturing consciousness, states of worldly puriﬁcation are impossible. 
The World-honored Buddha has taught: “True insight arises from hearing the voice of others and reﬂecting within oneself correctly.” But this hearing of the voice of others and this correct reﬂection are unable to permeate the ear consciousness, or the thinking consciousness, or both together, . 
When a person correctly reﬂects on the doctrine, as heard and understood, at that moment the ear consciousness is not operative. Furthermore that thinking consciousness also becomes inoperative when other distracting and discriminating ideas are heard. 
If this thinking consciousness that arises in tandem with correct reﬂection has long since disappeared, then the permeation of hearing with its permeating energy is already nonexistent. How then could such a no longer existent consciousness be the seed for the arising of a later consciousness? 
Furthermore worldly thoughts associated with correct reﬂection never arise and pass away together with thoughts of world-transcendent puriﬁcation, which are associated with true insight. Therefore these worldly thoughts are not permeated by those puriﬁed thoughts. 
Having no permeating energy, they cannot become the seed for world-transcendence. 
Therefore apart from the seminal, maturing consciousness, the world-transcendent puriﬁed mind is also impossible, because the permeating energies of hearing and reﬂecting are unable to include the seeds of permeating energy for transcending the world. 
the cause for impure states of mind, bring about the countering of such deﬁlement and be cause for the world-transcendent mind? 
The world-transcendent mind has never been experienced [by impure beings] and so it does not permeate their minds. 
If it does not permeate, then please explain from what cause does this worldtranscendent mind arise? 
The world-transcendent mind arises because its seed is the permeation of hearing that ﬂows from the purest reality realm. 
If it is identical with the container consciousness, then how can it issue in the seed to counter this consciousness? 
If it is not identical, then where does this wisdom seed of hearing ﬁnd its support? 
Until the attainment of the highest awakening of Buddhas, this wisdom permeation of hearing arises in synergy with whatever supporting ground it abides in. Therein it arises together with the maturing consciousness, just as water with milk. 
But this permeation of hearing is not itself that foundational consciousness, for it is the seed that counters that consciousness. 
states of permeation, while higher states depend on these middle states, because of hearing, reﬂection, and meditation cultivated repeatedly. 
higher, is then the seed of the Dharma body . Because it arises in countering the container consciousness, it is not comprised within that container consciousness. Since it is an outﬂow from the world-transcendent, most pure reality realm, even though a worldly state, it brings about the world-transcendent mind. 
Because even when the world-transcendent puriﬁed mind has not yet arisen from this seed, all such superior states of mind counter delusory passions and all evil destinies. Furthermore they counter the decay consequent upon all evil actions, enabling one to maintain life continuity, thus favoring the encounter with all the Buddhas and bodhisattvas. 
Although it is a worldly state, this permeation of hearing is comprised within the Dharma body as that which is to be attained by novice bodhisattvas, and in the liberation body as that which is to be attained by word-hearers and solitary enlightened ones . 
This permeation of hearing is not the container consciousness, for it is comprised within the Dharma body or the liberation body. 
Thus as increases from small to middle to high, to the same degree the maturing consciousness decreases. The support is then converted. 
When that support is entirely converted, then the container consciousness with all its seeds is entirely eliminated together with all those seeds. 
in tandem with is not the foundational consciousness, just as water is mixed with milk, then how can it be that the foundational consciousness is eliminated and that which is not the foundational consciousness is not eliminated? 
It is just like the haµsa that, when drinking, extracts milk from water. 
In a similar fashion, when worldly states are freed from desire, permeations from nonconcentrated realms are eliminated and permeations from states of concentration increase. This is how a worldly conversion of support becomes a world-transcendent conversion of support. 
it is not the maturing consciousness that leaves the body, for it has been taught that “consciousness does not leave the body.” This is because the concentration that destroys thought is a countering not of this consciousness . 
concentration, there is no need for consciousness again to be engendered, for this maturing consciousness continues without interruption and, apart from the time of rebirth, need not be reengendered . 
But this assertion cannot be demonstrated for the following reasons: 
These further mistakes are that in this opinion it would be impossible for one to fall from the abode of the unconscious gods or to emerge from the concentration that destroys thought, and that the last thought of a saint would become impossible. 
If is apart from this sequence of causes, then this opinion is not valid. 
Therefore our interpretation of this mind is demonstrated and one must a‡rm and understand it as we have explained. When bodhisattvas abide in good mind, They are freed from the ﬁve sense consciousnesses, And without remainder their minds convert their supports. By what other means could they do so? 
Countering cannot be the conversion of support, Because in abandonment it is absent. One would then err in failing to distinguish Cause from result in regard to abandonment. 
The nonbeing of seeds or Of their natures Cannot be the conversion of support, Since, because they do not exist, These two do not exist either, and The meaning of conversion is impossible. Section 4: 
Di›erentiations In sum there are three or four. 
There are the three di›erent kinds of permeation: 
The projection of rebirth means that permeation arises anew, for if it did not it would be impossible for consciousness to arise conditionally upon karmic formations, or for being to arise conditioned upon appropriation. 
Its maturation means that in virtue of those karmic formations, those beings mature in the six destinies, for without this it would be impossible for any being who had experienced rebirth to be reborn at a later time. 
Its referent signiﬁes that within the mind there is an image that engenders self-clinging, for without this, clinging to an image of self would be impossible. 
Its character means that this consciousness has a common character and a speciﬁc character, a seed-character as engendering the non-sensible and a seed-character as engendering the sensible. is common to all]. 
Its speciﬁc character is as the seed within each individual. 
Also its common character is as the seed for the engendering of the non-sensible and its speciﬁc character is as the seed for the engendering of the sensible. 
When its counteragent arises, that which is countered and eliminated is its speciﬁc character, while true insight is puriﬁed, supported upon a consciousness of the common seeds and others’ discriminations. It is just as a practitioner of meditation may take di›erent attitudes toward the same object and as many ways of examining things as are established in accord with their mental . 
We present verses: That which is di‡cult to eliminate and know Is termed the common entanglements. The thoughts of practitioners of meditation di›er, For the vastness of images forms the external world. 
Even though is not eliminated, For puriﬁed persons therein insight is puriﬁed. The perfection of the puriﬁed Buddha lands Is due to the purity of Buddha insight. Here is another verse: 
This foundational consciousness as speciﬁc is the seed for engendering a sensation of intelligent beings, for otherwise there would be no cause for the engendering of the sentient world. 
The common container consciousness as common is the seed for engendering the non-sensible , for otherwise there would be no cause for the arising of the physical, receptacle world. 
Consciousness as sluggish refers to the seeds of the major and minor delusory passions. 
Consciousness as lucid refers to the seeds of all good states with outﬂows. 
If these two were absent, one could not establish any di›erence between minds that have superior capabilities and those that do not have superior capabilities, both of which are the results of previous actions. 
Also there are two kinds of foundational consciousness: ﬁnished and not ﬁnished. 
Its character as ﬁnished is this consciousness as seed for the good and evil destinies that have already matured as results. 
Its character as not yet ﬁnished is its nature as the seed of language permeation, for from unlimited time it is the seed that engenders fabrication. 
Without this consciousness, the experience of the ﬁnal, causal maturation of good or evil actions and omissions and the arising of new language permeations would both be impossible. 
Furthermore it has a pattern of resemblance, for consciousness is like a magic trick, a mirage, a dream, or an optical illusion. This primary consciousness resembles these things. 
If this were not so, then this consciousness, as the seed for unreal imagining, could not be established as the cause of error. 
Furthermore it is described as total and not total. 
When one attains worldly liberation from desire, then that bondage is loosened. For adepts, word-hearers, and all the bodhisattvas, it is in part destroyed and eliminated, while for saints, solitary enlightened ones, and Tathågatas, it is totally destroyed and eliminated. 
Without this , this gradual destruction of passion would be impossible. 
There is no contradiction between the morally neutral nature [of the container consciousness] and the simultaneity of good and evil states. It is rather the good and evil that are in mutual opposition. 
If maturation itself were good or evil, then there would be no way to attain liberation from passion. 
And since there would be no way to engender either goodness or passion, there could be no liberation and no bondage, for these two [qualities of being not occluded and not deﬁned] would not exist. 
In sum they are three: the other-dependent pattern, the imagined pattern, and the reality pattern. 
constructed di›erentiations that have the foundational consciousness as their seed and that are included within unreal imagining. 
These di›erentiations are the conscious construction of the body, the conscious construction of the embodied person, the conscious construction of the experiencing person, the conscious construction of the content experienced, the conscious construction of valid experiencing, the conscious construction of time, the conscious construction of number, the conscious construction of place, the conscious construction of language, the conscious construction of a di›erence between oneself and others, and the conscious construction of being born and dying in good and evil destinies. 
The conscious construction of the body, the embodied, and the experiencer, the experienced content, valid experiencing, time, number, place, and language are all engendered from the seminal permeation of language. 
11 The conscious construction of the di›erence between oneself and others is engendered from the seminal permeation of belief in self. 
The conscious construction of being born and dying in good and evil destinies is engendered from the seminal permeation of the factors of existence. 
It is because such conscious constructions are the salient features of other-dependence, found in the deﬁlements of all worlds and destinies, that unreal imagining becomes manifested. 
These conscious constructs are comprised in unreal imagining, for they exist only as conscious constructs. 
The other-dependent pattern is the support whereby these nonexistent, unreal objects appear. 
The conscious constructs that are the content of experience correspond to the six external sense spheres of perceptible objects. 
The conscious construction of valid experience corresponds to the six sense consciousnesses. 
The remaining conscious constructs are di›erentiations of these basic constructs. 
because there are no external objects. They are like a dream. In a dream everything is only a conscious construct without any relationship to any external object. All the objects that appear as real therein, such as the various material forms, voices, odors, tastes, touches, villas, gardens, lands, mountains, and so on, have no real objective being whatsoever. 
This example shows how in all cases there is only conscious construction. 
The term “and so on” above indicates other examples, such as magic tricks, mirages, optical illusions, and so forth. 
You say that in all cases those things that are seen by a person who is awake are only conscious constructions like objects in a dream. 
But when a person awakens from a dream, he recognizes that the dreamed objects are only constructs of consciousness. Why then does one not similarly awaken from ? Answer: 
It is similar, for a person who has attained a wisdom awakening to suchness does not lack such an understanding. 
Just as a person yet dreaming does not wake up as long as he remains dreaming, but a person already awakened does have this awareness. 
So one who has not yet attained an awakened wisdom to suchness lacks this awakening, but one who has already attained a wisdom awakening to suchness certainly has this awareness. 
to conscious construction-only, then how can he infer this understanding? 
He can do so by reﬂecting upon the scriptures and by true reasoning. 
In scriptures such as the Scripture on the Ten Stages the World-honored Buddha taught, “Buddha sons, the three worlds are mind-only.” And in the Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning the great Bodhisattva Maitreya asked the World-honored Buddha, “World-honored One, are these images of things, which are the objects of the concentrated mind, di›erent from mind or identical with mind?” The World-honored Buddha answered, “Maitreya, they are not di›erent from mind, because I have taught that they are only conscious constructs. 
It is just as one sees on a mirror surface an image that appears to be di›erent from that surface, while in fact he sees the surface. 
In like fashion, that which appears in the concentrated mind seems to be objectively real, i.e., to di›er from the concentrated mind [but in fact it is only a construct of that mind].” 13 By reasoning upon this scripture we can clarify the meaning of conscious construction-only. 
How so? 
When the mind of a practitioner of meditation is already in the meditations of totality, he enters into a totality of color-image, as when he sees blue or yellow, but this mind does not itself see these material forms of blue or yellow as external objects. 
From this reasoning a bodhisattva can infer the meaning of conscious construction in regard to all consciousnesses. 
ness of memory, because the object seen is immediately present. 
In the mental consciousness of remembering what has been heard or reﬂected upon, consciousness has as its object things past, which arise as past. 
Therefore does demonstrate the meaning of conscious construction-only. 
From this inference a bodhisattva, even if he has not yet attained a wisdom awakening to suchness, can infer the meaning of conscious construction-only. 
structs explained above to be like magic tricks or dreams, those of the visual consciousness and so on are only conscious constructs. 
But how can this interpretation of conscious construction apply to material forms grasped by the eye consciousness? 
As stated above, it can be understood both from scripture and from reasoning that these also are conscious constructs only. 
Objection: If material forms are conscious constructs, then how do they appear as material? 
How do they perdure in solid homogeneity? 
They do so because they are supported by the deﬁle ments, such as inverted thinking, etc. 
If this were not so, the inversion of taking as an object what is not an object would not occur. 
And if these two obstacles did not occur, then states of puriﬁcation would not occur. 
Therefore, all conscious constructs are engendered in such fashion that they can be believed to be real. 
We present a verse: The cause of confusion and confusion itself are Constructs of material form and immaterial form. If the ﬁrst conscious construct did not exist, The second conscious construct would not arise. 
person, the experiencer, the content of experience, and valid experiencing come about in synergy and unison in all places of rebirth? 
Because they reach their term precisely in the experience of rebirth. 
Why do the conscious constructs of time and the other di›erentiations treated above come about? 
Because the environmental world is unlimited, . Because the mutual communication of a›airs is unlimited, . Because the di›erentiations in appropriations and experiences are unlimited, [di›erentiations between self and others arise]. Because the maturations of actions, whether experienced as agreeable or disagreeable, are unlimited and because the di›erences in dying and being born thus realized are unlimited, . 
structs as conscious constructs only? 
1) since all constructs have been shown to be only conscious constructs, then the only criterion is conscious construction, for external objects have no existence; 2) there are only two components in conscious construction, i.e., image and insight; and 3) because the images variously produced are included in conscious construction. 
What does this mean? 
Because all consciousnesses have no objects, we validate conscious construction-only as endowed with image and insight, for all sense consciousnesses have material form as their image and the sense consciousnesses as their insight, while the thinking consciousness has all the conscious constructs of sense perception as its image and thinking consciousness as its insight. 
How can this be? 
Because the thinking consciousness is able to imagine and appear discriminately in the guise of all these conscious constructs. 
We present a verse: When practitioners of meditation who understand The single criterion, Its two components, and their varieties Reach an understanding of Conscious construction-only, They eradicate the standpoint of consciousness. 
consciousness takes di›erent supports, it is referred to under di›erent names, just as acts of volition are referred to as acts of body, speech, and so on, [inasmuch as they depend on the body, the voice, etc.] In all its various conﬁgurations engendered by its supports it appears as dual: 
In all realms it appears as contact, but in form realms this thinking consciousness arises only in dependence on the support of the body. It is analogous to the material senses, which are also supported by the body. 
We present a verse: Those who have journeyed far and have journeyed alone, Bodiless and abiding in the cave of emptiness, Who have suppressed that which is di‡cult to suppress— They are liberated from the bondage of enmity. 
As a scripture says: The thinking consciousness apprehends each of the objects of the ﬁve senses, for this thinking consciousness in its discrimination is their cause. 
A further passage also says: When we describe discrimination, Among the twelve spheres , The group of the six sense consciousnesses Is termed the thinking sphere. 
the conscious constructor of objects, one must understand that herein all conscious constructs are termed the conscious construction of its image component, while the thinking consciousness and its supporting sense consciousnesses must be termed its conscious construction of the insight component. 
Because conscious constructions of images are the supports that engender the activity of insight, since, being the cause for the occurrence of insight, they appear as external objects. 
It is as the World-honored Buddha has taught, “When a bodhisattva attains the four understandings, he is able to comprehend and understand that all conscious constructs are without external object.” What are these four? 
Because all objects conform to these three wisdoms and because of the above-cited reasons for conscious construction-only, we conclude that only conscious construction exists and that external objects do not. 
There are six verses that reiterate the above interpretation. 
Be cause these verses appear later in the chapter on wisdom training, they will be treated extensively there. They begin with the phrase, “Hungry ghosts, animals, humans.…” . 
Why is it said to be other-dependent? 
Because, arising from its own seminal permeation, it is interwoven with causes and cannot be independent [it is dependent on others]. 
Because it does not arise spontaneously and cannot even for an instant be independent, it is termed other-dependent. 
If the imagined pattern is the other-dependent appearance of external objects as real, when they really do not exist, then how does it come to be imagined? 
Why is it termed imagined? 
Because the discriminations of thinking consciousness in unlimited ways cause error, it comes to be imagined. 
Because it has no speciﬁc character of its own, but is only the seeing of imagined distinctions, it is termed imagined. 
If the reality pattern is characterized as the eternal absence of the imagined pattern, how does it come to be reality? 
Why is it termed reality? 
Because suchness is never not suchness, it is reality. 
Because it perfectly puriﬁes all realms and is the highest of all good states in the fullness of ultimate meaning, it is termed reality. 
Here what state is referred to as imagining? 
What is referred to as the imagined pattern? 
Imagining is thinking consciousness, endowed with three kinds of imagining . 
This consciousness arises because its seeds are its own language permeations and the language permeations of all the sense consciousnesses. Because of its unlimited imagining in all places, it is termed the imagining . 
The imagined pattern refers to the basic activity of taking the other-dependent pattern as the content of imagining. 
What object does it encounter? 
How does it see them and how does it dependently arise? 
How does it express itself in language and how does it increase? 
It names all its objects in the other-dependent pattern; it grasps images; it engenders seeing in judgmental categories; its intelligence dependently arises as presented in language; its four kinds of language about what is seen and so on a‡rm that which is actually without being to be existent and fantasize that which does exist to be nonexistent. 
tical with each other? 
They are neither di›erent nor identical. One must explain them as . 
In one speciﬁc sense, the other-dependent pattern is dependent on others. 
In another sense it becomes imagined, and in yet another speciﬁc sense it becomes reality. 
In what sense is it termed other-dependent? 
In that it is bound to the other in its issuance from seminal permeation. 
In what sense does it become imagined? 
In what sense does it become reality? 
In that this other-dependent pattern, when it becomes reality, does not really exist as it was imagined. 
Furthermore in what sense does this one consciousness take on all the various conﬁgurations of consciousness? 
In that the conscious constructs that arise by virtue of both the fundamental consciousness and the other consciousnesses have these various conﬁgurations, and in that arise because of those conﬁgurations. 
In sum there are two. The ﬁrst is that which occurs in tandem with seminal permeation, while the second is that which is unformed in regard to puriﬁcation or deﬁlement. Thus we speak of other-dependence in virtue of these two mutual relationships. 
The imagined pattern is also of two varieties. The ﬁrst is the imagining of essences, while the second is the imagining of speciﬁc qualities. 
The reality pattern is also of two varieties. The ﬁrst is essential perfection, while the second is puriﬁed perfection. 
is the imagining of essences and the second is the imagining of speciﬁc qualities, while the third is that of intelligent persons and the fourth that of unintelligent persons. 
The intelligent are those persons who engender imagination from their ability to understand and di›erentiate names and words. 
The unintelligent are those who engender imagination with no such ability. 
Moreover in yet another schema there are ﬁve varieties of imagination. The ﬁrst is to imagine an essence in objects because of their names, as when one sees names as themselves implying objects. 
The second is to imagine an essence in names because of their objects, as when one takes objects to be intrinsic to names. 
The third is to imagine an essence in names because of those names, as when one imagines a name for a yet unknown object. 
The fourth is to imagine an essence in objects because of those objects, as when one imagines an object for a yet unknown name. 
The ﬁfth is to imagine an essence in both names and objects because of both, as when one identiﬁes names with objects and objects with names. 
The second is imagining images, that is, the conscious constructs of perceptible forms. 
The third is imagining because of the appearing , that is, all the conscious constructs of the sense consciousnesses, together with their supporting . 
The fourth is imagining changes in those images, that is, the changes of old age and so forth, the changes of sensations of pain and pleasure, of lust and delusion, of oppressive times, or the changes of being reborn in the hells or in the world of desire. 
The ﬁfth is imagining changes because of the appearing [of those images], that is, the arising of the changes described above. 
The sixth is imagining that is elicited by others, that is, the imagining that comes from hearing either false or true doctrine. 
The seventh is incorrect imagining, that is, the imagining of false doctrine of those outside the true doctrine. 
The eighth is correct imagining, that is, the imagining that comes from hearing the true doctrine of those within the true doctrine. 
The ninth is imagining that clings to its judgments, that is, the imaginings that arise in tandem with the sixty-two views that are based on belief in selfhood in all its varieties of incorrect reﬂection. 
the World-honored One has taught in all the Perfection of Wisdom teachings that nonimaginative wisdom is able to counter these ten distractions. 
Thus one should recognize that the full signiﬁcance of the Perfection of Wisdom scriptures lies in how the bodhisattva is to practice these perfections of wisdom in accord with the explanation of those scriptures. 
They teach, “¸åriputra, a bodhisattva is indeed a bodhisattva” [in order to counter the image of nonbeing]. They teach, “One does not see an existent bodhisattva” . They teach, “One does not see the name bodhisattva, the perfection of wisdom, practice or the absence of practice, perceptible form, sensation, conceptualization, volitional dispositions, or consciousness, for the essence of form is empty” . They teach, “They are not empty because of that emptiness” [in order to counter the negation of that which is]. 
They teach, “That emptiness within perceptible forms is not identical with those forms” . 
They teach, “No form is di›erentiated from emptiness” [in order to counter clinging to di›erentiation] for “form is emptiness and emptiness is form.” They teach, “This is because, ¸åriputra, these are only names” [in order to counter the distraction about totality]. 
They teach, “That which is referred to as the essence of form neither arises nor passes away and is neither deﬁled nor puriﬁed [in order to counter distractions about speciﬁc qualities]. 
They teach, “Of such names none are seen by the bodhisattva, who consequently engenders no attachment,” for if he should take note of the aggregates, he would also elicit this reﬂection. 
From these passages from the Perfection of Wisdom scriptures one should accordingly reﬂect upon the meaning of the ten distractions. 
14 all three patterns, then how can there be three patterns? 
Because it is contradictory that any substance to things be intrinsic to its name, since prior to the acquisition of names no understanding arises in regard to objects, and many names would indicate many objects, but this is contradictory. 
It is also contradictory that since names are undetermined, objects should also be disuniﬁed substances. 
We present verses on this: There is no understanding prior to naming; Names are many and indeterminate. It is contradictory for objects to be Identical with substances, to be many, or to be disuniﬁed. 
The nonbeing of beings appears as being. The undeﬁled yet becomes puriﬁed. Thus it is like a magic trick, Like the empty sky. 
it appears, how does one know that it is not entirely nonexistent? 
If there were no other-dependent pattern, then the reality pattern would also be nonexistent, and one would then come to a‡rm universal nothingness. 
And then, if the other-dependent pattern and the reality pattern both did not exist, one would fall into error about the being and nonbeing of deﬁlement and puriﬁcation. 
But since these states can be known not to be nothing, it is not true that all is nothing. 
We present a verse: If there is no other-dependent pattern, Then the reality pattern also does not exist. Then there could never be the two states Of deﬁlement and puriﬁcation. 
It should be understood through the teaching that such states do not exist. 
How should one understand the other-dependent pattern? 
It should be understood through the teaching on such similes as a magic trick, a mirage, a dream trace, a shadow, a reﬂection, a valley echo, the moon in water, a transformation. 
How should one understand the reality pattern? 
It should be understood through the teaching on the four kinds of pure states. 
These are 1) original, essential purity, that is, suchness, emptiness, the reality limit, the imageless, reality, the reality realm; 2) undeﬁled purity, that is, the above state separated from all adventitious obstacles; 3) the purity of the path whereby one reaches that , that is, all the factors favorable to awakening, all the perfections, and so on; and 4) the purity of the object that engenders that path, that is, the truly enunciated doctrine of the Great Vehicle. 
Because this teaching is the cause for puriﬁcation, it is not imagined. 
Because it is an outﬂow from the pure reality realm, it is not other-dependent. 
These four pure states encompass all pure states without exception. 
We present a verse: Such similes as magic refer to the other-dependent. The teaching of nonbeing refers to the imagined. The teaching of the four purities treats reality. 
These purities are the origin, the undeﬁled, The path, and the object. All pure states are encompassed in these four. 
15 explained in the scriptures through similes such as the magic trick and so on? In order to eliminate the delusions and doubts of others about the other-dependent pattern. 
How can these others be shown that their doubts about the otherdependent pattern are unjustiﬁed? 
In order to resolve the doubts of those who say, “If there really are no things, then how can one validate the objective world?”, it is taught that it is like a magic trick. 
In order to resolve the doubts of those who say, “If there really are no objects, then how can the mind and its activities arise?”, it is taught that it is like a mirage. 
In order to resolve the doubts of those who say, “If there really are no external things, then how can one experience pleasure or pain?”, it is taught that it is like a dream trace. 
In order to resolve the doubts of those who say, “If there really are no beings, then how do the various understandings arise?”, it is taught that it is like a reﬂection. 
In order to resolve the doubts of those who say, “If there really are no beings, then how can language arise?”, it is taught that it is like a valley echo. 
In order to resolve the doubts of those who say, “If there really are no beings, then how can one actually encounter real beings as objects of the concentrated mind?”, it is taught that it is like the moon in water. 
In order to resolve the doubts of those who say, “If there really are no beings, then how could bodhisattvas resolve unerringly to experience birth in the six destinies to beneﬁt others?”, it is taught that it is like a transformation. 
Scripture of Brahmå’s Questions that a Tathågata sees neither the cycle of birth and death nor cessation? 
His underlying intention was to teach the undi›erentiation whereby the cycle of birth and death is cessation because they are grounded within the other-dependent pattern as the imagined and reality patterns. 
This is because the other-dependent pattern in its imagined aspect becomes the cycle of birth and death and in its reality aspect becomes cessation. 
What was his intention in teaching these three aspects? 
While the deﬁled aspect is the imagined pattern within the other-dependent pattern, and the pure aspect is the reality pattern within the other-dependent pattern, the deﬁled and pure aspect is the other-dependent pattern itself. 
This was his intention in teaching these three aspects. 
What analogies can be o›ered for his intention? 
It is like a lump of gold with three aspects: elemental earth, gold, and a lump of soil. 
In the elemental earth, a lump of soil is visible, although it does not exist , while the gold, which does really exist, is not visible. 
But when the lump of soil is heated in the furnace, then the previously invisible gold appears. 
When the lump of soil appeared as the elemental earth, this was an illusory appearance. 
But when the gold appears, this is the appearance of reality. 
Thus the elemental earth has two aspects. 
In a similar way, when the fundamental consciousness has not yet been heated in the furnace of nonimaginative wisdom, this consciousness appears as the unreal, imagined pattern, and the reality pattern does not appear. 
But when it is heated in the furnace of nonimaginative wisdom, this consciousness appears as the perfected, reality pattern, and the unreal, imagined pattern does not appear. 
Therefore the consciousness of unreal imagination, that is, the other-dependent pattern, has two aspects. It is like the primal matter that contains gold covered over by dirt. 
taught that all things are eternal; in other passages, that all things are transient; and in yet other passages, that they are neither eternal nor transient. 
This was his intention in teaching the eternal, transient, and neither eternal nor transient natures of all things. This same interpretation holds for su›ering, pleasure, and the absence of either; for good, evil, and the absence of either; for emptiness, nonemptiness, and the absence of either; for self, non-self, and the absence of either; for quiescence, nonquiescence, and the absence of either; for essence, non-essence, and the absence of either; for arising, nonarising, and the absence of either; for passing away, no passing away, and the absence of either; for original quiescence, no original quiescence, and the absence of either; for original cessation, no original cessation, and the absence of either; for the cycle of birth and death, cessation, and the absence of either. 
One should interpret the underlying intent of all the distinctions taught by all Buddha Tathågatas by following the structure of the three patterns as above. 
We present verses: 16 As things have no reality, And as they appear in various ways, He explained their nonduality As neither reality nor unreality. 
From a single perspective he taught Either being or nonbeing; From a double perspective he taught Neither being nor nonbeing. 
But beings actually do exist in their appearances; Thus he taught their absence of nonbeing. 
Because substances do not of themselves exist, Because substances do not of themselves perdure, Because they do not exist as apprehended, The three patterns validate the three absences of essence. 
Because of non-essences, One establishes their momentary basis, Their original quiescence as neither arising nor passing away, And their original cessation. 
The four intentions are 1) the intention to make an identiﬁcation, as for example when it is taught that “At that time I was called VipaΩyin, who had attained Buddhahood”; 2) the intention to declare a future event, as for example when it is taught that “If a person recites and bears in mind the name of Bahuratna Buddha, he is assured of attaining supreme awakening without ever again falling back,” or when it is taught that “Only those who have elicited the vow to be born in the Buddha Land of Bliss will be born there”; 3) the intention of indirect reference, as for example when it is taught that “One can attain full comprehension of the Great Vehicle by serving Buddhas as numerous as the sands of the Ganges River”; and 4) the intention to accord with the dispositions of sentient beings, as for example when the Tathågata ﬁrst e›usively praised the charity of a certain person and then afterward severely censured it . 
As with charity, the same applies to discipline and the other perfections. 
These are termed the four intentions. 
The four aims are 1) the aim of causing one to enter, as when in the great or lesser vehicles the World-honored Buddha taught the conventional truths that identify the general and speciﬁc characteristics of persons and things; 2) the aim of disclosing patterns, as when he taught that the three patterns necessarily exist in the teaching on the speciﬁc nature of things; 3) the aim of countering, as when the practices that counter the eighty-four thousand passionate actions of sentient beings are clariﬁed; and 4) the aim of interpreting, as when a meaning di›erent from the literal sense is expressed in order to elucidate a di›erent meaning. 
The elucidation of the character of dependent co-arising is as the verse declares, “All things arise from the permeations of language and these from those ,” that is, the maturing consciousness and the actively evolving consciousnesses are causes one of the other. 
The elucidation of the true character of dependently co-arisen states of being means that the nature of all things, being characterized as active evolutions of consciousness, is conscious construction endowed with image and insight. 
Furthermore all states of being are characterized as support, imagined, and reality. In these words the nature of all states of being is elucidated within the context of the three patterns. 
We present a verse: Issuing from that which has both image and insight, One knows that all states of being have the three patterns. 
How can one elucidate the characters of these states? 
Within the other-dependent pattern, the imagined pattern lacks any reality whereby it might exist, but the true reality pattern really does exist therein. 
It is in virtue of this nonbeing and this being that at the same time spontaneously perfected suchness is realized or not, seen already or not yet seen. 
For in the other-dependent pattern, the imagined pattern does not exist, but the true reality pattern does exist. If one sees one, one does not see the other. 
We present a verse: In the other-dependent, the imagined does not exist, But true reality does exist. 
The elucidation of what has been taught consists of explaining and analyzing texts that have previously been taught [by the Buddha] in the light of later commentaries, whether concerning the assemblage of good qualities or the various aims of practice . 
17 World-honored Buddha’s good qualities , consists of the purest wisdom: 1) his nondual action, 2) his unmarked state of being the highest refuge, 3) his arrival at the Buddha abode, 4) his realization of equality with all Buddhas, 5) his attainment of unhindered activity, 6) his unerring and unopposable doctrine, 7) his unchanging sphere, 8) his inconceivable establishment of doctrine, 9) his equality in regard to the three times, 10) his manifestation of bodies in all world realms, 11) his unhindered wisdom in all things, 12) his wisdom joined with all his practices, 13) his wisdom without doubt in regard to all things, experienced by all bodhisattvas, 16) the perfection of his nondual Buddha abode, 17) his attainment of the undi›erentiated liberation wisdom of a Tathågata, 18) the ﬁnality of his attainment of equality in all Buddha lands, 19) the ultimacy of his reality realm, and 20) his extension to the limit of the realm of empty space. 
Just as the initial phrase “purest wisdom” is interpreted later by the commentarial explanations, so one must in turn distinguish and interpret each of the following phrases. 
If one would correctly explain the meaning of the doctrine, he must expand upon “the purest wisdom” by explaining that the wisdom of the Buddhas and Tathågatas is pure and without misunderstanding in regard to all things. In this basic meaning are comprised all twenty-one good qualities: 1) the quality of arising without any obstacle to knowledge whatsoever; 2) the quality of causing entrance into the highest purity of true suchness without duality in regard to being and nonbeing; 3) the quality of the Buddha abode wherein the Tathågata’s activity is e›ortless and uninterrupted; and action in the Dharma body; 5) the quality of countering all obstacles to practice; 6) the quality of suppressing all heretical doctrines; 7) the quality of arising in the world without being deﬁled by worldly states; 8) the quality of true doctrine validly established; four skillful answers; 10) the quality of manifesting enjoyment bodies in all world realms; 11) the quality of resolving the doubts of others; 12) the quality of introducing others to various practices; the quality of manifestation in accord with the aspirations of sentient beings; 15) the quality of taming sentient beings by the true doctrine through convening unlimited assemblies; 16) the quality of the fullness of perfection of the equal Dharma body; 17) the quality of manifesting pure Buddha lands in accord with the aspirations of sentient beings; 18) the quality of the inseparability and undi›erentiation of the three Buddha bodies; 19) the quality of engendering beneﬁt and gladness for all sentient beings to the limit of the cycle of birth and death; and 20) the quality of inexhaustibility. 
as, “If a bodhisattva has thirty-two qualities, he is called a bodhisattva.” They embrace the intention to bestow beneﬁt and gladness upon sentient beings: 
1) their intention to lead sentient beings to enter the wisdom of omniscience; 2) their wisdom to accord with their present situations; 3) their abandonment of pride; 4) the ﬁrmness of their good intentions; 5) their intention of being benevolent without simulation, of not currying favor, of being impartial to friend and foe, and of always being good teachers until they enter ﬁnal cessation; 6) their quality of speaking in good measure and gently, smiling before beginning to talk; 7) their compassion for all sentient beings without di›erentiation; 8) their not faltering or growing fainthearted in carrying out their tasks; 9) their quality of not becoming bored; 10) their quality of never being satiated with hearing doctrine; 11) their quality of confessing their own faults, while disregarding and not censuring the faults of others; deportment; 13) their quality of practicing disinterested charity, of not displaying fear in any destiny, of maintaining discipline, of being unerringly patient to all sentient beings, of zealously engendering all good states and practices, of cultivating contemplation, except those of the world of formlessness, and their wisdom joined to skillful means , that is, yoked to the four enticements; the undisciplined without distinction, of being respectful in serving good teachers, of being respectful in hearing doctrine, of enjoying dwelling in forest places, of not being fond of worldly fads, of taking no joy in the lesser vehicle, of appreciating the Great Vehicle, and of avoiding evil friends and respecting and serving good friends; of maintaining unlimited purity of mind, of sporting in the ﬁve supernatural powers and taking refuge in wisdom; and 16) their quality of not abandoning people of either proper or improper conduct, but including everybody, of speaking in a deﬁnitive manner, of revering truth, and of prioritizing and respecting action. 
The word “bodhisattva” is associated with these states. 
Through these commentarial explanations we have interpreted the previous passages. 
Here is a verse: When one takes up the previous phrases, They are analyzed as a sequence of good qualities. When one takes up the previous passages, Each is analyzed in light of its intention. 
Entry into the Distinguishing Characteristics of the Knowable able, how are we to understand the distinguishing characteristics of entry into the knowable? 
is supported by the permeations of much hearing and is not comprised within the container consciousness. Rather, just as with that container consciousness, so is a seed that develops . 
18 [Such correct reﬂection in turn] arises from images that appear as doctrine and its meaning. are discriminated in mental words that are accompanied by insight and that appear as if connected to apprehended . 
who have permeated the continuities with much hearing of the Great Vehicle, who have already rendered service to all the innumerable Buddhas who appear in the world, who have already entered a true state of deﬁnitive commitment, and who, through well-matured meditation, have increased their good roots and thus accumulated the two stores of merit and wisdom. 
In virtue of a discrimination of the images and mental words accompanied by insight that appear as doctrine and its meaning, and in virtue of the arising of insight into the doctrine of the Great Vehicle, they enter the state of practicing earnest commitment upon ﬁrmly believing what they have heard; they enter the path of insight upon intelligently understanding ; they enter the path of meditation upon countering all obstacles ; and they enter the ﬁnal path upon going beyond obstructing deﬁlement to the utmost puriﬁcation. 
The reality of all things exists only as conscious construction as explained, in virtue of an earnest commitment to what is heard, of an intelligent understanding, of a countering of all obstacles, and of a going beyond obstructing deﬁlement to utmost puriﬁcation. 
by the force of good roots; because they have sharpened their minds in three aspects; because they have eradicated the four basic barriers; and because, with uninterrupted and reverent meditation upon the doctrine and its meaning in quietude and insight, they have not been distracted. 
“Innumerable and immeasurable sentient beings in the human realm—since world realms in the ten directions are innumerable and immeasurable—from moment to moment realize supreme awakening.” The second sharpening of their minds [is expressed in the thought that] “In virtue of correct intentions the perfections of giving and so forth inexorably mature. 
I too have committed myself and attained such stability and, in virtue of my correct intention, will without di‡culty progress in the cultivation of the perfections of giving and so forth and attain their fullness.” The third sharpening of their minds [is expressed in the thought that] “Persons with good mental states after death in all their rebirths e›ortlessly attain pleasant and joyful destinies, for they have attained a limited goodness. 
Even with their limited goodness these persons still come to such attainments. How then would I who have achieved perfect and unlimited goodness not come to attain pleasant and joyful destinies at will?” Here stanzas refer : 
Sentient beings in the human realm Realize awakening at each and every moment In places beyond reckoning. 
The commitment of good persons enables them To engender the perfections of giving and so forth. Since the Victors attain these dispositions, They are enabled to cultivate giving and so forth. 
When good persons die, they attain superior joy. How then would not those whose puriﬁed goodness In its perfection eliminates gradations Be lacking in these accomplishments? 
thoughts of word-hearers and solitary enlightened ones, perverse notions are destroyed; 2) because they engender a mind of faith in and clear understanding of the Great Vehicle, they destroy all perverse ideas and doubts; 3) because they abandon perverse attachments to “I” and “mine” in regard to the doctrine they have heard and reﬂected upon, they destroy attachment to doctrine; and 4) because thoughts about images standing over against are not discriminated, they are able to eradicate discrimination. 
Herein a stanza states: Because the wise do not discriminate Thoughts about all the images That appear and stand before , They attain supreme awakening. 
concerning doctrine and its meaning? 
because of the discrimination of mental words accompanied by insight that are linked to the permeation of hearing, that are comprised in correct reﬂection, and that appear as doctrine and its meaning. 
because of the four inquiries on the designations of names, objects, essences, and di›erences. 
because of the four reality wisdoms, for in these four kinds of reality wisdoms names, objects, essences, and di›erences do not exist. 
When entering into the understanding of these things, bodhisattvas zealously endeavor to gain insight into conscious construction-only through the appearance of the mental words involved in such insight, which appear as written words and meanings to be discriminated. 
They fully comprehend that the images of those written words are merely the discriminations of mental words, that objects, depending on names and words, are merely discriminations of mental words, and that such names, objects, essences, and di›erences are valid only as conventional designations. 
Then at this stage, upon realizing that they are only the discriminations of mental words, these practitioners of meditation see that designations are neither names nor objects, neither essences nor di›erences, since in their real character there are no objective essences or di›erences. 
Thus they gain insight into conscious construction-only through the four inquiries and the four reality wisdoms that bear upon the names and objects that appear in the discrimination of mental words. 
What is it like? 
Because many apparently di›erent patterns of things do appear simultaneously, . 
It is just as in the dark a rope might appear to be a snake, while in fact that snake is an illusion and does not exist in the rope. 
Thus when people have clearly examined the objective rope, their previously confused awareness of a snake is to be without objective foundation and falls away while only the rope is known to be present. 
Yet this knowledge of the rope, when subtly analyzed, is also chimerical and without objective foundation, because it is characterized by material form, odor, taste, and contact, [none of which have any stable and objective foundation]. 
When the mind encounters these objects, its knowledge of the rope is also negated. 
When with a parallel insight one eradicates the apparent names and objects that appear in these six images, then discriminative, deﬁled understanding in mental words will no longer arise, just as in the knowledge of the snake. 
In suppressing objectivity in these six images, just as was the case with the knowledge of the rope, by relying on the wisdom of suchness the understanding of conscious construction-only itself can be rejected. 
by the mental words appear as objective, the bodhisattva fully understands the imagined pattern. In understanding the meaning of conscious construction-only, he fully understands the other-dependent pattern. But how does he understand the reality pattern? 
By abandoning any idea about conscious construction-only! At that moment the bodhisattva clearly understands the imagining of mental words, which long since had been yoked to the permeations of hearing doctrine, and he suppresses any idea of their correspondence with the external world. These no longer arise because their apparent objective status no longer has any cause and thus they do not even arise as an imagining of the mental words of conscious construction-only. 
This implies that the bodhisattva dwells only in nonimagination in regard to all objects and names, and in virtue of nonimaginative wisdom he realizes and abides in the reality realm of suchness. 
19 Things and persons, texts and meanings, Statements both concise and extended, Beings deﬁled and puriﬁed, and the ﬁnal stage— These ten are the di›erent spheres of naming. 
construction-only, he has attained understanding of the characteristics of the knowable. Through fully understanding these characteristics, he has attained entry into the ﬁrst stage of joy, well penetrated into the reality realm, attained birth in the lineage of all Buddhas in the ten directions, and attained impartiality in thinking about all sentient beings, bodhisattvas, and Buddhas. This is termed the bodhisattva’s path of insight. scious construction-only? 
Through a transcendent wisdom of quietude and insight focused on the all-pervading doctrine and through a wisdom characterized by a variety of images and conscious constructs attained subsequent to nonimaginative wisdom, he eradicates all the causal seeds in his fundamental container consciousness and nurtures all the seeds that enable one to contact the Dharma body. He converts his support and comes to attain the true qualities of all Tathågatas, and he attains the wisdom of omniscience. This is why he becomes aware of conscious construction-only. 
Seeing magical illusions in all the constructs that arise from the container consciousness and all the images of those imagined constructs, that wisdom attained subsequently to nonimaginative wisdom is fundamentally exempt from error. 
Just as a magician is himself undeceived by his magic tricks, so the bodhisattva, when enunciating the path of cause and result, always remains free from error in all his descriptions. 
tion-only, there are four concentrations that support the good roots of the four aids to penetration. 
How should a bodhisattva understand this? 
Through the four inquiries during the inferior e›orts at recognizing the absence of objectivity, the concentration of the acquisition of clarity supports good roots for aid to the penetration of fervor. 
In superior e›orts at recognizing the absence of objectivity, the concentration of increased clarity supports the good roots for aid to the penetration of crowning practice. 
In the four reality wisdoms, when the bodhisattva has gained insight into conscious construction-only and clearly understands the absence of objectivity, the concentration of partially penetrating reality supports recognition that is well-disposed toward truth not mediated through language. 
Immediately following this concentration, the clear suppression of the idea of conscious construction-only becomes an uninterrupted concentration that supports the highest worldly state. 
These four concentrations are methods whereby bodhisattvas gain insight into and bring to presence the truth not mediated through language. 
How does he enter into the path of meditation? 
He attains presence as described in the teachings in the extensive discourses of the Buddha on the ten bodhisattva stages, which summarize the twelvefold scripture of the Great Vehicle taught by all Tathågatas, because he masters both the general and the speciﬁc since he engenders transcendent, nonimaginative wisdom that focuses on the farreaching universal import and a wisdom of quietude and insight acquired subsequently to that nonimaginative wisdom ; because for immeasurable and incalculable millions of eons he relies on these many practices of meditation; because, by virtue of his conversions of support both previously and presently attained, he intensiﬁes his meditative practices in order to bring about an attainment of the three Buddha bodies. 
There are eleven di›erences herein: 
The bodhisattva must inquire into the fact that The interdependence of name and object is incidental. He must meditate on the duality as unitary, And as a conventional designation . 
From this he engenders reality wisdom, apart from Objectifying the three ideas [of name, essence, and di›erence]. If he sees that these do not exist, He enters into the three absences of essence. Treatise on Meditating on Conscious Construction (Fen pieh kuan lun), state: 
In states of quiescence the bodhisattva Understands that images exist only in his mind, And, abandoning externalized ideas of objects, He assuredly understands them to be only his own thoughts. 
Abiding within himself, the bodhisattva Understands that the objective realm does not exist, And also that the subjective realm is empty. 
Having nurtured the two stores of merit And wisdom without limit, A bodhisattva, in virtue of his certainty In reﬂection on doctrine, Is able to understand that the varied objects Are caused by ideas. 
Knowing that the varied objects are only ideas, He abides in conscious construction-only, Wherein objects appear. Therefore a practitioner of meditation realizes The Dharma realm And is liberated both from duality and From a nonduality . 
If one knows that there nothing remains apart from mind, Then he realizes also that mind does not exist either. Seeing both to be nonexistent, the sage Abides in the true reality realm of nonduality. 
The sage, through nonimaginative wisdom Is constantly impartial in all his actions, And the dense thicket of Error with its deﬁled support is banished and eliminated, Just as a medicine expels a poison. 
The sage, who is well-grounded in the true doctrine Taught by the Buddha, Places his mind at its root upon the reality realm and, Knowing that memory is merely imagination, Arrives at the shore of the ocean of good qualities. 
How then should we understand the distinguishing characteristics of the cause and result of this entry? 
By means of the six perfections: 
How are these six perfections the cause for gaining insight into conscious construction-only? How are they the result of such insight? 
Having already entered the realm of conscious constructiononly, in virtue of these six perfections, the bodhisattvas then attain the six perfections of a puriﬁed and committed disposition. 
Therefore even if they do not intensify their e›orts in regard to the six perfections, in commitment to true discourse and in their reﬂections of spiritual relish, pleasure, and delight, they continually cultivate without respite. Therefore they cultivate the six perfections to their ﬁnal fullness. 
Cultivating radiant qualities to perfection, Bodhisattvas attain a subtle patience in This great discourse , deep and broad, Of their own vehicle. 
Aware that there are only ideas and Attaining a wisdom that clings not, Their purity of commitment Is described as a stage of puriﬁed disposition. 
Abiding in the outﬂow of doctrine, Bodhisattvas see all Buddhas, past and future; Knowing that awakening is near, Without di‡culty they will attain it easily. 
six deﬁled obstacles that they are meant to counter, because they are the basis for all Buddha qualities, and because they are a support toward maturing all sentient beings. 
The perfections of giving and discipline are meant to counter the causes that prevent embarking , i.e., attachment to possessions and home. 
When one has embarked upon practice, the perfections of patience and zeal are meant to counter the causes of retrogression and spiritual debility, i.e., the opposition from other transmigrating sentient beings and weariness in one’s e›orts at bolstering virtues over a long period of time. 
After one has embarked upon practice and overcome this retrogressive debility, the perfections of meditation and wisdom are meant to counter the causes of loss, i.e., distraction and false wisdom. 
Therefore the perfections are established to counter these six deﬁled obstacles. 
They are numbered as six because they are a basis for all the Buddha qualities. The ﬁrst four perfections are causes of nondistraction, and the perfection is the essence of nondistraction. 
By relying on this state of nondistraction, one can truly understand the truth of all things [in the perfection of wisdom]—whereupon all the true qualities of a Tathågata are generated. 
Therefore they are six because they are a basis for all the Buddha qualities and because they are a support toward maturing all sentient beings. 
The perfection of discipline avoids injury to sentient beings. The perfection of patience enables those who su›er abuse from others to avoid feelings of revenge. The perfection of zeal brings forth good roots in others and eliminates bad roots. Thus beneﬁted in this fashion, all sentient beings become docile and their distracted minds are led to concentration, and thence to liberation, for this is the signiﬁcance of meditation and wisdom. 
Because bodhisattvas teach them through these six perfections, sentient beings mature. They are six because they support the maturation of sentient beings. 
These are the reasons why there are six perfections. fections? 
of supreme awakening; 2) unparalleled resources—all three levels of resources that are attributed to the perfections are fully cultivated by the bodhisattvas; 3) unparalleled tasks—the tasks of gladdening and beneﬁting sentient beings, for all the perfections of bodhisattvas are intended to accomplish these two tasks; 4) unparalleled skillful means, i.e., nonimaginative wisdom—all the perfections practiced by the bodhisattvas are included within their nonimaginative wisdom; 5) unparalleled orientation—all the perfections practiced by the bodhisattvas who turn toward supreme awakening are assuredly directed toward the result of universal wisdom; and 6) unparalleled puriﬁcation—the two obstacles of passion and to knowledge are utterly eliminated without remainder, for all the perfections practiced by bodhisattvas progressively eradicate these two obstacles until they are obliterated. 
Are perfections always giving? 
It can be that giving is not a perfection and that there is a perfection that is not giving. It is also possible for giving to be a perfection and for there to be a non-perfection that is not giving. 
The same four possibilities apply to the other perfections also. 
Because the earlier ones lead toward the arising of the later ones and because the former ones are puriﬁed by the later ones. 
From what etymologies are they derived? 
The term perfection, “påramitå,” means that in surpassing and going beyond the good roots of the perfections of persons in the world, word-hearers, and solitary enlightened ones, one is enabled to reach that far shore . 
Giving, “dåna,” is called “då” because it destroys miserly envy and eliminates bitter poverty . 
It is called “na” because it makes one a wealthy lord, prosperous and resourceful. 
Discipline, “Ω∆la,” is called “Ω∆” because it abates depraved and evil practices. 
It is called “la” because it is conducive to good practices and concentration. 
Patience, “k≈ånti,” is called “k≈å” because it eradicates anger and hatred. 
It is called “ti” because it is conducive to peace for self and others. 
Zeal, “v∆rya,” is called “v∆” because it eradicates indolence and evil states. 
It is called “rya” because without failure its practice leads to innumerable good states. 
Meditation, “dhyåna,” is called “dhyå” because it eliminates distractions. 
It is called “na” because it elicits a mind focused on an inner object. 
Wisdom, “prajñå,” is called “pra” because it eradicates all false views and wisdoms. 
It is called “jñå” because it truly knows all things in their varieties. 
On the ﬁrst four see above. 
The cultivation of beneﬁt for others means that in their spontaneous activity and non-abandonment of Tathågata deeds, all Buddhas cultivate the perfections again and again until they reach fullness. 
Now the cultivation of reﬂection refers to the practices comprised in the reﬂections of spiritual relish, pleasure, and delight, includes six aspirations: the vast aspiration, the long-term aspiration, the joyous aspiration, the benevolent aspiration, the great resolve aspiration, and the good aspiration. 
, the vast aspiration means that the bodhisattva considers the millions of eons it takes him to reach supreme awakening as a single instant, and at each instant he abandons his physical life and worships the Tathågatas, making o›erings of all the seven-jeweled world realms more numerous than the sands of the Ganges River. From his initial commitment until he enters and abides in puriﬁed awakening, that bodhisattva’s aspiration toward giving is insatiable. 
Similarly on innumerable occasions at each instant that bodhisattva, in the burning ﬁre that ﬁlls the trichiliocosm, assumes the four deportments in all his actions and, even though bereft of all possessions, he always keeps present and practices thoughts of discipline, patience, zeal, meditation, and wisdom—until he enters and abides in the ﬁnal, puriﬁed awakening. 
The bodhisattva’s aspiration for the other perfections is also insatiable. 
It is this insatiable mind for the perfections that is meant by the bodhisattva’s vast aspiration. 
The long-term aspiration means that from his initial commitment until he becomes awakened, the bodhisattva does not abandon this insatiable mind. 
The joyous aspiration means that in his deeds of beneﬁting others through the practices of the six perfections, the bodhisattva always elicits unparalleled joy, such as cannot be realized by those sentient beings whom he beneﬁts. 
The benevolent aspiration means that, after beneﬁting sentient beings through his practice of the six perfections, the bodhisattva sees those sentient beings as more benevolent than he himself, rather than the reverse. 
The great resolve aspiration means that the bodhisattva provides all sentient beings with good roots of virtue generated through his six perfections and with an unattached intent directs to lead them to attain their longed-for reward. 
The good aspiration means that the bodhisattva makes available for the common use of sentient beings all the meritorious good roots of his practice of the six perfections, so that they all may be directed toward supreme awakening. 
It is thus that the bodhisattva practices the reﬂection of spiritual relish embodied in these six aspirations. The bodhisattva’s reﬂection of spiritual pleasure embodied in the six aspects means that he takes pleasure in the meritorious good roots engendered in these six aspects by innumerable other bodhisattvas. 
The bodhisattva’s reﬂection of spiritual delight embodied in these six aspirations means that he delights in all sentient beings cultivating the six perfections with these six aspirations and that he himself vows to do the same until such practices lead to awakening. 
Those who hear about the bodhisattva’s practice of reﬂection in these six aspirations and who engender a single mind of faith will attain immeasurable and limitless accumulations of merits; and all obstacles from their evil actions will be utterly obliterated. 
If ordinary people, upon hearing, attain such immeasurable and limitless merit, what can we say about the exhaustive practices of a bodhisattva? 
that which restrains, that which assembles good qualities, and that which beneﬁts sentient beings. 
that which endures harm from others, that which accepts su›ering, and that which observes things . 
that which establishes pleasant residences, that which engenders supernatural powers, and that which beneﬁts others. 
preparatory to nonimagination, nonimagination, and that which is attained subsequent to nonimagination. are fundamentally present in these six perfections, since these are the outﬂowing results of these perfections and since are conducive to all good qualities. 
Because of their nature , because they cause the arising of those [states of greed, anger, and delusion], and because they are the results that ﬂow from those states. 
migratory course bodhisattvas have mastery over positions of great wealth, high birth, an assembly of followers, success in their e›orts to produce great riches, absence of sickness and pain, a lessening of desire, and intelligence in all arts and learning. At will, without losing the pleasures of their wealth, they beneﬁt sentient beings, since this is their proper activity. 
The merits of the six perfections cultivated by those bodhisattvas remain unchanging until they enter and abide in ﬁnal, puriﬁed awakening. 
honored One has spoken of all these perfections under the name of any single perfection, for his intent was to show that the cultivation of any perfection is aided by all the others. 
The Distinguishing Characteristics of the Diverse Practices in Regard to Entering the Cause and Result cause and result of entry into the characteristics . 
They are the ten bodhisattva stages: 
1) the stage of joy , 2) the stage of stainlessness , 3) the stage of bright radiance , 4) the stage of blazing ﬁre , 5) the stage di‡cult to conquer , 6) the stage of presence , imperturbability , 9) the stage of subtle wisdom , and 10) the stage of the Dharma cloud . 
Why is their number ﬁxed at ten? 
Because they counter the ten ignorances that occlude these stages, for the ten ignorances act as obstacles to the ten manifestations of the reality realm. 
What are the characteristics of these ten manifestations of the reality realm? 
In the ﬁrst stage one should understand the reality realm as omnipresent. 
In the second stage one should understand the reality realm as most excellent. 
In the third stage one should understand the reality realm as an excellent outﬂow. 
In the fourth stage one should understand the reality realm as ungraspable. 
In the ﬁfth stage one should understand the reality realm as undi›erentiated in its continuity. 
In the sixth stage one should understand the reality realm as undeﬁled and unpuriﬁed. 
In the seventh stage one should understand the reality realm as undivided by multiplicity. 
In the eighth stage one should understand the reality realm as without increase or decrease. 
In the ninth stage one should understand the reality realm as supporting the mastery of concentrations, lands, and wisdoms. 
In the tenth stage one should understand the reality realm as supporting mastery over actions and the methods of meditative formulas and concentrations. 
On this point stanzas state: Omnipresent and most excellent, Excellent outﬂow and ungraspable, Undi›erentiated and neither deﬁled nor puriﬁed, Undivided by multiplicity, Without increase or decrease, and Supporting four kinds of mastery— Support for actions, as well as for formulas and concentrations. 
These two stanzas from the Analysis of the Middle and the Extremes should be understood. 
Note that these ignorances are undeﬁled for adherents of the two vehicles, but deﬁled for bodhisattvas. 
ﬁrst attains the ability to beneﬁt both self and others. 
Why is the second stage called that of stainlessness? 
Because therein one is far removed from stains that would violate the bodhisattva discipline. 
Why is the third stage called that of bright radiance? 
Because therein, relying on unfaltering concentrations and contemplations, one supports the light of the great doctrine. 
Why is the fourth stage called that of blazing ﬁre? 
Because therein the virtues favorable to awakening burn up all obstacles. 
Why is the ﬁfth stage called di‡cult to conquer? 
Because therein the two wisdoms of truth and convention stand in sharp contrast and are di‡cult to unify and bring together. 
Why is the sixth stage called that of presence? 
Because therein, relying on a wisdom of the twelvefold dependent co-arising, one is able to bring to presence the perfection of wisdom. 
Why is the seventh stage called far-reaching? 
Because therein one arrives at the ﬁnal limit through energetic practices. 
Why is the eighth stage called that of imperturbability? 
Because therein one cannot be moved by any image or mental activity. 
Why is the ninth stage called that of subtle wisdom? 
Because therein one supports the most excellent and unoccluded wisdoms of investigation. 
Why is the tenth stage called that of the Dharma cloud? 
Because therein an awareness of the unity of all doctrines lies silent within meditative formulas and concentrations, because one removes from view the gross obstacles, just as a cloud covers the sky, and because one brings the Dharma body to perfection. 
of having attained commitment, i.e., one assuredly engenders commitment at each stage; 2) in virtue of having attained practice, i.e., one has attained the ten true practices of doctrine proper to each stage; 3) in virtue of having attained penetration, i.e., when one has ﬁrst penetrated to the reality realm of suchness at the ﬁrst stage, he can then penetrate all stages; and 4) in virtue of attaining accomplishment, i.e., one arrives at the summit of practice through these ten stages. 
all the bodhisattvas in each and every stage embark on their practices of quietude and insight, they accomplish them through ﬁve practices: 
All the stages have these ﬁve practices. These ﬁve practices in all stages engender ﬁve results: 
1) at each instant one can destroy the bases for all downward proclivities; 2) one transcends the confused notion of multiplicity and delights in doctrine; 3) one sees the light of the good doctrine everywhere as unlimited and undiscriminated; 4) as the pattern of imagining is converted, one attains the constant pattern of its puriﬁed aspect, and his continuity fully perfects the Dharma body; and 5) one assembles the proper causes, stretching continuously forth from one high stage to the next. 
1) the perfection of skillful means—one gives the merits from good roots nurtured through the six perfections to all sentient beings equally so that they may be directed toward supreme awakening; 2) the perfection of vows—this perfection encompasses the variety of vows whereby one excites future causes for engendering the six perfections; 3) the perfection of powers— through the practices of thoughtful investigation, powers subdue everything that counters the perfections and brings forth the six perfections in an uninterrupted continuity; 4) the perfection of knowledge—this perfection establishes the understanding of the ﬁrst six perfections and causes bodhisattvas in the great assemblies to experience delight in doctrine and to mature sentient beings. 
The last four perfections are comprised within that wisdom that is attained subsequently to nonimagination. 
As taught in the scriptural collections on the perfections, not all the perfections are practiced simultaneously in all stages. 
Practitioners arrive at their fullness in ﬁve gradations—some after three incalculable eons, some after seven, and some after thirty-three. 
What are these ﬁve gradations? 
[In the case of those who will arrive after three eons,] the practitioner engaged in practicing resolve completes in one incalculable eon . 
That practitioner is engaged in practicing puriﬁed aspiration , in practicing with images , and in [the fourth gradation of ] practicing without images , which accounts for the second incalculable eon. 
Thereafter, that practitioner is engaged in e›ortlessly practicing until in the tenth stage he completes the third incalculable eon. 
At times it takes seven incalculable eons. 
Before entering the stages there are three: 
During the stages there are four eons: one based on reality and truth, one based on abandonment, one based on quiescence, and one based on wisdom. 
At times it takes thirty-three. 
Three eons in the stage of skillful means: one of faith practice, one of zealous practice, and one of oriented practice. 
Then for each of the ten stages there are three eons: entry, abiding, and departure. 
Thus the ten stages of true practice are fulﬁlled over these eons. 
With good roots and vow power, Firmness of intent and excellence of progress, In three incalculable eons, It is said, true practice becomes perfected. 
The Distinguishing Characteristics of Learning Discipline causes of entry and its results. 
What then are the distinguishing features of learning discipline? 
It is as taught in the chapter “On Receiving the Bodhisattva Discipline” in the Bodhisattva Stages . 
Herein discipline that restrains is the support of the other two. Furthermore discipline that accumulates good states is the support for engendering the Buddha qualities, while discipline that beneﬁts sentient beings is the support for maturing sentient beings. 
hearers] means that this is a discipline whereby the bodhisattva is far removed from what is fundamentally sinful [such as murder, theft, and illicit sensual desire]. 
Its excellence in rules speciﬁc indicates a discipline whereby a bodhisattva is far removed from prohibitions about sin—thus where a word-hearer would sin, a bodhisattva remains sinless or, contrariwise, a bodhisattva can sin where a word-hearer would remain innocent. 
Bodhisattva discipline governs body, speech, and mind, while a word-hearer’s discipline governs only body and speech. Therefore mental sins can occur for a bodhisattva that do not hold for a word-hearer. 
In sum the beneﬁt to sentient beings brought about by his acts of body, speech, and mind are faultless. In such deeds all bodhisattvas must put into practice the training they have received. 
This is how to understand the excellence of these disciplines, both common and speciﬁc. 
would in his superior wisdom and as a skillful means commit the ten acts of murder, and so on, he would nevertheless remain unsullied and guiltless, gaining instead immeasurable merits and quickly attaining the excellent result of supreme awakening. 
Furthermore the acts of body and speech brought about through transformation also pertain to the profound discipline of a bodhisattva. 
Through such discipline at times he assumes the role of a king, even inﬂicting torment on sentient beings to establish them in the code of discipline. 
Or he may manifest varieties of former lives, thereby bringing some to su›er distress and resentment against their su›ering, while he leads others by cajoling, beneﬁting, and bringing them security. 
When they have ﬁrst elicited a mind of faith, then he causes them to mature their good roots in the holy paths of the three vehicles. This is the excellence of the bodhisattva’s profundity of discipline. by the bodhisattva. 
The Distinguishing Characteristics of Thought Training What then is the excellence of thinking? 
In sum it is sixfold: 
1) its object, 2) its varieties, 3) its countering force, 4) its aptitude, 5) its evocations, and 6) its deeds. 
things, this wisdom uproots all the debilitating obstacles in the foundational consciousness, just as one wedge dislodges another wedge. 
world, one can at will be born into eminent stations. 
in all world realms. 
natural powers, to make tremble, to blaze up, to pervade , to bring about manifestations, to transform things, to go and to come, to bring near that which is far, to render minute that which is large and vice versa, to incorporate all material forms into one’s own body, to take on the same form in entering the great assemblies, to appear and disappear, to suppress and block the supernatural powers of others through the eight masteries, whether to bestow on others abilities, memory, and happiness or to emit light on them. 
1) the di‡cult practice of one’s own personal acceptance, in taking on the good vows for awakening; 2) the di‡cult practice of not faltering, for the many su›erings of transmigration do not cause one to turn back; 3) the di‡cult practice of not turning one’s back, despite the fact that the evil done by sentient beings confronts one on all sides; 4) the di‡cult practice of being visible, for one is present to resentful sentient beings in bringing beneﬁt to them; 5) the di‡cult practice of being undeﬁled, for bodhisattvas born into the world are not deﬁled by worldly conditions; 6) the di‡cult practice of being committed, for in practicing the unplumbable Great Vehicle one is committed to its broad and deep meaning; 7) the di‡cult practice of clearly understanding, for one clearly understands the non-self of both persons and things; 8) the di‡cult practice of comprehending, for one truly discerns the scriptures of implicit meaning of all Tathågatas; 9) the di‡cult practice of not abandoning nor being deﬁled, for while not rejecting transmigration one is not deﬁled by it; and 10) the di‡cult practice of exerting e›ort in di‡cult tasks, for all Buddha Tathågatas, liberated from all obstacles, spontaneously bring beneﬁt to all sentient beings and, until the ﬁnal limit of transmigration is over, desire to cultivate such e›orts. 
above in number eight], how is one to understand the implicit meaning of the scriptures preached by all the Buddha Tathågatas? 
As the scriptures teach, a bodhisattva must investigate according to truth . How is it that a bodhisattva neither loses anything nor gives to anyone? 
In that a bodhisattva has well practiced giving everywhere in an unlimited and incalculable fashion, his practice of giving arises in continuity [even though he does not at any particular moment give anything to anyone]. 
How is it that a bodhisattva takes pleasure in giving? In that he does not take pleasure in any gift. 
How is it that a bodhisattva believes in giving? In that he does not place his faith in any Buddha Tathågata. 
How is it that a bodhisattva initiates giving? In that in his giving he does not lay plans for himself. 
How is it that a bodhisattva constantly delights in giving? 
How is it that a bodhisattva is capable of great giving? 
How is it that a bodhisattva is pure in his giving? In that he engenders avarice. 
How is it that a bodhisattva is perfected in giving? 
How is it that a bodhisattva masters giving? In that he attains no mastery over his giving. 
How is it that a bodhisattva is inexhaustible in giving? In that he does not reach inexhaustibility. 
One should understand the other perfections of discipline, patience, zeal, meditation, and wisdom according to the principle employed in these scriptural passages on giving. 
How is it that a bodhisattva takes what is not given to him by others? In that he takes sentient beings not given to him by others. 
How is it that a bodhisattva acts perversely and lewdly? In that he elicits thoughts about the perversity of the sensual desire . 
How is it that a bodhisattva speaks falsehood? In that he identiﬁes what is false as false. 
How is it that a bodhisattva tells lies? 
How is it that a bodhisattva utters harsh words? 
In that he reaches the far shore of knowledge. 
How is it that a bodhisattva utters inappropriate speech? In that he divides the doctrine and interprets it according to its genre. 
How is it that a bodhisattva becomes covetous? 
How is it that a bodhisattva becomes mean? In that he attacks all the passions in his own mind and the minds of others. 
How is it that a bodhisattva engenders false views? In that he truly examines falsity everywhere and at all times. qualities. 
What are these profundities? 
In this treatise we shall analyze them extensively . 
Eternity is the nature of all Buddha qualities, because the Dharma body is eternal. 
Abandonment is the nature of all Buddha qualities, because all obstacles are completely severed. 
Arising is the nature of all Buddha qualities, because transformation bodies constantly arise. 
Attainment is the nature of all Buddha qualities, because one attains the parallel counteragent to the eighty-four thousand passionate actions of sentient beings. 
Desire is the nature of all Buddha qualities, because one fulﬁlls his identity by encompassing desire-ﬁlled sentient beings. 
hatred, delusion, and worldliness are the nature of all Buddha qualities. 
Nondeﬁlement is the nature of all Buddha qualities, because, having fully realized suchness, no obstacle can deﬁle . 
Undeﬁleability is the nature of all Buddha qualities, because, although Buddhas appear in the world, they cannot become deﬁled by worldly things. 
These are the reasons for the profundity of the Buddha attributes. 
beings, to purify Buddha lands, and to generate all the Buddha attributes that the actions of the concentrations of a bodhisattva are di›erentiated. 
The Distinguishing Characteristics of Learning Wisdom What then is the excellence in wisdom training? 
The excellence of wisdom training consists in the superiority of nonimaginative wisdom in 1) its essence, 2) its support, 3) its cause, 4) its object, 5) its modality, 6) its establishment, 7) its solution of di‡culties, 8) its maintenance, 9) its aids, 10) its reward, 11) its outﬂow, 12) its issue, of the good attributes of preparatory, nonimaginative, and subsequently attained wisdoms, 15) examples of nonimaginative and subsequently attained wisdoms, 16) its august and spontaneous activity, and 17) its profundity. 
Nonimaginative wisdom, identiﬁed as the wisdom that is liberated from these ﬁve states, is described in the verses: 
For all bodhisattvas, the essence Is liberation from the ﬁve states, For nonimaginative wisdom is nonimaginative In regard to reality. 
For all bodhisattvas the support is Neither thinking nor the absence of thinking, For nonimaginative wisdom is not a not-thinking But is something that rapidly . 
For all bodhisattvas the cause is The permeation of hearing discourse, For nonimaginative wisdom is True and correct reﬂection. 
For all bodhisattvas the object is Ine›able reality, For nonimaginative wisdom The true suchness of the non-essence of both [self and things]. 
For all bodhisattvas its modality is Focused on true suchness, For nonimaginative wisdom is Imageless and undi›erentiated. 
Since words form a continuum, Its meaning is established by conjunction. 
Apart from words and language Wisdom does not occur in regard to knowables. since the two are not the same, Everything is inexpressible. 
The ﬁrm basis for all bodhisattvas is Nonimaginative wisdom, For it supports practices subsequently attained In their development to ﬁnal perfection. 
For all bodhisattvas the aids Are the two paths, For nonimaginative wisdom is characterized By the mental states of the ﬁve perfections. 
For all bodhisattvas the reward occurs in The two assemblies [of the transformation and enjoyment bodies], For nonimaginative wisdom in virtue of Preparatory e›ort and attainment . 
For all bodhisattvas the outﬂow occurs In one life after another, For nonimaginative wisdom Develops and progresses. 
For all bodhisattvas the issue Is yoked to attainment and perfection, For nonimaginative wisdom Is known in the ten stages. 
For all bodhisattvas, the term Is the attainment of the puriﬁed three bodies, For nonimaginative wisdom Reaches the most excellent mastery. 
This nonimaginative wisdom is Like space, undeﬁled By sundry and grievous evil acts, Simply because of its commitment. 
Pure like space, This nonimaginative wisdom Is liberated from all obstacles, Because it has reached perfection. 
Undeﬁled like space, This nonimaginative wisdom, Even though it appears in the world, Is not deﬁled by worldly things. 
These three wisdoms are Like a mute who tries to perceive objects, Like a mute who does perceive objects, and Like a non-mute who does perceive objects. 
These three wisdoms are Like a fool who tries to perceive objects, Like a fool who does perceive objects, and Like a non-fool who does perceive objects. 
These three wisdoms are Like the ﬁve senses that try to perceive objects, Like the ﬁve senses that do perceive objects, and Like that which is not the ﬁve senses [i.e., the thinking consciousness] that does perceive objects. 
These three wisdoms are respectively Like one of no learning who seeks to understand , Like one who is well-read who does understand a doctrine, and Like one who understands and perceives the meaning of a doctrine. 
Nonimaginative wisdom is Like a person who has his eyes closed. Subsequently attained wisdom is Like a person who has his eyes opened. 
Nonimagination is like space, Without deﬁlement, obstruction, di›erentiation, or limit. Subsequently attained wisdom is Like the appearance of forms in that space. 
Just as ma√i-jewels or heavenly drums Accomplish their deeds without reﬂection, Just so, without discrimination, The various Buddha deeds are accomplished. 
This wisdom called nonimaginative Is not di›erentiated from its object, Either as this or not as this , Either as not wisdom or as not not wisdom. 
The Buddha has taught that all things Are originally not imagined, Because that which is imagined does not exist. 
The preparatory nonimaginative wisdom has also three varieties inasmuch as it arises 1) from causes, 2) from evocation, and Nonimaginative wisdom has three varieties inasmuch as it is di›erentiated as 1) the completion of knowing, 2) inerrancy, and Wisdom attained subsequent to nonimaginative wisdom has ﬁve varieties inasmuch as its manifestations are di›erentiated as magical creations. 
Hungry ghosts, animals, humans, All gods—each have their own Di›erent ideas about a single object, Concluding that the object is valid. 
As, in regard to the past and the future, And to dreams and double images, Knowledge objectiﬁes things without any existent object, So objects are posited, even though they do not occur. 
If external things became objects of understanding, There would be no nonimaginative wisdom. If this did not exist, Then the attainment of Buddhahood would also be impossible. 
Bodhisattvas who have attained mastery Because of the power of their commitment Create lands at will, As do those in concentration. 
Those perfected in investigation, Those with wisdom and concentration All things appear as objects Within their own minds. 
When nonimaginative wisdom is cultivated, No object appears. Know then that no external object exists, And thus there is no conscious construction either. 
synonymous. As a scripture teaches, “When a bodhisattva dwells in the perfection of wisdom through the cultivation of non-abiding, he is able to cultivate the other perfections to their fullness.” Why is it that by cultivating non-abiding he can cultivate these other perfections to their fullness? 
On this point a stanza states: Because of the ﬁve superiorities in wisdom and On account of their compassion and cultivation of merit, In riches both mundane and transcendent, We say they are not far from perfection. 
This is because bodhisattvas see that, if they were to bestow riches, the actions of sentient beings in their consequent stage of wealth would constitute obstacles that would result in su›ering and that this would hinder the good that they might engender. 
It is because bodhisattvas see that if they lack riches, they will be able to realize detestation of evil transmigration. 
It is because bodhisattvas see that if they were to bestow riches on them, then they would nurture the causes for all manner of evil states. 
It is because bodhisattvas see that if they were to bestow riches on them, this would be cause for them to oppress an untold number of other sentient beings. 
21 These are the reasons why, although bodhisattvas are not lacking in such capabilities, yet sentient beings are seen in the world. 
On this point a stanza states: Seeing the obstacle of their actions, the good hindered, The manifestation of detestation, and increase of evil, And the injury to other sentient beings, Bodhisattvas are not moved toward giving . 
The Distinguishing Characteristics of Quiescent Abandonment as a Result of the Trainings then should we understand the excellence of quiescent abandonment? 
The destruction of deﬁlement by bodhisattvas is their nonabiding cessation. 
What are its characteristics? 
It is characterized by a twofold conversion of support whereby they deﬁnitively abandon deﬁlement but not transmigration. 
Herein transmigration refers to the deﬁled aspect of the otherdependent pattern. 
Cessation refers to the puriﬁed aspect of the other-dependent pattern. 
The basic support refers to both these aspects of the puriﬁed and deﬁled other-dependent pattern. 
The conversion of support means that, when its counteragent arises, the other-dependent pattern forever alters its basic nature as the deﬁled aspect and forever realizes its puriﬁed aspect. 
This conversion occurs from the ﬁrst to the sixteenth stages; 3) conversion of practice—no images appear in the supporting of those not yet freed from the obstacle , but reality does appear. 
What fault would there be for a bodhisattva to remain in an inferior conversion? 
He would fail to perceive what is of beneﬁt to sentient beings, be far distant from all bodhisattva states, and attain a liberation identical to that of the adherents of the lesser vehicles. 
What merit is there in a bodhisattva maintaining an extensive conversion? 
Because in transmigratory conditions he converts his own support, he attains mastery in all destinies, and he manifests his bodies both in valued positions in the world and in the three vehicles. His skillful capability in various ways of teaching and converting establishes others in the true teaching. This is the merit of an extensive conversion. 
For common worldlings, reality covered over Appears to them as illusion. For bodhisattvas, having abandoned everything, Reality appears. 
The non-appearance of illusion and The appearance of reality are The bodhisattva’s conversion of support, Liberation, at will. 
If wisdom engenders the equality Between transmigration and cessation, Then transmigration is precisely cessation And they are not two separate things. 
Therefore in regard to transmigration Do not abandon or refuse to abandon. Likewise in regard to cessation Have no attainment and no lack of attainment. 
The Distinguishing Characteristics of the Excellence of Wisdom abandonment, we now treat the excellence of wisdom. 
The excellence of wisdom is to be understood as the three bodies of the Buddha, which are the essence body, the enjoyment body, and the transformation body. 
Among these, the essence body is the Dharma body of Tathågatas, because it is the support for mastering all things. 
The enjoyment body is the body that is manifested in the various Buddha lands and assemblies of great persons. It is supported upon the Dharma body in that its cause is the complete puriﬁcation of the Buddha lands and the experience of delight in the doctrine of the Great Vehicle. 
The transformation body is also supported upon the Dharma body because it manifests itself [in many perceptible manners], such as residing in and descending from the Tu≈ita , being born , undertaking learning, indulging in desire for the material world, leaving home, going to the heretics’ place, practicing asceticism, attaining perfect awakening, turning the wheel of the Dharma, and entering into ﬁnal cessation. 
In brief, it is characterized in ﬁve manners. 
On this point a summary stanza states: Characteristic, realization and attainment, mastery, support, constitution, distinction, good qualities, profundity, recollection, and activity. These clarify the Buddha bodies. 
port because, when the dependent pattern in its deﬁled aspect with all its obstacles has been eliminated, one is liberated from all those obstacles and is converted into the dependent pattern in its pure aspect with mastery over all things. 
It is characterized as being composed of radiant qualities because through the completion of the six perfections, one obtains the excellent capabilities of the ten masteries. 
Among these [ten masteries], the mastery over the duration of life, the mastery over mind, and the mastery over necessities are through the fullness of the perfection of giving. 
The mastery over act and the mastery over birth are through the fullness of the perfection of discipline. 
The mastery over commitment is through the fullness of the perfection of patience. 
The mastery over vow is through the fullness of the perfection of zeal. 
The mastery over miraculous powers, which include the ﬁve supernatural faculties, is through the fullness of the perfection of meditation. 
The mastery over understanding and the mastery over doctrine are through the fullness of the perfection of wisdom. 
The Dharma body is characterized by nonduality because, being characterized by the nonduality of existence and nonexistence, all things are nonexistent and their characteristic of emptiness is not nonexistent. 
It is also characterized by nonduality of the conditioned and the unconditioned, because it is not engendered by acts and passions but is powerful in manifesting itself in conditioned images. 
It is also characterized by the nonduality of unity and di›erentiation, because the support of all Buddhas is not di›erent and yet innumerable individual attain perfect awakening. 
On this point there are stanzas: Because there is no clinging to self, there is no di›erentiation in the support . But since many individuals are enlightened in consequence of their former [states as bodhisattvas], their designated names are said not to be a unity. 
Because of the division of lineages, of usefulness, of totality, of beginninglessness, they are not a unity. Because of the absence of di›erentiation in support, which is suchness, there is no multiplicity. 
The Dharma body is characterized by eternity, because the purity of suchness as its characteristic, because it is under the impulse of former vows , and because its activity and action are unending. 
The Dharma body is characterized by inconceivability, because the purity of suchness is to be known by a personal realization, because it cannot be compared to anything, and because it is beyond the scope of intelligent knowing. 
initially attained through contact by the nonimaginative and subsequently attained wisdoms, which have as their object the uniﬁed doctrine of the Great Vehicle. are accomplished, matured, and cultivated in the ﬁve aspects [of practice explained in Chapter V] and have well accumulated the equipment in all the stages . by the diamondlike concentration, since destroys the subtle obstacles that are di‡cult to destroy. Having been separated from all obstacles immediately after that concentration, [the Dharma body] is thus acquired through the conversion of support. 
In short there are three so supported. 
The Dharma body is the support of the diverse residences of Buddha Tathågatas, the following stanzas: All Buddha Tathågatas, because they have realized and attained their own realm, acquire a ﬁvefold joy, but adherents of the two vehicles lack such a joy because they have not realized it. Therefore one who desires such joy should realize the realm of the Buddha. 
Because they are capable of establishing immeasurable deeds and because, delighting in the beauty of doctrine, their desire comes to fulﬁllment, Buddhas, who attain the highest, irreproachable joy, gain constant insight into the four immeasurable activities. 
The Dharma body is the support for the diverse bodies of enjoyment, because brings the good roots of bodhisattvas to maturity. 
It is the support of the diverse bodies of transformation, because generally brings word-hearers and solitary enlightened ones to maturity. 
The Dharma body of all Buddha Tathågatas is to be understood as consisting of these six kinds of Buddha factors. 
Just as with the Dharma body, so the enjoyment body is also not di›erentiated, because its support and activity are not di›erentiated. 
The transformation body is to be understood in a parallel manner. 
Dharma body is endowed with the perfectly puriﬁed four immeasurable activities, the eight liberations, the eight governing spheres, the ten entire spheres, noncontentious concentration, vow wisdom, the four unimpeded understandings, the six supernatural knowledges, the thirty-two major marks of a great person, the eighty minor marks, the four puriﬁcations of all aspects, the ten powers, the four fearlessnesses, the four things that need not be guarded against, the three focuses of mindfulness, the entire destruction of the propensities, nonforgetfulness, great compassion, the eighteen exclusive qualities of a Buddha, and the excellent wisdom of all excellent aspects. O you who have great compassion on sentient beings, you who have the aspiration to separate from bondage, you who have the aspiration not to separate [from sentient beings], you who have the aspiration for happiness and welfare—homage to you! 
spheres O you who are liberated from all obstacles, the sage who overcomes the entire world, you whose wisdom is universally replete, you whose mind is liberated—homage to you! 
O you who destroy all the passions of all sentient beings without remainder, who crush the deﬁlement of the passions, who always take pity on the passionate—homage to you! O you who are spontaneous, unattached, unimpeded, continually quiescent, you who answer all the questions of sentient beings—homage to you! 
O you who are unimpeded in teaching with regard to the support and that which supports and the language and wisdom needed, you, the teacher—homage to you! 
O you who, having approached through their words, know their conduct in regard to their coming, going, and deliverance, you who well instruct sentient beings— homage to you! 
After having seen you, all sentient beings revere you as a noble person. O you who, upon being seen by others, inspire a puriﬁed mind—homage to you! 
O you who have attained mastery over concentrations and wisdoms in regard to taking up, maintaining, and forsaking , and in regard to transformations and changes [in things], World-honored One—homage to you! 
O you who shatter the demons who impede sentient beings about the means, the refuge, the puriﬁcation, and the deliverance to the Great Vehicle—homage to you! 
O you who teach understanding, abandonment, deliverance, and of the obstacles encountered, for the beneﬁt of both self and others, overcoming any perverse — homage to you! 
O you who are unfettered, irreproachable, undeﬁled, and nonabiding, unmoved by things and unfabricating—homage to you! 
O you whose speech is awesome in the assemblies, who are free from the two deﬁlements, who have nothing to be guarded against, who forget nothing, who gather together communities—homage to you! 
O you who, in carrying out the interests of all sentient beings, do not waste time, whose work is never without fruit, who are never confused—homage to you! 
O you who continually 22 behold sentient beings in the entire world day and night, who are endowed with great compassion, who have the aspiration to beneﬁt—homage to you! 
O you who are unequaled by those in the two vehicles in performance, attainments, wisdoms, and deeds—homage to you! 
O you who have realized the great awakening of all aspects by the three bodies, who cut o› any doubts of others—homage to you! 
O you who have no attachment, no fault, no turbidity, no stagnation, no vacillation in regard to anything, and no fabrication—homage to you! 
endowed not only with these virtues but also with the qualities of essence, cause, result, activity, associated qualities, and function. Therefore the qualities of all Buddhas are to be understood as supreme. 
On this point stanzas state: You have accomplished suchness, you have been delivered through cultivating all the stages, you have attained preeminence among others, you are the liberator of all sentient beings. 
You are associated with inexhaustible and unequaled qualities, you are seen in the world and in the three assemblies, and yet you are invisible in every way to gods and humans! profound. 
How should that profundity be examined? 
The unborn Buddha is born, abides in non-abiding, does everything spontaneously, and eats the fourth food. 
are undi›erentiated and immeasurable; their one activity is beyond calculation; endowed with the three bodies, their action, both continual and interrupted, is supreme. 
There is nothing that can be awakened, but it is not the case that there is no perfectly awakened one at all. At every moment are immeasurable and are manifested through the nonexistence of existence. 
After having known desire and nondesire, he has entered into the reality of desire. 
The Buddha has gone beyond the ﬁve aggregates, and yet he dwells in the ﬁve aggregates. He is neither identical with nor separated from the aggregates, for he has entered a cessation that does not abandon the aggregates. 
All the actions of Buddhas completely interpenetrate just like water in the ocean. 
They have no intention of beneﬁting others, thinking “I have done, am doing, or will do .” The World-honored One is not seen because of the faults of sentient beings, just as the moon in a broken basin, like the sun he ﬁlls all worlds with the light of the Dharma. 
At times, like a ﬁre, manifest perfect illumination, and at times, like a ﬁre, they are extinguished, for these two in fact do not exist, but of all Buddhas abides forever. 
The Tathågata abides in the supremely abiding self, in unholy conditions, in human and evil , and in unchaste conditions. 
They do appear in all states of birth, and yet they are beyond the sphere of the six senses. 
The passions have been destroyed and suppressed, just like a poison counteracted by a magical spell. They have exhausted passion through passion and have attained universal wisdom. 
For those who practice the great means, passions become factors of awakening, and transmigration is identiﬁed with cessation. Therefore awakening is inconceivable. 
Buddhas, how many recollections do they employ? 
In sum, in relying on the Dharma body they cultivate the recollection of Buddhas in seven ways. 
1) They cultivate the recollection of Buddhas by considering: “All the Buddhas have unequaled mastery over all things,” for they have acquired the six unimpeded and unbounded supernatural knowledges over all world realms. 
Here is a stanza [on this]: Buddhas do not have entire mastery over the realm of all those sentient beings who are obstructed, without potential, or yoked to the twofold inevitability. 
“The body of the Tathågata is eternal,” because, with suchness uninterrupted, they are liberated from impurities. 
“The Tathågatas abide in great richness and enjoyment,” because all the wondrous purity of all Buddha lands is their richness and enjoyment. 
“The Tathågatas are never soiled nor attached,” because they are not soiled by any worldly thing, even though they depart from and appear in the world, just as dust cannot soil the sky. 
“The Tathågatas are of great use in the world,” because, by manifesting supreme awakening and ﬁnal cessation, they mature those sentient beings who are not completely mature and liberate those who are completely mature. 
Here are stanzas : are perfected in relying on the mind of the Tathågata and are perfected in good qualities, in eternity, in irreproachability, in spontaneity, and in granting great joy in doctrine to sentient beings. 
In all their actions they are unimpeded and equally beneﬁt many men. Wise men should base themselves upon such recollections of all Buddhas universally. 
In the manner in which it is described in the preface of the One Hundred Thousand-Stanza Scripture (Pai ch’ien ching) of the bodhisattva-pi†aka, the Worldhonored Buddha dwells in a great palace. The Buddha dwells in a great palace, which is ornamented with the seven gems and emits a great light completely ﬁlling immeasurable world realms. The conﬁguration of its immeasurable and wondrous distribution of ornaments constitutes a vast area. Its boundaries cannot be crossed or measured. 
Thus the pure land is completely puriﬁed in color, conﬁguration, extent, domain, cause, result, lords, confreres, servants, sustenance, action, beneﬁcence, fearlessness, abode, path, vehicles, entrance gates, and foundation. 
In these above descriptions its complete purity is manifested. 
The enjoyment of the perfectly puriﬁed Buddha land is completely pure, completely pleasurable, completely irreproachable, completely masterful. 
It should be understood that these ﬁve actions are the same for all Buddha Tathågatas. 
Here is a stanza on this [equality of actions among all Buddhas]: When cause, support, function, intention, and endeavor di›er, then it is true that there results a di›erence of action in the world; but because these ﬁve di›erences do not obtain for Buddhas, the actions of the World-protectors are identical. 
good qualities and such perfections, is not common to word-hearers and solitary enlightened ones, then with what intention has [the Buddha] taught that they also should journey in a single vehicle, i.e., the Buddha vehicle? 
Here are stanzas on this point: has taught a single vehicle to lead word-hearers of undetermined , other bodhisattvas , and of determined lineage into the Great Vehicle. 
He taught a single vehicle because of the identity of reality, of non-self, and of liberation; because of the di›erences of lineage; because of the acquisition of cessation in two aspirations; and because of ultimacy. 
body, then how can we enumerate di›erent Buddhas? 
Here is a stanza on this point: Because in one realm there are not two , because innumerable simultaneously complete causal practices, and because a sequential realization of Buddhahood is impossible, therefore one can validly a‡rm that there are many di›erent Buddhas at the same time. 
Here is a stanza: Because they are liberated from all obstacles, and since their action is without end, Buddhas both enter ﬁnal cessation and do not enter ﬁnal cessation. 
are six reasons: 1) because appears as a material body and as an activated body; 2) because it appears di›erently among the innumerable great assemblies; 3) because, being seen in accordance with the aspirations , it manifests fundamental di›erences; 4) because, being seen in a variety of di›erent ways, it appears as fundamentally changeable; sattvas, word-hearers, gods, and so forth, it is relational; and 6) because of the appearance of the two conversions of support of the container consciousness and of the active consciousnesses. It is therefore not reasonable that the enjoyment body be identiﬁed with the essence body. 
are eight reasons: 
1) it is not possible that a bodhisattva who has long since obtained irreversible concentrations should be born in the Tu≈ita or among men; 2) it is not possible that one who has remembered his rebirths should not have complete understanding of writing, calculation, mathematics, illustrating, crafts, scholarship, and the enjoyment of and indulgence in sensual desire; 3) it is not possible that one who has understood the di›erence between good and bad presentations of doctrine should go to heretics and take them as his teachers; 4) it is not possible that a bodhisattva who long since has understood the validity of the noble paths of the three vehicles should have engaged in useless austerities in searching for the path; 5) it is not possible that, upon leaving behind a hundred millions of Jambudv∆pas, [a bodhisattva] should realize complete awakening and set in motion the wheel of doctrine at a single location; 6) if, without manifesting the skillful means of complete awakening, were to perform the action of a Buddha in the other by means of transformation bodies, then he might also attain complete awakening in the Tu≈ita ; 7) if this is not so, then why did the Buddha not appear equally in all the Jambudv∆pas [at the same time]? 
No scripture or reasoning invalidates this ; and 8) a multiplicity of transformation bodies does not contradict [the scripture that says that] two Tathågatas do not arise in world, since the term world realm indicates the four continents . It is like the impossibility of two universal monarchs arising together in a single world realm. 
Here is a stanza on this subject: The subtle transformation bodies of Buddhas in an identical manner enter into many wombs in order to manifest the awakening of all aspects to the world. 
1) because of the completion of their actions, since they have ﬁnished delivering and maturing [the sentient beings whom they were to deliver and mature]; 2) to cause those who are already liberated and who desire cessation to abandon this aspiration for cessation in seeking to attain an eternal Buddha body; 3) to eradicate disrespect toward the Buddha and engender an understanding of the profound reality of true suchness and the enunciated doctrine; 4) to arouse longing , lest those who see him continually take him for granted; 5) so that might themselves develop zeal, knowing that the True Teacher cannot be found; and 6) to cause them quickly to reach maturity by not abandoning their own zealous e›orts for the task. 
Here is a stanza on this point: Because their actions are complete, to avoid desire for cessation, to eradicate disrespect toward the Buddha, to arouse longing , to bring about their own zeal, and quickly to attain maturity, it is impossible for the Buddha permanently to abide in transformation bodies. 23 supreme awakening through their vows and practices. 
body is eternal, how can it be said that the Tathågata’s body is eternal? 
Because both the apparitional body and the transformation body are supported upon the eternal Dharma body, because the apparitional body is never abandoned, and because the transformation shows itself again and again. It is like the expressions: “He always experiences happiness,” or “He always gives food .” These two bodies should be understood in this fashion. 
Here is a stanza on this point: The realization and attainment of all Buddhas are identical and inﬁnite. If this causes sentient beings to abandon e›ort, then this realization and attainment would be forever without cause, but it is impossible to discard the true cause. 
Among the collected scriptures of the Great Vehicle Abhidharma, is called the Summary of the Great Vehicle. This true explanation is completed. 

At one time the World-honored One was dwelling in an immeasurable abode adorned with seven gems that shone brilliantly and emitted a great light illuminating all the immeasurable world realms. Its limitless regions were brilliantly adorned and well arranged. They had no boundaries. Their quantity was beyond reckoning, and they surpassed anything found in the triple world. 
Like clouds, great bodhisattvas gathered together there. An immeasurable number of gods, n@gas, yaksas, gandharvas, asuras, garudas, kimnaras, mahoragas, humans, nonhumans, and similar beings were in attendance. There the great taste of the doctrine sustained their delight and happiness and brought about all benefit for sentient beings. It had destroyed the oppressive, defiled inclinations of passion, and it was far removed from all inimical forces. 
He entered into the unmarked doctrine. He dwelled in the Buddha abode, realized 688b3 688¢ The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning the equality of all Buddhas, and reached the state of no obstacles. The irreversible teaching of the doctrine he propounded was unhindered. That which he established was inconceivable. 
That unified wisdom of the Tathagata’s liberation was indeed ultimate. He had realized the equality of Buddha lands. He reached to the reality realm. He exhausted space and would never come to an end. 
He was accompanied by an immeasurable multitude of great word-hearers, all of whom were docile sons of the Buddha. Their thinking was well liberated. Their understanding was well liberated. Their discipline was well purified, and they had set their aim upon joy in doctrine. 
They had heard much, and retained and accumulated what they had heard. 
They thought good thoughts, spoke good words, and did good deeds. 
Their wisdom was swift, quick, incisive, salvific, penetrating, great, expansive, unequaled. 
They had attained the happiness of the highest state in the present world. 
They dwelled in the field of pure merit. Their deportment was tranquil and in no way imperfect. 
The perfection of their great patience and gentleness was without decrease. Already good, they revered and practiced the holy teachings of the Tathagata. 
Also present were an immeasurable number of great bodhisattvas, assembled from various Buddha lands. 
Appearing before them, they mitigated the oppressive lands that torment sentient beings. The principal ones were named the Bodhisattva Gambhirarthasamdhinirmocana, the Bodhisattva Vidhivatpariprcchaka, the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata, the Bodhisattva Suvisuddhimati, the Bodhisattva Visalamati, the Bodhisattva Gunakara, the Bodhisattva Paramarthasamudgata, the Bodhisattva Aryavalokitesvara, the Bodhisattva Maitreya, and the Bodhisattva MafijuSri.? 
Chapter II The Descriptive Marks of the Truth of Ultimate Meaning At that time the Bodhisattva Vidhivatpariprcchaka questioned the Bodhisattva Gambhirarthasamdhinirmocana, in the presence of the Buddha, and said: 
“Son of the Victor, it is said that all things are not dual. What does ‘all things’ mean? 
And why are they not dual?” The Bodhisattva Gambhirarthasamdhinirmocana answered the Bodhisattva Vidhivatpariprechaka and said: 
“Good son, in sum, all things are of two kinds, conditioned and unconditioned. 
Herein conditioned things are neither conditioned nor unconditioned, and unconditioned things are neither unconditioned nor conditioned.” The Bodhisattva Vidhivatpariprechaka again questioned the Bodhisattva Gambhirarthasamdhinirmocana and said: 
“Son of the Victor, what does it mean to say that conditioned things are neither conditioned nor unconditioned or that unconditioned things are neither unconditioned nor conditioned?” Gambhirarthasamdhinirmocana addressed the Bodhisattva Vidhivatpariprcechaka and said: 
“Good son, the term ‘conditioned’ is a provisional word invented by the First Teacher. 
Now, if itis a provisional word invented by the First Teacher, then it is a verbal expression apprehended by imagination. 
And if it is a verbal expression apprehended by imagination, then, in the final analysis, such an imagined description does not validate a real thing. 
Therefore, the conditioned does not exist. 
Good son, the term ‘unconditioned’ is also invented from language .* “Furthermore, besides the conditioned and the unconditioned, any other expression that exists in language is the same. 
But, it 689a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning might be objected, is it not true that there are no expressions without some reality? 
What, then, is the reality here? 
I would reply that it is that reality apart from language and realized in the perfect awakening of the saints through their holy wisdom and insight apart from all names and words. 
It is because they desire to lead others to realize perfect awakening that they provisionally establish as ‘the conditioned’ as verbal descriptions.* “Good son, the term ‘unconditioned’ is also a word provisionally invented by the First Teacher. 
Now, if the First Teacher provisionally invented this word, then it is a verbal expression apprehended by imagination.® And, if it is a verbal expression apprehended by imagination, then, in the final analysis, such an imagined description does not validate a real thing. 
Therefore, the unconditioned does not exist. 
Good son, the term ‘conditioned’ is also invented from language . 
“Besides ‘the unconditioned’ and ‘the conditioned,’ any other expression that exists in language is the same. 
But [some may object], is it not true that there are no expressions without some reality? 
What then is that reality here? 
I would reply that it is that reality apart from language and realized in the perfect awakening of the saints through their wisdom and insight apart from all names and words. 
It is because they desire to lead others to realize perfect awakening that they establish [such expressions] as ‘the unconditioned’ as verbal descriptions.” Then the Bodhisattva Vidhivatpariprcechaka again questioned the Bodhisattva Gambhirarthasamdhinirmocana and said: 
“Son of the Victor, why is it that those saints, being freed from language through holy wisdom and insight, realizing perfect awakening in that ineffable nature of reality, and desiring to lead others to realize perfect awakening, provisionally establish verbal descriptions, such as ‘conditioned’ and ‘unconditioned’?” The Bodhisattva Gambhirarthasamdhinirmocana addressed the Bodhisattva Vidhivatpariprcchaka and said: 
“Good son, one can liken to skillful magicians or apprentices, who, 12 Chapter II setting themselves up at a crossroads, make things like broken tiles, grass, leaves, pieces of wood, etc., appear to be magical things, herds of elephants, horses, chariots, soldiers, gems, pearls, cat’s-eyes, conches, crystal, coral, treasure, grain, storehouses, etc. 
Other people, not dull nor slow-witted, of good understanding and having acumen, see and hear those magical things and understand that what they see are not really elephants, horses, etc., but rather magical tricks that confuse the eye and cause it to engender the concept of a herd of elephants, the imagined concept of a herd of horses, the many imagined concepts of grain, storehouses, or other magical illusions. 
Afterwards they do not have to reconsider. “In like manner, some sentient beings, foolish and profane, have not yet attained to the transcendent understanding of the saints and are not able to recognize that in all things reality is apart from language. 
After they have seen and heard about all conditioned and unconditioned , they think that what they have learned is most certainly really existing conditioned and unconditioned things. 
Rather they are descriptions engendered from imagination and are magical, confused understandings in which one produces concepts about the conditioned and the unconditioned, concepts about whether they exist or not. They do not tenaciously cling to verbal expressions that are engendered from what they have seen and heard or think that only are true and everything else false. in order to express the meanings they know, they follow the accepted language. Afterwards they are not forced to reconsider. 
Thus, good son, the saints, being freed from language through their holy wisdom and insight in this regard, realize the perfect awakening that reality is truly apart from language. 
It is because they desire to lead others to realize perfect awakening that they provisionally establish names and concepts and call things conditioned or unconditioned.” At that time the Bodhisattva Gambhirarthasamdhinirmocana recited these verses to emphasize his meaning: 
In their idiotic confusion, fools delight in duality and rely upon verbal fabrications. 
Whether without understanding or with perverse understanding, they will revolve in the suffering of transmigration for a great length of time. 
They are indeed far from the discourse of true wisdom and will certainly be reborn as cows, sheep, and so forth. 
At that time the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, at a distance from this eastern sector equal to the sands of seventy-two Ganges, there is a world realm named Viésalakirti, whose Tathagata is named Visalakirti Tathagata. 
I used to live there before I came here. In that Buddha land I once saw seventy-seven thousand heretics together with their teachers gathered in one place to consider the descriptive marks of the ultimate meaning of all things. 
But although 14 Chapter II they thought, pondered, investigated, and thoroughly examined these marks of the ultimate meaning of all things, in the end they were unable to reach any conclusion. 
I then thought to myself, ‘The appearance of a Tathagata in the world is indeed a rare occurrence. 
But, because of his appearance, it becomes possible to understand the marks of ultimate meaning, which transcend the sphere of any reasoning.’”’ Then the World-honored One addressed the Bodhisattva Dharmodgata and said: 
“Good son, it is just as you have expressed it. 
1am perfectly awakened to the marks of the truth of ultimate meaning, which transcend any reasoning. 
Being already perfectly awakened, I declare, preach, explain, teach, and illumine [those marks] for others. 
Why do I do this? 
Because I have preached that ultimate meaning is realized internally by each saint, while reasoning is attained in the give and take among common worldlings. 
Dharmodgata, from this principle you should understand that ultimate meaning transcends the descriptions of reasoned meaning. 
Furthermore, Dharmodgata, I have preached that ultimate meaning does not function through images, but the functioning of reason does move within the realm of images. 
From this principle, Dharmodgata, you should understand that ultimate meaning transcends the descriptions of reasoned meaning. 
Furthermore, Dharmodgata, I preach that ultimate meaning is ineffable, but the functioning of reason moves within the realm of language. 
From this principle, Dharmodgata, you should understand that ultimate meaning transcends the descriptions of reasoned meaning. 
Furthermore, Dharmodgata, I teach that ultimate meaning severs all expression, but the functioning of reason moves within the realm of expression. 
From this principle, Dharmodgata, you should understand that ultimate meaning transcends the descriptions of reasoned meaning. 
Furthermore, Dharmodgata, 15 690a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning I preach that ultimate meaning severs all disputation, but the functioning of reason does move within the realm of disputation about meaning. 
From this principle, Dharmodgata, you should understand that ultimate meaning transcends the descriptions of reasoned meaning. 
“Furthermore, Dharmodgata, you should understand that it is like a man who all his life long was accustomed to tart and bitter tastes. 
He would be incapable of comprehending, evaluating, or appreciating the wonderful taste of honey or rock candy. 
With his desires burning like fire, he would be unable to comprehend, evaluate, or appreciate the wonderful inner detachment that severs the images of all sense objects, sounds, smells, tastes, and touches. 
It is like a man who for ages has placed his concern upon and taken his delight in fine, worldly conversations. 
He would be unable to comprehend, evaluate, or appreciate the joy of the inner, holy silence of tranquility. 
It is like a man who for ages has placed his concern upon and taken his delight in all the worldly ideas he had heard, expressed, and understood. 
He would be unable to comprehend, evaluate, or appreciate the final cessation that forever eradicates all ideas and destroys personality.® Understand, Dharmodgata, it is like a man who for ages has placed his concern upon and taken his delight in worldly disputation. 
He would be unable to comprehend, evaluate, or appreciate the fact that in north Kuru [where I have preached] there are no disputes over the constituents or over noself. 
In like fashion, Dharmodgata, reason is entirely unable to comprehend, evaluate, or appreciate the descriptive marks of ultimate meaning, which transcend the functioning of any reasoning.” At that time the World-honored One recited these verses to emphasize his meaning: The sphere that is internally realized without descriptions cannot be spoken and severs expressions. Ultimate meaning, laying to rest all disputes, transcends all the descriptive marks of reasoning. 
16 Chapter II At that time the Bodhisattva Suvisuddhimati addressed the Buddha and said: 
“Wonderful it is, World-honored One, that I have been able to hear these words of yours. 
It is just as you have said, for the marks of the truth of ultimate meaning, being subtle and profound, can be characterized as neither identical with nor different from all things. 
They are indeed difficult to fathom.® World-honored One, I once saw an assembly of bodhisattvas gathered together and seated. They were in the stage of fully cultivating their commitment, and were all considering the descriptive marks of the truth of ultimate meaning, whether they were identical with or different from the descriptive marks of conditioned states of being. 
Some of these bodhisattvas said that there was no difference between the marks of the truth of ultimate meaning and the marks of conditioned states of being. Others said that it was not true that there was no difference between the marks of the truth of ultimate meaning and the marks of conditioned states of being, but that the marks of the truth of ultimate meaning do differ from the marks of conditioned states of being. 
Yet other bodhisattvas, in doubt and perplexed, said: ‘Which bodhisattvas are speaking truth and which falsity? 
“Good son, it is just as you have expressed it. All those good sons were indeed foolish and slow-witted. They did not have insight, and, behaving poorly, did not reason intelligently in regard to the subtlety and profundity of the truth of 17 690b 690c The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning ultimate meaning, for it does transcend being characterized as either identical with or different from conditioned states of being. Why is this so, Suvigsuddhimati? 
It is because one cannot comprehend the descriptive marks of the truth of ultimate meaning in names by performing such exercises. 
“Why is this so, Suvisuddhimati? 
It is because, if the descriptive marks of the truth of ultimate meaning were not different from conditioned states of being at all, then at this very moment all common worldlings would have already gained insight into truth. 
They all necessarily would have already attained the quiescent cessation of supreme skill or would have realized full, perfect awakening. 
But, if the descriptive marks of ultimate meaning were entirely different from the marks of conditioned states of being, then those who have already gained insight into truth would not have expunged images of conditioned states of being. 
And if they had not expunged images of conditioned states of being, then they would not have attained liberation from bondage to those images. 
Not being liberated from those images, they would not be freed from bondage to their gross weaknesses. 
Not being freed from bondage to gross weaknesses, those who have gained insight into truth would have been unable to attain the quiescent cessation of supreme skill or full, perfect awakening. 
But, Suvisuddhimati, it is not the case that at this very moment all the common worldlings have already gained insight into truth, are already capable of attaining the quiescent cessation of supreme skill, or have realized full, perfect awakening. 
Therefore the opinion that the descriptive marks of the truth of ultimate meaning are not different from the descriptive marks of conditioned states of being is not reasonable. 
If someone were to say that the descriptive marks of the truth of ultimate meaning were not different from the descriptive marks of conditioned states of being, from this above argument you should understand that this opinion is neither intelligent nor truly reasonable.!° Suvisuddhimati, neither is it the case that those who have gained insight into truth have not been able to expunge all the images of conditioned states of 18 Chapter IL being, for they have indeed been able to expunge them. 
It is not the case that those who have gained insight into truth have been incapable of liberation from bondage to the images of conditioned states of being, for they have indeed been capable of such liberation. 
It is not the case that those who have gained insight into truth have been incapable of liberation from bondage to gross weaknesses, for they have indeed been capable of such liberation. 
It is precisely because they have been capable of liberation from these two obstacles that they have been able to attain the quiescent cessation of supreme skill and to realize full, perfect wisdom. 
Therefore, the opinion that the descriptive marks of the truth of ultimate meaning are entirely different from the descriptive marks of conditioned states of being is not reasonable. 
If some say that the marks of the truth of ultimate meaning are entirely different from the marks of conditioned states of being, from the above argument you should understand that this opinion is neither intelligent nor truly reasonable. 
“Moreover, Suvisuddhimati, if the marks of the truth of ultimate meaning were identical with the marks of conditioned states of being, then, just as the marks of conditioned states of being are defiled, so also the marks of the truth of ultimate meaning would be defiled. 
Suvisuddhimati, if the marks of the truth of ultimate meaning were entirely different from the marks of conditioned states of being, then the common mark that describes conditioned states of being could not be termed the mark of the truth of ultimate meaning. 
But, Suvisuddhimati, the descriptive marks of the truth of ultimate meaning are not defiled, and the common marks of conditioned states of being are termed the mark of the truth of ultimate meaning. 
Therefore it is not reasonable to say that the descriptive marks of the truth of ultimate meaning are identical with the descriptive marks of conditioned states of being, nor that they are entirely different one from the other. 
From this argument you should understand that both those who speak for the identity of marks and those who speak for their complete difference are neither intelligent nor reasonable. 
19 69la The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning “Moreover, Suvisuddhimati, if the descriptive marks of ultimate truth were identical with the descriptive marks of conditioned states of being, then, just as the mark of the truth of ultimate meaning is undifferentiated in all conditioned states, so all the marks of those conditioned states would be undifferentiated. 
Then those who practice meditation would not have to search for ultimate meaning in all the conditioned states of being that they have seen, heard, understood, and known. 
On the other hand, if the descriptive mark of the truth of ultimate meaning were entirely different from conditioned states of being, then it would not be true that all conditioned states of being are manifestations only of the absence of self, of the absence of essence. 
The marks of ultimate truth would then simultaneously be held to be characterized in two different manners, one of defilement and one of purity. 
Those who practice meditation do search for ultimate meaning in the conditioned states of being they have seen, heard, understood, and known. 
Also, all conditioned states of being are indeed manifestations only of the absence of self, the absence of essence, and they are rightly termed marks of ultimate truth. 
It is not true that it is simultaneously characterized in two manners, one of defilement and one of purity. 
Therefore, the opinion that the marks of the truth of ultimate meaning are either identical with or entirely different from the marks of conditioned states of being is not reasonable. 
If some say that these marks of the truth of ultimate meaning are either identical with or entirely different from the marks of conditioned states of being, from this argument you should understand that they are neither intelligent nor truly reasonable. 
“It is like unto the fresh white color of a conch shell, for it is not easily ascertained whether is identical with or different from the shell. 
The yellow color of gold presents a similar case. 
Or consider the melodies from the sound of a guitar, for it is difficult to ascertain whether that sound is identical with or different from the guitar. 
Or take the fragrance that wells up from 20 Chapter IT aloes, for it is difficult to tell whether it is identical with or different from the aloes. 
Or take the bitter taste of pepper, for it is difficult to tell if it is identical with or different from the pepper. 
A similar case is the insipid taste of an astringent nut. 
It is like the silky skin of a moth and its softness, for it is difficult to ascertain if that silky texture is identical with or different from the softness. 
Or take the rich liquor on the top of boiled butter. Is it identical with or different from the boiled butter? 
“Likewise it is difficult to tell whether impermanence is identical with or different from conditioned states of being, whether suffering is identical with or different from impure states of mind, whether the no-self of personality is identical with or different from all things, whether inquietude is identical with or different from covetousness. 
The same is true about anger and delusion vis-a-vis covetousness. 
Thus, Suvisuddhimati, the descriptive marks of the truth of ultimate meaning cannot be said to be either identical with or different from the descriptive marks of conditioned states of being. 
Suvisuddhimati, I have perfectly understood the descriptive marks of the truth of ultimate meaning, which are subtle indeed, profound indeed, hard to fathom indeed, which transcend all descriptions as being identical with or different from all things. 
Having perfectly understood, I declare, preach, explain, and illumine for the sake of others.” Then the World-honored One recited these verses to emphasize his meaning: The descriptive marks of the realm of conditioned states of being and of ultimate meaning are apart from being described either as identical or as different. 
If one imagines them to be either identical or different, one is acting unreasonably. 
Because of bondage to images and to gross weaknesses, sentient beings must assiduously cultivate quietude and vision, and then they will be able to attain liberation. 
At that time the World-honored One addressed the venerable Subhiti and said: 
“Subhiti, in the world of sentient beings, how 21 691b 691¢ ‘he Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning many do you know who cherish their pride and in a prideful manner state their understanding? 
“Worldhonored One, in the world of sentient beings, I know a few who state their understanding without pride, but I know innumerable, untold sentient beings who cherish their pride and state their understanding in a prideful manner. 
World-honored One, once I was dwelling in a grove in a forest. A large number of monks lived nearby. 
I saw them assemble after sunrise to discuss various issues and to propose their understandings, each according to his insight. “Some proposed their understanding of the aggregates, their descriptive marks, their arising, their exhaustion, their destruction, and the realization of their destruction. Others, in like fashion, proposed their understanding of the bases [of consciousness] and of dependent co-arising, while yet others proposed their understanding of sustenance, its descriptive marks, arising, exhaustion, destruction, and the realization of its destruction. 
At the same time, others proposed their understanding of true severance, of the supernatural abilities, of the sense faculties, of the powers, of the factors of awakening, while yet others talked about the eightfold path, its descriptive marks, the states it is able to control, its arising from a state of being non-arisen, its assured unforgettableness once it has arisen, and its increase from repeated practice. 
22 Chapter IT “World-honored One, when I saw them, I thought that all those venerable persons were engaged in addressing these various issues and proposing their interpretations, each according to the insights he had attained. 
But, note well, all of them cherished their pride and, because they clung to that pride, they were unable to comprehend the one universal taste of the truth of ultimate meaning. 
But you, World-honored One, have already explained that the descriptive mark of the truth of ultimate meaning is rare, most subtle indeed, most profound, difficult to fathom. 
World-honored One, if practicing monks find it difficult to fathom this one universal taste of the truth of ultimate meaning in this holy teaching, then how much harder will it be for heretics to understand it?”" Then the World-honored One addressed Subhiti and said: 
“This is so, Subhiti, for I have been awakened to the truth of ultimate meaning which is of one universal taste, most subtle, most profound, most difficult to fathom. 
Having been awakened, I declare, preach, explain, and illumine it for the sake of others. 
What is it that I have preached, Subhiti? 
I have preached that the purified content of understanding in all the aggregates is the truth of ultimate meaning. 
I have preached that the purified content of understanding in all dependent co-arising, in sustenance, in the realms, in recollection, in true severance, in the supernatural abilities, in the factors of awakening, and in the factors of the path is the truth of ultimate meaning.” This purified content of understanding is characterized as being of one taste, being undifferentiated in all the aggregates, in all the bases, in all they discussed , for it is of one taste and not differentiated. 
It is from this principle that the truth of ultimate meaning is of one universal taste. 
“Furthermore, Subhiti, once those practicing monks who cultivate centering have understood the suchness of a single group , the selflessness of the teaching on ultimate meaning, then they will not engage in analyzing one after the other the aggregates, bases, dependent co-arising, sustenance, truth, the 23 692a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning realms, recollection, true severance, the supernatural abilities, the faculties, the powers, the factors of awakening, or the factors of the path. 
The selflessness of the teaching of suchness and ultimate meaning is based upon the nondual wisdom of suchness and ultimate meaning. They then will come to awareness and realize the truth of ultimate meaning, which is of one universal taste. 
Therefore, Subhiti, from this principle understand that the truth of ultimate meaning is of one universal taste. 
“Furthermore, Subhiti, if, like all the aggregates, like all the bases, dependent co-arising, sustenance, truth, realms, recollection, true severance, supernatural abilities, sense faculties, powers, factors of awakening, and factors of the path, all of which are described by differentiating one from the other; if, like these, suchness, ultimate meaning, and no-essence had descriptive marks that differentiated one from the other, then these would issue from causes, they would be caused. 
And, if they arose from causes, they would themselves be conditioned. And, if conditioned, they would not be ultimate meaning. And, if they were not ultimate meaning, then one would once more have to seek the truth of another ultimate meaning. 
It is because suchness, ultimate meaning, and the no-essence of all things are not said to be caused, do not arise from causes, and are not conditioned that they are the truth of ultimate meaning. Once one attains this ultimate meaning, there is no further need to seek another ultimate meaning. 
Only it is eternal and permanent, whether a Tathagata appears in the world or not, for in all things reality is established, the reality realm perdures. 
Therefore, Subhiti, from this principle you should understand that the truth of ultimate meaning is of one universal taste. 
“Subhiti, in empty space there are differences in the multiple varieties of color, while remains unmarked, undifferentiated, and unchanged by them. Rather it encompasses all those marks within its one taste. 
In a similar fashion, the truth of ultimate meaning is in all things, which are of different natures and do have differing marks; and it encompasses all those marks with its one taste.”!* 24 Chapter II Then the World-honored One recited these verses to emphasize his meaning: 
Encompassing all marks with one taste, ultimate meaning is taught by all Buddhas to be undifferentiated. 
If one were to discriminate it in those differentiations, one should assuredly be foolish and prideful. 
25  Chapter III The Descriptive Marks of Mind, Thought, and Consciousness At that time the Bodhisattva Visalamati addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, you have spoken about bodhisattvas skilled in the secrets of mind, thought, and consciousness. 
Why do you speak of these bodhisattvas as being skilled in the secrets of mind, thought, and consciousness? 
What do you mean by describing them in this fashion?” Then the World-honored One addressed the Bodhisattva Visalamati and said: 
“It is very good, Visalamati, that you are able to question the Tathagata about this profound theme. 
You raise this question because you desire to benefit and gladden unlimited sentient beings, because you have compassion for the world and all its gods, men, angels, and so forth, so that they may be led to realize meaning, benefit, and happiness. 
Attend, then, and I will explain the meaning of the secrets of mind, thought, and consciousness. “Visalamati, you should understand that sundry sentient beings fall into sundry destinies in their transmigrations through the six destinies. Whether egg-born, womb-born, moisture-born, or magically born, they issue from birth. From the very first instant , the maturation, evolution, unification, increase, and growth of their minds, together with all their seeds, depend upon two appropriations. 
The first is their appropriation of the material senses in the body. 
The second is their appropriation of the propensity toward verbal fabrication in discriminating 27 692b 692c The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning images and words. 
In the worlds of form, have these two appropriations, but not in the world of no-form.* “Visalamati, this consciousness is also termed the appropriating consciousness, because it is taken up together with the body. 
It is also termed the receptacle consciousness, because this consciousness joins itself to and lies hidden in a common security and risk. 
It is also termed mind, because this consciousness mines and accumulates material forms, sounds, odors, tastes, and touches.® “Visalamati, because the appropriating consciousness is the support and ground, there evolves the group of the six consciousnesses of seeing, hearing, smelling, tasting, touching, and thinking. 
The conditions that produce visual consciousness are the eye and material forms. In synergy with such visual consciousness, there evolves a thinking consciousness that simultaneously discriminates those very objects . 
The conditions that elicit aural, olfactory, gustatory, and tactile consciousness are the ear, nose, tongue, and body, together with sound, odor, taste, and touch. In synergy with these aural, olfactory, gustatory, and tactile consciousnesses there evolves a thinking consciousness that simultaneously discriminates these same objects. 
“Visalamati, when a single visual consciousness evolves, at that very instant a discriminative thinking consciousness arises in synergy with that visual consciousness. 
When two, three, four, or five consciousnesses develop, at that very instant a discriminative thinking consciousness arises in synergy with those same five consciousnesses."® “Visalamati, it is like a great rush of flowing waters. 
If the conditions for one wave are present, only one wave will develop. 
If the conditions for two or more are present, then many waves will develop. 
But that great rush of waters itself flows on constantly without interruption or cessation. 
It is also like the surface of a very pure mirror. If the conditions for one image are present, then only one image will appear . 
If the conditions for two or more images are present, then many images will appear. 
28 Chapter III But the mirror surface does not alter itself into the image and suffers no change at all. 
Likewise, Visalamati, the appropriating consciousness is similar to those rushing waters, for it is the support and ground. When the conditions for the arising of a single visual consciousness are present, then a single visual consciousness develops. 
When the conditions for the arising of the five sense consciousnesses, or however many, are present, then those consciousnesses develop. 
“Visalamati, although in this fashion the bodhisattvas, supported upon the wisdom of abiding in doctrine, are skilled in the secrets of mind, thought, and sense consciousness, yet it is not on this account that the Tathagata described them as skilled in mind, thought, and sense consciousness. 
They do not see objects of thought nor thinking consciousness . 
Visalamati, it is on this account that they are called bodhisattvas skilled in the secrets of mind, thought, and sense consciousness, and are so described by the Tathagata.” Then the World-honored One recited these verses to emphasize his meaning: 
Fearing that they would imagine and cling to it as to a self, I have not revealed it to the foolish.” 29  Chapter IV The Characteristic Patterns of All Things” At that time the great Bodhisattva Gunakara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, you have spoken about bodhisattvas skilled in the characteristic patterns of all things. Why do you so speak of them? 
Why do you describe them so?” Then the World-honored One addressed the Bodhisattva Gunakara and said: 
“It is excellent, Gunakara, that you have been able to question the Tathagata about this profound theme. 
You bring forth this question because you desire to benefit and gladden unlimited sentient beings, because you have compassion for the world with all its gods, men, angels, and so forth, so that they might be led to attain meaning, benefit, and happiness. 
Attend and I will explain the marks of all things for you. “In sum, the marks of all things are threefold. 
The first is the characteristic pattern of clinging to what is entirely imagined. 
The second is the characteristic pattern of other-dependency. 
The third is the characteristic pattern of full perfection. 
“The pattern of clinging to what is entirely imagined refers to the establishing of names and symbols for all things and the distinguishing of their essences, whereby they come to be expressed in language. 
The pattern of other-dependency refers to the pattern whereby all things arise co-dependently: for if this exists, then that exists, and if this arises, then that arises. This refers to [the twelvefold conditions, starting with] ‘conditioned by ignorance are karmic formations,’ ‘conditioned by origination is this grand mass of suffering,’ . 
31 693a 693b The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning The pattern of full perfection refers to the universally equal suchness of all things. Bodhisattvas penetrate to this suchness because of their resolute zeal, intelligent focusing, and true reflection. 
By gradually cultivating this penetration, they reach unsurpassed true awakening and actually realize perfection. 
“Good son, the pattern of clinging to what is entirely imagined is like the defective vision of one who has cataracts in his eyes. 
The pattern of full perfection is like the unconfused objects seen by the pure vision of one with sound eyes and no cataracts. 
“Good son, it is just as when a pure crystal comes into contact with and is tinted with the color blue, it appears to be a blue sapphire or a blue gem. 
Because it takes on the appearance of a blue sapphire or a blue gem, it confuses sentient beings. 
When it comes into contact with the color red, it appears to be a ruby and so confuses sentient beings. 
When it comes into contact with the color green, it appears to be an emerald and so confuses sentient beings. 
When it comes into contact with the color yellow, it seems to be gold and so confuses sentient beings. 
Similarly, Gunakara, just as those tinted colors appear upon the pure crystal, so the propensity toward language of the characteristic pattern of clinging to what is imagined is superimposed upon the other-dependent pattern. 
Just as upon that pure crystal one falsely clings to blue sapphires, rubies, emeralds, or gold, so upon the other-dependent pattern of consciousness one clings to the imagined, for that otherdependent pattern is like the crystal. 
Just as, when in a constant and continual fashion the pure crystal no longer has any images of sapphires, rubies, emeralds, or gold, it is without reality or essence, so when the pattern of other-dependency no longer has imagined images in it, it is also in fact without reality or essence, and is then the pattern of full perfection. 
The 32 Chapter IV other-dependent pattern can be understood as caused by the grasping of those imagined images upon that other-dependent pattern. 
The pattern of full perfection can be understood as caused by the absence of grasping the imagined pattern upon the other-dependent pattern. 
“If bodhisattvas are truly able to understand the imagined pattern as it arises upon the other-dependent pattern in all things, they then will be truly able to understand all things as unmarked. 
If bodhisattvas are truly able to understand the other-dependent pattern , they then will be truly able to understand all things as defiled. 
If bodhisattvas are truly able to understand the fully perfected pattern, they then will be truly able to understand all things as purified. 
If bodhisattvas truly understand all things as unmarked in the other-dependent pattern, they then will be able to abandon defiled things. 
If they are able to abandon defiled things, they will be able to realize things as purified. 
In this fashion, Gunakara, since they truly understand all three patterns , they will truly know things as unmarked, defiled, and purified. 
Because they abandon defiled things, they will realize things as purified. 
And this is why those bodhisattvas are described by the Tathagata as skilled in the characteristic patterns of all things.” Then the World-honored One recited these verses to emphasize his meaning: 
Not being able to abandon defiled things, one will obstruct the realization of wondrously purified things. 
Not gaining insight into the sinfulness of all one’s actions, one will be wild, sinful, and injurious to sentient beings. 
Sadly enmeshed in transient things, are not such people lost and pitiable?® 33 693c  Chapter V The Absence of Essence At that time the great Bodhisattva Paramarthasamudgata addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, once when I found myself alone in a quiet place, I thought to myself: ‘The World-honored One in an immeasurable number of sermons has explained the aggregates, their specific characteristics, their arising, their destruction, their abandonment, their full understanding. 
In like fashion he has explained the bases of consciousness, dependent co-arising, and sustenance. 
In an immeasurable number of sermons, he has explained the truths, their specific characteristics, full understanding, abandonment, and the practices that lead to their realization. 
In an immeasurable number of sermons, he has explained all the realms, their specific characteristics, varieties, differentiation, nondifferentiation, abandonment, and full understanding. 
In an immeasurable number of sermons, he has explained the stations of recollection, their specific characteristics, the act of controlling , which are controlled, how by meditation what has not yet arisen can be produced, how what has already arisen can be maintained, their unforgettableness, repeated practice, growth, and increase. 
And just as he has explained the stations of recollection, so he has explained true abandonment, the supernatural abilities, the sense faculties, the factors of awakening. 
In an immeasurable number of sermons, he has explained the eightfold holy path, its specific characteristics, the act of controlling , which are thus controlled, how by meditation what has not yet arisen can be produced and what has already arisen can be maintained, its unforgettableness, repeated practice, growth, and increase.’ 35 694a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning “World-honored One, you also have explained that all things have no-essence, no arising, and no passing away, are originally quiescent, and are essentially in cessation. 
Excellent indeed, good son, that you have been able to question the Tathagata concerning this profound theme. You raise this question because you desire to benefit and gladden immeasurable sentient beings, for you have compassion for the world and all its gods, men, angels, etc., so that they may be led to attain meaning, benefit, and happiness. 
Attend and I will explain my underlying intent in saying that all things have no-essence, no arising, no passing away, are originally quiescent, and are essentially in cessation. 
“Paramarthasamudgata, you should understand that, in reliance upon the three kinds of no-essence, I have explained that all things whatsoever have no-essence, for descriptive marks have no-essence, arising has no-essence, and ultimate meaning has noessence. 
This is so because it is names and symbols that establish those marks, and there is no inherent characteristic in things. This then is what I call the noessence of marks. 
The arising of things has no-essence, for all things arise in dependence upon others. 
This is so because they depend upon the causal power of others and do not arise from themselves. Therefore this is what I call the no-essence of arising. 
The ultimate truth of all things has no-essence, for, from their arising, all things have no-essence. 
This is what I call the no-essence that is identical with the conditioned arising of things. 
I also call it the no-essence of ultimate meaning because I preach that among all 36 Chapter V things, that realm of the purified content of understanding is to be regarded as the no-essence of ultimate meaning. 
The characteristics of the other-dependent pattern of consciousness are not, however, themselves this realm of the purified object of understanding. 
Therefore I call this the no-essence of ultimate meaning. Moreover, that fully perfected pattern of all things I also term the no-essence of ultimate meaning, for the absence of selfhood in all things whatsoever I call ultimate meaning, or no-essence, because this is the truth of ultimate meaning, because it is manifested by the absence of essence. 
For these reasons I call it the no-essence of ultimate meaning. 
“Good son, flowers in the sky are like the essential no-essence of descriptive marks. 
The arising of magical images is like the essential no-essence of arising, as well as one aspect of the essential no-essence of ultimate meaning. 
Just as empty space is manifested everywhere by the absence of material forms, so is the other aspect the essential no-essence of ultimate meaning, which is manifested everywhere by the absence of selfhood in all things. 
“Good son, this is my underlying intent about the three kinds of essential no-essence whereby I have preached that all things have no-essence. 
Paramarthasamudgata, you should understand that it was with this underlying intent about the essential noessence of marks that I preached that all things have no arising and no passing away, are originally quiescent, and are essentially in cessation.” For if the descriptive marks of things do not exist in themselves, then they do not arise. 
If they do not arise, then they do not pass away. 
If they do not pass away, then they are originally quiescent. 
If they are originally quiescent, then they are essentially in cessation, for herein there is not the slightest part that could be led once again into final cessation. 
Therefore, with this underlying intent concerning the essential no-essence of marks, I have preached that all things have no arising and no passing away, are originally quiescent, and are essentially in cessation. 
Good son, it was with this underlying intent about the essential no-essence of ultimate truth manifested through the no-self of 37 694b 694c ‘lhe Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning things that I preached that all things have no arising and no passing away, are originally quiescent, and are essentially in cessation. 
This no-essence of ultimate meaning manifested through the no-self of things is for all times and forever, because the reality nature of all things abides in an unconditioned state and is not associated with any of the defilements. 
Because at all times and forever the reality nature of all things abides, it is unconditioned. Because it is unconditioned, it has no birth and no passing away. 
Because it is not yoked to any of the defilements, it is originally quiescent and essentially in cessation. 
Therefore, with this underlying intent concerning the no-essence of ultimate meaning manifested by the absence of selfhood in things, I have preached that all things have no birth and no passing away, are originally quiescent, and are essentially in cessation. 
“Moreover, Paramarthasamudgata, I am not propounding these three kinds of no-essence because among the varieties of sentient beings in the world, some regard the pattern of imaginative clinging as a distinct essence, or because they regard the pattern of other-dependency or the pattern of full perfection as distinct essences. 
Rather it is because sentient beings superimpose the pattern of imaginative clinging over that of other-dependency and full perfection that I propound these three kinds of no-essence.” Sentient beings, because they imagine there are essences and characteristics to be clung to in the other-dependent and fully perfected patterns, produce language about this and that. 
To the degree that they produce language, they cling to images of essences in the other-dependent and fully perfected patterns because their minds are permeated with language, their understanding follows upon language, their inclinations are toward language. Thus they cling to various imagined essences and characteristics in their other-dependent and fully perfected patterns of consciousness. And, clinging to such in those patterns, they cling to the imagined pattern. 
Therefore they will bring forth their other-dependent pattern in future . 
Defiled by passion, actions, and birth, they will gallop about in transmigration for a long time. For a long time 38 Chapter V they will circle about without surcease and experience suffering, whether in the hells, among animals, among ghosts, in the heavens, among angels, or among men.” “Moreover, Paramarthasamudgata, I preached the teaching on the essential no-essence of arising for all those sentient beings who have not yet planted roots of goodness, who have not yet purified themselves from obstacles, who have not yet matured their continuity , who have not yet cultivated liberation, who have not yet been able to accumulate the two requisites of merit and wisdom. 
When they attend to this teaching, they will partially be able to understand that all conditioned states, which are dependently co-arisen, are impermanent, inconstant, not comforting, grievously transient, and destructive. 
Then their minds will produce deep dread and detestation for all conditioned states. When this has happened, then they will reject all evil. When they no longer do evil, they will be able to cultivate and practice good. 
And, practicing good, they will be able to plant roots of goodness not previously planted, they will be able to purify obstacles not previously purified, they will be able to mature their continuities not previously matured. 
Because of this they will cultivate liberation and accumulate the two requisites of merit and wisdom. 
They will not yet perfectly be able to detest all conditioned states. They will not yet be able to sever their desires or be perfectly liberated. They will not be altogether liberated from the defilements of passion, action, and birth. 
It is for them that the Tathagata once more preaches this doctrine on the essential no-essence of marks and the essential no-essence of ultimate meaning. 
He indeed desires to lead them to be able perfectly to detest all conditioned states, perfectly to sever their desires, perfectly to be liberated, and to transcend the defilements of all passion, action, and birth. 39 695a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning “When they attend to this teaching, then in the essential noessence of arising, they will be perfectly able to believe and understand the essential no-essence of marks and ultimate meaning. They will ponder, think, and really understand, for in their otherdependent pattern of consciousness, they will cling to no imagined essences or marks. 
Because of a wisdom not permeated by language, because of an insightful wisdom not formed by language, because of a wisdom freed from inclinations toward language, they will be able to destroy the pattern that arises dependent upon others, for, sustained by the wisdom power of this teaching, they will eternally be able to sever all causes for future forever. 
Because of this they will be able to detest all conditioned states, they will be able to sever all their desires and be perfectly liberated. They will be able to be entirely liberated from the three defilements of passion, action, and birth. 
“Moreover, Paramarthasamudgata, because they follow this path, all those sentient beings who belong to the word-hearers’ vehicle will realize unsurpassed, quiescent cessation, as will all those who belong to the solitary enlightenment vehicle or to the Tathagata vehicle. 
For all word-hearers, solitary enlightened ones, and bodhisattvas, this is the one wondrous path of purification. This is the one ultimate purification. There is no other. 
It is with this underlying intent that I have preached that there is only one vehicle. It is not that in the world of sentient beings there are not sentient beings of various different lineages, for some are slow to understand, some are not so slow, and some are quick to understand.” “Good son, a person of the word-hearers’ lineage, turned toward quiescence, even if he were to be skillfully led by the energetic perseverance of all the Buddhas, would yet be unable to be led to sit upon the wisdom seat and realize full, supreme awakening. 
This is so because from their origin they possess only an inferior lineage, because their compassion has been weak, because they have lived in fear of suffering. 
Since their compassion has been weak, they have turned their backs upon deeds that benefit and 40 Chapter V gladden all sentient beings. 
Since they have lived in fear of suffering, they have turned their backs upon engendering any conditioned activities. 
I have never taught that one who turns his back upon deeds to benefit and gladden all sentient beings, who turns his back upon engendering conditioned activities, will sit upon the wisdom seat and realize supreme awakening. Therefore I teach that such persons are termed word-hearers totally intent upon quiescence. 
“But if a person of the word-hearers’ lineage were to turn toward wisdom, I would identify him as a bodhisattva. 
This is so because, having already been liberated from the obstacle of passion, when he receives the universal awakening of all Tathagatas his mind will also be liberated from the obstacle to knowing.” Because initially was intent upon his own benefit, the intensity of his practices liberated him from the obstacle of passion, and therefore the Tathagata designated him as belonging to the lineage of the word-hearers. 
“Moreover, Paramarthasamudgata, sentient beings have various commitments both to the doctrinal discipline I have well presented and to the doctrine of the good teaching enunciated by my fully purified intent. 
But a Tathagata relies upon the three kinds of essential no-essence; and with such a profound intent he has presented a summary of that doctrine when he preached the scriptures of implicit meaning, saying that all things have no-essence and no arising, are originally quiescent, and are essentially in cessation, for such are their hidden and profound marks.” “If then sentient beings, who have already planted roots of superior goodness, who have already been purified from all obstacles, who have already matured the continuities , who have already repeatedly cultivated liberation, who have already been able to accumulate the requisites of superior merit and wisdom, if such were to attend to the doctrine of these scriptures , they would truly understand the underlying intent of my words and would engender a deep faith in and understanding of this doctrine, for they would truly penetrate 41 695b 695c The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning this meaning in an infallible understanding. 
Relying upon the practices of that penetration, they would quickly be able to realize the final stage. 
Because of their deeply engendered pure faith in me, they would know that the Tathagata is supremely awakened and manifests true wisdom in all things. “There are sentient beings of upright disposition, who have already planted roots of superior goodness, who have already been purified from all obstacles, who have already matured the continuities , who have already repeatedly cultivated liberation, but who are yet unable to accumulate the requisites of superior merit and wisdom. Although such upright dispositions, they lack the ability thoughtfully to make judgments on propositions. 
Yet, because they do not set up their own views, when they attend to this doctrine, even though they lack the ability truly to understand the underlying intent of my words, yet they will be able to engender a deep faith in this teaching. They will believe in this scripture: ‘The teaching of the Tathagata is a most profound revelation, is associated with the most profound emptiness, is difficult to glimpse, difficult to understand, is beyond thinking, is not within the sphere of rational reflection, is to be subtly interpreted, is understood by the wise.’ But they abide in it with humility and say: ‘The wisdom of all the Buddhas is profound indeed! 
For the sake of sentient beings of various commitments, all the Buddha Tathagatas have turned the wheel of the true doctrinal teaching, for the wisdom and insight of all Buddha Tathagatas is infinite, while our wisdom and insight follows in their wake.’ Although they are able to revere this scripture and declare it to others, to copy it and protect it, to unroll it and disseminate it, to venerate and honor it, to recite it and review it, yet they will still be incapable of the effort of meditating upon it, and thus they will be incapable of penetrating the underlying intent of my words. 
But those sentient beings 42 Chapter V will be able to increase the requisites of merit and wisdom, and they will be able to mature the continuities that have not been matured. 
Although they do have the ability to make judgments on propositions, yet, abiding in their own views, even if they hear this doctrine, they will be unable truly to understand the underlying intent of my words. 
Even if they were to engender faith and understanding in this doctrine, they would only be clinging to the words that express the meaning, that is: that all things most certainly have no-essence and no arising, are originally quiescent, and are essentially in cessation.” Consequently, they take up the view of nihilism and the nonexistence of all marks. 
With this view of nihilism and the nonexistence of all marks, they negate all marks, for everything is unmarked. They dispense with and negate not only those marks of things clung to in imagination, but also the marks of other-dependency and full perfection. 
Now, the very ability to designate the imagined pattern presupposes that otherdependency and full perfection are described by marks.”’ If, then, in dispensing with and negating the descriptive marks of the imagined, they regard the marks of other-dependency and full perfection as unmarked, they in fact dispense with and negate all three characteristic patterns. 
They do form concepts about my teaching, but, in their negation of meaning, they do not form concepts of its meaning. 
Because, while forming concepts of my teaching, in their negation of meaning, they do not form concepts of its meaning. They do maintain this doctrine, but they do not maintain its meaning. 
Nevertheless, because they have engendered faith and understanding in regard to this doctrine, their merit will increase, but they will turn away from and lose wisdom because they engender clinging to what is meaningless. 
Because they turn away from wisdom, they will lose that wide, limitless doctrine. 43 696a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning “Yet other sentient beings listen to them and take their doctrine as the doctrine and their negation of meaning as meaning. If they follow that view, they will form their concept of doctrine from that doctrine and their concept of meaning from that negation of meaning; they will devote themselves to that doctrine as doctrine and to that negation of meaning as meaning. 
Therefore they likewise will turn away from and lose the good doctrine. 
“Other sentient beings do not follow this view, but as soon as they hear that all things have no-essence and no arising, are originally quiescent, and are essentially in cessation, they feel dread. Feeling such dread, they say: ‘This is not the teaching of the Buddha, but rather the teaching of a demon.’ With such an understanding, they attack and curse this scripture. 
Therefore they encounter great misfortune and are blocked by the obstacle of their action . 
This is why I have taught that if one forms the view that all descriptive marks are no marks and propounds this meaninglessness as meaning, this will bring about the obstacle of action . 
Because they beguile limitless sentient beings, they cause them also to be blocked by this obstacle of action . 
“Good son, there are other sentient beings who have not yet planted roots of goodness, who have not yet been purified from all obstacles, who have not yet matured their continuities , who have not repeated their commitments, who have not yet accumulated the requisites of merit and wisdom, and whose lineage is not of an upright disposition or character. 
Even though they are able thoughtfully to judge propositions, yet they always maintain their own views. 
Even if they hear this doctrine, they will be unable truly to understand the underlying intent of my words or to have deep faith in this doctrine. They will form the concept that this doctrine is not doctrine and that this meaning is not meaning. 
Clinging to the idea that this doctrine is not doctrine and that this meaning is not meaning, they publicize their evaluation, saying: ‘This is not the teaching of the Buddha, but of a demon.’ With such an 44 Chapter V understanding they slander, reject, curse, and revile this scripture as useless and mistaken; and in untold ways they attack, criticize, and discard this scripture. They regard all those who have faith in this scripture as a rival faction. 
From the very beginning they are blocked by the obstacle of their action [against doctrine], and thus they impede by means of this obstacle of action . It is easy to describe the beginning of this obstacle of action and to estimate how many hundreds of thousands of eons it will take for it to be overcome. 
Good son, these are the differences in the various kinds of commitments of sentient beings to my well-enunciated and well-controlled doctrinal discipline and my good doctrinal teaching expressed with a purified intent.” At that time the World-honored One recited these verses to emphasize his meaning: 
What wise man speaks thus without an underlying intent? 
All those paths of purity and all the purifications rely upon this one only, for there is no second. Thus herein I have established the single vehicle, but this does not mean that there are no differences in the lineages of sentient beings. 
In the world of sentient beings, unlimited beings simply are delivered in their individual persons and enter quiescence, for it is difficult to attain that cessation realized together with the great compassion and courage that does not turn away from sentient beings. 
In the uncontaminated realm, subtle and difficult to conceive, liberations are equal and undifferentiated, for all meaning is complete and free from delusion and suffering, without duality or comparison, for this is eternal happiness. 
45 696b The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning At that time the Bodhisattva Paramarthasamudgata addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, the intent underlying the words of all Buddha Tathagatas is rare, rare indeed! 
It is subtle, subtle indeed! 
It is profound, profound indeed! 
It is difficult to penetrate, difficult to penetrate indeed! 
The Worldhonored One has designed so that the marks of all things are essentially without essence in reference to the pattern of clinging to what is imagined, whereby the attribution of names and symbols to conditioned images, that support those imagined descriptive marks clung to within the range of discrimination, are taken to be the aggregate of material form, the descriptive marks of its essence, the descriptive marks of its specific difference, whereby the attribution of names and symbols is taken to be the mark of the essence or difference of the arising of material form, the passing away of material form, or of the eternal severance from material form. 
“The World-honored One has designed that the arising of all things is essentially without essence, and one aspect of is that ultimate meaning is essentially without essence in reference to the pattern of other-dependency, which is the conditioned image supporting those imagined descriptive marks clung to within the realm of discrimination. 
I now understand this meaning enunciated by the World-honored One as follows, for those marks clung to by imagination upon the conditioned images that support such imaginative clinging within the range of discrimination, validate nothing real, and this is their essential nature as no-essence. “The World-honored One has designed the other aspect of [the teaching] that ultimate meaning is without essence in reference to the pattern of full perfection, the purified content of understanding that is the no-self of things, that is suchness, that is termed the pattern of full perfection. 
This is how the material aggregate or the other aggregates should be explained. 
This is how each of the twelve bases should be explained. 
This is how each of 46 Chapter V the twelve branches of existence should be explained. 
This is how each of the four sustenances should be explained. 
The World-honored One has designed that the marks of all things are essentially without essence in reference to the pattern of clinging to the imagined, i.e., the fact that the attribution of names and symbols to the conditioned images that support clinging to imagined descriptive marks within the realm of discriminations is taken to be the truth on suffering. 
The World-honored One has designed that the arising of all things is essentially without essence in reference to the pattern of other-dependency, i.e., those conditioned images that support clinging to imagined descriptive marks within the realm of discrimination. 
I now understand this meaning enunciated by the World-honored One as follows. Since those conditioned images that support clinging to the imagined within the realm of discrimination validate nothing real, their essence is precisely without essence, for this is the no-self of things, suchness, the purified content of understanding. It is this that is termed the pattern of full perfection. 
In reference to this, the World-honored One has designed the other aspect of that ultimate meaning is essentially without essence. 
The World-honored One has designed that the marks of all things are essentially without essence in reference to the pattern of clinging to the imagined, i.e., the fact that the attribution of names and symbols to the conditioned images that support clinging to the imagined within the realm of discrimination is taken to be either the essential or the specific mark of true concentration, its ability to control, that which it 47 696c 697a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning must control, its true cultivation to elicit what has not yet been elicited, its strengthening of what has already been elicited, its unforgettableness, its repeated cultivation, its increase, and its expansion. 
The World-honored One has designed that the arising of things is essentially without essence, and one aspect of is that ultimate truth is essentially without essence in reference to the pattern of other-dependency, i.e., those conditioned images that support clinging to the imagined within the realm of discrimination. 
I would explain the meaning enunciated by the World-honored One as follows: if, in those conditioned images that support clinging to imagined marks in the realm of discrimination, those marks clung to by imagination validate nothing real, then this is the essence that is essentially without essence, the no-self of things, suchness, the purified content of understanding. It is this that is termed the pattern of full perfection. 
“World-honored One, just as dried ginger must be put into the prescriptions of all medicinal powders and elixirs, just so, WorldHonored One, the explicit teaching that all things have no-essence, no arising, and no passing away, are originally quiescent, and are essentially in cessation must be put into all the scriptures of implicit meaning. 
World-honored One, just as pigments pervade all they color with the identical, single hue of their coloring, whether blue, yellow, red, or white, and thus demonstrate that coloring action, just so, World-honored One, the explicit teaching that all things have no-essence, etc., pervades all scriptures of implicit meaning with its identical, single hue, and thus demonstrates the implicit meaning of those scriptures. 
World-honored One, just as the addition of warm cheese to cooked delicacies like cakes or fruit produces an exquisite taste, just so, World-honored One, the addition of the explicit teaching that all things have no-essence, etc., to scriptures of implicit meaning produces exquisite delight. 
WorldHonored One, just as empty space pervades everywhere with its identical, single flavor and obstructs no activity, just so, WorldHonored One, the explicit teaching that all things have no-essence, etc., pervades all scriptures of implicit meaning with its identical, 48 Chapter V single flavor and obstructs no activity performed by word-hearers, solitary enlightened ones, or bodhisattvas.” At that time the World-honored One praised the Bodhisattva Paramarthasamudgata and said: 
“Excellent, excellent it is, good son, that you have been able to understand so well the underlying intent enunciated by the Tathagata. 
Also the similes of the dried ginger, the pigment, the warm cheese, and empty space were right to the point. 
It is exactly as you have maintained.” At that time the Bodhisattva Paramarthasamudgata addressed the Buddha and said: 
“In the country of Benares at Rsipatana in the Deer Park, the World-honored One first turned the wheel of doctrine, the four holy truths for those setting out in the word-hearers’ vehicle. 
This turning of the wheel was marvelous and wonderful, such as nobody, whether gods or men, had been able to turn in the world before. 
Nevertheless there were superior teachings, for had to be interpreted and occasioned controversy. 
Then the World-honored One with an underlying intent turned the wheel for the second time for the sake of those setting out in the great vehicle, that all things have no-essence, no arising, and no passing away, are originally quiescent, and are essentially in cessation. 
This turning of the wheel was marvelous and wonderful indeed. Nevertheless there were teachings superior to this, for it also had to be interpreted and occasioned controversy. 
The World-honored One then with an explicit meaning for the third time turned the wheel of doctrine for those setting out in all the vehicles, that all things have no-essence, no arising, and no passing away, are originally quiescent, and are essentially in cessation. 
It had no superior nor did it contain any implicit meaning nor occasion any controversy.” “World-honored One, if a good son or good daughter, having heard this teaching that all things have no-essence, no arising, and no passing away, are originally quiescent, and are essentially 49 697b 697c The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning in cessation, with the explicit meaning as it was enunciated by the Tathagata, were to believe, copy, protect, honor, disseminate, recite, or meditate and reflect upon it, how much merit would they engender through their effort of meditating upon it?” At that time the World-honored One addressed the Bodhisattva Paramarthasamudgata and said: 
“Paramarthasamudgata, the merit engendered by that good son or good daughter would be limitless, incalculable, incomparable. 
I can but suggest a small part of it for you, like a bit of dirt on one’s fingernail in comparison to the earth. It does not amount to one-hundredth part, nor onethousandth part, nor one-hundred-thousandth part. It cannot be reckoned as even the tiniest part. 
Or it is like the pool in a cow’s tracks compared to the waters of the four great oceans, which does not reach one-hundredth part, etc. 
“World-honored One, how should we designate this teaching on the explication of underlying intent? 
“Good son, it is designated the explicit teaching on ultimate meaning, and you should reverence it as such.” When this explicit teaching on ultimate meaning was enunciated in the great assembly, six hundred thousand sentient beings produced the mind of supreme awakening, three hundred thousand word-hearers removed themselves far from defilement and pollution and in this doctrine attained the wisdom eye of doctrine, one hundred fifty thousand word-hearers separated themselves definitively from all contaminated states of mind and attained liberation, and seventy-five thousand bodhisattvas attained the patience of the doctrine of no arising. 
50 Chapter VI The Analysis of Centering At that time the Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, in the great vehicle, when a bodhisattva practices the meditation of quietude and vision, what is his support? 
“Maitreya, good son, you should understand that in the great vehicle when a bodhisattva practices the meditation of quietude and vision, his support and station is the conventional exposition of the doctrine and the commitment not to cast off full, supreme awakening.””” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“The World-honored One has taught four kinds of content. 
Among these four which is the content of quietude? 
And which is the content of both together?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: “Good son, the single content of quietude is not accompanied by an image for reflection. 
The double content of both together is the limit of phenomenal reality and the fulfillment of duty.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, how is the bodhisattva able to seek quietude and to be well trained in vision by supporting himself upon these four kinds of contents of quietude and vision?” 51 698a 4ue ocripture on tne mxpiicauon or Underlying Meaning The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
“Good son, the conventional exposition of the doctrine as I have enunciated it for bodhisattvas consists in the scriptures, the metrical verses, the prophecies, the hymns, the discourses, the narratives, the parables, the apothegms , the accounts of previous lives, the extensive discourses, the accounts of miracles, and the expositions. 
Bodhisattvas listen attentively and accept these docilely. With their words well understood, their ideas well considered, their views well clarified, alone in a forested place they focus their thought upon the doctrines they have heard and pondered, for they are now capable of thinking reflectively upon those doctrines. 
In the continuity of their inner minds they focus and reflect, and repeatedly abide in this correct practice. 
They place their bodies and their minds at ease. This is what is termed quietude, and this is the quietude bodhisattvas seek. 
With their body and mind at ease, while abandoning the modalities of thinking, they thoroughly examine and understand that doctrine upon which they have so well reflected in the images brought about by concentration. 
In those meanings known through the images brought about by inner concentration, they are able to correctly investigate and examine, to ponder and search out everything, whether patience, happiness, wisdom, views, or awakening. 
It is this that is termed vision, and this is how bodhisattvas are able to be well trained in insight.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, if the bodhisattvas internally reflect upon and think about the mind without having yet attained ease of body and mind, what do you call that type of reflection?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
Rather it is a reflection concomitant with the commitment to quietude.” “World-honored One, if the bodhisattvas, not having yet reached ease of body and mind, attentively reflect upon images as the content of inner concentration in accord with the doctrines upon which they have reflected, what is that type of reflection called?” 52 Chapter VI “Good son, that is not the focusing of quietude at all! 
Rather it is a reflection concomitant with the commitment leading to quietude.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, are the paths of quietude and vision to be described as different or identical?” The Buddha addressed the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
“Good son, they are to be described as neither different nor identical. 
They are not identical because images for reflection are not the objective .” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, are the images brought forth by all concentrations and vision to be described as different from or identical with thinking?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
This is so because those images are nothing but ideas. 
Good son, I have taught that the object of consciousness is nothing but a manifestation of conscious construction only.”°° “World-honored One,” “if those images brought about in this manner are identical with thinking, then how can thinking reflect back and look upon itself?” “Good son,” “nothing ever looks at anything.*! 
Rather, when thinking occurs as such or such, then such and such images make their appearance. 
Good son, when a well polished and cleaned surface of a mirror encounters a material shape, it reflects the underlying material thing and we say that we see the image , the image appears as an object. 
In this manner, when thought arises, it seems to differ from the images that appear in concentration.” “World-honored One, all the images that sentient beings have, which occur because their minds encounter material form, etc., present themselves as distinct essences. 
Are these identical with thinking?” 53 698b ne Scripture on tne xpucation or Underlying Meaning “Good son, they are indeed identical, even though, with their mistaken awareness, the foolish are unable truly to understand that these images are nothing but conscious constructions and consequently misunderstand them.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, how can we describe the single-minded practice of vision of the bodhisattvas?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
“World-honored One, what are the varieties of vision?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: “Good son, in sum, there are three kinds. 
The second is vision from inquiry. 
The third is vision from penetration. 
Vision from inquiry is that vision which through wisdom attentively reflects upon those things not yet well understood in order to understand them well. 
Vision from penetration is that vision which attentively reflects upon those things already well understood by encompassing them within wisdom in order to realize them and attain liberation.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, what are the general varieties of quietude?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
“Good son, since they follow upon that thinking uninterrupted [by images], you should understand that here also there are three kinds. 
There are also eight kinds, for each meditation is a kind of quietude, from the first to the of neither conceptualization nor nonconceptualization. 
Again there are four kinds, for each of the four immeasurable activities of friendliness, compassion, joy, and abandonment is a kind of quietude.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, you have taught about quietude and vision supported by the doctrine and not supported by doctrine. 
What do these terms mean?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: “Good son, the quietude and vision supported by the doctrine are that quietude and vision attained through the doctrine and its meaning first received and pondered by the bodhisattvas. 
The quietude and vision not supported by the doctrine are the quietude and vision attained not through the images of the doctrine the bodhisattvas have received and pondered, but through the instructions and meanings of other teachings, such as meditation upon decaying and rotting or upon the impermanence of all things, the suffering of all conditioned states of being, the no-self of all things, or the final quiescence of cessation.*? 
Such quietude and vision I designate as not supported by doctrine. 
But, if they have attained a quietude and vision supported by the doctrine, those bodhisattvas I have 55 698c 699a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning designated as followers of the doctrine, and they have keen faculties, while, if they attain a quietude and vision not supported by doctrine, those bodhisattvas I have designated as followers of faith, and they have dull faculties.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, you have taught about quietude and vision that take as their object different doctrines, and about quietude and vision that take as their object a unified doctrine. 
What do these terms mean?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: “Good son, when a bodhisattva takes as his object of understanding each point of the doctrine of the scriptures, etc., and practices quietude and vision in regard to these doctrines which he has received and pondered, that is termed quietude and vision that take as their object different doctrines. 
When a bodhisattva takes as the object of his understanding the doctrine of all the scriptures, etc., and attentively reflects upon all these doctrines as one lump, one accumulation, one whole, one gathering up, all in harmony with suchness, turning toward suchness, approaching suchness, in harmony with wisdom, with cessation, with the conversion of the support, going toward these; if, in approaching these doctrines he proclaims the unlimited, incalculable doctrine and with this reflection practices quietude and vision, that is termed quietude and vision that take as their object a unified doctrine.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, you have taught about quietude and vision that take as their object a minor unified doctrine, about quietude and vision that take as their object a great unified doctrine, and about quietude and vision that take as their object an unlimited unified doctrine. 
What do these terms mean?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
“Good son, if one takes as the object of understanding the meaning of each of the scriptures and of the other eleven divisions of the teachings, and attentively reflects upon them as one lump, etc., this is to be known as the quietude and vision that take as 56 Chapter VI their object a minor unified doctrine. 
But if one takes as the object of understanding the doctrine of the scriptures, etc., received and pondered, and attentively reflects upon them as one lump, etc., without considering them separately, then this is to be known as the quietude and vision that take as their object a great unified doctrine. 
If one takes as the objects of understanding the unlimited doctrinal teaching of the Tathagata, the unlimited words and expressions of that doctrine, and the unlimited clarifications of ever more excellent wisdom, and attentively reflects upon them as one lump, etc., without considering them separately, then that is to be termed the quietude and vision that take as their object an unlimited unified doctrine.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, why do you say that the bodhisattvas attain quietude and vision that take as their object of understanding the unified doctrine?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
“Good son, there are five reasons that should be understood. The first is that when they reflect, from moment to moment they purge away support for all weakness. 
The second is that they sever all varieties of concepts and take their joy in doctrine. 
The third is that they understand the unlimited light of doctrine which has no differentiating marks anywhere. 
The fourth is that they bring forth purified, nonrefiective images for the accomplishment of duty. 
The fifth is that, in order to bring the Dharma body to fulfillment, they encompass that preeminent, wondrous cause for ever-increasing development.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, when are this quietude and vision that take as their object the unified doctrine said to be understood? 
At what point are they attained?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: “Good son, they are said to be understood from the very first stage of utmost joy, and are said to be attained from the third stage of expanding light. 
Good son, bodhisattvas just beginning their 57 699b The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning practices should also study and focus upon without remiss, even though they are yet unable to be praised .” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
To be a concentration having no inquiry but only judgment? 
To be a concentration having neither inquiry nor judgment?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: “Good son, that quietude and vision are termed a concentration with both investigation and inquiry when they experience and realize doctrinal descriptions as received, investigated, and inquired about, even though they be grossly obvious. 
That quietude and vision are said to be a concentration having no investigation but only inquiry when they experience and realize doctrinal descriptions as remembered in their subtle light, even though not experiencing or realizing what is grossly obvious. 
Furthermore, good son, quietude and vision accompanied by investigation is termed a concentration with both investigation and inquiry. 
Quietude and vision that take as the content of understanding the unified doctrine are termed a concentration that has neither investigation nor inquiry.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, what are the marks of quietude? 
What are the marks of the initiative ? 
What are the marks of abandonment?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
“Good son, whenever thinking becomes flighty or is about to become flighty, quietude is characterized as a focusing upon those things that can engender disgust, or by a focusing upon thinking 58 Chapter VI uninterrupted . 
Whenever thinking becomes languid or is about to become languid, initiative is characterized as a focusing upon those things that can bring joy, or by a focusing upon the images of that thinking. 
Whenever one becomes defiled by these two passionate inclinations, whether in the practice of quietude, the practice of vision, or the practice of both in synergy, abandonment is characterized as an effortless focusing and spontaneity of mind.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, that entire multitude of those bodhisattvas who practice quietude and vision know both doctrine and its meaning. 
What is knowing doctrine? 
What is knowing its meaning?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
“Good son, all those bodhisattvas understand and know doctrine in five aspects, for they know its names, its phrases, its descriptions, its differences, and its unity. 
The knowledge of its names consists in conceptual designations, which delineate essences in all defiled and purified things. 
The knowing of its phrases consists in the ability to maintain and establish in discourse all defiled and purified things among that collection of names. 
The knowing of its writings consists in the words that are based upon these two supports . 
The knowing of its differences consists in focusing, which objectifies each of those differences. 
When all of these come together into one, that is knowing doctrine. 
This is why it is said that those bodhisattvas know doctrine. 
“Good son, those bodhisattvas know meaning in ten aspects, for they know the limit of being, the suchness of being, the meaning of subject, the meaning of object, the meaning of environment, the meaning of enjoyment, the meaning of mistakes, the meaning of the absence of mistakes, the meaning of defilement, and the meaning of purification. 
“Good son, the limit of being refers to the limit to the analysis of all that exists among all defiled and purified things. 
This includes 59 699c 700a A POU Uae UR Ue Ua a CS, all that exists, such as the five aggregates, the six bases of internal consciousness, and the six bases of external consciousness. “The suchness of all things refers to suchness existing in all defiled and purified things. This term includes the suchness of all things. 
There are seven kinds. The first is the suchness of the transmigratory flow, for all conditioned states of being have neither beginning nor end. 
The second is the suchness of descriptive marks, for in all things both persons and things have no-self. 
The third is the suchness of conscious construction, for all conditioned states of being are nothing but conscious construction. 
The fourth is the suchness of what is given, that is, the truth about suffering that I have preached. 
The fifth is the suchness of false conduct, that is, the truth about the origin that I have preached. 
The sixth is the suchness of purification, that is, the truth of the destruction that I have preached. 
And the seventh is the suchness of correct practice, that is, the truth of the path that I have preached. 
“Understand that because of the suchness of the transmigratory flow, of the suchness of what has been given, and the suchness of false conduct, all sentient beings are entirely equal. 
Because of the suchness of descriptive marks and the suchness of conscious construction, all things are entirely equal. 
Because of the suchness of purification, the supreme awakenings of all wordhearers, all solitary enlightened ones, and all bodhisattvas are entirely equal. 
Because of the suchness of correct practice, the wisdoms encompassed in the hearing of doctrine and in the quietude and vision that take as their object the unified realm of doctrine are entirely equal. “The meaning of subject consists in the five sense organs, mind, thought, sense consciousness, and concomitant mental states. “The meaning of object consists in the six external bases, for the meaning of subject is also the meaning of object [since the object is nothing but conscious construction]. 
“The meaning of environment consists in that encompassing environment within which all sentient beings dwell, whether a single town, a hundred towns, a thousand towns, or a hundred 60 wuapuce va thousand towns; whether a single great land bordering the ocean, a hundred such, a thousand such, or a hundred thousand such; whether a single continent of Jambudvipa, a hundred such, a thousand such, or a hundred thousand such; whether a single group of four continents, a hundred such, a thousand such, or a hundred thousand such; whether a single chiliomicrocosmos, a hundred such, a thousand such, or a hundred thousand such; whether a large dichiliomedzocosmos, a hundred such, a thousand such, or a hundred thousand such; whether a trichiliomegacosmos, a hundred such, a thousand such, a hundred thousand such, or a hundred hundred thousand such, a single billion such, a hundred billion such, a thousand billion such, or a hundred thousand billion such; whether a single trillion, a hundred trillion such, a thousand trillion such, or a hundred thousand trillion such, in number equal to the minute atoms contained in a hundred thousand trillion trichiliomegacosmos, in the unlimited and incalculable encompassing universes in the ten directions. 
“The meaning of mistakes consists in errors of conceptualizing; errors of thinking; errors of seeing in regard to the meaning of subjectivity and objectivity, such as imagining what is impermanent to be eternal; errors of conceptualizing; errors of thinking; and errors of seeing, such as imagining suffering to be happiness or defilement to be purity, or imagining the no-self to be a self. 
One must, however, know their marks . “The meaning of defilement is triple, for there are three kinds of defilement in this triple world: the defilement of passion, the defilement of our actions, and the defilement of birth. 
“The meaning of purification consists in the factors of awakening, whereby one is separated from bondage to those three kinds of defilement. 
61 700b ‘rhe Scripture on the Kxplication of Underlying Meaning “These ten aspects encompass all meaning. 
Moreover, good son, those bodhisattvas are said to know meaning because they are able to know and understand five kinds of meaning, for they know all matters, all meanings, and all causes, they attain the results of perfect knowing, and they understand them. 
“Good son, herein the knowing of all matters consists in knowing all that is knowable: i.e., all aggregates, all internal bases, and all external bases. 
In like fashion the universal knowing of all meaning consists in knowing the meanings that must be distinguished as to their varieties; whether conventional meaning or ultimate meaning; whether virtuous or defective; whether about conditions or times; whether about arising, abiding, or passing away; whether about sickness, etc.; whether about suffering, its origin, etc.; whether about suchness, the reality limit, the reality realm, etc.; whether extensive or specific; whether categorical, analytic, oppositional, or dismissive; whether underlying or explicit. 
i.e., discipline and complete severance from covetousness, anger, and delusion; the results by monks; and the common and exclusive, worldly or transcendent good qualities of word-hearers or Tathagatas, all of which I have explained. The communication of them, i.e., the communication of the things , consists in broadly proclaiming and announcing to others all those liberating wisdoms of the doctrine that one has realized. 
These five meanings encompass all meaning. 
“Moreover, good son, those bodhisattvas are said to know meaning because they know the four aspects of meaning: 
Good son, these four aspects of meaning encompass all meaning. 
“Moreover, good son, those bodhisattvas are said to know meaning because they know the three aspects of meaning: 
The meaning of realms is fivefold: 
the realm of the surrounding world, the realm of sentient beings, the realm of doctrine, the realm of discipline, and the realm of the methods of discipline. 
Good son, these three aspects encompass all meaning.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, what is the difference between meaning known through wisdom gained from hearing , meaning known through wisdom gained from thinking, and meaning known through wisdom gained from the cultivation of quietude and vision?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
“Good son, the wisdom gained from hearing , rely upon the literal meaning of a text without really understanding its intent or making it clear. They move toward liberation without being able to realize the meaning that brings about that liberation. 
the wisdom gained from thinking, also rely upon the text, but not just to the letter, for they are able really to understand its intent. But they are not yet able to make clear, and, although they turn toward liberation, they are yet unable to realize the meaning that brings about that liberation. 
the 63 700c The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning wisdom gained from cultivation, bodhisattvas both rely upon the text and do not rely upon the text, they both follow the letter and do not follow the letter, for they are able really to understand its intent. They make clear by means of images wrought in concentration that conform to the matters to be known. They turn toward liberation well and are able to realize the meaning that brings that liberation about. 
Good son, these are what are termed the three kinds of differences in knowing meaning.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, what is the wisdom and what is the insight of all those bodhisattvas who know doctrine and its meaning through their cultivation of quietude and vision?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
“Good son, I have already on numerous occasions proclaimed the two differences between wisdom and insight! Nevertheless, I will now summarize the main point for you. 
Wisdom is that wondrous discernment which occurs through the cultivation of that quietude and vision which take as their object the unified doctrine [of the great vehicle]. 
Insight is that wondrous discernment which occurs through the cultivation of that quietude and vision which take as their object the different doctrines .” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, when the bodhisattvas cultivate quietude and vision, what images do they abandon? 
By means of what reflections?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: “Good son, because they reflect upon true suchness, they abandon images of doctrine and images of meaning. 
When they lack anything to be attained in names and name-essences, then they no longer pay any regard to the images that support those [names and name-essences]. In such a fashion they abandon them. 
As it is with names, so it is with phrases and all kinds of meanings. 
Even in regard to realms and essences of realms they lack anything to be attained, and so they no longer pay any regard to their images. 
Is this image of true suchness also to be abandoned or not?” “Good son, in the meaning of true suchness which they discern, there is no image whatsoever and nothing to be attained. 
Good son, as I have explained it, that meaning of true suchness which they discern dispenses with any kind of image that might any meaning. 
Thus it is not the case that this discernment itself can be replaced with anything else.” “World-honored One, you have given the examples of the broken water basin, the dirty mirror, and the bubbling spring as being surfaces that do not sustain any surface image for consideration. 
The opposite of these would then sustain . 
In like fashion, if one has a mind not cultivated, then one will not sustain a true understanding of suchness, but when that mind is well cultivated, then one will sustain such an understanding. 
What kind of suchness were you talking about?” “Good son,” “in that explanation there are three kinds of thinking capable of penetrating understanding: the thinking that is capable of understanding from what has been heard, the thinking that is capable of understanding from what has been thought, and the thinking that is capable of understanding from what has been cultivated. 
I presented that explanation in light of the suchness of conscious construction.” “World-honored One, those bodhisattvas have discerned and know both doctrine and meanings and have been earnest in their cultivation to abandon all images. How many kinds of difficultto-abandon images do they abandon? 
And how do they in fact abandon them?” “Good son, there are ten kinds of such images, and those bodhisattvas are able to abandon them through emptiness. 
First, because they discern and know both doctrine and meanings, there are the various images of writings and words, which they are able 65 71a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning to abandon through the emptiness of all doctrine. 
Second, because they discern and know the meaning of the suchness of the given, they have images of arising, passing away, abiding, differentiation, continuity, and development, which they are able to abandon through first the emptiness of images, and then the emptiness of beginnings and endings. 
Third, because they discern and know the meaning of the subject, they have lustful images of bodies and of self-pride, which they are able to abandon through [cultivating meditation on] the emptiness of interior and the emptiness of nonattainment. 
Fourth, because they discern and know the meaning of object, they have images of desired possessions, which they are able to abandon through the emptiness of externals. 
Fifth, because they discern and know the meaning of enjoyment, they have internally established images of the flirtations and endowments of men and women, which they are able to abandon through the emptiness of the internal and the external, and on original emptiness. 
Sixth, because they discern and know the meaning of environment, they have unlimited images, which they are able to abandon through the greatness of emptiness. 
Seventh, because they discern and know the immaterial, they have images of internal quiescence and liberation, which they are able to abandon through the emptiness of the conditioned. 
Eighth, because they discern and know the meaning of the true suchness of images, they have images of the no-self of persons and things, which, whether images of only conscious construction or of ultimate meaning, they are able to abandon through the emptiness of the ultimate, the emptiness of no-essence, the emptiness of the essence of noessence, and the emptiness of ultimate meaning. 
Ninth, because they discern and know the meaning of the suchness of purification, they have images of the unconditioned and of the unchanging, which they are able to abandon through [cultivating meditation on] the emptiness of the unconditioned and the emptiness of the 66 Chapter VI unchanging. 
Tenth, because they attentively reflect upon the nature of emptiness whereby they discipline what has to be disciplined, they have images of the nature of emptiness, which they are able to abandon through the emptiness of emptiness.” “World-honored One, once they have abandoned these ten kinds of images, what other images do they abandon and from what images are they liberated?” “Good son, they abandon the images wrought in concentration. 
They are liberated from and abandon the binding images of defilement. 
Good son, you should understand that, strictly speaking, each of these emptinesses counteracts its respective images, but yet it is not true that each one does not counteract all the images. 
It is similar to the case of ignorance, for it is not true that it is unable to engender all the defiled things even up to old age and dying. 
However, strictly speaking, ignorance is said to engender only karmic formations, because all the karmic formations are immediately caused by ignorance. 
This same principle also applies .” At that time the Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, what is the overall image of that emptiness which the bodhisattvas discern without discarding and yet without pride in regard to that image of emptiness?” Then the World-honored One praised the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
Good son, you have been able to question the Tathagata on this profound meaning in order to lead all the bodhisattvas not to discard the image of the nature of emptiness. 
Why is this so, good son? 
It is because if the bodhisattvas were to discard the image of the nature of emptiness, then they would discard the great vehicle altogether. 
Therefore attend well, for I will explain the overall image of emptiness for you. 
Good son, in the great vehicle the overall image of emptiness refers to the final separation of those images clung to by imagination, with all their varieties of defilement and purity, from both 67 701b 701c The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning the pattern of other-dependency and the pattern of full perfection: 
the complete nonattainment in those .” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, how many concentrations are included within this quietude and vision?” The Buddha addressed the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
“Good son, as I have explained, the unlimited word-hearers, bodhisattvas, and Tathagatas have unlimited varieties of concentration, all of which are included within .” “World-honored One, what is the cause of this quietude and vision?” “Good son, it is purified discipline and true insight accomplished through purified hearing and reflection.” “World-honored One, what are the results of this quietude and vision?” “Good son, their results are well-purified discipline, wellpurified thought, and well-purified understanding. 
Moreover, good son, all the good qualities, both worldly and transcendent, of all word-hearers, Tathagatas, etc., are included as results of this quietude and vision.” “World-honored One, what activity is performed through this quietude and vision?” “Good son, their activity is the liberation from the two bonds, the bonds of images and the bonds of gross weakness.” “World-honored One, among the five kinds of entanglements you have explained, which are obstacles to quietude, which to vision, and which to both together?” “Good son, lust for bodies and possessions is the obstacle to quietude. 
Lack of interest in the holy doctrines is the obstacle to knowledge. 
The various ways of abiding in the welter of pleasurable images and being fully content with shallowness are the obstacles to both together. 
Because of the first , one is unable to perform meditation. 
Because of the second, the effort cultivated never reaches accomplishment.” 68 Chapter VI “World-honored One, among the five obfuscations, which impede quietude, which vision, and which both together?” “Good son, flightiness and evildoing are obstacles to quietude. 
Melancholy, laziness, and doubt are obstacles to vision. 
Good son, if bodhisattvas reject attending to the great vehicle and fall into the attending of word-hearers and solitary enlightened ones, that is distraction in regard to attending. 
If they allow their minds to be scattered among the passionate inclinations perceived upon all the confusing images of the five external sense attractions, that is distraction in regard to externals. 
If they become immersed in melancholy, attached to the taste of trance through laziness, or defiled by the accompanying passion for any other trance state, that is the distraction in regard to internals. 
If, in attending to and thinking upon the images wrought by means of interior concentration, they rely upon images of external things, that is the distraction in regard to images. 
If internally they attend to sensations that arise conditionally and yet, because of their gross weakness, imagine a self and engender pride, that is the distraction of gross weakness.” 69 702a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning “World-honored One, what are the obstacles that this quietude and vision are capable of counteracting from the initial bodhisattva stage to the Tathagata stage?” “Good son, in the first stage they counteract the obstacles of the passions that lead to evil destinies, and of the defilement of action and birth. 
In the second stage they counteract the obstacle of the appearance of subtle sins. 
In the third stage they counteract the obstacle of the desires. 
In the fourth stage they counteract the obstacle of attachment to concentration and to doctrine. 
In the fifth stage they counteract the obstacle of rejecting transmigration altogether and going to cessation. 
In the sixth stage they counteract the obstacle of the frequent appearing of images. 
In the seventh stage they counteract the obstacle of the appearing of subtle images. 
In the eighth stage they counteract the obstacles of expending effort in regard to the imageless and of not having attained mastery in regard to images. 
In the ninth stage they counteract the obstacle of not having attained mastery of all the varieties of skillful speech. 
In the tenth stage they counteract the obstacle of not having attained the realization of the fully perfected Dharma body. 
Good son, in the Tathagata stage this quietude and vision counteract both the obstacle of the most subtle passion and the obstacle to the knowable. 
Because they are thus able to completely eradicate these obstacles, they finally realize universal wisdom and insight, unattached and unhindered; and, supported upon the accomplishment of objective, they are installed in the ultimately pure Dharma body.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, how do bodhisattvas, supported upon their intense cultivation of quietude and vision, realize supreme awakening?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
“Good son, having already attained quietude and vision, the bodhisattvas support themselves upon the seven suchnesses. With minds well concentrated upon the doctrine heard and pondered, within themselves they truly reflect upon the nature of 70 Chapter VI suchness as it has been well considered, well examined, and well established. 
Because of their reflection upon suchness, they are able to abandon the appearances of all subtle images, not to mention gross images. 
Good son, these subtle images refer to images of the appropriation of thinking; images of experience; images of conscious construction; images of defilement and purification; images of the interior; images of the exterior; images of both interior and exterior; images that one must act for the benefit of sentient beings; images of true wisdom; images of suchness, images of [the four truths of] suffering, its origin, its destruction, and the path; images of the conditioned; images of the unconditioned; images of eternity; images of transience; images of the nature of suffering and change; images of the unchanging; images of the different characteristics of the conditioned; images of the identical characteristics of the conditioned; the image that there is a universal just because one knows a universal; images of the no-self of persons; and images of the no-self of things. 
“They are able to abandon all thoughts that appear in their minds and, because they continually abide in such an activity, over a period of time they cultivate a mind to counteract all entanglements, obfuscations, and distractions. 
Afterwards, they internally engender penetrating discernment in regard to each of the seven suchnesses, for this is the path of insight. 
Because of this attainment they are said to have entered the assured status of a bodhisattva exempt from rebirth, for they are born into the household of the Tathagata and, entering into the first stage, they are able to enjoy the superior good qualities of this stage. 
During this initial period, because they have attained quietude and vision, they have already attained the two objects—the objects accompanied by images for reflection and the objects that are not accompanied by images for reflection—for it is at this point that they attain the path of insight. 
They also realize as the object of their understanding the limits of the phenomenal. 
Then afterwards in all the stages they cultivate the path of meditation while attentively reflecting upon these three kinds of objects. 
Just like a man 71 702b The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning who removes a large wedge by means of a small wedge, so these bodhisattvas banish internal images by the method of relying upon this as the small wedge to remove the large wedge (of all their images]. 
Since they destroy forever that weakness in all its images, afterwards in all the stages they gradually refine their thoughts as one refines gold until they realize supreme awakening, until they realize the objective they set out to accomplish. 
Good son, thus because these bodhisattvas have well cultivated meditation within themselves, they realize supreme awakening.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, how does this cultivation produce the great majesty of a bodhisattva?” “Good son, when the bodhisattvas become aware of the six supports, they are able to produce that great majesty of a bodhisattva. 
The second is that they know well the abiding of thought. 
The third is that they know well the departure of thought. 
The fourth is that they know well the increasing of thought. 
The fifth is that they know well the diminution of thought. 
The sixth is that they know well the methods. 
They know well the arising of thought, for they truly know the differences that engender thought in its sixteen activities, and this is what is meant by knowing well the arising of thought. “These sixteen activities of thought are as follows. 
The first is the arising of conscious construction as the unconscious, foundational receptacle, that is, the appropriating consciousness. 
The second is the arising of conscious construction in tandem with its numerous different objects, that is, the imaginative thought consciousness that immediately apprehends all the object realms of material forms, etc.; the understanding which immediately apprehends internal and external objects; or, alternately, the imaginative thought consciousness which in an instant, a single moment, enters into concentration and sees many Buddha lands and many 72 Chapter VI Tathagatas. 
The third is the arising of conscious construction objectified in small images, that is, thinking bound to the world of desire. 
The fourth is the arising of conscious construction objectified in large images, that is, thinking bound to the world of material form. 
The fifth is the arising of conscious construction objectified in unlimited images, that is, thinking bound to infinite space and infinite consciousness. 
The sixth is the arising of conscious construction objectified in subtle images, that is, thinking bound neither to conceptualization nor to nonconceptualization. 
The eighth is the arising of conscious construction in no images, that is, transcendent thinking and objectless thinking. 
The ninth is the arising of conscious construction activated in tandem with suffering, that is, the thinking of the inhabitants of the hells. 
The tenth is the arising of conscious construction in tandem with the complex of sensation, that is, thinking activated through desire. 
The eleventh is the arising of conscious construction activated in tandem with joy, that is, the thinking of the first two meditations. 
The twelfth is the arising of conscious construction activated in tandem with happiness, that is, the thinking of the third meditation. 
The thirteenth is the arising of conscious construction activated in tandem with neither suffering nor happiness, that is, thinking from the fourth meditation to neither conceptualization nor nonconceptualization. 
The fourteenth is the arising of conscious construction in tandem with defilement, that is, the thinking associated with passions and passionate inclinations. 
The fifteenth is the arising of conscious construction in tandem with goodness, that is, thinking associated with faith, etc. 
The sixteenth is the arising of conscious construction in tandem with morally neutral states, that is, thinking unassociated with either that . “How do they know well the abiding of thought? 
This means that they truly know the suchness of understanding. How do they know well the departure of thought? 
This means that they truly know deliverance from the two bonds, those of images and those of weakness, for such knowing enables them to lead their thinking 73 702c 703a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning away from them. 
How do they know well the increase of thought? When they truly know the thoughts that are able to counteract the bonds of images and the bonds of weakness, for at the moment when those increase and accumulate, they attain an increase and accumulation . This is what is meant by knowing the increase of thought. How do they know well the decrease of thought? 
They truly know the images that have to be counteracted, the weak, defiled thoughts, and, when they discard them or lessen them, this is a rejecting and a decreasing. This is what is meant by knowing the decrease of thought. How do they know well methods? 
They truly know the liberations, the of mastery, and totality, either when cultivating or terminating . 
Good son, this is how the bodhisattvas the great majesty of a bodhisattva, whether they have already done so, are going to do so, or are presently doing so.” The Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, as you have taught, in cessation without remainder all sensations without remainder are forever destroyed. 
Which are these sensations that are forever destroyed?” “Good son, in sum, there are two kinds of sensations destroyed without remainder. 
The first are the sensations of bodily weakness, while the second are the sensations of the objects that are their results. 
There are four kinds of sensations of bodily weakness: the sensations of bodies of material form, the sensations of formless bodies, the sensations of weakness already brought to term as result, and the sensations of weakness not yet brought to term as result. 
Sensations already brought to term as result refer to present sensations, while sensations not yet brought to term as result refer to the objects of sensation to be caused in the future . 
Sensations of objects that result are also of four kinds: 
In cessation with remainder, all sensations not yet brought to term as result have 74 Chapter VI already been destroyed, for there is generally present the experiencing of sensations born from wisdom contact, which counteract the experiencing both of those [sensations not yet brought to term as result], and of those sensations already brought to term as result. 
Those two kinds of sensation are already destroyed, and one experiences only that sensation born of wisdom contact. 
But in cessation without remainder, at the time of final cessation even this is eternally destroyed. 
Thus it is said that in the realm of cessation without remainder, all sensations are destroyed without remainder.” Thus the World-honored One finished his explanation. 
He again addressed the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
All good sons and good daughters must with diligent effort cultivate it.” Then the World-honored One recited verses to emphasize his meaning: 
If, looking to what they can attain, some reject and criticize and take their view to be the way to realize doctrine, Maitreya, they will be as far from centering as is the sky from the earth. 
Obdurate people who do not work to benefit beings, once enlightened, do not bother about benefiting sentient beings, but the wise do act until the end of the eons, and they attain supreme, undefiled joy. 
If one enunciates doctrine from 75 703b The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning desire, although one be said to have rejected desire, one will revert to desire. Thus fools, having attained the priceless doctrine, turn back and wander about begging alms. 
At that time the Bodhisattva Maitreya addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, how should we designate this teaching in this doctrinal discourse on explicating underlying intent? 
How should we revere it?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Maitreya and said: 
“Good son, it is designated the teaching on the explicit meaning of centering and you should revere it as such.” When this teaching on the explicit meaning of centering was preached in the assembly, six hundred thousand sentient beings attained supreme awakening; three hundred thousand word-hearers attained purification of their doctrine-eye, undefiled and unpolluted in regard to this doctrine; one hundred fifty thousand word-hearers exhausted their contaminants and their thought attained liberation; and seventy-five thousand bodhisattvas came to attend to expansive centering.** 76 Chapter VII The Stages and Perfections At that time the Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, you have taught the bodhisattva stages, which are the stage of utmost joy, the stage of purification, the stage of expanding light, the stage of flaming wisdom, the stage of invincibility, the stage of presence, the stage far-reaching, the stage unshakable, the stage of wisdom discernment, and the stage of the doctrine cloud. 
You have furthermore described the Buddha stage as an eleventh stage. 
What are the purifications of these stages? 
In what are [those purifications] included?” At that time the Buddha addressed the Bodhisattva Avalokite$vara and said: “Good son, you should understand that all these stages are included in the four purifications and the eleven aspects. 
The four purifications are able to encompass the ten stages because the purification of superior intention encompasses the first stage, the purification of superior discipline encompasses the second stage, the purification of superior thought encompasses the third stage, and the purification of superior wisdom encompasses the excellences evolved in the subsequent stages. 
You should understand that is able to encompass all the stages from the fourth to the last Buddha stage. 
You should understand that in this fashion these four purifications are able to encompass all the stages. “How do the eleven aspects encompass all these stages? 
In the first stage of practicing commitment, the bodhisattvas well cultivate patience in their commitment by relying upon the ten practices 17 703¢ The Scripture on the Explication ot Underlying Meaning lof copying, honoring, propagating, attending to, reading, maintaining, explaining, intoning, pondering, and cultivating] doctrine. Therefore, upon transcending this stage, they enter the assured status of a bodhisattva exempt from rebirth. 
Having thus brought this aspect to perfection, those bodhisattvas are yet unable truly to know and practice, because of the presence of subtle sins and mistakes. Therefore, in this aspect they are yet imperfect. 
But they are able to realize this perfection by the earnest cultivation . 
Having thus perfected this aspect, they are yet unable to attain a worldly perfect concentration or recollection, or a perfect memory of they have heard. Therefore, in this aspect they are yet imperfect. 
But they are able to realize this perfection by the earnest cultivation . 
But they are able to realize this perfection through the earnest cultivation . 
But they are able to realize this perfection through their earnest cultivation . 
Having thus perfected this aspect, they are yet unable to examine the evolution of transmigration as it is in reality, because they frequently engender disgust for that . They are unable to abide for long in imageless reflection [on transmigration]. Therefore, in this aspect they are yet imperfect. 
But they are able to realize this perfection through the earnest cultivation . 
Having thus perfected this aspect, they are yet unable to abide for long in the meditation of imageless reflection in a nondefective and uninterrupted fashion. 
But they are able to realize this perfection through the earnest cultivation . 
Having thus perfected this aspect, they are yet unable to abandon effort in regard to imageless mastery. They are unable to attain mastery over images. Therefore, in this aspect they are yet imperfect. 
But they are able to realize this perfection through the earnest cultivation . 
Having thus perfected this aspect, they are yet unable to attain mastery over different ways of saying things, images, interpretations, and distinctions in their preaching. Therefore, in this aspect they are yet imperfect. 
But they are able to realize this perfection through the earnest cultivation . 
Having thus perfected this aspect, they are yet unable to attain the sense of the presence of the perfect Dharma body. Therefore, in this aspect they are yet imperfect. 
But they are able to realize this perfection through the earnest cultivation . 
Having thus perfected this aspect, they are yet unable to attain that wondrous wisdom and insight, unattached and unimpeded in all knowable realms whatsoever. Therefore, in this aspect they are yet imperfect. 
But they are able to realize this perfection through the earnest cultivation . 
Thus this aspect is brought to perfection; and, being perfected, all these aspects are brought to perfection. 
Good son, understand how in this manner these eleven aspects entirely include the ten stages.” The Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, why is the first stage termed the stage of utmost joy? 
Why are the other stages termed what they are termed?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara and said: 
“Good son, the first stage is termed the stage of utmost joy because, in accomplishing great meaning and attaining a transcendent mind not hitherto attained in the world, one engenders great delight and joy. 
The second stage is termed the stage of purification because in it one removes all subtle transgressions against discipline. 
The third stage is termed the stage of expanding light 79 704a 704b The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning because the concentrations and memory formulas attained in it are able to be the support for unlimited wisdom light. 
The fourth stage is termed the stage of flaming wisdom because the factors of wisdom attained in it burn away all passion and wisdom flares up like fire. 
The fifth stage is termed the stage of invincibility because when in it, one attains mastery in the cultivation of skillful methods over those same factors of wisdom, which are most difficult to overcome. 
The sixth stage is termed the stage of presence because when in it, one brings to presence and examines all the evolutions of conditioned states of being and abides in their presence by the continual cultivation of reflection upon the imageless. 
The seventh stage is termed the far-reaching stage because when in it, one is able to enter into an imageless and farreaching reflection, without defect and without interruption, and thus one draws near to images of pure lands. 
The eighth stage is termed the unshakable stage because when in it, one attains spontaneity in regard to the imageless and does not evince any movement of any passion in regard to images. 
The ninth stage is termed the stage of wisdom discernment because in it one obtains irreproachable and expansive wisdom which understands and masters all doctrinal enunciations. 
The tenth stage is termed the stage of the doctrine cloud because in it, just as a great cloud is able to cover over the sky, this mass of weakness is encompassed by the Dharma body. 
The eleventh stage is termed the Buddha stage because in it one is forever freed from the obstacle of even the subtlest passion, and from the obstacle to the knowable, in supreme awakening to all knowable realms.” The Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, in the stages, how many delusions and how many weaknesses to be counteracted are found?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara and said: 
“Good son, in these stages there are twenty-two delusions and twelve kinds of weakness to be counteracted. In the first stage there are two delusions: the delusion of clinging to personality 80 Chapter VII and to things, and the delusion of being defiled in evil destinies. 
These, together with the weakness , are what has to be counteracted . 
In the second stage there are two delusions: the delusion of subtle mistakes and the delusion of destinies from various actions. 
These, together with the weakness that , are what are to be counteracted . 
In the third stage there are two delusions: the delusion of being covetous and the delusion in regard to perfecting the memory of what is heard. 
These, together with the weakness , are what are to be counteracted . 
In the fourth stage there are two delusions: the delusion of being attached to concentration and the delusion of being attached to doctrine. 
These, together with the weakness , are what are to be counteracted . 
In the fifth stage there are two delusions: the delusion of an exclusive focus in rejecting transmigration and the delusion of an exclusive focus in aiming at cessation. 
These, together with the weakness [that issues from them], are what are to be counteracted . 
In the sixth stage there are two delusions: the delusion of bringing to presence and examining the evolutions of conditioned states of being , and the delusion in frequently bringing to presence images . 
These, together with the weakness [that issues from them], are what are to be counteracted [by this sixth stage]. 
In the seventh stage there are two delusions: the delusion of bringing to presence subtle images and the delusion by the method of focusing exclusively upon the imageless. 
These, together with the weakness , are what are to be counteracted [by this seventh stage]. 
In the eighth stage there are two delusions: the delusion of exerting effort in regard to the imageless and the delusion in regard to mastering images. 
These, together with the weakness [that issues from them], are what are to be counteracted [by this eighth stage]. 
In the ninth stage there are two delusions: the delusion that one has mastered the unlimited doctrinal explanations, the 81 704c The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning unlimited doctrinal literature, and the successive wisdom interpretations and formulas, and the delusion of having mastered the art of interpretation. 
These, together with the weakness , are what are to be counteracted [by this ninth stage]. 
In the tenth stage there are two delusions: the delusion in regard to great clairvoyance and the delusion in discerning subtle intentions. 
These, together with the weakness [that issues from them], are what are to be counteracted . 
In the Tathagata stage there are two delusions: the delusion of a most subtle attachment to all the knowable realms of meaning and the delusion of their extremely subtle obstacles. 
Good son, it is because of these twenty-two delusions and eleven weaknesses that there are these stages, and that supreme awakening, being encumbered by , remains absent.” The Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, supreme awakening is rare indeed, for it is the attainment of the great benefit, the great result, whereby all bodhisattvas are enabled to break asunder the net of great delusion, are enabled to pass through the thicket of great weaknesses and realize supreme awakening.” The Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, by how many supremacies are these stages established?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokite$vara and said: 
Good son, these purities in sequence become increasingly superior from the first stage up to the Tathagata stage. 
Excluding the purity of birth in the Tathagata stage, the good qualities of the first stage are equally present in the higher stages, for you should understand that these stages 82 Chapter Vil are superior in good qualities . 
The good qualities of all the ten bodhisattva stages can be surpassed, but the good qualities of the Tathagata stage are unsurpassed.” The Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, why do you say that the birth of a bodhisattva is far superior to the births of all other sentient beings?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokite$Svara and said: 
“Good son, there are four reasons. First, is engendered from the most pure good roots. 
Second, it is taken up through the power of their penetrating thought. 
Third, the compassion delivers sentient beings. 
And fourth, being undefiled, they are able to remove the defilement of others.” The Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, why do you say that all bodhisattvas produce an expansive vow, a wondrous vow, a superior vow?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara and said: 
“Good son, there are four reasons. All bodhisattvas are well able to realize the happiness of abiding in cessation. 
They could quickly realize it, yet they renounce that rapid realization of a joyful abode. 
Without causes or necessity, they produce the mind of that great vow because they desire to benefit all sentient beings. They remain among great sufferings of various kinds for a prolonged time. 
Therefore I have said that they produce an expansive vow, a wondrous vow, a superior vow.” The Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, how many precepts must all the bodhisattvas observe?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara and said: 
“Good son, the precepts of the bodhisattvas are the six perfections of giving, discipline, patience, zeal, meditation, and wisdom.” The Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, of these six kinds of precepts, how many are included within the precept of high discipline, how many within 83 705a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning the precept of high thinking, and how many within the precept of high wisdom?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokite$vara and said: 
I teach that of zeal pervades them all.” The Bodhisattva Avalokite$Svara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, among these six precepts, how many are included within the requisite of merit and how many are included within the requisite of wisdom?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokite$vara and said: 
“Good son, that which is included within the precept of high discipline is synonymous with that which is included within the requisite of merit. 
That which is included within the precept of high wisdom is synonymous with that which is included within the requisite of wisdom. 
I teach that both zeal and meditation pervade both .” The Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, how do the bodhisattvas observe these six precepts?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara and said: 
“Good son, there are five aspects under which they must observe these precepts. The first is that from the first they must have an intense faith in the wondrous doctrinal teachings about the perfections as found in the bodhisattva canon. 
The second is that they must zealously cultivate the wondrous wisdoms accomplished through hearing, reflecting, and meditating in the ten practices concerning doctrine. 
The third is that they must nurture thoughts of wisdom. 
The fourth is that they must draw near to a spiritual counselor. 
The fifth is that they must cultivate good qualities without interruption.” The Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
in order to benefit sentient beings and in order to counteract all the passions, for the first three precepts benefit sentient beings, while the latter three counteract all the passions. 
The first three benefit sentient beings, for by giving, all bodhisattvas provide requisites to benefit sentient beings. 
By being disciplined, they benefit sentient beings in sparing them from injury, oppression, and irritation. 
By their patience under abuse, they are able to benefit sentient beings, enabling them to patiently sustain injury, oppression, and irritation. 
The latter three counteract all the passions, for by zeal the bodhisattvas, although they may not yet have suppressed all their passions forever or may not yet have eliminated all their passionate inclinations, are able diligently to cultivate good qualities, and all those passions become incapable of reversing their efforts toward goodness. 
By meditation they do suppress their passions forever, and by wisdom they eliminate their passionate inclinations forever.” The Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, why have you presented the other perfections as four?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara and said: 
“Good son, it is because they are aids to the former six perfections. 
Bodhisattvas, who assist sentient beings by means of the first three perfections , establish [sentient beings] in good by means of taking care of them in the skillful methods of all the kinds of attractions [which are giving to beings, encouraging them with speech, benefiting them with action, and identifying with them]. Therefore, I have taught that the perfection of skillful methods is an aid to the first three perfections. 
“But because of bodhisattvas’ present condition , their passions are numerous, and they are yet incapable of uninterrupted practice. Because of their fragile commitment and the worldly quality of their understanding, they are incapable of abiding within their minds. Because they are incapable of properly practicing the exercises heard in the bodhisattva canon, the 85 705b 705¢ The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning meditation they do have is unable to produce transcendent discernment. 
However, they have accumulated the requisite of merit in some small part; and in their minds they do engender a vow to lessen their passions in the future. 
Because of this vow their passions weaken and they become capable of practicing zeal. Therefore I have taught that the perfection of vow is an aid to the perfection of zeal. 
When bodhisattvas draw near a spiritual counselor and listen to doctrine with true attention, this becomes a cause for their turning away from an inferior commitment and toward a superior commitment, for they become able to attain an otherworldly understanding. It is this that is termed the perfection of power. 
Due to such power they become capable of abiding within their minds. Therefore I have preached that the perfection of power aids the perfection of meditation. 
If such bodhisattvas are able to properly cultivate the exercises they have heard, they become able to produce meditation. And this is what is termed the perfection of wisdom. 
Because of this wisdom they are able to produce transcendent discernment. Therefore I have preached that the perfection of wisdom is an aid to the perfection of discernment.” The Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, what is the reason for the sequence of the six perfections in your preaching?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara and said: 
This means that bodhisattvas are able to acquire purified discipline through being generous with their physical possessions . 
They practice patience because they guard discipline. 
By practicing patience, they become capable of producing zeal. 
By producing zeal, they become capable of accomplishing meditation. 
Endowed with meditation, they become able to obtain transcendent discernment. 
This, then, is the reason for the sequence of the six perfections in my preaching.” The Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
The three subdivisions of giving are the giving of doctrine, the giving of material goods, and the giving of fearlessness. 
The three subdivisions of discipline are the discipline to turn away from what is not good, the discipline to turn toward what is good, and the discipline to turn toward benefiting sentient beings. 
The three subdivisions of patience are the patience to endure insult and injury, the patience to abide peacefully in suffering, and the patience to investigate doctrine. 
The three subdivisions of zeal are the zeal which protects one like armor, the zeal to exert effort in engendering good, and the zeal to exert effort in benefiting sentient beings. 
The three subdivisions of meditation are the meditation of abiding in happiness, which counteracts all the suffering of passion because it is nondiscriminative, tranquil, very tranquil, and irreproachable; the meditation that engenders the good quality ; and the meditation that produces benefit for sentient beings. 
The three subdivisions of discernment are the discernment that has as its object worldly, conventional truth; the discernment that has as its object the truth of ultimate meaning; and the discernment that has as its object the benefiting of sentient beings.” The Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, why are these perfections called perfections?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara and said: 
They are unattached because they are not attached to the opposites of the perfections. 
They are disinterested because the thought is not bound to the maturation or reward resulting from any of the perfections. 
They are irreproachable because such perfections have nothing in common with defiled states and are apart from implementing evil methods. 
They are nondiscriminative because the specific descriptions of these perfections do not cling to their literal meaning. 
They are fruitful 87 706a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning because such perfections, when practiced and accumulated, turn toward and seek the result of supreme awakening.” “World-honored One, what are the opposites of these perfections?” “Good son, you should understand that there are six such . 
The first is looking out for one’s own advantage in seeking happiness by hankering after pleasure, wealth, and power. 
The second is looking out for one’s own advantage in indulging the pleasures of body, speech, and mind. 
The third is looking out for one’s own advantage in being impatient when humiliated by others. 
The fourth is looking out for one’s own advantage in not bestirring oneself to practice and in being attached to pleasure. 
The fifth is looking out for one’s own advantage in the hectic confusion and wild activity of the world. 
The sixth is looking out for one’s own advantage in the fabrication of what one sees, hears, understands, knows, and says.” “World-honored One, what is the resultant maturation of all these perfections?” “Good son, you should understand that in sum there are six kinds. 
The second is going to and being born in good destinies. 
The third is the full joy and happiness of peace and concord. 
The fourth is being a ruler over sentient beings. 
The fifth is the absence of bodily torment. 
The sixth is great renown and fame.” “World-honored One, how do these perfections become mixed up with defiled states?” “Good son, in sum, there are four such situations: 
A situation is unreasonable when, by practicing one perfection, one puts off and neglects the practice of the other perfections.” “World-honored One, what is meant by unskillful methods?” “Good son, if the bodhisattvas, in benefiting sentient beings through their perfections, were to rely only upon material goods 88 Chapter VII to bring benefit and render them happy, and would not bother to lead them away from evil or establish them in good, that would be an unskillful method. 
Why is that, good son? 
It is because it is not true that the one who does such things is really benefiting sentient beings. 
Whether one has a small amount or a great heap of excrement and urine, it can never be used as perfume. 
Similarly, because sentient beings suffer because of their actions, and because their nature is suffering, it is impossible to lead them to happiness simply by the method of providing them with fleeting images of material things. 
The best benefit would be to establish them in good.” The Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, how many purifications do all these perfections have?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara and said: 
“Good son, I have never said that they have purifications other than the five enumerated above [of nonattachment, disinterestedness, irreproachability, nondiscrimination, and fruitfulness]. 
However, with these as the basis, I will explain the common and specific characteristics of the purifications of these perfections. “The purifications common to all the perfections number seven. 
The first is that bodhisattvas need not seek after knowledge other than that of the doctrine. 
The second is that, after they have gained insight into this doctrine, they do not engender attachment to it. 
The third is that they do not engender doubt about this doctrine or question whether or not it is capable of leading to great awakening. 
The fourth is that they never congratulate themselves, deprecate others, or engage in ridicule. 
The fifth is that they never become prideful or lax. 
The sixth is that they never denigrate their achievement or become surfeited . 
The seventh is that they never become jealous of or stingy with others because of this doctrine. “The purifications specific to each perfection also number seven. 
As I have taught, the bodhisattvas are characterized by seven purifications of giving. 
The first is that, because the gift is pure, they practice a purified giving. 
The second is that, because their 89 706b 706c The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning discipline is pure, they practice a purified giving. 
The third is that, because their insight is pure, they practice a purified giving. 
The fourth is that, because their thought is pure, they practice a purified giving. 
The fifth is that, because their speech is pure, they practice a purified giving. 
The sixth is that, because their wisdom is pure, they practice a purified giving. 
The seventh is that, because they are purified from defilement, they practice a purified giving. 
They are endowed with constantly prevailing discipline. They accept and learn all lessons. These are the seven characteristics of the purification of discipline. “Having deep faith in the maturation that results from all their own actions, the bodhisattvas do not become exasperated in any unfavorable situation in which they might find themselves. 
In order to overcome trouble, they do not become abusive, enraged, pugnacious, threatening, or flippant. 
They do not harbor resentment or reckon up their due. 
When criticized, they do not become vexed, but neither do they invite criticism from others. 
It is not from fear or defiled affection that they practice patience, but they do not spurn kindnesses. 
These are the seven characteristics of the purification of patience. “Having understood the equality of zeal, the bodhisattvas neither boast of their resolute practice of zeal nor denigrate others. 
They are endowed with great power and with great zeal. 
Their profound abilities are strong and resolute. 
They never cast off the yoke of the good. These are the seven characteristics of the purification of zeal. “In their meditation the bodhisattvas have acquired the concentration that penetrates images, the concentration of perfection, 90 Chapter VII the concentration of two aspects, the concentration of spontaneity, the concentration without support, the concentration of inculcating control, and the unlimited concentration of practicing the lessons learned in the bodhisattva canon. 
“Discernment means that the bodhisattvas have separated themselves from the two extremes of imposing [imagined essences upon doctrine] or of deleting , for they practice the middle path.** Because of this discernment, they truly understand the meaning of liberation methods: 
that is, the three liberation methods of the empty, the desireless, and the imageless. 
They truly understand the meaning of essence: that is, the three patterns of the totally imagined, the other-dependent, and the fully perfected. 
They truly understand the meaning of noessence: that is, the three kinds of essential no-essence in marks, arising, and ultimate meaning. 
They truly understand worldly, conventional meaning: that is, the five stations of learning [which are literature, craftsmanship, medicine, logic, and doctrine]. 
They truly understand the true meaning of ultimate meaning: that is, the seven emptinesses. 
These are the seven characteristics of the purification of discernment.” The Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, what are the specific actions of these five characteristics ?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara and said: 
“Good son, you should understand that these characteristics of purification have five actions. Because they are unattached, the bodhisattvas always exert diligent effort in their present practice of the perfections without laxity. 
Because they are disinterested, they encompass the causes to avoid laxity in the future. 
Because 91 707a The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning they are irreproachable, they are able correctly to practice completely purified and wholly radiant perfections. 
Because they are nondiscriminative, in their perfection of skillful methods, they speedily attain fullness. 
Because they are generous, in all their destinies they attain inexhaustibility in regard to all perfections whatsoever and all consequent favorable maturations [of those perfections], and finally reach unexcelled supreme awakening.” The Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, why are [the bodhisattvas who have mastered] these perfections extensive? 
Why are they undefiled? 
Why are they most radiant? 
Why are they unshakable? 
Why are they purified?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara and said: 
They are undefiled because they are irreproachable and nondiscriminative. 
They are radiant because the action of their penetrating understanding is supreme. 
They are unshakable because they have already entered the state of non-returners. 
They are purified because they have completed the ten stages and the Buddha stage.” The Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, why are all the favorable results and maturations of the perfections inexhaustible?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokite$vara and said: 
“Good son, this is so because, dependent one upon the other, these are cultivated without interruption.” The Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, why do the bodhisattvas in faith pursue the perfections, but not the agreeable rewards resulting from them?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokite$vara and said: 
“Good son, there are five reasons. First, it is the perfections {and not their rewards] that are the causes for the highest joy and happiness. 
Second, it is the perfections that are the causes for the highest benefit for oneself and for others. 
Third, it is the 92 Chapter VII perfections that are the causes for the maturation of favorable results in future times. 
Fourth, the perfections are the support for the negation of all defilement. 
Fifth, the perfections are beyond all change.” The Bodhisattva Avalokite$vara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, what are the august qualities of each of these perfections?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara and said: 
“Good son, you should understand that each of the perfections has four august qualities. First, when one cultivates these perfections correctly, one becomes capable of abandoning their opposites: stinginess, laxity, exasperation, idleness, distractions, and false meanings. 
Second, when one cultivates them correctly, one becomes capable of the true requisites for unexcelled, supreme awakening. 
Third, when one cultivates them correctly, even in the present world, one becomes capable of encompassing within oneself benefit for sentient beings. 
Fourth, when one cultivates them correctly, one becomes capable of attaining inexhaustible, favorable results from their maturation in the future.” The Bodhisattva Avalokite$vara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, what is the cause, the result, and the benefit of these perfections?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokite$Svara and said: 
The benefit is that fully perfected and expansive great awakening.” The Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, if the bodhisattvas are endowed with inexhaustible riches, and if they are most compassionate, then how can there be poor sentient beings in this world?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara and said: “Good son, it is because the very actions of sentient beings are sinful. 
If this were not so, then how would there be poverty in 93 707b 707 The Scripture on the Explication of Underlying Meaning the world, for the bodhisattvas always cherish the mind to benefit others and they are indeed endowed with inexhaustible riches. if sentient beings did not set up obstacles by their own actions. 
The bodies of hungry ghosts are oppressed by a great thirst, but even if they encounter the waters of the great sea, still they remain parched. 
This is not the fault of that great sea. It is the fault of the actions of those hungry ghosts themselves! 
Similarly, the riches to be given by the bodhisattvas, like the sea, are not at fault. Rather, like those hungry ghosts, the force of evil actions deprives of the fruits .” The Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, by means of which perfection do the bodhisattvas perceive the essential no-essence of all things?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara and said: 
“Good son, it is because of the perfection of discernment that they are able to perceive the essential no-essence of all things.” “World-honored One, if it is by means of the perfection of discernment that they are able to perceive the essential no-essence of all things, then why are they not able to perceive the essential essence ?” “Good son, I have never taught that one perceives the essential no-essence by means of their essential essence.*> Although that essential no-essence is apart from all descriptions and is realized internally, nevertheless one is unable to enunciate it by rejecting all verbal descriptions. 
Therefore, I explain that it is by means of the perfection of discernment that one is able to perceive the essential no-essence of all things.” The Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, you have taught about perfection, near perfection, and great perfection. 
What is perfection? 
What is near perfection? 
And what is great perfection?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokite$vara and said: 
“Good son, the bodhisattvas, through unlimited periods of time, cultivate and practice giving, etc., and bring to completion 94 Chapter VII good states, yet there still remain passions. They are not yet capable of vanquishing them but rather are themselves vanquished by them. Perfection refers to the development of such weak commitment during the stage of practicing commitment. 
Passions still do make their appearance, but they are able to vanquish them and are not themselves vanquished by them. Near perfection, then, refers to this [stage of development] in the initial stage and above. Those bodhisattvas, during further unlimited periods of time, cultivate and practice giving, etc., develop further increases, and bring to completion good states. No passion now appears at all. 
Great perfection refers to this in the eighth stage and above.” The Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, how many varieties of passionate inclinations are to be found in all these stages?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva AvalokiteSvara and said: 
“Good son, there are three varieties. The first are the passionate inclinations that are removed from their companions. These occur in the first five stages. 
Why is this so? 
Good son, all the passions that do not arise connaturally are companions to the arising of connatural passions. Since they no longer are present at the time , they are said to be removed from their companions. 
The second are debilitated passionate inclinations, which appear subtly in the sixth and seventh stages. But if one cultivates their suppression, they will appear no longer. 
The third are the subtle passionate inclinations found in the eighth stage and above. Herein all passions have been removed and no longer appear. There remains only the support for the obstacle to the knowable.” The Bodhisattva Avalokitesvara addressed the Buddha and said: 
“World-honored One, how many varieties of abandoning the weakness of these passionate inclinations are manifested?” The Buddha answered the Bodhisattva Avalokite$vara and said: 
